Authors
Christopher Null
Number of Reviews
517

Title
Review for Cry, the Beloved Country (1995)
     We had an execution, jilted lovers, big-time payback, and at least
three sprawling examinations of someone's life.  Now we get an apartheid
film:  another in the string of "serious movies" coming out in the last
few weeks.
     CRY, THE BELOVED COUNTRY is James Earl Jones's magnum opus, a film in
which he gets to really stretch his range as an actor, even though the
film doesn't give him much room to do so.  The movie is the story of aging
Zulu priest Stephen Kumalo (Jones) and his search for his sister and son
in 1946 Johannesburg.  A stranger in a strange land, Kumalo soon finds his
country ways unsuited for life in the bustling city, and he is victimized
by thieves almost as soon as he arrives.
     Kumalo finds his sister soon enough:  she's a prostitute in the
seediest section of town.  Finding son Absalom is a different matter
altogether, and a convoluted investigation finally leads him to his son's
life of crime, a pregnant girlfriend, and the sort-of-accidental murder of
a prominent, white, social reformer.  To make matters worse, this man is
the son of Kumalo's wealthy neighbor, James Jarvis (Richard Harris). 
Kumalo becomes wrapped up in his son's trial, but more interestingly,
attempts to reconcile things with Jarvis.
     Harris and Jones are amazing when on screen together, but this is all
too rare, as they interact in only three brief scenes.  The rest of the
picture is very beautiful, but its deliberate, plodding pace seems to drag
the movie on for an eternity.  There's no big surprise about what's going
to happen, but the sheer heart that Jones, Harris, and director Darrell
James Roodt have imbued to the film give it an uncommon bouyance and it
manages to rise above its flawed pacing.
     The message of CRY, THE BELOVED COUNTRY, that compassion and
forgiveness are crucial if society is to develop to the next level, is
almost completely foreign in cinema today.  And it is that compassion that
makes this picture so oddly memorable.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
     It's been over two years since Canadian auteur Atom Egoyan first came to
my attention with his breakthrough film EXOTICA.  Since then, I've become
something of an aficionado of his works through home video, and it was with
breathless anticipation that I awaited what was sure to be the movie that
pushed him into the mainstream: THE SWEET HEREAFTER.
     Maybe I over-hyped it in my mind, becoming too hopeful in the face of
overwhelming praise for the film.  Or maybe I know Egoyan's tricks too well by
now.  Either way, I left the film extremely pleased but depressed: partly
because the movie is such a downer, and partly because I know Egoyan can do
even better.
     This time around, Atom uses his multiple time-line storytelling to relay
the events surrounding the tragedy when a school bus careens off an icy road
in a sleepy town in the Great White North.  When lawyer Ian Holm swoops in to
build a negligence case against the bus manufacturer and the city, he becomes
the unwitting agent as the revealer of the dirty secrets that everyone within
seems to hide.
     It almost sounds like David Lynch territory, and without his trademark
glorious revelation--a scene the binds all the characters' lives together and
which Egoyan traditionally ends his films with--it almost is.  Instead of
pumping up the mystery, Egoyan has opted for a slower pace of gradually
revealing the secrets behind the facade... something that probably makes the
film more accessible to the masses, but is less pleasing on the whole.  Then
again, Holm is in the role of his life here, and the movie is absolutely worth
seeing if only for his performance.
     Don't get me wrong.  THE SWEET HEREAFTER is a *riveting* film, one that I
encourage you to see, as long as you aren't feeling suicidal, as it really is
deeply depressing.  At the same time, I also urge you to check out EXOTICA,
CALENDAR, and THE ADJUSTER on home video.  If nothing else, you'll come out
feeling normal, no matter how nuts you really are.
Director: Atom Egoyan
Producer: Atom Egoyan, Camelia Frieberg
Writer: Atom Egoyan
Starring: Ian Holm, Maury Chaykin, Gabrielle Rose, Peter Donaldson, Bruce
Greenwood, David Hemblen, Brooke Johnson, Arsinée Khanjian, Tom McCamus,
Stephanie Morgenstern, Earl Pastko, Sarah Polley
http://www.flf.com/sweet/index.html
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Powder (1995)
     Once in awhile, Hollywood manages to surprise me with an
uncompromising film full of genuine emotion and enough to make you
really think.  POWDER was completely unexpected: it's easily one of the
best films I've seen all year.
     Something of an updated, hybridized E.T., POWDER is the story of
an albino teenager (Sean Patrick Flanery) with strange powers of
telekinesis, empathy, and the ability to channel and absorb raw
energy.  As Powder says, "I'm not like other people."  That's putting
it lightly.
     His mother is struck by lightning before Powder's birth, and he is
born premature, an apparent freak of nature.  His redneck father will
have nothing to do with him, and Powder ends up in his grandparent's
basement until his teens.  When Powder finally emerges from hiding, the
small Texas town has no idea what to make of him, and typical of
Southern paranoids, he is immediately ostracized as a social deviant.
     It soon becomes apparent that Powder is more than just an
extremely pale kid, as some subtle and not-so-subtle changes begin to
take effect, and we find that the outcasts among us can really be the
greatest of people.  Powder reflects the deconstruction of all that's
wrong with society, and the film manages to hammer home its messages of
peace, tolerance, and the cessation of fear without ever becoming
preachy.
     POWDER manages to take this kind of story to new and better
heights than its predecessors.  Powder is a recluse, but unlike NELL,
we can understand and sympathize with him.  Powder is the embodiment of
virtue, but unlike FORREST GUMP, he is not just a victim of
circumstance.  And Powder is imbued with supernatural ability, but
unlike E.T., we can relate to his persecution on an individual level.
     POWDER probably deserves a dozen Academy Award nominations,
especially for Flanery's jaw-dropping leading role.  The makeup, which
had to literally be painted on, is almost surreal, and writer/director
Victor Salva (who's done virtually nothing before this) deserves my
highest praise.  The special effects are groundbreaking, the camerawork
(shot in and around Houston) is excellent, and the supporting cast of
Jeff Goldblum, Mary Steenburgen, and Lance Henriksen is solid.
     This probably isn't a film for the brain-dead hordes of moviegoers
looking for mindless eye candy.  It requires a little commitment on the
viewer's part, but it's well worth it.  In the end, POWDER is a
stirring example of what to do right, not only in filmmaking, but in
living one's life as well.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
     With his highly anticipated JURASSIC PARK sequel, Steven Spielberg
grubs through the filmmaking archives for every plot device, camera
trick, and cliched scene you can think of, and rolls it into one big
mess.  Only with dinosaurs.  Lots of 'em!
     With the low-angle, out-of-focus, washed-out photography, it looks
like Spielberg slapped this thing together on his weekends away from
DreamWorks.  The result is a film that's mostly painful to watch save
for a few big action sequences (admittedly impressive) and a finale that
other critics are certain to ruin for you.
     THE LOST WORLD (plot: more dinosaurs) follows the "Action! --
s-l-o-w exposition -- Action! -- s-l-o-w exposition" sequence of events,
an exercise which really bogs down the beginning of the film, and
combined with just plain goofy plot development (hunters on
motorcycles?  patching a baby T. Rex's broken leg?) robs the movie of
any real terror.  Not even Julianne Moore -- probably best known for
being my favorite actress -- can help much.  So to compensate, Spielberg
calls for many, many automobiles to be toppled over.
     Throw in your sequel-begging ending (don't do it!) and you've got
the makings of a franchise headed the way of Spielberg's first big
monster movie -- Jaws.  JURASSIC PARK 3-D, anyone?  I didn't think so.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
     Take a little BRAVEHEART, take a little BEOWULF.  Mix them together
with a bit of THE GOONIES, and you've got yourself THE 13TH WARRIOR
     Here, at last, is a movie that is *exactly* what you expect it's
going to be.  From the opening scene, where Ahmed Ibn Fahdlan (Bandaras)
is shipped across the world for political reasons, to the end, where
Ahmed finds himself an unlikely hero amidst a group of Norse warriors,
this is a traditional, big, action movie from start to finish.
     There's no mysterious surprise or turn of events.  The bad guys
(aka `The Eaters of the Dead,' taking their name from the Michael
Crichton book on which this film is based) are just a bunch of bad guys
with no reason for being bad.  The good guys are a bunch of Nordic
barbarians that spit, insult one another, and seem to enjoy pain.
Banderas is an Asian Zorro.  The movie clocks in just under two hours,
whereupon you get up from your seat and leave the theater, trying to
form an opinion about what you've just seen.
     And I found that incredibly difficult to do.  THE 13TH WARRIOR is
simply without thrills and excitement.  It's also without any huge
negatives that would compel me to tell you to avoid the movie.  It's
just *there*.
     And that's hardly worth getting excited about, for good or for
bad.  Skip this one, and check out the *other* McTiernan film playing
right now: THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR.
Director: John McTiernan
Producer: John McTiernan, Michael Crichton, Ned Dowd
Writer: William Wisher, Warren Lewis
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Vladimir Kulich, Dennis Storhoi, Daniel
Southern, Neil Maffin
http://www.the13thwarrior.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Crumb (1994)
     When the HOOP DREAMS scandal was going on earlier this year, there
was a second documentary commonly mentioned as having been likewise
robbed alongside the basketball film.  That movie was CRUMB, the
equally ambitious and deserving portrait of the infamous
artist/cartoonist Robert Crumb.
     Crumb was the creator of such works as the drawing, "Keep on
Truckin'," which became an icon adorning every truck mud flap in the
1960's, the cover art for Big Brother and the Holding Company's album
"Cheap Thrills," and the character Fritz the Cat, which had the dubious
distinction of starring in the first X-rated feature animated film.
     One of the first things we find out about the artist:  he
basically hates all of these works, for one reason or another.  In
fact, there's not a lot that Crumb likes at all about his career to
date.  He basically shuns the underground comic movement that he
started.  He refuses almost all commercial propositions.  He despises
modern society and, seemingly, humanity as well.
     This new film by Terry Zwigoff is an eye-popping shocker, delving
unflinchingly into questions of Crumb's hatred of females, questions of
racism, his traumatic childhood, and his extremely twisted family.
Crumb makes no apologies.  Like most documentaries, there's no cohesive
plotline here, only slow and inexorable revelations about the artist's
life, filmed over a six-year period.  Despite the meandering story
line, the film is quite engrossing, not so much due to the extensive
parade of Crumb's work that is displayed, but more to the cast of
characters inhabiting this strange, strange world.
     Crumb's family are the most enthralling of these characters,
especially his two brothers.  Their stories of growing up as outcasts,
their abusive father, their amphetamine-abusing mother, and the birth
of their respective "careers" in art are nothing short of fantastic.
The film starts to drag during some of the comic book readings and
during interviews with other characters who aren't quite as
enthralling, but overall the film is extremely worthwhile.
     The ultimate impression that stays with me is not just that Robert
Crumb is an extremely odd fellow, but more that he's a real person that
I doubt anyone will ever truly understand.

Title
Review for Clockers (1995)
     After the first two minutes of CLOCKERS, during which a parade of
bloody crime scene photos are splashed on the screen, you'll be ready
to put down your popcorn.  After the first fifteen minutes, you'll be
bored enough to go buy some more.
     You can't imagine how sick and tired I was of hearing the hype
surrounding CLOCKERS, Spike Lee's latest film about (surprise!)
African-Americans in Brooklyn who get into trouble with drugs, murder,
and betrayal.  Every other critic on the planet will probably say they
love CLOCKERS so as not to appear uncool.  I'll give it to you
straight.
     By and large, Lee has forgone the traditional concepts of
moviemaking (to tell a cohesive, interesting, entertaining story) in
favor of playing a lot of bad music, giving us some incomprehensible
and overlapping dialogue, photographing some meaningless low-light
images, and other sundry nonsense.  A plot does exist: Strike (Mekhi
Phifer) is a clocker (a drug dealer), and his boss (Delroy Lindo, a
shameless Samuel L. Jackson wannabe) sends Strike to kill the local
fast food franchise's night manager.  After all, who wouldn't?  The
cops (Harvey Keitel and John Turturro) close in, and everything comes
crashing down.
     To be honest, it never goes up high enough to crash, per se.  The
film just wallows in its hipper-than-thou attitude and never becomes
engaging in the least.  Characters come and go with no motivation,
spouting their lines as if...Spike Lee had written them for the
actors.  No one is likable at all.  Lee's ultra-stylish use of a
constantly moving camera gets old in about five minutes, annoying in
ten.  And the film just drones on and on ... for 132 very unnecessary
minutes.
     While CLOCKERS has its moments, they are few and far between.  By
the time the film starts to show some promise (about 90 minutes in),
it's much too late to save it.  Overall this is the perfect example of
how *not* to make a movie about the mean streets, coming off more like
a gory Movie of the Week than a feature film.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter & Novelist
-Contributing Editor, Mike's FEEDBACK  /  Film Critic, Texas Business Weekly
-[R]eply to be added to movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Things to Do in Denver When You're Dead (1995)
     The way I see it, any film starring Christopher Walken as a
quadriplegic gangster has to have something going for it.  And while
THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD has *something,* I'm not quite
sure what that is.
     Just you're typical gangster/melodrama/black comedy/romance flick,
THINGS TO DO... is a stylish story about a few days in the life of Jimmy
the Saint (Andy Garcia).  Jimmy plays a mobster-gone-good whose attempt at
legitimacy is a business known as "Afterlife Advice," where terminally ill
clients can videotape future advice for their loved ones.
     The Man With The Plan (Walken), Jimmy's old boss, soon calls him back
for a special job:  rough up the new boyfriend of The Man's son's
ex-girlfriend (got that?)--no big deal.  Jimmy then reassembles his old
team of hit men, including the leper "Pieces" (Christopher Lloyd),
Franchise (William Forsythe), Easy Wind (Bill Nunn), and the
beyond-hyperactive Critical Bill (Treat Williams in his fabled "comeback"
role).  In case you haven't figured it out yet, THINGS TO DO... is not
exactly long on tastefulness.
     To make the overly long story short:  the gang manages to completely
screw up the job, Jimmy finds himself falling in love with a girl named
Dagney (Gabrielle Anwar), and a whole lot of folks get whacked.  When you
sort all this out, you get a plot that's mildly interesting and sometimes
funny but is mainly a tedious exercise in attempted hipness. 
Incidentally, Scott Rosenberg's script was written in two weeks...and you
can tell.
     The film has its fun moments and first-timer Gary Fleder's direction
isn't too tough on the viewer (it's about as aesthetically pleasing as any
film made in Denver can get).  Williams's performance is further
over-the-top than I've seen since Jack Nicholson in BATMAN (not that
that's a bad thing), and Fairuza Balk also turns in a startling
performance as Jimmy's favorite hooker.
     Other than these elements, THINGS TO DO IN DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD is
merely average--a nice place to visit, but I wouldn't want to die there.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
     I realize, right from the start, that absolutely *nothing* I say
about BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA is going to sway you at all, one
way or another, about whether or not to see the film.
     Nevertheless, I'm going to comment, mainly out of habit.
     If you've read this far, I just have to wonder -- what are you
expecting from this film?  A work of genius?  A breakthrough performance
for the two delinquent boys made famous by MTV?  What kind of a bunghole
reads a review of a Beavis and Butt-head movie without knowing from the
start exactly what's coming???
     BEAVIS AND BUTT-HEAD DO AMERICA is exactly what it claims to be --
no more, no less.  It's about 78 minutes of spare animation, butt jokes,
rock & roll music, and enough Technicolor slapstick to... um, well,
um... hu-huh... I said "stick."
     Okay, now *I've* got Mike Judge's grating characters on the brain,
so I've got to give him credit.  Who would have thought that in the time
it takes to eat lunch, two kids who do nothing but watch TV all day
could get involved with a tale of a stolen biological warfare device,
hitmen, ATF agents, and the collapse of Hoover Dam, and live to watch TV
again?  Far-fetched, you say?  It's a *cartoon*, people.
     Well, the film is already destined to be a cult classic, I'm sure,
so I guess you'd better see it too.  For the record, the jokes are above
average for typical B&B material, there are a number of celebrity voice
cameos that I won't spoil for you, plus enough movie spoofs to entertain
even a non-fan of the show.  And, it's only 78 minutes long -- it's
like, you can either catch the movie, or you can watch an episode of
"Baywatch."  Take your pick.
     In the end, I was relatively amused and entertained.  Beavis and
Butt-head "do" America -- in every sense of the title -- and the movie
is simply a fine homage to a movie whose parts add up to less than its
whole.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member James Brundage.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/4b7b7d09beeaed148825695a004f6b0b?OpenDocument
When you enter into the world of entertainment journalism, you think
it's the coolest thing in the world.  Suddenly, doors are opened for
you.  You can get into movies free, or get books free, or get music
free.  You can meet directors or movie stars, see rock gods face to
face, and get to ask Kurt Vonnegut that question that has burned in your
gut for years.  For some odd reason, people call you names.  They call
you evil and the enemy, but you really don't care.  You just are
thrilled to be there, be part of this intangible "it" known as
celebrity.
Eventually, you have to choose between telling the truth and being nice.
You have to choose between playing the PR game and making a friend.  And
if you're like just about anyone else out there, this probably is the
first moral stance that you've ever really had to take.
Of course it doesn't help that you're functioning in an adult world, and
this is your experience of growing up.  It doesn't help if you lived
your life smarter than those that surrounded you only to find out that
when you come into your new world you are still an outcast.
And it doesn't help when you are presented with a true journalistic
challenge like Almost Famous, a movie that throws down the gauntlet at
press and asks it not necessarily to review it badly but to be honest. 
To try to have that ideal that we all remember with fondness and
longing to be objective.
In Almost Famous, William Miller (Patrick Fugit) is just a kid who wants
to be cool.  He's been skipped ahead two grades and entered first grade
a year early.  His mother is an eccentric college professor that
celebrates Christmas in September so it won't be commercialized.  And
his sister ran away to a tune of Simon and Garfunkel when he was 11.
In 1973, he meets up with the infamous rock critic Lester Bangs (Philip
Seymour Hoffman) who both warns him about going into the profession of
entertainment journalism and also assigns him to cover a Black Sabbath
concert for $35.  This quickly leads backstage with the (fictitious)
band Stillwater, because Miller is fan enough to be admitted into their
world.  The Black Sabbath article leads to a Rolling Stone assignment:
cover Stillwater's tour, where William must learn to enjoy life, make
the right moral choices, keep on the goods with his mom, save a girl
from a drug overdose here and there, and still try to be back in time
for graduation.
It's such a positivist message that if the movie weren't so damn good
I'd puke.
As a director, Crowe has done his job perfectly.  He has crafted a film
that is mutually entertaining to outsiders of the industry and insiders,
nostalgic without being patronizing, humorous, slick looking, and well
acted.  He has directed newcomer Patrick Fugit to an incredible debut
while providing solid material for Fugit to build upon.
As a writer, Crowe falters slightly.  Although Almost Famous works
incredibly well as a drama, its comic attempts tend to be more
contrived.  Certain scenes, such as one where the Stillwater is about to
crash in a plane, end up completely contrived to the point where my
rating dropped half a star because of it.  Yet the most curious part of
the film is not that Crowe has made minor flaws, but that he openly says
that he is ready to take flack for his flaws.
You see, towards the end of the movie Crowe makes a point of saying to
William (and, indirectly, to the press watching the movie), "Write what
you want."  He is effectively letting us off the hook, and placing
himself in the position to be criticized.  For that I both respect him
and Almost Famous all the more.
But as previously stated, Almost Famous does have its flaws.  Biopic or
spin pic, Almost Famous comes off as oftentimes a contrived comedy
injected like bad heroin into an otherwise thoughtful drama, and it
almost overdoses on this clichéd comedy more than a few times.  It's as
if Crowe challenges us to think, and then tells our brains to shut the
hell up as we watch Fairuza Balk slam headfirst into a concrete barrier
(and then ironically turn up on the bus the next day without a
scratch).  And while this blend of brain candy and food for thought
might be fine for most people, I'd rather Crowe had chosen one path or
the other, instead of having one that ends up striking the audience as
useless and unfunny.
It would have been great if Crowe focused more on the dynamic among
Penny Lane (Kate Hudson), Russell Hammond (Billy Crudup), and William,
instead of wasting time listening to Jason Lee do his best Chasing Amy
impression (ironically, there is a sort of homoerotic suggestion towards
the end a la the infamous scene in Chasing Amy), instead of giving us
more images about the funny stories of Rock 'n' Roll.  We've seen
rockumentaries before, gotten the scoop anecdotes, and heard all of the
stories about The Who time and again.  Almost Famous's pulling rock
stories out of its hat (or some other orifice) is akin to that kid
spoutning the annoying weight-of-the-human-brain statistic in Crowe's
last movie, Jerry Maguire.  Save us.
Still, Almost Famous is worth a watch.  You will either find it as drama
with comedic detritus or comedy with dramatic detritus, but will
probably come away smiling whichever way you look at it, and you will
probably gloss over the flaws in a matter of weeks, days, or even hours.
Director: Cameron Crowe
Producer: Ian Bryce, Cameron Crowe
Writer: Cameron Crowe 
Starring: Billy Crudup, Frances McDormand, Kate Hudson, Jason Lee,
Patrick Fugit, Anna Paquin, Fairuza Balk, Noah Taylor, Philip Seymour
Hoffman
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for White Man's Burden (1995)
     What would happen if race roles in America were reversed?  What if
blacks had all the power, and whites had to fight prejudice and racism at
every turn?  Such is the setting of writer/director Desmond Nakano's
brilliant new film, WHITE MAN'S BURDEN.
     The movie is a tightly constructed drama about Louis Pinnock (John
Travolta), a reliable blue collar man who works in a factory owned by
high-society elitist Thaddeus Thomas (Harry Belafonte).  At home, Louis
has to deal with a rough neighborhood, gang violence, and trying to
provide for his wife (Kelly Lynch) and two kids.
     Just when things are looking up for the Pinnocks, Louis is suddenly
fired from his job, beaten by police after "fitting the description," and
then evicted from his home.  Desperate, he tries to get Thaddeus to hear
his case for reinstatement.  When he won't listen, Louis kidnaps him, and
the story *really* starts to take off.
     What follows is a compelling, thought-provoking study of racism and
the frightening economic and societal realities it can create.  Nakano's
script is masterful at challenging every preconceived notion we have, and
Oscar-deserving performances by Travolta and Belafonte really bring his
words to life.  The pair have an incredible chemistry on screen, as
Travolta finally shakes his slick, pompous stereotyping for a much meatier
part.  The comic relief is very well-done, also, and the film never
wallows into the hopeless despair that other "victim of circumstance"
stories tend to do.
     I was initially skeptical that WHITE MAN'S BURDEN would be any good,
but Nakano's unique vision proved me very wrong.  While he stops a little
short on pushing the film to its limit, it's still a nearly flawless
example of how modern cinema ought to be done, unadulterated by Hollywood
glitz and driving its message home with a hammer.
     I continue to think about one of Thaddeus's biting remarks early in
the film, where he implies that whites are genetically inferior and
"beyond being helped."  I also think about the four rowdy skinhead punks
(who somehow managed to get passes) sitting behind me, ashamed that the
message was lost on these cretins.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Restaurant (1998)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Athan Bezaitis.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/16b0ca3b85bae527882568ab005bf109?OpenDocument
They might as well have called this movie J. T. MCCLURE'S, which is the
name of the "restaurant" where all the film's characters work.  That
would have at least helped to add a little mystery and some flare to
such a pitiable title.   Thankfully, the film itself is a whole lot
better than the name might indicate.  RESTAURANT, directed by Eric
Bross, spins the story of a group of young twenty-somethings struggling
to reach their dreams of fame, while working at an upscale bar and grill
in Hoboken, New Jersey.   It's got that sort of SWINGERS humor and
mentality, mixed with a diverse cast and much more serious themes.
Our protagonist is the restaurant's bartender, Chris Calloway (Adrien
Brody - SUMMER OF SAM, SIX WAYS TO SUNDAY), a struggling playwright
weaving his real life problems into his first play -- a work in progress
that he can't seem to finish.  When he meets the newest waitress Jeanine
(Elise Neal - MISSION TO MARS) and they hit it off, he's faced with his
second interracial relationship (the first being Lauryn Hill, who we see
mostly as a picture on the refrigerator).  Chris can't figure out why he
likes black women so much, especially after his Italian father raised
him to be a bigot.  This dilemma is portrayed in his unfinished play,
which is the story of a white man that can't deal with the external
pressures of having a black girlfriend, even though he's madly in love.
As he tries to make sense of his feelings, he gets caught up in the past
when his ex (Hill) shows up at a friend's wedding.  Because his
relationship with her ended on such a bizarre note, he can't put it
behind him, which prevents him from devoting his heart to Jeanine, and
finally, thwarts him from finishing the play.  Whew!
Fortunately, the movie is not as mushy as the plot may sound.  Chris has
some pretty interesting friends who all face issues of their own.
Malcolm Jamal-Warner, from "The Cosby Show," is a Howard University
graduate who is relegated to the position of waiter because he's black,
even though he's a qualified bartender.  Jesse Martin, from "Ally
McBeal," is an intelligent man stuck as a line cook who offers
rationalizations regarding the white stigmatization of the N-word.
David Moscow (NEWSIES) plays Reggae, the head chef content with his
existence as a pothead, soliciting prostitutes with regularity, and
considering himself to be from "the hood" even though he's white.  Ethan
(Michael Stoyanov) is also a waiter, but happens to be homosexual and
finds he can't get promoted even after years of loyal service.  The
whirlwind of tumult causes the movie to run a little long, but it's
actually much needed in order to make its powerful statement for racial
tolerance.  Essentially, the film comes to grips with a plethora of
controversial issues that we've all heard about in after-school specials
or seen in other movies before, but it's still entertaining thanks to a
blend of humorous dialogue and good acting.
At its core, RESTAURANT is an important movie for at least offering
another perspective on interracial relationships beyond Spike Lee's
JUNGLE FEVER.  I recommend it, and even non-Gen X'ers, at whom the film
is directed, are sure to get something positive from the movie.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Madadayo (1993)
It seems only fitting that Akira Kurosawa's last film (which he wrote
and directed) be an homage to teaching.  After all, he inspired many of
today's respected directors and is taught in film schools
internationally.  Madadayo is a sweetly overlong portrayal of an
interconnected community whose center is a beloved professor.
Madadayo opens with a Professor (Tatsuo Matsumura) announcing to his
class that after 30 years of teaching, he is now choosing to write in
retirement.  The young sing his praises and previous alumni move the
Professor and his wife into a new home.  The pair is as hospitable to
everyone as if they were children returning from college.
His students visit him constantly, trying to repay all his work with
whatever token of comfort they can.  Though he is still called Professor
and spins new tales, the relations no longer have the condescending
quality of talking down to a pupil.  The generation lines are blurred
more as the youths build a house for the couple when their new home has
been destroyed by air raids in the second World War.
With the perfect mix of humility, humor, and acceptance, it's easy to
understand the Professor's popularity.  He is idolized even when most
vulnerable.  It is also accepted when his alumni refuse to allow him to
wallow in self-pity.  As the standard of living decreases, the Professor
accepts his pupils as equals that much more, for each chips in to help.
Every year after his retirement, a Maadh Kai (translation: Are you
ready?) party is thrown in the Professor's honor.  They shout verses
back and forth to jokingly confirm to the entire community that he isn't
ready to die yet.  The tiresome length of these scenes is somewhat
abated by the contagious laughter and various toasts as to the nature of
the Professor's lessons.
The Professor is never shown in front of a class again, so his pupil's
words are the strongest indications of the type of mentor he was.  Added
to this is that the only time the young peers are shown communicating
without the Professor around is when they are talking about him. 
Matsumura carries the nucleus of the film well, with his subtle sarcasm
and silent revelry.  The script is also intelligent enough to display
the wonderful impact he has had on others' lives without having to bear
witness to a school lecture.
As kind and humbling as Madadayo is, the plot becomes monotonous.  Each
section simply presents something going wrong with the Professor's life,
and his students then resolve the issue.  One unending series of scenes
revolves around the revered older gentleman losing emotional control
over a cat that disappears.  The beauty of his visions about the missed
feline is intoxicating, as are the verses spoken, but the effect wears
off due to the long interval.
As with other foreign subtitled films, some of the culture-based jokes
won't have the same strength when translated, leaving the viewer at a
loss to understand why the characters are laughing.  The unique
collaboration between age groups is pleasant but it's difficult to
accept that these lads risk setting their mentor on the correct
emotional track only once.
Impeccably shot by Takao Saito, who was also the cinematographer for
Kurosawa's Ran and Dreams, it can be difficult to concentrate on what is
being said.  From lush gardens to stark devastation after World War II,
cultural details seem to flow past the screen.
Similar to Stand and Deliver and other "perfect teacher" movies,
Madadayo is a feel-good experience worth a rental, if only because the
central character is flawed, and therefore a more interesting study. 
The humor is contributes unexpectedly poignant satire, which is rarely
found in the peers of this genre.  However, for a truly brilliant
Kurosawa experience, check out his earlier work first.
Director: Akira Kurosawa
Producer: Hisao Kurosawa
Writer: Akira Kurosawa
Starring: Tatsuo Matsumura, Kyoko Kagawa, Hisashi Igawa, George Tokoro,
Masayuki Yui, Akira Terao, Asei Kobayashi, Takeshi Kusaka
http://www.ran2000.com/index.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
     For those keeping score, here's the new Hollywood movie formula: 
TWISTER - tornado + other disaster = $$$!
     $$$ may be right, but ***** is definitely not forthcoming, at least
not in the case of DANTE'S PEAK, a shameless and blatant rip-off of the
mildly entertaining aforementioned film that is largely responsible for
the return to prominence of the disaster movie.  This time around, it's
a volcano that threatens the peace of little Dante's Peak, and it's
Pierce Brosnan who comes to the rescue.
     Here's how frightening the similarities are.  Both films open with
a flashback explaining why this particular act of nature is so traumatic
to the hero (Helen Hunt in TWISTER, Brosnan in PEAK).  Both feature a
team of gosh-darn-nutty scientists investigating the disasters, plus an
unlikely romance-on-the-run for the leads.  Both sport far-too-crisp
digital effects.  Both are full of small-town kitsch (TWISTER is set in
the midwest, PEAK is a sleepy Northwestern village).  Both are full of
bad jokes and bad acting to go along with the bad weather.  Both have a
"grandma" character *and* a dog who are injured by the force of nature. 
Hell, both even feature a big red truck that gets destroyed by the
disaster in question!
     DANTE'S PEAK, trying to outdo TWISTER with a volcano, ups the level
of things that are destroyed, and it features lots of ash raining down,
flowing lava, and lots and lots of buildings blowing up(!)  And that's
really about it.  Really.
     But what makes PEAK so bad, where TWISTER was passably good?  Is it
the cheeseball dialogue and a really horrid performance from Linda
Hamilton?  Or is it the precocious children?  Is it the fact that if
everyone in the town of Dante's Peak wasn't dumber than a post, this
whole disaster would have been avoided (that means you, grandma)?
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Valentine (2001)
Well, here's something that will make you wish you'd stayed home to
watch Survivor instead of shelling out money at the movies.  Hell,
Valentine, another entry into the yearly, winter horror crapfest, even
makes Temptation Island look good.
What we've got here is your standard grade horror flick in the vein of
Scream and Urban Legend, revolving around a mysterious killer devising a
supposed revenge plot -- a geeky kid who got a Carrie pulled on him in
6th grade.  My how the tables have turned!  The bunch of girls who
refused to dance with him are now getting killed, 13 years later.  Has
this nobody returned from obscurity to exact his revenge for having
punch poured on him?
We'll have one med school coed get pinched during a midnight autopsy. 
And of course she will hide in a body bag in a futile attempt to escape
the man in the Cupid mask -- who's naturally doing his marauding on
Valentine's Day.  We'll see all manner of stabbings, shootings,
beheadings, boilings, and whatnot -- until 90 minutes later the killer
is unmasked.
The film presents us an oh-so-clever puzzler -- is it the 6th grader
come back to haunt the girls?  Is it one of their dates?  Another man
from the past?  The cop?  Or maybe it's the fisherman they ran over and
left for dead on a winding road.  The possibilities are as endless as
they are random.
Valentine is headlined by actresses Denise Richards and Marley Shelton
(who, with this and Sugar & Spice, appears to be on the Molly Ringwald
road to career suicide), plus a gaggle of totally unknown supporting
actresses whose only requirement for appearance appears to have been
having very large breasts.  (And despite this there's no nudity in the
film at all!)
David Boreanaz joins the ladies in a truly pathetic role, stumbling
through his lines like he has a hangover.  No surprise: His character is
a recovering alcoholic.
Prefaced by stern and multiple verbal warnings that Valentine is "very
scary and very intense," sadly, we find the only very that applies to
this film is very stupid.  Simply, thrills are utterly lacking in the
film.  The murders are fully expected, unoriginal, and lacking in even
the most basic sense of horror.  And Cupid makes for a stalker about as
frightening as Mary Poppins.
Maybe the only thing dumber than the film itself is the way it is
credited: four screenwriters appear to have fought over the writing
credit, but the director refused to put his name on the film (Jamie
Blanks is an alias).  Now that's horror.
Director: Jamie Blanks
Producer: Dylan Sellers
Writer: Donna Powers, Wayne Powers, Gretchen J. Berg, Aaron Harberts
Starring: David Boreanaz, Denise Richards, Marley Shelton, Jessica
Capshaw, Jessica Cauffiel, Katherine Heigl, Fulvio Cecere, Daniel
Cosgrove, Johnny Whitworth
http://valentinemovie.warnerbros.com
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
     And I thought I'd seen some twisted movies.  Get ready for the real
psych-out of the year, the long-awaited Jennifer Lopez vehicle The Cell,
the most daring production to come out of Hollywood since Fight Club.
     Note however that daring does not necessarily mean good.  While The
Cell is a deeply disturbing picture, it doesn't always impress.  And
though I am fine with digitally vivisectioning a horse into ten
quivering pieces for dramatic effect, I'm not sure I needed to see
Vincent D'Onofrio poking a hole in Vince Vaughn's stomach in order to
pick out some intestine to spiral around a rotisserie.  (No, really.)
     The Cell is a hodgepodge of The Silence of the Lambs and
Dreamscape, with bits of Psycho and Kiss the Girls thrown in for
effect.  The film opens by introducing us to Catherine (Lopez), an
ex-social worker now employed by an experimental medical company that
can connect two minds together via a funky machine.  In practice, this
is being used by Catherine to try to heal a young kid now in a coma. 
But kid-in-coma does not a thriller make, so to spice things up,
Catherine is given the chance to enter the mind of the also-comatose
Carl Stargher (D'Onofrio), a serial killer who secrets his victims away
in a glass cell for 40 hours, until the cell fills with water and they
drown.  (The convolution gets more forced than that, but I'll spare
you.)
     Vaughn plays FBI agent Peter Novak, who rushes Stargher to
Catherine's offices so she can jump into his brain to locate the
well-hidden glass cell where Stargher's final victim is still awaiting
her watery doom.  Through an increasingly bizarre turn of events, Novak
hops in as well.  Considerable mucking around ensues.
     The Cell owes its freakiness not just to some whacked subject
matter, but also to a truly bizarre use of photographic tricks. 
Slow-motion, fast-motion, upside-down, sideways, underwater,
hallucination-inducing graphics -- you name it, The Cell has it -- and
it often combines them for an even bigger effect.  Add in a
demonic-looking D'Onofrio and Lopez's even stranger wardrobe and you've
got the makings for a movie that's going to give plenty of pre-teens
nightmares when they catch it late at night on HBO.
     The Cell is certainly not for all tastes.  In fact, it may not be
for any tastes.  Pure freak fans will likely be happy, but real
moviegoers will probably be disappointed.  For example, while the story
is twisted enough to make any closet Lynchian giddy, there are enough
stupid holes in it to make the entire go-inside-his-mind plot
irrelevant.  In the end, Carl's brain dump doesn't provide the clues to
the cell's whereabouts, the answer is sitting right there in his
real-world basement.
     With its ultra-hip sensibility, cool threads, and post-modern
thematics ("the cell" as metaphor for the human mind, get it?), The Cell
is clearly a movie to be treasured, hated, and debated by wannabe film
snobs.  But did I actually like it, you ask?  I'm still trying to figure
that one out.  Ask my shrink.
Director: Tarsem Singh
Producer: Julio Caro, Eric McLeod
Writer: Mark Protosevich
Starring: Jennifer Lopez, Vince Vaughn, Vincent D'Onofrio, Marianne
Jean-Baptiste, Jake Weber, Dylan Baker
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for "Riget" (1994) (mini)
     This is what would happen if you let David Lynch loose on the set of
"ER" with nothing but a TV camera, a gaggle of Danish actors, and a bone
saw.  THE KINGDOM, an extremely ambitious effort for both the filmmakers
and the audience, is Denmark's hipper-than-thou answer to "Twin Peaks."
     I'm not even going to attempt to explain the plot of THE KINGDOM, as
it could fill several pages and still not make a lick of sense.  I'll
leave it at this:  "The Kingdom" is a giant Copenhagen hospital, and every
single room in it (and most of the corridors, and the driveway, and the
parking lot) contains at least one complete wacko.
     The dearth of information about this "film" belies its true
beginnings as a serialized TV show in Denmark.  The movie version of THE
KINGDOM is nothing more than the first 4 episodes (of a planned 13) from
this television show slapped back to back, converted to film, and played
in all its grainy glory on the big screen.  (Note!  This means it's *5
hours* long.  Really.)  In fact, watching THE KINGDOM is a very TV-like
experience.  The only things missing are the commercials and a ringing
telephone.  Of course, I'm not one to watch 5 hours of TV in one sitting. 
I left after Episode 2, as it's pretty clear where the "movie" is going
and that there's not going to be a "big finish" after Episode 4.
     This is not to say that THE KINGDOM isn't worth watching.  Rather,
you *have* to know what you're getting into.  Here's some of what you
get:  a child's ghost living in an elevator shaft, patients holding a
seance in their room, bizarre cults of doctors akin to the Masons, an
intern who decapitates a corpse to impress his love, a phantom
ambulance...and that's just Episode 1.  What you don't get is this:  much
background music, a discernibly strong plotline, a camera in focus,
character motivations, or just about anything else you typically expect to
find in the world of film.  In other words, THE KINGDOM is all but
destined to become a phenomenal cult hit.
     Occasionally, THE KINGDOM overcomes its meandering flaws and
completely shocks the audience with some truly powerful scenes.  However,
most of the time, the movie is just plain weird, and it defies description
in any other way.  If your butt can handle 5 hours in a movie theater and
this sounds like your cup of tea, don't miss it.  Otherwise, wait for
video...and get the 3-day rental.  You'll need it.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
     Just when you thought "high concept" couldn't get any lower....
     That's right, it's an amazing double negative that hasn't
successfully been pulled off since SOUTH PARK:  A movie that's
incredibly stupid yet fall-down funny.
     How stupid?  Here's the plot:  Washed-up actors from a 1960's
sci-fi TV show called "Galaxy Quest" are mistaken for a real starship
crew and are whisked to the stars to do battle with an evil entity.
     How funny?  Well, it's not SOUTH PARK funny, but it's frankly one
of the better comedies of the year.
     "Star Trek" fans -- you are being mocked.  But don't take it
personally.  If you can laugh at your inner geek, you'll find GALAXY
QUEST immensely entertaining and enjoyable.  I was a STAR WARS fan and
didn't really grow up with "Star Trek," but I got a real kick out of the
self-loathing of the likes of the tired character actors played by
Rickman and Shalhoub.  However, it's Sigourney Weaver who strikes her
most memorable character since Lt. Ripley of ALIEN's Nostromo.  As the
blond and buxom "Tawny Madison," she owns the part and every scene she's
in.  While pairing her with goofball Tim Allen is liking casting pearls
before swine, Allen does redeem himself with a spot-on Shatner homage.
     Getting inside the twisted mindset of the 'Trek geek is much more
fun than you might think, and GALAXY QUEST plays all the genre's clichés
out to the hilt.  In this case, that's a good thing.  Just pray that we
don't see a sequel.  But knowing "Star Trek,"....
Director: Dean Parisot
Producer: Suzann Ellis, Mark Johnson, Charles Newirth
Writer: Robert Gordon, David Howard
Starring: Tim Allen, Sigourney Weaver, Tony Shalhoub, Daryl Mitchell,
Enrico Colantoni, Sam Rockwell, Missi Pyle
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Tumbleweeds (1999)
     Mother and daughter pack up from hillbilly land and head for
California: Does it sound like we've been over this ground before?
     The similarities between TUMBLEWEEDS and ANYWHERE BUT HERE (the
corpse of which is not even cold) are astonishing.  In TUMBLEWEEDS, Mom
Mary Jo (McTeer) is a put-upon single mother; daughter Ava (Brown) is
brash and headstrong.  The two drive to California, intent on "starting
over," -- in the case of TUMBLEWEEDS, an escape from physical abuse, or
at least the treat of it.  ANYWHERE BUT HERE: same story, sans the
abuse.
     Both films bumble through experiences with lovers (mother and
daughter), school, work, and the other rigors of daily life, eventually
focusing on the relationship between mom and kid.
     The former movie was a piece of junk, and TUMBLEWEEDS is not a
terribly better movie than the disaster of ANYWHERE BUT HERE.  It's safe
to say that your feelings about one will apply to the other.
TUMBLEWEEDS does manage to redeem itself above its competitor, though.
For starters, cross-eyed British actress McTeer does an astonishing job
at playing West Virginian.  Brown's Ava is sure to launch her on a Jena
Malone-path to child stardom.  And the supporting characters are
universally good in this film, unlike the former.
     But perhaps the most astonishing facet of TUMBLEWEEDS is the
discovery that it was co-written and directed by one Gavin O'Connor, who
turns out to play the post-dumb, not-quite-abusive truck driver
boyfriend from whom Mary Jo and Ava eventually run away.  That alone
makes TUMBLEWEEDS interesting as a curiosity.  O'Connor should be put in
a museum next to Forest Whitaker.
     In the film, these tumbleweeds ultimately have to decide whether or
not to settle down, and that at least gives the movie some closure.  The
story along the way is choppy and predictable, with the exception of a
few gross-out moments: I'm quite sure I could have done without the
mother-daughter farting scene.
Director: Gavin O'Connor
Producer: Greg O'Connor
Writer: Gavin O'Connor, Angela Shelton
Starring: Janet McTeer, Kimberly Brown, Gavin O'Connor, Jay O. Sanders,
Lois Smith, Laurel Holloman
http://www.tumbleweeds-movie.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for Nick of Time (1995)
     The experiment was this:  Make an action/suspense movie that takes
place in *real time.*  That is, ninety minutes of film shows us ninety
consecutive minutes in the lives of the hero and villains.  Real time
has been done before (see also Alfred Hitchcock's ROPE, which is not
only in real time, but has the appearance of being one continuous shot
with no cuts).  Real time has never been done quite like this.
     In NICK OF TIME, director John Badham has taken a traditional
three-act thriller and jammed it into a sparse 90 minutes.  The plot
follows accountant Gene Watson (Johnny Depp), now a single father of
seven-year old Lynn (Courtney Chase).  Arriving at Union Station in
downtown Los Angeles, Gene and Lynn are picked from the crowd by the
enigmatic Mr. Smith (Christopher Walken) for a devious task.  Smith
gives Gene a gun and a little over an hour to commit a murder or else
his daughter will be killed.  The catch?  The target is the governor of
California (Marsha Mason).  Watson then has to balance the life of his
daughter with the far-ranging conspiracy he finds himself caught up
in.  And time is running out.
     The main problem is that the plot is basically silly, because
*everywhere* Watson goes, he finds another flunkie working for Smith.
Even some of those closest to the governor are in on it, any number of
whom could pull the trigger, certainly better than some accountant
picked from the train station.  But Smith's scheme is to frame Watson
as a nut case so Smith can walk off scott free, and because Smith
follows the flustered Watson around all the time, after forty-five
minutes you know he'd be better off letting Watson go and shooting the
governor himself, just to end the hassle.
     Good pacing and the experimental nature of the film tend to
overcome the lack of an engaging plot.  Of course, real time generally
means dead time, and Badham does a good job at keeping things moving so
you never get bored.  I'm not sure what it says about the film, but
keeping track of whether they're really on schedule with the frequent
shots of clocks is as much fun as watching the movie itself.  The
numerous scares indigenous to the thriller genre are also plentiful.
     Depp's acting is plain, and Walken hams it up until his character
has become the typical complete joke that he's becoming well-known
for.  The horrid Roma Maffia, as Smith's sidekick, almost manages to
bring the film crashing down, but she thankfully doesn't have enough
lines to cause too much damage.  Worth watching for is Charles Dutton
as a crusty, disabled shoe shine man who becomes Watson's only friend
and ally.
     Given that NICK OF TIME won't be a smashing success, it'll be some
time before the real-time experiment is tried again.  I'm looking
forward to another one, though.  But next time, folks, lets try to get
some criminals that aren't so completely stupid.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Urban Legends: Final Cut (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Max Messier.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/e70007c21d46af3d8825696100046fb9?OpenDocument
Words I thought I'd never write: the sequel to Urban Legend lacks the
grace, wit, and power of the original.
Put the gun to my head, pull the trigger, and put me out of my misery. 
Better yet, put the horror genre out of its misery.  When you've
finished watching Urban Legends: Final Cut, you'll share my same grim
point of view thanks to the horrible acting, terrible script, and
ridiculous directing which has become all too common today.
Urban Legends: Final Cut is a smorgasbord of stolen movie ideas (mainly
from The Blair Witch Project and Scream): Fabulous people with perfect
teeth and skin, one creepy film school, and a dog eating a freshly
removed kidney from one of the movie's hapless victims.  Urban Legends
delivers a story about a bunch of film students working on their thesis
films to win the coveted "Hitchcock Award" which guarantees the winner a
director deal in Hollywood.
One female filmmaker (Jennifer Morrison, the freaky dead girl from Stir
of Echoes) writes a fiction script based on a serial killer who kills
his victims according to "urban legend" tales.  Suddenly, her entire
crew starts getting bumped off with urban-legendary homicides, but the
bodies are always missing and she is often the only witness to the
killings.  The killer wears a fencing mask and a long black overcoat,
looking like a scorned Olympian out to avenge his defeat in Sydney.  Why
this is scary is never explained.
Of course, the golden rule of sequels is that there must be least one
recurring character for continuity's sake.  Urban Legends has one minor,
recurring character from the original who we never cared about anyway
(the security guard, of all people).  The other central problem is that
this character has already seen the urban legend killings once before,
but she's utterly clueless about what's going on around her.  Call it
suspension of disbelief.
This film is also a prime example of how horror films are now completely
dead in the water.  The last decent horror film was The Blair Witch
Project, and that seemed more like a snuff film than fiction.  The
stalking killer with crazy motivation has become a tired cliché, as
everyone seems to have forgotten: Real horror is not about what is seen
but about what is unknown.
Director: John Ottman
Writers: Paul Harris Boardman, Scott Derrickson
Producers: Gina Matthews, Neal Moritz
Starring: Jennifer Morrison, Matthew Davis, Joey Lawrence, Anson Mount,
Hart Bochner
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/urbanlegends/index.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for But I'm a Cheerleader (1999)
     Take director Jon Waters and give him a really good actress like
Natasha Lyonne, a paltry budget of, say, $1 million, and ask him to make
a satire about a "gay rehab camp," and you might come up with something
like But I'm a Cheerleader.
     Then again, Waters might have come up with something funny, like
Pecker.  With such a meaty topic as Family Values ripe for a send-up,
you'd think it would be easy to milk Cheerleader for comic value.
Unfortunately, first-time feature director Jamie Babbit (whose few
credits including directing the MTV series "Undressed" and acting as
script supervisor on The Game) doesn't appear to have much ability
behind the camera, which becomes painfully apparent after only a few
minutes.
     The story follows Megan (Lyonne), a high school cheerleader who
wrestles with lesbian tendencies.  She dreams of women's thighs while
her boyfriend tongue-bathes her.  She even has a Melissa Etheridge
poster.  Naturally, mom and dad want this gayness nipped in the bud, so
they call in "True Directions," a homosexual-rehab group run by Mary
Brown (Cathy Moriarty) that resembles 28 Days detox-center crossed with
a McDonald's kiddie play area.
     Everything at True Directions is cast in hot pink or baby blue (to
let the recruits empathize with their gender), and exercises consist of
learning to vacuum (ladies) and chopping wood (guys).  Naturally, there
are self-affirmations and admissions of homosexuality -- all part of the
road to healing.
     In the clink, Megan meets rough-and-tumble lesbian Graham (Clea
DuVall, looking to make a career out of playing rough-and-tumble lesbian
types), and naturally they fall in love.  Will they run off together and
become societal outcasts or will they graduate?  Well, you need only
wait about 75 zippy minutes to find out.
     But I'm a Cheerleader plays a lot like a sitcom, only not a very
funny one.  (Perhaps a laugh track would have helped?)  The addition of
good actors like Melanie Lynskey (Heavenly Creatures) and Michelle
Williams (Halloween: H2O) is far outweighed by using yesterday's
pop-culture jokes like RuPaul (not in drag!), Mink Stole, and especially
Moriarty.  The editing, directing, and cinematography don't help,
either.  (Have fun while you watch: see how many times you can count the
boom microphone drifting into frame!)  The result is a haphazardly
constructed mess that's totally off when it comes to comedic timing, and
essentially unable to muster even the tiniest bit of sympathy for any of
its cast, even if True Directions-style places really do exist.
     But perhaps the most egregious error is casting Natasha Lyonne as a
cheerleader.  Lesbian, yes.  Cheerleader, no.  Lyonne strikes me as more
of a band girl.  Oh right -- I almost forgot -- it's supposed to be a
satire.
Director: Jamie Babbit
Producer: Leanna Creel, Alexis Magagni-Seely, Andrea Sperling
Writer: Brian Wayne Peterson
Starring: Natasha Lyonne, Cathy Moriarty, Bud Cort, Mink Stole, RuPaul,
Clea DuVall, Eddie Cibrian, Joel Michaely, Julie Delpy, Michelle
Williams, Melanie Lynskey, Richard Moll, Katharine Towne, Brandt Willie

Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
     Batman's reins have been turned over from director Tim Burton (now
producing) to Joel Schumacher, from lead Michael Keaton to Val Kilmer, and
from an old, baroque Gotham to a heavily stylized, kiddie-pop city.
     A lot can be said for the idea that the setting of a picture
thoroughly controls its tone.  What we have in BATMAN FOREVER is an
attempt to make Gotham more like Los Angeles, full of neon, black lights,
and people sporting primary-color wigs.  Unfortunately, something has been
lost in translation.
     What we lose is the idea of Batman as The Dark Knight.  Instead, he
spends a large bit of celluloid pontificating about the morality of
killing people, telling us like a public service announcement that it
won't make things better.  Okay, I buy that, but why is Batman telling me
this?  Batman is supposed to be a kick-ass-and-take-names type of guy, not
some lousy pacifist.  I don't need to got to the movies for that.  The
message is entirely out of place.  Also lost is a *real*
villain ... instead, we get Jim Carrey's over-the-top interpretation of The
Riddler, who was always a wuss on the TV show, and Tommy Lee Jones's
Harvey Two-Face, who I don't think I've even heard of.
     On the subject of villains, Carrey plays Carrey--what more can you
say?  He's hilarious, obviously made for the role, but the part isn't
written well enough to carry the picture alone.  Jones is downright awful
as Two-Face, mumbling his lines in every scene and trying desperately to
live up to the actors with much better parts who refuse to give him even a
little piece of the show.
     At any rate, here's what the new Batman brings to the table.  First
and foremost is Chris O'Donnell as Bruce Wayne's young ward, Dick Grayson,
a.k.a. Robin.  O'Donnell saves the film more often than he saves Batman,
proving what a spectacular actor he is, even with a bare-bones role.  Also
good is Nicole Kidman as Batman's love interest, Dr. Chase Meridian, who
ends up psychoanalyzing him out of his costume.  It's too bad the love
story wasn't written very well.
     And that's not all that's poorly written.  The plot has enough holes
to drive the Batmobile, the Batplane, *and* the Batboat through. 
Everything is homage to the first two films:  the obligatory car chase,
workmanlike fight scenes, people discovering Batman's true
identity ... yawn.  When you see the film, try to guess what will happen
next:  you'll be right.
     Overall, there's very little originality on the screen ... not that
you could see it, thanks to a nonexistent first act, some dismal
photography (Stephen Goldblatt, out of his element), even worse editing
(Dennis Virkler, surprising considering his two Oscar nominations), and
some dull, unrealistic digital effects.
     Thank God for the self-deprecating humor in the film, with Batman and
Robin poking fun at their small screen past.  If you watched the series at
all, the jokes make the movie worthwhile.  Kilmer is good, as usual, as
the man behind the mask, and there are a few good action sequences.  If
you see the film, try to ignore the preaching, pinch yourself awake after
the first half hour, and pray that Tim Burton makes a really good movie
next to make up for this one.

Title
Review for Tank Girl (1995)
     Lori Petty, America's number one Madonna wannabe, is back in action
as TANK GIRL, a comic book character come to life.  Actually, the whole
movie is a comic book come to life.  Live action is spliced with still
shots of comic strip panels and some full-motion animation, so if you get
bored with the live-action part of this picture (and you probably will),
at least you can look at the cartoons.
     Not that these bits are any more entertaining, but at least they're a
change of pace from the dull storyline.  The filmmakers use them any time
there is the possibility for a neat special effect or some potential for
plot development, so they don't waste any money on actually interesting
footage, instead copping out to some goofball crayon scribbling.
     The thin plot goes like this:  the earth is dried up, Malcolm
McDowell is the bad guy, Lori Petty is Tank Girl, and she wants to kill
him.  McDowell barely saves this picture from being a complete failure,
reprising his classic psycho bad guy role in fine form.  His support is
terrible, from Ice-T as a mutant kangaroo, to Petty herself, who I was
hoping would get killed by the movie's end.
     No such luck.  Petty ruins this movie with her bad acting, inability
to crack jokes, and the ability to look stupid no matter what she is
doing.  I guess that was the point, but I can't understand why it needed
to be made.  Recommended only to fans of Petty:  both of them.

Title
Review for Hussard sur le toit, Le (1995)
     You heard it here first:  1996 will be the year that puts French
cinema back on the map, at long last.  With both PURPLE NOON's re-release
and the arrival of THE VISITORS (the highest-grossing French film of all
time) later this year, we're guaranteed a couple of hits.  But the first of
these French delicacies to arrive will be THE HORSEMAN ON THE ROOF.
     Rumored to be the most expensive film ever shot in France, THE
HORSEMAN ON THE ROOF is the film adaptation of Jean Giono's popular novel
of the same name.  Directed by CYRANO DE BERGERAC's Jean-Paul Rappeneau,
this tale of love and tragedy in 1830's France is an exquisite period
piece, full of settings and photography as lush as its story line.
     This story involves an Italian revolutionary named Angelo (Olivier
Martinez), on the run from the law as well as the cholera epidemic that was
sweeping Europe at the time.  Forced into France to try to find his
compatriots, Angelo takes refuge in the home of the mysterious Pauline
(Juliette Binoche), and the two begin to grow close.
     As the cholera sweeps across France as well, Angelo finds himself
hunted by the locals, who fear him as a carrier of the disease.  Together
with Pauline, the two strike out across the countryside, each in search of
their own peace.
     The film, full of spectacular action scenes as well as touching or
romantic moments between the two principals, is a careful blend of the two
genres that works very well.  Special kudos to the actors, especially
Binoche, who plays her role as the noble woman with a cryptic goal (I won't
give it away) superbly.  The enormous cast of both speaking parts and
extras is handled well, and the scenes are perfectly choreographed.
     HORSEMAN's one flaw is its tendency to fall into what I call French
Movie Syndrome, with the characters spending long stretches of time in
monologues, reminiscing about characters and places we've never met or
never seen.  It's here that the viewer tends to doze off in hopes of a
swordfight or a fire.
     Otherwise, I have few complaints.  THE HORSEMAN ON THE ROOF should be
accessible to the same audience that made THE POSTMAN a success, and can be
enjoyed by a wide range of viewers.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
     I'm not entirely sure how to begin a review of the highly-anticipated (at
least for me) fourth installment of the ALIEN series except to say... what a letdown!
     Sigourney Weaver's Ellen Ripley died in ALIEN3, the movie that was
supposed to put the nail in the ALIEN coffin, but thanks to the miracles of
next-millennium cloning, she's back, and full of alien DNA to boot (thus
making her invincible, giving her acid for blood, and generally a pretty
creepy chick).  This new twist has great potential, as Ripley's alien side
gives her a strange kinship with the creatures... creatures that once again
are loosed by idiot scientists trying to tame them.
     But in the end, the desire to spill more Blood! Blood! Blood! (and alien
goo) wins out over plot and thematics.  Instead, the picture progresses like a
sorry rehash of the first three movies.  Two hours later, I left depressed.
     Director Jean-Pierre Jeunet, who made the masterful DELICATESSEN, has
plenty of fun with creepy set design, creatures galore, clever photography,
and propelled mucous, but other than that, ALIEN 4 has little to recommend. 
Even Winona Ryder as a reluctant comrade is a real disappointment.
D: Jean-Pierre Jeunet
W: Joss Whedon
P: Gordon Caroll, David Giler, Walter Hill
S: Sigourney Weaver, Winona Ryder, Dominique Pinon, Ron Perlman
http://www.alien-resurrection.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
     In Hollywood, you just can't make a movie like SHINE.  Put simply,
it is just not allowed.
     This is our loss and Australia's gain, because SHINE comes off as
one of the upper-echelon films of the year, an ambitious and unflinching
look at that country's David Helfgott, a prodigy of a pianist driven
insane by his father, only to emerge again after 20 years of
institutionalization.
     The film tracks David's tumultuous life from young boy (Alex
Rafalowicz) to young man (FLIRTING's Noah Taylor) to adulthood
(Australian stage actor Geoffrey Rush).  David's father Peter (Armin
Mueller-Stahl) pushes young David so hard (his motto: "Win!  Win! 
Win!") that his mind slowly crumbles before our very eyes.  And while
Peter wants David to be The Best, he doesn't want him away from home,
and his overprotectionism, combined with Peter's insistence that David
master Rachmaninoff's 3rd Piano Concerto (the "Rach 3," considered one
of the most difficult piano pieces ever written), eventually drives
David over the edge.
     Extremely compelling for a film that is essentially a character
study of one man, SHINE succeeds by leaving out no detail and by
masterfully using the camera to capture an inner turmoil that would be
impossible for us to feel otherwise.  Exquisite is the string of
five-star performances by Rush, Taylor (a favorite of mine),
Mueller-Stahl, and supporting players John Gielgud and Lynn Redgrave. 
Rush's frantic jabbering as the insane adult Helfgott so perfectly
captures the mood that he deserves (and is receiving) serious notice. 
And let me not forget the music, which is awe-inspiring (especially the
unbelievable Rach 3), and which makes you want to applaud after each
piece is performed.
     SHINE isn't flawless, though -- the biggest problem is a *serious*
defect in the sound quality, normally no big deal, but inexcusable in a
film about music.  The roundabout plot structure will not appeal to
every filmgoer, and when the movie was over, I felt a bit cheated by the
lack of a real ending.  (Helfgott has returned to sanity and is
allegedly going to play at the Oscars if SHINE is nominated -- an event
that the film, as it stands, would never portend.)
     I guess you can't have everything.  But maybe leaving the audience
hungry for more was the whole idea.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
     Danny Boyle says he was "keen to distance this movie from LORD OF
THE FLIES, which THE BEACH has been unfairly compared to."  Okay, so THE
BEACH is not LORD OF THE FLIES.  LORD OF THE FLIES has a lot more going
for it.
     Many a confused moviegoer has already asked me what the heck this
film is about, since the trailer makes it out to be something akin to,
er, LORD OF THE FLIES.  The movie, based on the novel by Alex Garland,
traces the Thailand trip of young Richard (DiCaprio), who in Bangkok
encounters a crazy guy named Daffy (Carlyle, who has nary an
understandable line of dialogue in the whole movie).
     Daffy ends up offing himself, but not before teasing Richard with a
map to a remote Thai island, where the perfect beach can be found.  So,
with two French acquaintances (Francoise and Etienne - Ledoyen and
Canet, respectively) from his Bangkok hotel, they manage to trek to the
remote paradise.
     Turns out the beach really is there.  A band of expatriates from
around the world (led by Swinton) live there, in fact, and they have an
uneasy peace with the local pot farmers across the island, who carry
some big guns and a lot of chest-beating anger and paranoia.  The
arrival of the trio turns out to be good and bad -- but mostly bad.
     Writer-director-producer team Hodge-Boyle-Macdonald have put
together two of the best films of the last decade (SHALLOW GRAVE and
TRAINSPOTTING), and the limbo bar for THE BEACH is set incredibly high.
Unfortunately, it doesn't live up to their legacy, for a number of
reasons.
     TITANIC fans expecting their dashing Leo are going to be sorely
disappointed.  In THE BEACH, DiCaprio practically plays a parody of
himself, haughty and aloof, but underneath a coward and a habitual
liar.  The rest of the cast can safely be shrugged off, with
much-vaunted newcomer Virginie Ledoyen leaving virtually no memorable
impression.
     More than ever before, Boyle relies on camera trickery to tell the
story.  The problem is that, unlike in TRAINSPOTTING, where camera
tricks were used to get in the head of a heroin fiend, THE BEACH uses
them to mask defects in the script, which rambles on for 90 minutes
without much direction, before diverging into THE DEER HUNTER territory,
with Leo going inexplicably primal.  Even Boyle's kitschy
life-as-video-game trick has been done before, in Spike Lee's CLOCKERS.
     By film's end, the troubled shrugs of our audience would seem to
agree with me that no one really knows what to make of THE BEACH.  It
will likely appeal to moviegoers more interested in scenery than
substance -- just don't expect BEACH BLANKET BINGO.  This is APOCALYPSE
NOW: The Prequel.
Director: Danny Boyle
Producer: Andrew Macdonald
Writer: John Hodge
Starring: Leonardo DiCaprio, Tilda Swinton, Virginie Ledoyen, Guillaume
Canet, Staffan Kihlbom, Robert Carlyle, Magnus Lindgren, Victoria
Smurfit
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
     It's round two for Heather Graham.  Will she make it in comedy?  Or
will she drag the genre down in flames?  Unlike her earlier attempt at
yucking it up just a few months ago in AUSTIN POWERS 2, Graham is
actually pretty good here, as are all the principals.  Imagine my
surprise when, ultimately, BOWFINGER just doesn't gel the way a good
comedy should, although it certainly has some merit.
     The problem isn't the premise: Never-has-been, aging filmmaker
Bobby Bowfinger (Martin) is so desperate to make a movie, he decides to
film impromptu scenes with major, but paranoid, star Kit Ramsey (Murphy,
basically playing himself).  Wackiness ensues when the scenes (a sci-fi
action film) get crazier and crazier.  Sounds like a good plot to me.
     It's not the stars.  The idea of Martin and Murphy together has had
me salivating for this film all summer.  Supporting stars like Graham,
Stamp (as a Scientology-esque guru), and Baranski all hold up their
parts of the picture well, and Murphy's second role as a nerdy Ramsey
lookalike is the best part of the movie.
     It's not the pacing.  BOWFINGER jumps along from scene to scene and
never gets boring.  And on technical merits, the film is a success.
     The problem, I think, lies in the comedy.  Try as it might,
BOWFINGER just never manages to be hysterically funny.  A few bright
spots aside, BOWFINGER's jokes almost universally fall flat, with missed
comic opportunities buzzing by at every turn.  I really wanted to love
this picture, but compared to POWERS or AMERICAN PIE, this isn't a
brilliant flick.
     I think the fault lies with director Frank Oz (best known as the
voice of Yoda), none of whose credits (including IN & OUT) have
impressed me very much.  Oz obviously wanted to craft an adult comedy
here, but ended up making a PG-13 film that tries to appeal to all
tastes.  It's no surprise that it doesn't really click with adults or
kids.
     On a personal note, Eddie Murphy Productions was *this close* to
buying a script I wrote last year.  Who was my contact at the company?
Eddie Murphy's brother.  Think about that... after you see the movie.
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
     I'll say it up front: This is not your classic four-star review.
`South Park' is definitely an acquired taste, but it's one I've picked
up, despite the series' lackluster performance over this season.
     SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER, AND UNCUT certainly makes up for it,
taking the comic adventures of four boys in the `redneck town' of South
Park, Colorado to new highs, er, lows, in their feature debut.
     And what a debut it is.  George Carlin?  Step aside.  Andrew `Dice'
Clay?  Old news.  Farrelly brothers?  Puh-leeze.  Lenny Bruce?  Meet
your replacement.  Shocking, in-your-face, blatantly offensive,
jaw-dropping, mind-boggling, floor-rolling, horribly crass humor has a
new master, and SOUTH PARK is it.
     Plot?  Firmly tongue in cheek, the boys of South Park want to see
an R-rated `Terrance and Philip' movie, but their parents won't let
them.  They sneak in, whereupon they pick up the nastiest foul mouths
this side of the Bangkok red light district.  When their parents
discover the source of the crudeness, Kyle's mom launches a crusade
against the crass cartoon, which culminates in Terrance and Philip's
incarceration and a war between America and Canada (T&P's homeland).
Meanwhile, appearances by everyone from Big Gay Al to Saddam Hussein to
a George Clooney-voiced doctor to Brian Boitano (well, in reference,
anyway) pay off the true fans.
     The subtext: The boys are on the side of freedom of speech, while
the parents don't seem to mind the violence that justifies solving the
problem...  Who woulda thought SOUTH PARK would have a theme!?  And a
good one, however blatant.
     I'm not going to try and justify SOUTH PARK's four stars on any
kind of artistic merit.  But I will say I haven't laughed this hard in a
couple of years, and some of the musical numbers will be impossible to
forget.
     While Mr. Hanky does not appear, much to my disappointment, SOUTH
PARK is such a wild ride that it really can't be missed, especially if,
like me, you have very bad taste.
Director: Trey Parker
Producer: Trey Parker, Matt Stone
Writer: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Pam Brady
Starring: Mary Kay Bergman, George Clooney, Minnie Driver, Isaac Hayes,
Eric Idle, Mike Judge, Trey Parker, Matt Stone
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Beautiful Girls (1996)
     With a cryptic title like BEAUTIFUL GIRLS, one starts to wonder to
whom this film is being marketed.  Is it the frat boy model-ogling crowd? 
Is it a self-help flick for teenage girls?  Is it soft porn?  The answer,
of course, is none of these:  BEAUTIFUL GIRLS is a *date movie*, and quite
a good one at that.
     Something like THE BIG CHILL meets Generation X, BEAUTIFUL GIRLS is
one of those ensemble character movies that really defies description in
terms of plot points.  The ostensible main character is Willie (Timothy
Hutton), who is ambivalent about girlfriend Tracy (Annabeth Gish) so heads
back home to Knight's Ridge, Massachusetts to sort things out during his
10-year high school reunion.  Here, he hooks up with old pals Tommy (Matt
Dillon) and Paul (Michael Rapaport), each of whom is also flailing
helplessly in his own romantic mess.
     The "beautiful girls" in question include Sharon (MIGHTY APRHODITE's
Mira Sorvino), Tommy's girlfriend, and Darian (Lauren Holly), Tommy's
*other* girlfriend.  Jan (Martha Plimpton) is Paul's seven-year-long
lover, who's now dating the local butcher.  Then there's the visiting
heartbreaker Andera (Uma Thurman) and 13-year-old
"heartbreaker-in-training" Marty (Natalie Portman).  And don't forget a
special appearance by "Elle Macpherson"...Paul's Saint Bernard.
     The entanglements of the some 17 major cast members could fill pages
and would spoil the film.  Suffice it to say that they are mostly very
funny and realistic to boot.  After an awkward and confusing start,
BEAUTIFUL GIRLS really hits hard as a comedy and a romance without
becoming mushy and stilted like your average twentysomething date flick. 
And even more incredible is that director Ted Demme and writer Scott
Rosenberg have managed to imbue every character with life and originality,
something many filmmakers have trouble doing with just one or two.
     The acting is all top-notch, including the big surprise of Rosie
O'Donnell's best 10 minutes of her career, playing the local beautician. 
The young Portman is just fantastic, and Hutton also brings some real
emotion to his role (hopefully this will revive his career).
     And in case you're used to my crusty opinions and think I'm being
rough, my guest insisted BEAUTIFUL GIRLS was one of the best films she'd
ever seen.  Regardless, even if we're both overestimating this picture,
it's still worth a look.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
     In DOGMA, Smith's long-awaited and already vilified indictment of
the Catholic church, the auteur has gone to great lengths to show us he
can take on any establishment and gut it wide open.  To wit:
     DOGMA tells the story of two fallen angels (Affleck and Damon,
natch) who decide to take advantage of a loophole in Catholic dogma and
weasel their way back into Heaven.  God's messenger (Rickman) is sent to
convince the cynical Bethany (Fiorentino) to stop the angels because if
they make it into Heaven, the world will end.  Along the way, Bethany
enlists the aid of a half-dozen nutty characters, including prophets Jay
and Silent Bob (Mewes and Smith), the muse Serendipity (Hayek,
inexplicably borrowed from Greek mythology), and the 13th Apostle Rufus
(Rock).  Jason Lee also makes his usual Smith movie appearance as
Azrael, a demon trying to stop Bethany.
     Make sense?  If it doesn't, don't worry.  Smith goes to great
lengths to explain things over and over again, in long-winded monologues
that pepper the entire film.  In fact, the sermons are DOGMA's biggest
failing.  In trying to point out the fallacies of Catholicism, Smith
becomes just as preachy and sanctimonious as the institution he's trying
to lampoon.  You can't fight fire with fire in this case.
     While any film that features George Carlin as a Bishop trying to
introduce a new Christian icon (Jesus giving the thumbs-up) gets my
vote, and DOGMA is not short on laughs, too much of the film is flat.
Jay's sex talk is disarming at first, tired by the end.  Alanis
Morrissette as God?  Snooze.  THE BUTCHER BOY already did Sinead
O'Connor as the Virgin Mary.  Now *that* takes balls.
     Still, DOGMA remains one of the funnier films of the year.  But
more importantly, whether you agree with Smith or not, you're sure to be
offended.
Director: Kevin Smith
Producer: Scott Mosier
Writer: Kevin Smith
Starring: Ben Affleck, George Carlin, Matt Damon, Linda Fiorentino,
Salma Hayek, Jason Lee, Alan Rickman, Chris Rock, Alanis Morrissette,
Jason Mewes, Kevin Smith
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Loser (2000)
     If you're a cynic, you might wonder when Amy Heckerling (director
of the utterly vapid Clueless) lost touch with the youth of America. 
I'm inclined to believe it was in 1982, right after the release of Fast
Times at Ridgemont High, her only good movie, which she made when she
was only 28.
     Now in her mid-40's, it's rather depressing to see Heckerling using
the same jokes that worked almost two decades ago.  And for a movie that
uses "Dare to be different" as its tagline, it's almost pathetic that
this story is lifted virtually verbatim from Fast Times, with the Mark
Ratner-Stacy Hamilton romance going awry once again.  Brian Backer, who
starred as Ratner, is even back in a small role.
     With American Pie alums Jason Biggs and Mena Suvari, Loser spins a
story of a vaguely Midwestern, er, loser named Paul, who moves to New
York to attend a vaguely NYU-like school on full scholarship.  Instantly
loathed for not being a philistine, Paul finds himself attracted to a
nice yet vaguely Goth girl named Dora that sits next to him in English
Lit.  The only catch is that she's having an affair with the professor
(Greg Kinnear).
     Ultimately, Loser is your standard love triangle movie, tweaked to
try and appeal to the coveted teen audience.  This is half-successful,
and Biggs and Suvari carry enough innate charm to make you laugh
plenty.  A boatload of comedian cameos from Steven Wright to Taylor
Negron livens things up as well.
     But the story -- and the comedy -- falls flat on the whole.  There
is no doubt from the second the characters are introduced how things are
going to end, right down to the "What happens to..." text that tells you
how miserable all the bad guys end up and how happy our heroes are.  See
also Fast Times at Ridgemont High.  On top of this, the movie is just
plain sloppy.  Direction and editing are lackluster at best, and the
film feels like it was tossed together in a week.  Kinnear deserves
special acclaim for managing to undo years of turning himself into a
respectable actor with movies like As Good As It Gets, diving back into
sitcom stereotypes with his overbearing professor role.
     Amazingly, Loser is one of very few recent movies that draws power
from its soundtrack, chock full of mid-to-late 1990's hits (examples:
"No Myth," "Pretty Fly (For A White Guy)") that Heckerling must have
gotten in an MTV compilation disc.  Good tunes, all of them.  Which
means: if you find yourself bored between jokes on the screen, you can
close your eyes and listen to the music.
Director: Amy Heckerling
Producer: Twink Caplan, Amy Heckerling
Writer: Amy Heckerling
Starring: Jason Biggs, Mena Suvari, Greg Kinnear, Twink Caplan, Zak
Orth, Jimmi Simpson, Egidio Tari, Tom Sadoski
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/loser/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Bandits (2001)
If you start a movie by telling people how it's going to end, well,
telling us how it gets there better be one hell of a good time.  And to
be sure, Bandits begins with its ending, but the story leading up to the
dramatic finale is just about as lame as they come.
Doing time for unknown crimes, Joe (Bruce Willis) and Terry (Billy Bob
Thornton) are milling about the clink one day when our hunky inmate Joe
engineers a daring escape, taking his milquetoast pal Terry along for
the ride.  Within a few nights on the lam, they've engineered a plan for
a new kind of bank robbery -- kidnap the bank manager at his home, spend
the night at his house, then waltz in with him first thing in the
morning and abscond with all the money.
The plan works so well as Joe and Terry rob their way from Oregon to
L.A. (en route to open a nightclub in Mexico, of course!) that they
become infamous as "The Sleepover Bandits."  Through happenstance (and
of course it has to be through happenstance), the bandits end up with a
bored, rich housewife along for the ride.  Kate (Cate Blanchett) ends up
stealing their hearts, and along with those go any semblance of
watchability that Bandits might have had.
Bandits wants to be Fargo -- a kitchy, light-hearted, and wryly funny
comedy set against the backdrop of a caper.  Instead, Bandits is a messy
debacle of awful jokes, unbelievable romance, and a ploddingly obvious
storyline that feels even longer than its two-plus hours.
Bruce Willis can be fun, even in throwaway material like The Whole Nine
Yards, but Bandits puts his balding head in trashy long hair and tries
to convince us that he's some wonderstud that can charm ladies even when
he's holding them at gunpoint.  On the flipside, Thornton's one-note
character (he's an obsessed hypochondriac that can actually delude
himself into paralysis) is sold as someone with whom Kate falls in love
simply because they both dislike black and white movies.  But while
details like logic are glossed over, increasingly irrelevant director
Barry Levinson (Sphere, An Everlasting Piece, you get the picture...)
opts to spend long, pregnant moments developing irrelevant,
uninteresting storylines, the end result being one awfully boring movie.
In search of something positive to say, I'll acknowledge that at least
Bandits has a fair number of giggle-worthy moments, a tense dinner as
the kidnappers dine with a bank manager and his suburban family being
the comedy highlight of the movie.  Too bad that's 30 minutes into the
picture -- and the film just heads south from there.  The love triangle
wherein the guys agree to share the girl (a plot stolen from Splendor --
lame source material, in my opinion) isn't believable, and the robbery
scenes are barely suspenseful at all; in fact, the only real danger
arises when the criminals act with complete stupidity: joyriding on the
road or when the driver (the sleepy Troy Garity, a minor highlight in
this sea of boredom) leaves the waiting getaway car to chase a hot
chick.  Uh huh.
It's amazing that seven producers were unable to figure out how to turn
a moderately promising premise into something worth watching.  (Well,
not really.)  The bottom line is that this is a Levinson vanity project,
pure and simple, and there's nothing uglier than vanity.
Director: Barry Levinson
Producer: Ashok Amritraj, Michele Berk, Michael Birnbaum, David
Hoberman, Barry Levinson, Arnold Rifkin, Paula Weinstein
Writer: Harley Peyton
Starring: Bruce Willis, Cate Blanchett, Billy Bob Thornton, Troy Garity
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
     The latest entry on the long list of follow-up disappointments will
have to be OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE, a film sort-of from the Farrelly brothers
(THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY) with practically none of its charm.
     Based on an old novel by Peter Farrelly, this is the (obviously
autobiographical to some extent) tale of a good-for-nothing, super-poor
kid called Dunph (Hatosy) growing up in Pawtucket, Rhode Island (you
know, outside Providence).  When he gets high and smashes the car into a
police cruiser, dad somehow works a deal to get him sent to a prep
school in Connecticut, where he finds himself a fish out of water.
     Now Dunph is so stupid that he actually thinks Arizona is on the
coast.  But when he meets a cute girl (Smart) she mends his evil ways
and gets him to study.  There's wacky hijinx along the way (a pale
imitation of DEAD POETS SOCIETY), which really amounts to a collection
of random scenes involving heavy drug use, various pranks, mean school
authorities, and George Wendt's character inexplicably coming out of the
closet.
     Most notable among the players here is Alec Baldwin, apparently
doing his best grumpy Jackie Gleeson impersonation as Dunph's father.
All of the other players are pretty much forgettable.  Which is why,
ultimately, this is a movie that goes nowhere after close to two hours.
     Is it funny?  Occasionally, and fans of the coming-of-age genre
will probably be satisfied.  Is it Cameron Diaz-hair gel funny?  Not
even an outside chance.
Director: Michael Corrente
Producer: Peter Farrelly, Michael Corrente, Bobby Farrelly, Randy Finch
Writer: Peter Farrelly, Michael Corrente, Bobby Farrelly
Starring: Shawn Hatosy, Jon Abrahams, Tommy Bone, Jonathan Brandis, Jack
Ferver, Kristen Shorten, Amy Smart, George Wendt, Alec Baldwin
http://miramax.com/mm_front/owa/mp.entryPoint?action=0&midStr=1091
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Four Rooms (1995)
     I wish I could say I was let down by FOUR ROOMS, but given the sheer
volume of just awful buzz about the film, I think I got what I was
expecting:  an over-anticipated, overworked movie that was full of talent
but devoid of taste.
     It starts off bad enough.  As the credits announce the four
writer/directors (Allison Anders, Alexandre Rockwell, Robert Rodriguez,
and Quentin Tarantino), a cartoon sequence plays over them, in the
tradition of cinematic masterpieces like MANNEQUIN.  This sets the stage: 
New Year's Eve at Hollywood's Mon Signor Hotel and only one bellhop (Tim
Roth), and believe me, it's a rillyrilly wacky place.  The film then
launches into the first of four 30ish-minute shorts, one by each director.
     The first segment is Anders's "The Missing Ingredient," about a coven
of witches (including Madonna, Valeria Golino, and a mostly topless Ione
Skye) who don't quite have everything they need to return their petrified
goddess to flesh.  Cut together like an episode of "Love, American Style,"
this vignette is just plain goofy and without point.  Anders had *never*
made a good movie before this, and she still hasn't, thanks mainly to lots
of rillyrilly bad dialogue and acting.  I heard a rumor that the actual
ending to this episode is after the closing credits, but I'm not sure it's
worth sticking around for.
     The worst of the bunch is Rockwell's "The Wrong Man," wherein a
sadomasochistic guy with a gun terrorizes his wife (Jennifer Beals) and
bellhop Ted.  I never did determine what this episode was all about, and
judging from the silent audience, no one else did either.  (Hint:  Beals
and Rockwell are married.)  Rillyrilly bad music and dialogue also abound.
     Robert Rodriguez's "The Misbehavers" is poor, but at least provides a
few chuckles.  Here, Rodriguez gets to take his comic strip, about some
naughty kids, from his old college newspaper (where yours truly also
worked) into the exciting world of live action.  Dad Antonio Banderas is
funny, but otherwise there's not much that's good here, although nothing
is rillyrilly bad.  Don't forget to smile during the humorous finale and
appreciate the prodigious amounts of vomiting in this episode.
     Wrapping up the film is the patriarch of the bunch, Tarantino
himself, with a ripoff of an old "Alfred Hitchcock Presents" titled "The
Man From Hollywood."  Actually, for 25 minutes the characters (Tarantino,
Beals, Paul Calderon, and Bruce Willis) moan and scream a lot.  Then, for
15 minutes they rip off Hitch's "The Man From Rio," where Peter Lorre bets
that Steve McQueen can't light his lucky lighter 10 times running.  If he
wins, Lorre gives him his car.  If he loses, McQueen loses his pinky. 
Same deal in Tarantinoland, and the very very end pays off this otherwise
drab episode.  Notably poor here are the rillyrilly bad acting and editing
and a rillyrillyrilly bad performance by Willis.
     Watching the finale is almost worth sitting through the last hour of
the film, but Anders and Rockwell should have been cut loose years ago
when this project was dreamed up.  Very disappointing is Tim Roth's
ubiquitous overacting and just plain constantly annoying presence.  Two
stars pretty much cover all the four rooms...generously.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Smoke (1995)
     When you sit in the theater, staring up at the big screen, during
the first few minutes of SMOKE, you *know* you're watching an "Art
Movie."  SMOKE obviously has no misgivings about its place in the film
chain, being perhaps the best example of a pure character-driven drama
to come along in ages.
     The sketchy plotline defies explanation.  Basically, SMOKE is the
lazy, drawn-out story of a smoke shop owner, Auggie (Harvey Keitel),
his estranged lover (Stockard Channing), a favorite patron/novelist,
Paul (William Hurt), and the young man who saves his life (newcomer
Harold Perrineau).  As $5,000 is kicked around among these characters,
their lives interact in unpredictable ways.  Sometimes this is
interesting, often it's just tiresome.
     Director Wayne Wang (of THE JOY LUCK CLUB) has taken a story in
the vein of TWENTY BUCKS and basically dragged the comedy out of it in
favor of giving us a talky melodrama.  The slow and deliberate pacing
of this film can't be stressed enough.  Auggie himself points this out
as Paul flips through his photo album:  a series of pictures of the
same street corner, one taken each morning at 8 AM.  Paul says he
doesn't "get it."  Auggie replies, "You'll never get it if you don't
slow down."  Wang himself explains that this scene is "the heart of the
film."
     That's a fine sentiment for an art gallery, but the last time I
checked, variable-speed movie projectors were still not in heavy use.
You can't slow down a film.  It has a natural pace, and Wang has
imposed an impossible gait on what could have been a memorable movie.
     It's a shame too, because at the heart of SMOKE are some genuine
characters with excellent actors behind them.  SMOKE is not only a
reference to the cigar store, but it's a metaphor for the fleetness of
life, happiness, and prosperity.  (You have to see one scene--the
world's most dysfunctional picnic--to really digest this fully.)
     In the end, sitting around, pontificating, smoking, and acting
cool can only carry a movie so far.  Maybe if Wang worked on
entertaining the audience instead of experimenting with format, this
film would have been a smoother smoke.

Title
Review for Score, The (2001)
I'll admit to having a soft spot for heist movies.  It's just too bad
that, with the exception of The Thomas Crown Affair remake, most recent
heist flicks have come off atrociously, a fact to which anyone who sat
through the ridiculous Entrapment can testify.
Hallelujah.  The Score is the heist film I've wanted to see for a long
time.  Not since James Caan burned that safe open in 1981's Thief has a
safecracking been so tense and meticulously designed.  And with the
triple threat of Ed Norton, Robert De Niro, and -- God bless him --
Marlon Brando, The Score is in some excellent hands.
The story is a familiar one.  De Niro plays the likable Nick Wells, an
expert safecracker who has clearly done well living a life of crime.  He
lives the high life, but does it quietly, in Montreal, where he runs a
swanky jazz club (presumably as a money laundering front).  Much like
Pierce Brosnan's Crown, we instantly like Nick, and when he expresses
doubts about a big job his rotund partner Max (Brando) cooks up, we want
to agree with his demurral.  But Max's inside man Jackie (Norton) will
have none of it -- he weasels his way into Nick's audience and convinces
him to do the job.  The prize: a priceless gold scepter, secreted in a
maximum-security vault in the basement of the Montreal customs office.
Jackie is key -- under the guise of a retarded janitor named David, he
has the run of the building.  With his inside knowledge and Nick's raw
talent, the job looks doable.  If there is any honor among thieves, that
is.
Like any good heist movie, The Score walks us through the minutiae of
masterminding such a grand plan, leaving enough of it secret so that
when it plays out on the screen, we're on the edges of our seats.  De
Niro is solid, but it's Norton who steals the show with his haughty and
smarmy Jackie (not to mention a spot-on retarded janitor).  Brando, of
course, is larger than life and, like any wonder of the world, a
spectacle to behold.  His screen time, sadly, is predictably brief.
The Score also has some other nice touches.  Its set designs are
impeccable, with Nick's jazz club a haunt I'd love to be a regular at. 
The film also features the most amusing computer hacker character
(played to caffeine-addled perfection by Jamie Harrold) I've seen since
WarGames.
Alas, the film is already drawing criticism, and justly so, for a
remarkably slow first act.  The film plods for at least half an hour,
repetitiously setting up what is already apparent: that Nick is plenty
well off and wants out of the racket.  Angela Bassett's girlfriend role
is a throwaway, a blatant (and unsuccessful) attempt to get a woman
somewhere in the movie.  Howard Shore's score is also undercooked, a
crummy rush job that repeats endlessly and pulls you out of the action
(visit the movie's web site and you can hear it for yourself, over and
over and over again).
But when the music is low and the game is on, The Score manages to pull
off a rare feat seen so rarely in cinema today: It makes you forget
you're watching a movie.  While recent movies like Memento have been
stellar, they're still just pictures on a screen.  The Score makes you
feel like you're handing De Niro a bolt cutter so he can get through a
steel cage.  My palms were sweating out of apprehension for the guy. 
Frank Oz is no master director, but he's managed to pull off a rare home
run with this one.
As a side note, The Score also has a bit of Hollywood gossip surrounding
it, namely involving the rumor that Brando would have none of Frank Oz's
direction to "tone it down."  Considering Brando is Brando and Oz is the
voice of Miss Piggy, it's easy to understand both sides of the
argument.  But judging from some of the shit Brando pulls in the film,
I'd say the real score is: Brando 1, Oz 0.
Director: Frank Oz
Producer: Gary Foster, Lee Rich
Writer: Kario Salem, Lem Dobbs, Scott Marshall Smith
Starring: Robert De Niro, Edward Norton, Marlon Brando, Angela Bassett,
Andrew Walker, Jamie Harrold
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Copycat (1995)
     Hot on the heels of SEVEN, another very unconventional thriller
has arrived in theaters:  COPYCAT, an equally creepy film with the
thematic premise that there really are an awful lot of sick people out
there.
     Judging from COPYCAT, there's more of them than we're giving
credit to.  COPYCAT is the story of a serial killer apparently chasing
psychologist Helen Hudson (Sigourney Weaver).  The only problem is,
some thirteen months earlier, another killer (Harry Connick, Jr.)
almost got her, and the experience was enough for her to lock herself
into her snazzy apartment for good.  When killer #2 comes around, two
detectives, M.J.  (Holly Hunter) and Ruben (Dermot Mulroney) try to
solve the mystery.  This is a much more disturbing and difficult task
than it first seems, entangling everyone in an intensely engaging plot
full of surprises and "rule-breaking" twists.
     The acting in COPYCAT is top-notch.  Even the normally blas
Mulroney seems to be remarkably cognizant of his surroundings and
manages to bring his character to life.  Weaver is typically good,
nearly reprising her fabulous role in DEATH AND THE MAIDEN, but Hunter
frequently steals the show from everyone.  Connick is immensely
disturbing in his small part, with which he obviously had a lot of fun;
you won't hear his crooning the same again.  Jon Amiel's direction is
similarly good.
     Unfortunately, much like SEVEN, COPYCAT has a number of *long*
periods of expository drama at its beginning, plainly attempting to
replicate the cool interaction among the characters in THE SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS.  This is where SEVEN and COPYCAT both failed:  it's simply
impossible to figure out why the killer is that interested in the
heroes, or to become that enthralled with them ourselves.  Luckily, by
the time we hit 45 minutes, the almost painful suspense has far
overtaken the sappy melodrama.
     And that suspense is worth it.  COPYCAT is well-paced and
inevitably reaches a nail-biting conclusion that I wouldn't dare
reveal.  Not to mention, the film actually has the first really
worthwhile denouement I've seen in years.  Be sure to stick around
until you see the credits roll.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Miss Julie (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/5ce2185d91dd24d3882568e800799457?OpenDocument
After single handedly crafting the worst film of 1999, the unbearably
heavy handed art house rubbish The Loss of Sexual Innocence, jazzy
auteur Mike Figgis brings his experimental eye to an adaptation of
August Strindberg's Miss Julie.
It's a brilliant play, one which observes naturalistic behavior and
flawed, complex characters without judgment. It's filled with
beautifully written scenes of emotional conviction. Naturally, Figgis is
so hell bent on his radical tinkering with form and content that the
story becomes a muddle of sensual implications taken straight from
fashion magazine perfume ads.
Indeed, he casts former model and current girlfriend Saffron Burrows in
the title role as Julie  a challenge for even the most experienced
actor. Julie slowly breaks down on the evening after her marriage has
fallen to pieces. She will ultimately return to a family structure which
will stifle her, and struggles willfully with her passions and appetites
embodied in the form of a robust servant (Peter Mullan).
Burrows gave sulky, shallow performances in Figgis' Sexual Innocence and
in Renny Harlin's Deep Blue Sea (the audience I was with cheered when
the sharks pursued her with bared teeth.) Her performances in those
films were remarkably similar to her work here. She does wear her hair
in slightly different curls and perhaps uses some blond highlights, but
her emotional range remains the same, haughtily demanding to be waited
on or entertained, occasionally allowing her lips to part for wet kisses
and chafing tongues. Would this be a Figgis film without smutty groping
and breast fondling every ten minutes?
When we first glimpse Miss Julie, she enters the large kitchen space. It
resembles the crumbling theater used in Louis Malle's superior Vanya on
42nd Street. Julie stares at a bird in a cage. Figgis can't resist
hammering the point home by shooting Julie through the bars. After that
image, there's hardly any point to watching the rest of the film, which
is her last gasp of inflicting her will on the macho, belligerent and
self righteous servant, who continually mutters that she on her pedestal
can never understand the lives of those below. She allows herself to be
ravished on her own terms (`kiss my foot'), with the inevitable regret,
guilt and sadness which surely follow. She is, after all, merely `a
fragile woman' full of dew.
If Burrows had a commanding screen presence, some shred of integrity or
glimmer of intellect  Cate Blanchett would have been perfect  one
would feel Strindberg's sense of all too human tragedy which comes hand
in hand with female oppression. Instead, we are presented with Figgis
posturing artistically and, shooting her brooding face in the soft
sunlight, sexually objectifying her.
Figgis has a penchant for hand-held photography on the mobile super-16mm
camera, which makes free use of the space and puts us on the same level
of his characters. This does manage to break through the stodgy barrier
of making a highbrow, affected period film, which all too often
degenerates into costume drama waxwork displays and loses all passion
and vigor.
However, he neglects to make it as `human' as this technique might
imply, still overly fixated on hyperreal, gauzy lighting and formal
devices over content, even making fade out ellipses feel heavy handed.
He's in love with long, adoring close ups of Burrows vacant good looks,
or of Mullen staring at her obsessively. His performance is so rigid he
might as well be wearing a corset.
His most indulgent choice is editing a sex scene from two angles running
parallel in a split framed sequence, which reeks of being experimental
for its own sake and a prelude for Time Code, which tells its story in
four panels simultaneously (one in each corner of the screen.) If Miss
Julie is any indication, it's a device which serves to increase the
artificiality and, thus, the ridiculousness of his scenario.
Mike Figgis is not without prowess or enormous technical skill, and I
admire his adventurous spirit. If only he didn't get high on the fumes
of his own highbrow artistic flatulence, he's become a filmmaker of
serious consideration. Until that time, he remains merely a curious
dilettante.
Director: Mike Figgis
Producer: Mike Figgis, Helen Cruickshank
Writer: Helen Cooper (from the play by August Strindberg)
Starring: Saffron Burrows, Peter Mullan, Maria Doyle Kennedy, Heathcote
Williams
http://www.mgm.com/missjulie/index.html
---
Jeremiah Kipp - kipp@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
     Every ant has his day.  At least, that's what Woody Allen would
have you think, in this twisted animated version of ANNIE HALL meets
BRAZIL.  Starting with a moody grass-scape of what turns out to be a
quiet corner of Central Park, voiced-over by Allen's `Z', a hapless
worker ant who feels the weight of the colony--so to speak--on his back,
ANTZ tracks a lot like any Allen flick.
     In fact, if it wasn't for all the forumla-driven bad guys, perilous
situations, and narrow escapes, ANTZ would be *exactly* like any other
Allen film.  But this is animation, and that means kid-pleasing effects
must plaster the screen.  Sadly, this hurts the story to the point where
ANTZ will quickly get lost in the shuffle of animated films coming out
over the next year, despite its unique touches.  To make matters worse,
some of the more gruesome scenes, including an ant-termite battle that
would leave Private Ryan wetting himself, are decidedly not for
children.
     Don't get me wrong, I thoroughly enjoyed the movie.  And if the
humdrum trailer for A BUG'S LIFE is any indication, ANTZ is going to be
the best we'll see out of computer animation for awhile, at least until
TOY STORY 2.  But, to paraphrase Z himself, a boy-meets-girl,
boy-loses-girl, boy-changes-underlying-social-structure movie... just
isn't that original.  Even if it is about ants.
     More story, less silly antics.  Maybe then I'll be inclined to put
down my can of Raid....
Director: Eric Darnell, Lawrence Guterman
Producer: Brad Lewis, Aron Warner, Patty Wooton
Writer: Todd Alcott, Chris Weitz, Paul Weitz
Starring: Woody Allen, Sharon Stone, Gene Hackman, Sylvester Stallone,
Christopher Walken
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  /
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Wicker Man, The (1973)
It's difficult to shake the disquieting climax of The Wicker Man, where
pious Police Sgt. Howie (Edward Woodward) of the West Highland Police is
confronted by the secrets kept within the isolated Scottish island of
Summerisle.  Being a decent Christian, he finds himself repulsed by
their pagan rituals, open sexuality, and their unwavering devotion to
the Old Gods.  Much like the unwitting protagonists of Peter Weir's The
Last Wave and Nicolas Roeg's Don't Look Now, Howie is facing off against
powers much larger than himself (and anything that is dreamt of in his
narrow theology).
Called upon to investigate the disappearance of a young schoolgirl named
Rowan Morrison, Sgt. Howie finds stubborn, tight-lipped resistance from
the local islanders, who carry about their business unmindful of his
single-minded detective work.  More often than not, they treat him with
bemused detachment, laughing into their drinks or simply ignoring him
altogether as he marches through the rustic schoolyards, dingy inns, and
lush green hills.  The locations, filmed in the highlands of Scotland,
possess the eerie, musty, ever-haunted quality of an Old Country worn
down by time.  If there is a central character in The Wicker Man, it's
the timeless elements of rock and water, moss and faded wood that
comprise the town squares.  Sgt. Howie, a man from the city, is clearly
out of his depth.
As his search progresses, he begins to piece together an elaborate
mystery (that may be less complicated than he believes) where Rowan was
brutally sacrificed by a fanatical cult led by the calm, elegant,
progressive-thinking Lord Summerisle (Christopher Lee).  "I think I
could turn and live with animals," muses the vaguely sinister local
politician.  "They are so placid and self-contained.  They do not lie
awake in the dark and weep for their sins.  They do not make me sick
discussing their duty to God."
The Wicker Man sustains a mood of unspoken dread through Sgt. Howie's
interactions with the tight-lipped, poker faced islanders, as well as
the implied clues he reads between the lines as they evade his line of
questions.  There's also a charged eroticism that perhaps comes hand in
hand with his deeply religious suppression of carnal desire.  One of the
more memorable sequences involves Sgt. Howie's inability to sleep as a
lovely young barmaid, Willow (Britt Ekland), dances nude outside his
door.  Prim, straight-laced, and disciplined to a fault, Sgt. Howie
proves unable to deal with the pressures of a free lovin' modern age. 
(It is worth pointing out that this is a horror film that often takes
place during the light of day, where evil can lurk under a clear blue
sky.  There are no easy hiding places here.)
It's amusing to note that Christopher Lee cites The Wicker Man as the
finest movie he ever made, especially considering he only shows up for
two (memorable) scenes as Lord Summerisle.  He's clearly the heavy, but
handles the role with a particularly light touch, tossing off his
sarcastic commentary with unflappable charm.  Where else will you get
the chance to see this wonderfully charismatic actor sway back and forth
in a mad Celtic dance, his face ecstatic and mouth agape?  The
ever-charismatic Mr. Lee throws himself into the role with vigor,
playing beautifully off of Edward Woodward's lean, humorless Sgt. Howie.
Anthony Shaffer's fatalistic screenplay slowly, resolutely builds to the
cathartic moment where he is brought face to face with, what else, The
Wicker Man of the title.  His shriek into the bright shining day
("Christ! Christ! Oh, oh, Christ!") stands out as one of those indelible
screen moments that linger, much like Donald Sutherland's final howl in
the 1978 remake of Invasion of the Body Snatchers.  Hey, it was the 70s,
man.  A bleak time for screen protagonists struggling to endure in a
conspiratorial global environment.
Director: Robin Hardy
Producer: Peter Snell
Writer: Anthony Shaffer
Starring: Edward Hardwick, Christopher Lee, Britt Ekland, Diane Cilento
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Trixie (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Max Messier.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/6de7368c8c0e0a258825690d0006428c?OpenDocument
It's a damn shame when a bad movie happens to a great actor.  It's even
worse when you try to enjoy their performance in the film while being
distracted by a terrible wasteland of a script.  Such is the sad case of
Alan Rudolph's latest "screwball noir" farce, Trixie, a misguided
attempt at expanding the noir genre by giving it a comedic twist.
Everything seemed to be in place to make a good film out of Trixie,
starting with a great cast of Nick Nolte, Will Patton, Dermot Mulrooney,
newcomer Brittany Murphy, Nathan Lane, and the wonderfully versatile
actress Emily Watson.  The story follows a misunderstood girl named
Trixie, who has an annoying habit of mixing up her metaphors - with such
memorable lines as "life is no bed of gravy" and "it's like looking
through a needle for hay."  Trixie holds dead-end jobs as a security
guard for low-rent department stores but yearns for something better in
her life.  Don't we all.  Eventually she takes a job at a casino resort
as an undercover cop and gets involved in a tangled mess of a political
sex scandal/murder mystery.  Don't you just hate when that happens?!
A slew of characters that seem drawn from the well of mediocrity and
melodrama entertain and challenge Trixie as she searches for the truth
in a sea of misplaced plot points.  Nathan Lane hams it up as a
washed-up lounge singer, Will Patton growls through lines as a corrupt
businessman, Dermot Mulroney tries to act sincere as a knucklehead of a
ladies man, Lesley Ann Warren is just plain annoying as a sex tart, and
Nick Nolte is a politician playing Nick Nolte.
The one bright light in the film is Watson, proving she can go from a
depressed Irish mother of a million kids in last year's Angela's Ashes
to a wisecracking working class Chicago chick who knows how to hold her
own.  The film starts off with a bang by giving the audience a strange
look at Trixie's life and the way she interacts with the things and
people around her.  It seems she strives to remain true to her beliefs
and her actions despite her failure at communicating with others.
Director Alan Rudolph speaks of this film as an examination of
communication and how people interact with one another, yet never seem
to understand each other completely.  The main problem is that he never
succeeds in delivering an interesting product for review.  The first
half-hour is solid and moves with purpose.  The last hour and half
simply sink under the movie's, and Rudolph's, pretentious voice.
Writer/Director: Alan Rudolph
Producers: Robert Altman, James McLindon
Starring: Emily Watson, Nick Nolte, Brittany Murphy, Will Patton, Nathan
Lane, Dermot Mulroney, Lesley Ann Warren, Stephen Lang
Rating: R
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html"> 
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
     Previously destined for a straight-to-video release, the TOYS are
back in the long-awaited sequel to 1995's massively successful TOY
STORY.
     Thank God!  Almost as good as the original, TOY STORY 2 is an
unabashed crowd-pleaser to children and adults.  With enough
(non-offensive) adult humor and plenty of good-natured kid stuff, this
film had our tiny audience in stitches from start to finish.
     TOY STORY 2 picks up right where the original left off.  With Andy
(Morris) off to `Cowboy Camp,' Mom (Metcalf) decides to throw a yard
sale, and Woody ends up being stolen by the evil toy magnate Al
(Knight), owner of Al's Toy Barn.  Turns out Woody (Hanks) is a relic
from a 1950's TV show, and he completes an extremely valuable collection
which is set to be shipped off to a museum in Japan.
     Held prisoner, Woody runs into the rest of the cast of `Woody's
Roundup'--his horse Bullseye, prospector Stinky Pete (Grammer), and
spunky cowgirl Jessie (Cusack).  Turns out they're okay with the Japan
trip, and soon, Woody starts to like the idea of moving overseas to be
idolized forever.  But it's Buzz Lightyear (Allen), to the rescue!  With
the aid of the usual gang of followers from the original, a massive
mission to save Woody is launched.
     A huge chunk of TOY STORY 2's humor is derived from clever
referential jokes to the original, so be sure you've seen it first.
Also, the story is tons of fun, but--and believe me, I feel weird about
typing these words--it also lacks the depth of the first film.  As
messages go, the original TOY STORY's themes of blind acceptance were
more powerful.
     Still, Hanks and Allen are incredibly fun, but it's Cusack's Jessie
that steals the show with as the over-the-top cowgirl.  Overall, TOY
STORY 2 is simply a whole lot of good, clean fun.  And there ain't
nothing wrong with that.
Director: Colin Brady, John Lasseter
Producer: Ralph Guggenheim
Writer: Andrew Stanton, Rita Hsiao, Doug Chamberlin, Chris Webb
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Don Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace Shawn,
John Ratzenberger, Annie Potts, Joan Cusack, Jodi Benson, R. Lee Ermey,
Kelsey Grammer, Laurie Metcalf, Wayne Knight, John Morris, Estelle
Harris
http://disney.go.com/worldsofdisney/toystory2/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Way of the Gun, The (2000)
     In case you're utterly dense and stupid (and some of my hate mail
indicates that if you're reading this, you just might be), know that
with a title like The Way of the Gun you are getting yourself into a
very, very violent film.  I do not mean a couple of cap guns and a blood
pack under someone's shirt.  I mean more shots fired per foot of film
this side of a Rambo movie.  Bring your earplugs.
     This is not to say that violence can't be stylish or clever. 
Movies like Pulp Fiction have proven that a gun can be poetry.  Or it
can just be a gun.  Writer/director Christopher McQuarrie (best known
for writing The Usual Suspects; Gun is his directorial debut) has set
out to make a Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid for the millennium. 
>From its all-bad-guys cast (except for the girl) to the arch, black
comedy to a south of the border shootout, the homage is pretty sincere. 
Too bad it didn't quite work out.
     This crime thriller weaves the story of two thugs (Ryan Phillippe
and Benicio Del Toro) looking to make their big score.  Opportunity
arises in the waiting room of a sperm bank, when they learn of a very
pregnant surrogate mother (Juliette Lewis) who is being paid big money
to carry the child of a wealthy couple.  A kidnapping/ransom plot is
hatched, and complications ensue.  As it turns out, the man can pay such
a rate for his new son because he's dirty, and he sends the goons out en
masse in order to recover his property -- an unborn baby boy.
     Subplots and side roads abound, as the kidnappers find themselves a
bit out of their depth, resulting in a chase across Mexico, filled with
double-crosses and trickery galore.  Notable among the players is James
Caan as the "bagman" on the case -- the guy sent in to try and trick the
kidnappers into an even worse situation by offering solace.  Caan's
aging gangster is intentionally hilarious, sporting a Members Only
jacket and followed by a crew of aging henchmen that look straight out
of Palm Beach.
     The drama plays out at a suspiciously familiar-looking Mexican
brothel, with Lewis giving birth (her doctor -- I'm positive -- played
the jerky redheaded kid from Dead Poets Society) amid a hailstorm of
gunfire.  When it's over, it's amazing the place is left standing. 
Suffice it to say that few members of the cast are.
     Ultimately, The Way of the Gun is flecked with many laughs despite
its gruesome storyline.  As a cinematic experience, it's also
competently made, but something just doesn't sit right, and the picture
never reaches the echelon of the Reservoir Dogs of the violence-in-film
world.  This is largely because though Gun is clever, it's considerably
over-plotted and, as a direct result, interminably slow as detail after
detail is explained at length.
     But perhaps its biggest failing is that Gun gives us absolutely no
one to root for.  And it takes some doing to make a pregnant woman
unsympathetic.
Director: Christopher McQuarrie
Producer: Kenneth Kokin
Writer: Christopher McQuarrie
Starring: Ryan Phillippe, Benicio Del Toro, Taye Diggs, Juliette Lewis,
James Caan
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
     Hitting theaters shortly, with surprisingly little fanfare, is
CONSPIRACY THEORY, a very long and very scattered production which
introduces the never-before-used plotline that the government is full of
bad guys.
     I was intrigued at first:  as the ads tout, a conspiracy nut (Mel
Gibson) suddenly learns one of his theories is true, and everyone's out
to get him.  And in the process, he has to protect a redhead (Julia
Roberts).  That would normally be enough for me, but without spoiling
the movie for you, that just ain't what the movie is about.
     While the central plot twist turns out to be pretty shocking, it
can't make up for the sad reality that THEORY has an appalling script --
and most notably that the dialogue is totally ridiculous.  The film's
cinematography is painful to watch, and Gibson, who would seem perfect
for the nutcase role given his LETHAL WEAPON roots, comes off as silly
and pathetic.  Clocking in at well over two hours, THEORY quickly earns
a place on the too-much-of-a-bad-thing wall.  In the end, the movie
makes enough sense, but it leaves so many loose ends dangling that it's
hard to care.
     Oh well, I guess a Julia Roberts fetish can't overcome a crummy
script and bad production values after all.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Athan Bezaitis.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/9569e78c3e3008e988256897005ab16a?OpenDocument
 THE VIRGIN SUICIDES is a dark comedy that embodies some twisted views
on suburban family life and the true lack innocence of adolescence.
First-time writer and director Sofia Coppola, daughter of GODFATHER
creator Francis Ford Coppola, proves to us that she's not really an
actress (see THE GODFATHER, PART III), but that she does have the family
knack for provocative movie directing.  The movie is based upon Jeffrey
Eugenides' novel, The Virgin Suicides, a detective story about five
sisters who mysteriously commit suicide and the investigation by four
neighborhood boys who had fallen in love with them.  Coppola, however,
transforms the movie into her own allegory of five adolescent girls who
suffer from ruthlessly suppressed lives, their desperate plea for
self-expression, and the tragedy that besets their wretched existence.
Set in the mid-seventies, the plot follows the Lisbon family, with James
Woods, a physics teacher at the local high school, as the scatter
brained father, and Kathleen Turner as the uncommonly strict mother.
Their five daughters are beautiful, naturally blonde, and the desire of
every boy in the neighborhood.  When the youngest, Cecilia, mysteriously
attempts suicide, psychiatrist Danny DeVito recommends that she be
allowed to interact more socially, especially with boys.  So the Lisbon
girls are introduced to the boys of the neighborhood, who have already
been watching the girls from afar through half-opened window shades,
binoculars, and telescopes.  At a party in Cecilia's honor, the boys
witness a tragedy that shocks them out of their wits.  As a result, the
Lisbons fall into a deep suppression shutting out the rest of the world
by retreating into their own inner sanctum.  It appears they will never
recover until Trip Fontaine (Josh Hartnett), the high school heartthrob,
pursues the unattainable Lux (Kirsten Dunst).  He attempts to ask her to
the prom, but the only way her mother will allow him to take Lux is if
all the girls go together.  For the first time, the girls will venture
out of the home to interact socially in an environment other than
school.
The movie begins as a lighthearted comedy with some great cameos from
the likes of DeVito and town priest Scott Glenn (BACKDRAFT).  The tone,
however, turns somber once the children are exposed to the worst of
their suppression.  Kathleen Turner as mom reverts to her SERIAL MOM
days, making the kids burn their rock records and even withdrawing them
from school.  Reminiscent of 1987's FLOWERS IN THE ATTIC, the children
are forced to fantasize through travel guides, imagining a different
life in faraway lands. With every avenue of self-expression cut off, the
girls suffocate in their misery and cry out for help to the boys in the
neighborhood.
The film, with its large ensemble cast, is well acted, and director
Coppola gets the best out of old pros Woods and Turner, while at the
same time coaxing solid performances out of her young cast, especially
Dunst and Hartnett.  On the flip side, what the film lacks is solid
character development.  We don't learn enough about any of the
neighborhood boys, or the strict Lisbon parents, or the mysterious Trip
Fontaine.  Constantly floating from one sequence of events to the next,
I was left with too many unanswered questions as to whether the story
was a mystery about what drove the girls off the edge, or how the
neighborhood boys became so fascinated with them.  Either way, it takes
away some of the film's appeal with no "real" characters to latch on to
in order to help you through such a bizarre and fantastic situation.
Despite its flaws, THE VIRGIN SUICIDES is a success.  It's an eerie look
at life with a sick twist of fate for five beautiful sisters with the
world as their oyster.  With this film, Sofia Coppola will strike a
presence for herself on the Hollywood scene -- no longer to be known for
her infamous role as Michael Corleone's daughter.  Ford Coppola was
criticized for casting Sofia in that role, but now he will be praised
for helping to produce his daughter's beautiful film.
Starring: James Woods, Kathleen Turner, Kirsten Dunst, Josh Hartnett,
Hana Hall, Chelse Swain, A.J. Cook, Leslie Hayman, Danny DeVito, Michael
Pare, Jothahan Tucker, Anthony DeSimone, Noah Shebib, Robert
Schwartzman, Lee Kagan, Chris Hale, and Joe Dinicol
Director/Writer: Sofia Coppola
Producers: Francis Ford Coppola, Julie Costanzo, Dan Halstead, Chris
Hanley
MPAA rating: Not yet rated
Year of release: 2000
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Winslow Boy, The (1999)
     David Mamet scores again, and in the unlikeliest of films.
     I've known and respected Mamet's directorial work since the gritty
HOUSE OF GAMES (1987) and have remained a fan through last year's THE
SPANISH PRISONER.  Without fail, Mamet works on gritty, hard-edged
con-artistry-related flicks like these.  So it's with no small amount of
skepticism that I greeted the G-rated WINSLOW BOY.
     Call me a fool.  WINSLOW ranks among Mamet's best and is a
refreshing change of pace.  A period peace set in 1911 London, this is
the story of 13-year old Ronnie Winslow, a naval prep school student who
is expelled for stealing and cashing a five-shilling note.  When Ronnie
proclaims his innocence to the very end, the case becomes a cause
celebre among the citizens of Britain - something of a former-day O.J.
Simpson case, though, this time, the people side with the accused.
     Mamet has layered this film, based on the stage play, with myriad
levels of nuance, enriching the role of each member of the Winslow
family to heights that Hollywood has never dreamed of.  As Ronnie's
ultimate lawyer, Jeremy Northam does his best work ever, by far.  Nigel
Hawthorne is similarly fantastic as Ronnie's dad, and as Ronnie himself,
Edwards proves there are still a few young faces who can act.
     Highly recommended, but don't let the G rating fool you.  This is a
film for adults about serious situations: Personal liberty, government
posturing, political bureaucracy, and justice, of course.  I urge you to
see it.
     Great double feature suggestion: THE BUTCHER BOY on tape, THE
WINSLOW BOY in theaters.
http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/winslowboy/
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1

Title
Review for Carrington (1995)
     I hate to stereotype ... but I will anyway.  I simply find it
inconceivable that a real woman could go for seventeen years without
once changing her hair.  The woman in question is Emma Thompson,
portraying English painter Dora Carrington in post-WWI England.  The
hairdo in question is a peculiar blonde bob that has the daunting task
of making Thompson look "boyish."
     If you're like me, you're saying to yourself, "Who is this Dora
Carrington, and why would someone make a movie about her?"  Well, I
still don't have the answer to that one.  Carrington was something of a
homebody who thrived on shocking Victorian sensibilities with her
outrageous behavior, the bulk of which involved sexual promiscuity in
some fashion or another.  Most notable among her odd and largely
meaningless "flings" was a doomed-from-the-start relationship with
troublesome writer Lytton Strachey (Jonathan Pryce), a bearded,
neo-Oscar Wilde who couldn't function normally without substantial
babysitting from Carrington and/or any number of her lovers.
     Together, Carrington and Lytton meander through 17 years of love
and hate, happiness and anger, life and death.  With its promising
start, CARRINGTON begins by introducing the real star of the film,
Lytton, but shortly thereafter, the movie bogs down in irrelevant,
plodding details about Carrington's life and love interests.  Soon, I
was wondering what the point was to all of this, and I never did find
out, as the only remotely empathetic character was Lytton.
     Jonathan Pryce, who won Best Actor at Cannes, is deserving of all
the praise he's received.  He manages to bring Lytton alive so well
that when he's not on the screen, the film completely stalls out.  In
fact, the movie is based on a book entitled "Lytton Strachey."  Why
screenwriter/director Christopher Hampton (who recently bombed with
TOTAL ECLIPSE) felt Dora Carrington was a more interesting person is
beyond me.
     Other than Pryce, the raucous comedy at the film's opening, and a
great score by Michael Nyman (THE PIANO), there's not much to redeem
this picture.  Incidentally, this script was written in 1976, and only
now has it been produced.  It isn't hard to see why it took so long.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Citizen Ruth (1996)
     It's been a while since I've anticipated a film this greatly and
been let down so much by the actual product.  Filmed from Alexander
Payne and Jim Taylor's extremely entertaining script, CITIZEN RUTH had a
lot to live up to.  Of course, in some ways, it does, and in some, it
doesn't.  Geez, you'd think I would be used to disappointment by now!
     CITIZEN RUTH is the story of Ruth Stoops (Laura Dern), a "huffer"
(paint/glue/other hazardous vapor sniffer) who finds herself the
unlikely center of a modern morality play.  Ruth, pregnant for the fifth
time and up on drug charges once again, is given a choice by an
unsympathetic judge:  go to jail for criminally endangering her fetus,
or have an abortion and face a lighter sentence.  Immediately, ires are
raised and banners are crafted from both sides of the abortion issue --
with Ruth Stoops, the lowest of the low, right in the middle.
     What follows is a rather simple tale of pro-choice vs. pro-life,
and there's no clear good guy in all of this.  But instead of focusing
on the issue, the filmmakers choose to focus on the characters -- and
they're all pretty loathsome when you get down to brass tacks.  Worst of
all is Dern, who is so gratingly offensive that by the end of the movie
you really just want her to shut up more than anything else.
     Some of the supporting characters are amusing, but it gets to the
point where you just can't take any more Southern small-town kitsch and
an overwhelming desire to leave this no-win debate overtakes you.  But
something keeps you in your seat -- and it isn't just the gum on the
floor.  I guess it's the humor that the filmmakers have instilled into
this not-too-funny situation and the earnestness with which they try to
tell this story.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Vertical Limit (2000)
     After suffering through an airline showing of The Perfect Storm, I
could think of no better way to spend the evening than with another Man
vs. Nature story in 2000's take on the genre, Vertical Limit.
     As the thrill-packed trailer might already have cued you, this is
an action-filled mountaineering movie, with Chris O'Donnell as Peter
Garrett, the unlikely hero trying to save his stranded sister Annie
(Robin Tunney) from certain death atop K2, the second-highest place on
earth.  How'd she get there?  Glad you asked... three years after a
family tragedy sends Annie on a perpetual climbing quest and Peter
grounded on earth, the siblings meet up again at the base of K2, where a
Texas billionaire (Bill Paxton) is ascending the peak as a publicity
stunt with Annie in tow.  Naturally, we learn you can't mess with Mother
Nature for profit, and the climbing team ends up stuck in a crevasse
only a few hundred feet from the summit -- beaten up, but alive. 
Barely.
     Peter is forced to climb again -- even though he's sworn it off,
they suck him back in (it's Cliffhanger by way of The Godfather) for the
noble cause of saving sis.  After recruiting resident
weirdo/chip-on-his-shoulder-character Montgomery Wick (Scott Glenn) and
some other local rabble, it's a race against time to save the smarmy
billionaire and/or the innocent girl.  Wonder who'll get saved, dontcha?
     Oddly, Vertical Limit has very little going against it... and very
little in its favor.  So much of the film feels familiar, drawn from
Cliffhanger (though it desperately tries to avoid that comparison, but
fails) -- from the setting to the hokey jokes drawn from yesterday's
e-mail lists to some rather obvious plotting.  We've even seen Paxton
take on the elements before (in Twister).  That he's the bad guy here
doesn't seem to make much difference to the picture's originality.  The
movie isn't bad by any stretch, but it's just so plain that it will find
a rough time attracting a thrill-seeking audience on a crowded holiday
weekend.
     About all that is worth noting here is the attempt at remaking the
boy next door, Chris O'Donnell, as an action star.  It worked for Will
Smith, right?  O'Donnell, and I love the guy to death, is such a cute
little fella that you can totally buy him as Robin Tunney's brother, if
only Robin Tunney lived in Poughkeepsie and her cat was stuck in a tree
and, well, Chris had to climb the daunting 15 feet up there to get it. 
But O'Donnell at 26,000 feet is a contrivance that I doubt anyone is
going to buy, despite throwing the poor guy into way-over-the-top action
scenarios (you've seen the jumping-over-the-chasm clip by now), all of
which come out of nowhere as a platform for him to strut upon.  Sorry
Chris, get thee back to Circle of Friends.
     Overall, the movie is capably directed, poorly edited, and acted
with gusto.  Aside from this, it bears mention that Vertical Limit is
extremely (and surprisingly) gruesome and far too long, with too many
side stories and too few that don't suddenly end with an avalanche
(seriously).  Whether you like the movie or not, one thing's for sure:
After seeing Vertical Limit's spine-tingling opening, you won't be in
any hurry to rush up your local cliff-face.  Hell, I'm even trying to
keep away from the stairs.
Director: Martin Campbell
Producer: Martin Campbell, Robert King, Marcia Nasatir
Writer: Robert King, Terry Hayes
Starring: Chris O'Donnell, Bill Paxton, Robin Tunney, Nicholas Lea,
Alexander Siddig, Scott Glenn, Izabella Scorupco
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/verticallimit/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
     Boy meets girl.  Another boy bets boy he can't score with girl. 
Boy pays third boy to try to loosen up girl's sister so he can get
girl.  Serious themes that haven't been explored since... well... since
SHE'S ALL THAT.
     At least 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU has one hell of a good title. 
I give it points for that alone.  And while this updating of
Shakespeare's "The Taming of the Shrew" is clever and funny at times,
much of the film is just not entertaining due to bad directing by
way-out-of-his-element first-timer Gil Junger.
     In this retelling, we find Cameron (Gordon-Levitt) falling for
Bianca (Oleynik), the prettiest girl in all the land.  But dad (Miller)
won't let Bianca date until her older sister does!  Too bad sister Kat
(Stiles) is a, ahem, a shrew.  Whereupon Cameron launches a plan to
manipulate a half-dozen or so people such that Kat and brooding outcast
Patrick (Ledger) are a cozy couple.
     Unfortunately, much of this potentially good material is paced like
a bad sitcom.  And never have I seen a movie so desperate for a laugh
track.  Turns out Junger directed the "coming out" episode of "Ellen,"
and even worked on the series "Blossom."  Well, you can draw your own
conclusions from *that*.
     There's fortunately some good comic relief in this flick, mostly
from the adults.  Larry Miller, in particular, deserves some kind of
award for having me crack up repeatedly.  And Mitchell's English teacher
proves that, yes, there is life beyond "Veronica's Closet."  Also of
note is a good pop score punctuated by personal faves Letters to Cleo
and Save Ferris.
     Too bad a generally good cast is largely wasted otherwise.  And
parents: PG-13 is a very generous rating.  You've been warned.
     And a final word: stay for the blooper reel during the credits. 
It's the best part of the film.
Director: Gil Junger
Producer: Andrew Lazar
Writer: Karen McCullah Lutz, Kirsten Smith
Starring: Heath Ledger, Julia Stiles, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Larisa
Oleynik, David Krumholtz, Andrew Keegan, Larry Miller, Daryl "Chill"
Mitchell
http://www.10thingsihateaboutyou.com
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Hochzeitskuh, Die (1999)
     Not since Top Secret! has a cow been featured so prominently as a
plot device in a movie.  While The Wedding Cow, a Swiss/German
production currently making the festival rounds, bears little
resemblance to the Val Kilmer movie (aside from its German setting),
it's a funny diversion nonetheless.
     Flora (Isabella Parkinson) is a hapless girl headed to southern
Germany to start a new job as a librarian.  From the get-go, her travels
are ill fated, as she finds her money stolen and gets kicked off the
train.  The equally hapless plumber Tim (Oliver Reinhard) takes pity on
the hitchhiker and picks her up.  The cow in back, he explains, is a
wedding present from his aunt.  He's on his way south to get married in
just a few days.  It's Forces of Nature meets "Hogan's Heroes."
     The Wedding Cow quickly develops as your standard road trip
comedy.  The cow goes missing.  The truck breaks down.  Another loony
hitchhiker is picked up.  The truck gets stolen.  No one will let them
bring the cow into a hotel.  The travelers start to hate each other.
But perhaps they'll fall in love?  The Wedding Cow travels over familiar
ground but the ride is truly an enjoyable one.
     At less than 90 minutes, Cow is hardly epic filmmaking.  German
comedy is not something we see a lot of, and director Tomi Streiff has a
flair for making a rural journey seem a little bit askew.  The problem
is that the comedy never goes full-tilt over the edge:  the movie is
funny but it's never fall-down hilarious.  I wanna see some twisted-ass
Teutonic humor!  With a cow in the show, how could you miss?
Director: Tomi Streiff
Producer: Susan Schulte
Writer: Ela Thier, Tomi Streiff
Starring: Isabella Parkinson, Oliver Reinhard, Julia Palmer-Stoll,
Roland Kieber, Ursula Staack

Title
Review for Real Blonde, The (1997)
     Daryl Hannah plays the titular character in "The Real Blonde," which
does not bode well, considering the fact that the last film in which Hannah
had this distinction was 1993's "Attack of the 50 Foot Woman."  Nonetheless,
 the film manages to achieve a degree of respectability (far surpassing the
debacle that was "Attack of the 50 Foot Woman"), but not much else.
     The subjects of this film are the intertwined worlds of modeling, soap
operas, and music videos in New York City, and given the nature of these
industries, it is obvious from the beginning that the film's director (Tom
DiCillo of "Living in Oblivion" fame) is setting us up for another stale
commentary about the superficiality of these image industries with little
actual plot to revolve around.
     In contrast to "Living in Oblivion," wherein DiCillo focused on the
humor surrounding the mishaps of a low-budget film production, "The Real
Blonde" is centered primarily around the dramatic and moral issues that
those involved with these image-oriented industries undergo.  Sadly, the
humor is lost, despite the presence within the film of such talented comic
artists as Christopher Lloyd, Buck Henry, and Dave Chappelle.
     Despite this limitation, the film does contain some interesting
elements.  At a certain point in the movie, we begin to realize that "The
Real Blonde" is not only criticizing the three industries mentioned above
for their obsession with sex objects and artifice, but it is
self-reflexively criticizing itself for focusing on the same artificial
reality.  Additionally, the startling intrusions of the intermittent dream
sequences are also pleasantly appealing.
     Ultimately, despite solid performances by Matthew Modine as Joe, a
struggling serious actor who takes on background work in a Madonna video to
get his foot in the door, newcomer Maxwell Caulfield who is convincingly
creepy as Joe's former best friend turned soap star, and Elizabeth Berkeley,
continuing her slow post-"Showgirls" return to the living with a solid
performance as a Madonna body-double, the film fails to follow through with
any true substance.
     "The Real Blonde" is as artificial as the world that it portrays.
Director: Tom DiCillo
Producer: Tom Rosenberg, Marcus Viscidi
Writer: Tom DiCillo
Starring:  Matthew Modine, Catherine Keener, Daryl Hannah, Maxwell
Caulfield, Elizabeth Berkley
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
     My brother says I shouldn't review sports movies.  Because I'm not
a sports fan, he says, I can't be objective.
     He may have a point, but I don't think FOR LOVE OF THE GAME is
fundamentally a sports movie.  Sure, suit Kevin Costner up in a baseball
uniform and you might think you're looking at another FIELD OF DREAMS,
but FOR LOVE OF THE GAME is something we don't see a lot of.  Allow me
to explain.
     On the last day of a losing baseball season, veteran Detroit Tigers
pitcher Billy Chapel (Costner) gets the news that he's going to be
traded *and* that his girlfriend is ditching him to move to London.  The
information devastates Chapel, so he decides to take it out on the
baseball diamond, steeling himself up for the game of his life.
     Before you know it, we're watching Chapel edge closer and closer to
the near-impossible perfect game:  9 innings, 27 batters, no hits, no
walks, no men on base.  And while Chapel struggles inning after inning 
against the Yankees, against the coach, against his aching body and mind
 he relives the last five years of his life through flashback.
     The flashbacks include the meeting of his on-again off-again
girlfriend Jane (Preston), befriending her daughter (Malone), his ups
and downs with his old buddy and standby catcher Gus (Reilly), getting
injured, getting better, and basically living the life of an aging
ballplayer.
     Back at game time, Chapel realizes he's made some mistakes, and
this final match becomes a shot at redemption.  Everyone watching the
game somehow seems to realize this, and through those nine innings, all
lives are invariably altered.
     If it sounds like a powerful film, that's because it is.  Director
Raimi is a master at pulling strings, and no expense has been spared at
coaxing the tears out of you.  All the players are perfectly suited for
their roles, with special marks for Reilly and Costner, who gives his
best performance since JFK in 1991.
     But it isn't too far into FOR LOVE OF THE GAME that you start to
realize a couple of things.  First, that the baseball game is far more
dramatic and interesting than the flashbacks.  (The film is obviously
adapted from a novel, and sometimes it feels like the flashback pages
are being shot verbatim.)  Second, that the whole thing is a ploy to
manipulate you into getting over-emotional.  There are points when you
want to spit, the movie is so saccharine.
     But this GAME is just so compelling, it's hard not to put those
flaws aside and just let yourself be washed over by this movie.  I may
be a victim of Hollywood mind games, but at least I enjoyed myself.
Director: Sam Raimi
Producer: Armyan Bernstein, Amy Robinson
Writer: Dana Stevens
Starring: Kevin Costner, Kelly Preston, John C. Reilly, Jena Malone,
Brian Cox, J.K. Simmons
http://www.universalpictures.com/forloveofthegame/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
When a red curtain opens and an orchestra conductor emerges to "direct"
the unmistakable 20th Century Fox theme music, we know we're in for
something different.  Really different.  Good different.
Filled with virtuoso special effects and spectacular song-and-dance
sequences, Baz Luhrmann's long-awaited Moulin Rouge makes every minute
of our collectively held breath worthwhile.  In fact, during its opening
hour, this critic found it hard to look away even for a second to jot
down a note, for fear of missing even a nuanced sparkle in the eye of
some French whore.
Somewhere between a fairy tale and an episode of Sesame Street, sitting
on a strange line between history and fantasy, lies Moulin Rouge, a
vaguely familiar story about a love affair between a penniless writer
and a dying courtesan.  Set in Paris in the year 1900, in and around the
infamous Moulin Rouge -- a brothel/dancehall in the seediest part of
town -- the film quickly tosses us into a whirlwind of a story, windmill
included.
Christian (Ewan McGregor) arrives in Paris, eager to make his mark as a
writer.  No sooner does he begin to type than a band of bohemian poets
and actors literally fall in on him, including the crazed and diminutive
Toulouse-Lautrec (John Leguizamo, acting on his knees).  Together they
hatch a plot to take a new musical across the street to the Moulin Rouge
in search of a backer for their thrilling new show.
Naturally, before midnight strikes, Christian has fallen in love with
the star of the Rouge, the "Sparking Diamond" Satine (Nicole Kidman),
while her boss, the maniacal Zidler (Jim Broadbent) looks on
disapprovingly.  The man with the money is the Duke of Worcester
(Richard Roxburgh), to whom everyone must suck up.  But it wouldn't be a
movie unless the Duke was also in love with Sabine -- and boy does he
have a mean streak....
Its plot is as old and trite as the most overdone of Greek tragedies,
but the fun of Moulin Rouge is all in its telling.  Far and away the
best part of the movie are the spectacular musical numbers performed by
some very good (not great) singers.  (All the actors did their own voice
work.)  When they simply talk, you'll find yourself drumming your
fingers, hoping the next number will come along soon.  And they always
do -- like a machine gun, some 19 performances appear in rapid
succession.
The songs are all contemporary numbers unknown to 1900's Paris.  While
the use of pop songs in period pieces has actually been a mainstay of
the musical since the 1940's, it's never been taken to the extremes of
Rouge.  A Knight's Tale tried this stunt only a few weeks ago, with
mixed results.  In Moulin Rouge, McGregor belts out "The Sound of Music"
in one scene, Broadbent vamps through "Like a Virgin" (yes, Jim
Broadbent), McGregor and Kidman duet memorably through a host of
love-themed songs while standing atop the elephant in which she lives
(yes, elephant), and the entire cast tangos to a Latin-infused version
of "Roxanne," with Jose Feliciano backing the group.  You won't even
realize Marilyn Manson is covering "Smells Like Teen Spirit."  A
Knight's Tale's "We Will Rock You" comes off as lame in comparison.  Put
simply, Moulin Rouge rocks.
The cast is uniformly superb.  Jim Broadbent appears larger than life
(and he is larger than life to begin with), while John Leguizamo is
astonishingly smaller than life... with a French lisp to boot ("the
Thpawk-leeeng Die-aaay-mon!" -- try it out loud).  Of course, this is
Kidman's and McGregor's movie, and when they're together on screen the
picture shines brighter than ever.  In fact, for their duets, Luhrmann
really cranks things up, laying on the dazzle and pouring his heart into
the movie.  The three of them form a remarkably apt trio.
Still, there's only so much of this anyone can take.  Moulin Rouge is a
movie that wears down the audience and its cast.  While it starts off as
an unmitigated five-star extravaganza, it eventually flags into mere
four-star territory as the film becomes repetitious and a bit slow
(heresy!).  Still, it's one of the best films of the year to date,
following Memento is the only award-caliber film released so far in
2001.
But forget all of that.  What you will have witnessed after seeing
Moulin Rouge is nothing short of the rebirth of the movie musical.  It
will certainly be a love-it-or-hate-it experience for moviegoers -- but
like they say, if you don't get it, you're just too old.  Way too old.
Director: Baz Luhrmann
Producer: Fred Baron, Martin Brown, Baz Luhrmann
Writer: Baz Luhrmann, Craig Pearce
Starring: Nicole Kidman, Ewan McGregor, John Leguizamo, Jim Broadbent,
Richard Roxburgh, Kylie Minogue
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Desecration (1999) (V)
     Indie horror is always a hit-and-miss affair, but true splatter
fans will find a lot to like in Dante Tomaselli's Desecration, a truly
bizarre tale of a boy (Danny Lopes) who accidentally kills a nun and
then suffers the otherworldly consequences.
     As cinematic oddities go, Desecration ranks right up there with
Eraserhead, rarely making much sense but creeping you out every chance
it gets.  Made on a $150,000 budget, the film has a lot of big-budget
flourishes made possible by clever camerawork and odd lighting coupled
with good sound effects.  Does it work as a story?  No, but it is
genuinely creepy and would probably work better as atmosphere for your
Halloween party, what with its demonic nuns and clown-men, than anything
else.
     In many ways, Desecration reminded me of the original Phantasm,
long on cheese but leaving you scared to death -- of all things -- of a
metal ball.  You'll never look at nuns the same way again.
     The DVD also includes an excerpt from the original short film of
Desecration, which, if it's possible, is even weirder than the feature.
Director: Dante Tomaselli
Producer: Dante Tomaselli
Writer: Dante Tomaselli
Starring: Irma St. Paule, Christie Sanford, Danny Lopes, Salvatore Paul
Piro, Vincent Lamberti
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Everest (1998)
     Nothing would suffice in making a movie about the tallest mountain
on earth than by showing it in the largest format on earth, as well.
     This 70mm IMAX film, which I saw on the country's largest movie
screen at the new San Francisco Sony Metreon (80 feet tall, 100 feet
wide), is nothing short of jaw-dropping spectacular.
     While the tale of Ed Viesturs climbing Mount Everest (for the fifth
time) is a good one, the story of the eight people from another party
who got stuck on the summit during a fierce storm  and died  almost
brings you to tears.  EVEREST is indeed larger than life.
     Of course, this is IMAX, and you go to see the spectacle of the
photography.  But remember, there's a guy carrying that enormous camera
up that mountain.  And a guy with a microphone.  And a tripod.  And
film.  And batteries.  The making of Everest is as phenomenal as the end
product.
Director: David Breashears, Stephen Judson, Greg MacGillivray
Producer: Stephen Judson, Alec Lorimore
Writer: Tim Cahill, Stephen Judson
Starring: Liam Neeson, Jamling Tenzing Norgay, Araceli Segarra, Ed
Viesturs, Paula Viesturs
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
     What a huge gamble, to make a movie about "Hustler" magazine
founder and die-hard porn king Larry Flynt and his turbulent life.
     Whether or not it's successful, the filmmakers deserve every bit of
praise for having the guts to make a movie like this, especially in an
age where Washington constantly cries foul over Hollywood's depictions
of sex and violence.  And believe me, THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT has
plenty of both.
     Following Flynt's (Woody Harrelson) life from juvenile Kentucky
moonshiner to Ohio strip joint owner to the multi-millionaire ruler of a
publishing empire, the film lays out the facts and doesn't make any
judgments.  Instead, we are invited to decide for ourselves, as the
movie turns around Flynt's almost perpetual run-ins with the law, with
anti-porn crusaders like Jerry Falwell and Charles Keating, and folds in
Flynt's loving (and kinda sick) relationship with his wife Althea
(Courtney Love).
     The biggest surprise in FLYNT is a five-star performance by
Harrelson.  After a series of idiotic movies like INDECENT PROPOSAL and
MONEY TRAIN, who knew there was an actual *actor* under there?  Edward
Norton also redeems himself from the boneheaded PRIMAL FEAR, playing
Flynt's long-suffering attorney Isaacman.  Again, another pleasant
surprise.
     But what truly baffles me is how Harrelson's finest hour is being
overshadowed in the press by the performance of Courtney Love, who is
undoubtedly one of the worst actresses I've ever seen, even in a role
that was custom-made for her meager talents.  That Love is perfectly
credible as a stripper/drug addict is no surprise; it's her credibility
as an actress (i.e. when she opens her mouth) that is more difficult to
swallow, and it is her laughable performance that almost manages to
topple FLYNT from greatness.  I can only assume that people are
confusing acting ability with a good makeup job.
     LARRY FLYNT is not particularly well-written, glossing over a ton
of details, often favoring shock value to storytelling.  Considering
this is the life of Larry Flynt, you can't really fault the writers for
this, but the linear plot progression often feels incidental to the rest
of the picture.  Still, Flynt's story is compelling enough to provide
its own momentum, and with Milos Forman (AMADEUS) behind the camera, it
does.
     As to whether Flynt is a crusader for freedom or the Anti-Christ,
you'll have to draw your own conclusion.  In the meantime, here's
something to think about:  Why is the movie called THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY
FLYNT when the big case in the film is Flynt vs. Falwell?  Discuss
amongst yourselves.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
     Kinky sex?  Intentional car wrecks?  Extreme underground
perversion?  A year and a half of fuss and controversy for this?  You
betcha!
     CRASH is one of the more disturbing movies I've seen in my
lifetime, and although I enjoyed it on an aesthetic level, I find it
difficult to recommend to the masses, and I think you'll see why in a
minute.
     David Cronenberg's story of a cadre of fetishists who get off on
car wrecks and suck in the not-so-innocent-themselves Ballard family
(James Spader and Deborah Unger) is an exercise in extremism.  Powerful
performances by all the leads (especially Holly Hunter and Elias Koteas
as big-time fetishists), excellent scoring, and masterful visuals make
CRASH a tricky little picture.  A little eye-popping, a little
nauseating, it's easy to get sucked into Cronenberg's spell.
     Then again, this is a movie about sex and car crashes, for God's
sake!  Where Cronenberg fails in his attempt to shock us is in his
trying much too hard to make us identify with these freaks and their
freakishness.  When you let your disbelief creep in just a little bit,
you start to ask yourself if it's even remotely reasonable to be aroused
by a car crash.  I just don't think so.
     CRASH gets progressively more and more disturbing as it gets more
and more ridiculous.  The ending is predictable, yet oddly understated.
     Sure, it's pretty silly when you sit down and think about it, but I
have to hand it to Cronie for trying.  I know I buckled my seatbelt on
the way home from the theater.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Cleopatra's Second Husband (1998)
     Ever had a houseguest that wouldn't leave?  You don't know the half
of it.  A striking departure from films like Pacific Heights,
Cleopatra's Second Husband cuts deep and pours salt in the wound -- a
harrowing story that goes from semi-romantic comedy to gruesome thriller
without looking back.
     Jon Reiss's debut feature tells the story of Robert Marrs (Paul
Hipp), an independently wealthy and prissy photographer unable to
impregnate his wife Hallie (Bitty Schram).  When they leave for a short
trip, Zack (Boyd Kestner) and Sophie (Pitch Black's Radha Mitchell) are
enlisted to care for the house.  But upon their return, the place is a
mess, the fish are dead, and Zack & Sophie don't look to leave.
     Things get spicy when Robert has a tryst with Sophie, his wife
leaves, Sophie follows suit, and Zack becomes a devil in the flesh, soon
turning Robert into a zombified slave.  What happens next I won't spoil,
but suffice it to say the best is yet to come.
     Cleopatra is startling in its originality, and while it's only 93
minutes long, the movie feels epic in its scope, thanks to all the
twists and turns.  In other words, it's destined to become a cult
classic.
     The film's few failings -- atrocious sound design that leaves
numerous lines inaudible, too many scenes that chat about rather that
show the action, and a draggy first act -- are largely forgivable.  In a
nutshell, if you're a fan of independent film, seek out Cleopatra's
Second Husband and see if your jaw doesn't hit the floor like mine.
Director: Jon Reiss
Producer: Jacqui De La Fontaine, Jill Goldman, David Rubin
Writer: Jon Reiss
Starring: Paul Hipp, Boyd Kestner, Bitty Schram, Radha Mitchell, Alexis
Arquette, Jonathan Penner, Nancye Ferguson
http://www.indicanpictures.com/Cleo.htm
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
     Easily the best comedy of the year - and the best film of the year
to star Joseph Fiennes and feature Queen Elizabeth as a major character
- SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE gets a hands-down recommendation for all
filmgoers.
     The clever premise follows one William Shakespeare (Fiennes), stuck
with writer's block while trying to pen "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's
Daughter" and unable to get his own love life going to boot.
     Enter Viola (Paltrow), an upper-class woman with aspirations of
acting in the men-only theatre who sneaks in (in drag) to audition for
the part of Romeo. But not only is Viola a woman, she's betrothed to the
Duke of Wessex and is set to sail for the New World in a matter of
weeks. It's only natural that young Will falls for the lady.
     Wacky hijinx ensue, but SHAKESPEARE never falls into the syrupy
love story trap, and the insight into what-might-have-been is a real
treat for fans of the bard. Fiennes does excellent work here, as does
Paltrow, who always seems to act better when affecting a British accent.
     The six Golden Globe nominations are right on target - definitely
check SHAKESPEARE out at an art house near you.
Director: John Madden
Producer: Donna Gigliotti, Marc Norman, David Parfitt, Harvey Weinstein,
Edward Zwick
Writer: Tom Stoppard, Marc Norman
Starring: Joseph Fiennes, Gwyneth Paltrow, Ben Affleck, Geoffrey Rush,
Judi Dench
http://www.miramax.com:8888/mm_front/owa/mp.entryPoint?action=0&midStr=742
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Last Night (1998)
     It's six hours until the end of the world, and Bruce Willis, Robert
Duvall, and Will Smith are nowhere in sight.  The world is *really gonna
end* -- so what do you do with those six hours?
     I rarely read film production notes, but writer/director/star Don
McKellar's introduction to LAST NIGHT caught my eye this time.  I quote,
`The world is ending, once again.  But this time, in my movie, there is
no overburdened loner duking it out with the asteroid, no presidents or
generals turning the tables on extra-terrestrials.  Those heroes are out
there, somewhere, one hopes, but I was interested in the rest of us
suckers-hapless individuals who, with limited access to nuclear
resources, would have to come to terms with the fast-approaching
finale.'
     This is heady stuff.  I've long toyed with the idea of writing a
black comedy set on the eve of our destruction, but always abandoned the
idea because it's just too maudlin.  Atom Egoyan veteran McKellar
doesn't completely escape that sentiment in this film, but he does a
commendable job at taking what might be the most difficult of subjects
and turning it into something that's enjoyable to watch.
     Reminiscent of SHORT CUTS in many ways, LAST NIGHT follows the
intertwined stories of the last six hours in the lives of several
people.  McKellar takes the lead as Patrick, a troubled man who has to
deal with his family (including sister Polly), sex-crazed friend Craig
(Rennie), and lost lamb Sandra (Oh), who's trying to get home in time so
she and her husband can kill each other before midnight, when the world
will go away (in a mysterious fate).
     None of this is played to comedy  well, maybe a *little* comedy,
and before long, the world has indeed ended for what might be the first
time on film, and everyone's life has changed along the way (you know,
before they died).
     LAST NIGHT is heavy filmmaking, but it rewards the patient viewer.
It's deep and thoughtful, and quite sleepy in parts, but McKellar, in
his directorial debut, has done an admirable job.  I know I couldn't
have done it.
Director: Don McKellar
Producer: Niv Fichman, Daniel Iron, Caroline Benjo
Writer: Don McKellar
Starring: Don McKellar, Sandra Oh, Callum Keith Rennie, Sarah Polley,
David Cronenberg, Tracy Wright, Genevieve Bujold
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
[REVIEWS TAKE A NEW, SHORTER FORMAT BEGINNING WITH 'THE SAINT']
     The Next Big Franchise hits theaters this Friday, with all the
trappings of a sequel-destined event.  Infused with a backstory to set
up the past of its nameless hero (Val Kilmer) as something of a "rogue
James Bond with a guilty conscience and a Volvo," THE SAINT is as
improbable as it is entertaining.  With a plot revolving around a
successful cold fusion experiment developed by miniskirt-clad scientist
Emma (Elizabeth Shue) and the Russian Mafia's enlisting of the Saint to
"steal the formula," it would be easy to sit back and laugh at the
film's goofiness.  However, Kilmer comes off as so engrossing and
delivers his wryly hilarious lines with such precision that you end up
forgetting the bad techno soundtrack and the series of unlikely
coincidences that drive the picture to its inevitable end.  And while
that obviously-altered-to-make-it-happy ending is truly annoying, it's
THE SAINT's combination of action and comedy that make it a worthwhile
trip.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Swingers (1996)
     One of the most sincere and earnest looks into single life in the
90's, SWINGERS is nothing but -- in the terms of its resident lounge
lizards -- *money*.
     You've probably seen print ads, movie reviews, and the like,
portraying SWINGERS as a film about a bunch of suave and sexy guys,
making the moves on the pretty babies (aka women) in the nightlife of
La-La land.  The title's double entendre doesn't help matters, either,
so let me set the record straight.
     SWINGERS is about a bunch of guys in L.A., yes, but they aren't
overly suave, with the exception of Trent (the hysterically funny Vince
Vaughn), who lives in an apparent fantasy world of CLOCKWORK ORANGEy
faux-English doublespeak.  His best friend is Mike (Jon Favreau, who
also wrote the script), a down-and-out actor/comedian suffering over the
breakup with his girlfriend of six years.  Rob (Ron Livingston) and Sue
(is in "a boy named Sue," Patrick Van Horn) are both actors/losers also.
     Weaving through Los Angeles and Las Vegas, Trent, Mike, and their
friends turn out to pretty much be high-talkers and low-rollers, about
like everyone else.  We see that these are regular guys, each with his
own demons, each as insecure as you and me.  But they talk a big game.
     Sound familiar?  In the end, SWINGERS perfectly humanizes its
players, makes a touching statement about getting back on your feet
after love knocks you down, and, most importantly, comes off as really,
really, really funny.  Favreau and director Doug Liman are sure to hit
the big time after this, and Vaughn (who's already been picked to star
in JURASSIC PARK 2) ought to get a Best Supporting Actor nomination, at
least.
     SWINGERS is one of those very rare movies where you really come out
a changed, happier person -- at least for awhile.  Hey, maybe I'm money,
and I don't even know it!
     And am I the only one that thinks Favreau looks *exactly* like
George Clooney?  And yes, Doug, that Aaton-III camera is *way* too loud.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit The Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Month by the Lake, A (1995)
     Take a base of ENCHANTED APRIL, a little of THE POSTMAN, maybe
some MEDITERRANEO, throw them together, and what do you get?  A mess,
to be sure, and I'm guessing it the result is something like A MONTH BY
THE LAKE, John Irvin's new film about two star-crossed lovers who find
romance in their "golden years."
     Vanessa Redgrave and Edward Fox play the leads of Miss Beaumont
and Major Paulo, aging British singles who vacation at a lake in 1937
Italy, just before World War II.  The pair soon discover each other:
She is a headstrong photographer.  He is a crusty businessman who
dabbles in sleight-of-hand.  Clearly, they are meant for each other,
and a love/hate relationship develops on the spot.  As the romance
progresses, the two abuse and play off each other's insecurities so
well, you'd think they really were a couple.  When youngsters Miss
Bentley (Uma Thurman) and Vittorio enter the picture and complicate
matters, the film becomes a game of sly cat and mouse, where you never
know who is chasing after whom.
     The fundamental problem is that A MONTH BY THE LAKE is supposed to
be a romance, but the emotions of love are dreadfully lacking from all
the players, probably because Trevor Bentham's spare script doesn't
provide any room for these feelings.  As far as I could tell, the
supreme act that pushes Miss Beaumont head over heels for the Major is
the fact that he sends her flowers as a peace offering over one of
their spats.  It just isn't that easy.  Most of the time, the two seem
to hate each other, and in all honesty, the Major is a big jerk.  When
Miss Beaumont falls for him, it's really kind of depressing.
     That aside, the film is well-made and has some funny moments,
particularly when the principals are acting spiteful.  Also, the
picture's true worth comes out in its theme of the impending war and in
making us feel that this idyllic lakeside village is doomed when the
inevitable bombing begins.  I don't know if that was the message they
were shooting for when making a romance, but that's what they got, and
ultimately, this unexpected power is what makes the film worthwhile.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Redboy 13 (1997)
     Indie filmmaker Marcus van Bavel may not have a knack for catchy
titles, but he certainly has a flair for spoofing the big-budget spy
genre on what must have been a low six-figure budget.
     REDBOY 13 pays homage to DR. STRANGELOVE, FULL METAL JACKET, DIRTY
HARRY, MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, RAMBO, and, most importantly, the James Bond
films.  Hell, if it wasn't for AUSTIN POWERS, REDBOY 13 would be the
first real spy spoof to come along in a while.
     Especially considering its humble origins in the backwoods of
Texas, it's a damn good one.  Er... a *gosh darn* good one, as Colonel
Calcan (Logan) would say.  Set in the waning days of the Cold War,
REDBOY 13 is the story of a 13-year old boy (Roy-Brown) who is trained
to be a top agent for a splinter group of the U.S. government called the
C.Y.A.  Under the supervision of Calcan, Redboy is sent to Central
America to overthrow a military regime... when he returns, he'll be "the
biggest hero since Ollie North."  There's even a big Bondian opening
credits sequence with silhouettes, grandiose vocalizing, etc.
     REDBOY 13 plays it straight all the way, with the exception of van
Bavel's appearance(s) in the film as three supporting characters, a la
Peter Sellers in STRANGELOVE (one of the characters is even a
wheelchair-bound mad scientist whose allegiance is with Nazi Germany). 
In fact, if van Bavel didn't look so frighteningly like shock filmmaker
John Waters, one might be tempted to take REDBOY at face value.
     Tempted, but impossible.  A darling of the festival circuit, REDBOY
13 is shot in 35mm Cinemascope, has dozens of computer-generated effects
(they look kinda cheesy, but hey, this is an indie pic), and only really
suffers during some hammy acting that wanders into Leslie Nielsen
territory a few times.  But in the end, van Bavel's assured technical
direction and clever photography make REDBOY imminently watchable.
Director: Marcus van Bavel
Producer: Marcus van Bavel, David Boone
Writer: Marcus van Bavel
Starring: Robert Logan, Devon Roy-Brown, Charlie Schmidt, Wendy Blech
http://www.io.com/~mvb/rb13.html
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Long Kiss Goodnight, The (1996)
     The much-publicized ballyhoo over THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT relates
largely to the $4 million paid for Shane Black's script.  The question
everyone is asking is, was it worth it?
     Well, yes and no.  Opening weekend is sure to bring in moviegoers
in droves enthralled by the sight of Geena Davis with a blonde dye-job,
but more discriminating viewers will probably be put-off by the plot
holes, inconsistencies, and downright silliness of the film.  I mean,
how many times *can* you outrun an explosion in one film, anyway?
     THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT starts with one hell of an idea -- suburban
schoolteacher Samantha (Davis) has had amnesia for eight years, and when
an escaped convict tries to kill her after he sees her on television,
the truth of her past is slowly revealed.  Along with private eye Mitch
(Samuel L. Jackson), Samantha discovers the reality of her life -- she
is a cold-blooded assassin in the employ of the CIA under deep cover, by
the name of Charly.
     Things go from bad to worse when everyone apparently wants the
resurfaced and now out-of-date Charly out of the picture, and it becomes
a game of cat and mouse with Charly's new goal becoming... well, we
never really figure that out, but it involves killing a lot of people,
and blowing up a lot of stuff.
     Jackson is hilarious here in another PULP-y Jules-esque comic
relief role, and Davis has the action-star makings of another Sigourney
Weaver.  And while the film on the whole is one exciting slam-bang
actioner (directed by slam-bang director and Mr. Geena Davis, Renny
Harlin), it's the glaring bits of incongruity that constantly bother the
viewer.  The conveniently placed props -- thin ice where it's needed,
always a gun handy, kerosene in a child's doll (I still haven't figured
that one out) -- and Harlin's insistence in pointing these out well in
advance so we won't be scratching our heads when they inevitably enter
the picture -- all of this gives the movie the feeling of a
methodically-planned operation, executed with the skill of... well, a
killer like Charly.
     THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT has other problems, most notably a poor
editing job, needed explanatory sequences obviously excised from the
film, and a disconcerting similarity of Charly at the end of the film to
MacGyver, but what's the point of worrying?  In the end, you're likely
to remember little but a lot of guns, explosions, and Geena's lovely
hair.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium and Null Set Productions
at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Englishman Who Went Up a Hill But Came Down a Mountain, The (1995)
     If you're expecting a big joke about the unfortunate title of this
film, you'll be disappointed.  Everyone else has done it already.  I saw
the film late, and I'm just not falling into that trap.
     With that out of the way, THE ENGLISHMAN WHO WENT UP A HILL BUT CAME
DOWN A MOUNTAIN refers to the title character, Hugh Grant, who is given
this wacky Welsh nickname as the result of some wacky events surrounding
the wacky title hill/mountain.
     The story is a classic comic farce.  Set in 1917, in the village at
the foot of the mountain, Ffynnon Garw, a pair of surveyors from England
come to the village to measure its height.  Grant is Anson, as one of the
surveyors who recently returned from World War I only to find himself
shell-shocked so badly that public service is his only apparent employment
option.
     When Anson measures Ffynnon Garw, he finds it to be just a bit too
short to be called a mountain.  Now the Welsh take their mountains very
seriously, and this is quite a blow to the village, so with the aid of
villagers Morgan (Colm Meaney), Betty (Tara Fitzgerald), and a host of
others, they conspire to keep the surveyors in town long enough to pile
enough dirt atop Ffynnon Garw to push it into mountaindom.  Through high
school-style pranks and the affectionate ministrations of Betty, Anson
stays in town long enough to be charmed by its beauty, simplicity, and
fraternity.
     Some of this works.  Some of it doesn't.  THE ENGLISHMAN can be
hilarious at times, and really quite silly at others.  In fact,
Fitzgerald, who is normally the embodiment of the phrase "ingenue," looks
downright goofy with her 1917 Shirley Temple curls and period dress.  I
couldn't take her seriously at all.  Worse still, the critical romance
developing between her and Anson is completely unbelievable, and was a
real stumbling block for me.
     Otherwise, the film is good, if not entirely memorable, featuring
some excellent bit players and an original story (but not too
original--the story of Ffynnon Garw is true).  The film drags a bit here
and there, but the ending had me walking out with a smile.

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
     I have no idea what "wonder boys" are.  I assume it's one of many
questions that are answered in the novel but which go ignored in this
film adaptation.
     As it turns out, it doesn't really matter who the WONDER BOYS are.
The film has enough substance and, especially, ribald and dark, dark
humor to carry it despite a few minor flaws like this.
     A very deep character study, WONDER BOYS revolves around Pittsburgh
professor and novelist Grady Tripp (Douglas), now struggling with his
second novel, which has stretched into 2,600 pages and years in the
making.  Daytime, he teaches writing to the likes of James (Maguire) and
Hannah (Holmes), while attempting to hide his affair with the (married)
University Chancellor (McDormand) and keeping his unfinished novel from
the grubby hands of his editor (Downey).
     Grady's relationship with the talented (yet nearly sociopathic)
James becomes the focus of the picture, is Grady tries to coax the
hidden writing talent out of James, all while they take a wild ride
together through a Pittsburgh winter storm.
     The depth of character development in WONDER BOYS defies any hack
film critic's two-paragraph description of them.  Suffice it to say that
WONDER BOYS is often deep and invariably quite funny, especially if
you're a fan of black comedy.  Case in point: The film really gets going
when James kills the blind dog that is attacking Grady's leg.  I never
knew a dog's carcass could be so funny, and I'm something of an animal
lover.
     That said, WONDER BOYS is no KINGPIN.  This is a sophisticated
movie for a sophisticated audience.  The cast is universally
outstanding.  It's especially good to see McDormand in a good role
again, and Douglas and Maguire turn in very memorable performances,
redeeming them both for some recent, lackluster pictures.
Director: Curtis Hanson
Producer: Curtis Hanson, Scott Rudin
Writer: Steven Kloves
Starring: Michael Douglas, Robert Downey Jr., Katie Holmes, Tobey
Maguire, Frances McDormand, Richard Thomas, Rip Torn
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Net, The (1995)
     This just goes to show that not only can Sandra Bullock not act,
but she can't even pick decent projects, either.  Sucked from the
Hollywood buzzword list like a bottom-feeder looking for sludge, THE
NET is trite idiocy that is socially irresponsible and irredeemable.  I
puked out loud.
     I honestly can't believe a movie like this was made.  Basically,
it's the story of Angela Bennett (Bullock), a superstar computer hacker
who runs across something she isn't supposed to, then finds her
identity erased, her friends killed, and herself hunted down.
Obviously a rush job to beat the other impending computer movies to the
market, THE NET is one plot hole after another, with technological
impossibilities filling the space between.
     If you think for one second that Sandra Bullock is believable as a
systems analyst who hasn't left her house in four years, you probably
aren't mentally capable of reading this review.  I mean, she's got an
awfully nice body for someone who sits on her butt 24 hours a day.
     The story and acting are pathetic, the only exception being
comedian Dennis Miller, whose five minutes of screen time are more like
a welcome intermission than a part of the film.  Unfortunately, it's
much too little, too late.  THE NET is simply horrible in every
way--the writing isn't clever, the jokes are unilaterally flat, the
sound effects are silly (a wooden *carousel* horse actually brays) and
the "romance" scenes are funny because they're so pitiful.  Director
Irwin Winkler (NIGHT AND THE CITY, 1992) isn't exactly on a winning
streak here, either.  As Miller's character puts it in the film, "I'm
not buyin' the whole package."
     The sad thing is that a movie vaguely similar to THE NET was made
rather well in 1992 as SNEAKERS.  Unfortunately, the producers of this
film decided to make a "serious picture" about the dangers of a fully
computerized society, ripping off the message of SNEAKERS, but
forgetting to satirize it like that film did.  I pray that no one takes
this movie as a serious warning.  The last thing we need in this
country are more paranoid technophobes.

Title
Review for Usual Suspects, The (1995)
     THE USUAL SUSPECTS, the heavily hyped new film from Bryan Singer,
is finally here, and with it comes the answer to the riddle posed in
its high-powered ad campaign, "Who is Keyser Soze?"
     Keyser Soze is a semi-mythical crime kingpin who ultimately
directs the actions of five small-time hoods.  With the promise of $91
million and the opportunity to keep their lives, the enigmatic Keyser
sends the quintet on a fool's errand in San Pedro harbor: to stop a
competitor's huge cocaine sale that would interfere with Keyser's own
drug operation.  As the film opens, we see the catastrophic results of
the mission.
     The band of unlucky criminals includes the classy Dean Keaton
(Gabriel Byrne), palsied Verbal Kint (Kevin Spacey), hardware
specialist Hockney (Kevin Pollak), entry-man McManus (Stephen Baldwin),
and the mush-mouthed Fenster (Benicio Del Toro).  Kint, the lone
survivor of the five felons, is quizzed by U.S. Customs Agent Kujan
(Chazz Palminteri) about the crime.  The remainder of the movie shows
us the tale he weaves.
     THE USUAL SUSPECTS puts some neat twists on the classic crime
drama, and it's one of the blackest comedies you'll see this year.  All
the actors nail their parts with ultra-cool finesse, and just listening
to Del Toro mumble his lines is worth the cost of the ticket alone.
Singer's direction is also completely on target.
     My problems with the film come from the plot.  The primary
difficulty is that the movie sometimes gets a little too clever for its
own good, the same problem Hal Hartley ran into with this year's
AMATEUR.  While it keeps you in stitches, the film takes its
multi-layered riddles a little too far, and while this is somewhat
critical to the film, it's still a bit much.  The end result is a
picture bogged down by the weight of maintaining an overdone mystique.
     The other "minor" problem is the mystique itself, regarding the
identity of Keyser Soze.  45 minutes into the film, I placed my bet on
the name of Soze's alter-ego.  An hour later, I won, despite some
rather unfair trickery on behalf of the script.  While the flashback
clues can be very misleading (a la Hitchcock's STAGE FRIGHT), they
never come out and deliberately lie to the viewer.  Regardless, it
still shouldn't stop the audience from figuring it all out, well in
advance.
     Despite all this, THE USUAL SUSPECTS is a funny, visually
stunning, and much-needed change of pace from recent thrillers, which
have had the originality of a Xerox machine.  I'm happy to say that
this one's no copy.
-Christopher Null, Mike's FEEDBACK Magazine / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
     Invoking memories of THE MATRIX, TWELVE MONKEYS, CRASH, and
AMERICAN BEAUTY, FIGHT CLUB has had a lot of hype behind it for close to
a year now.  Is it deserved?  I'm still trying to figure that one out.
I saw the film 6 hours ago.  I liked what I saw.  I'm just not sure
*what* I saw any more.
     FIGHT CLUB is the story of Jack (Norton), a mild-mannered day-job
schlub/insomniac.  To combat his lack of sleep, Jack takes comfort in
various support groups for ailments he doesn't have, where he finds a
sudden freedom from life's pressures, surrounded by people on the verge
of recovery or the verge of death.  Soon enough, Jack becomes `addicted'
to the support groups, but things get worse when the freakish Marla
(Carter) tries to take over his space  obviously getting off on the
same thrill as Jack.
     Soon, Jack is back where he started, and on a flight home from yet
another business trip, he encounters Tyler (Pitt), a nutty character
reminiscent of The Mad Hatter, William S. Burroughs, and The Unabomber
all rolled up into one.  When Jack arrives at home, he finds his condo
mysteriously blown up, and he ends up moving in with Tyler in a craphole
of a house.  Tyler takes Jack down a road of self-discovery, mainly
through violence, and together they found Fight Club, an underground
bareknuckled boxing society  a big step beyond `self-help.'
     As the movie progresses, so does the darkness of Fight Club.  Its
membership skyrockets, and its extracurricular activities turn
subversive.  The explosive ending introduces a twist a la THE SIXTH
SENSE, which finally helps the movie make some sense.
     Along the way, FIGHT CLUB is quite a ride.  Director Fincher
(SEVEN) knows atmosphere, and atmosphere is what you get, starting right
with the opening credits, which feature a ride through the human brain.
Norton narrates the entire film, which puts you right inside his head.
The acting is superb, and Meat Loaf is quite hilarious as an enormous
man with no testicles and two giant breasts (I'd explain, but...).
     FIGHT CLUB is not going to appeal to everyone the way SIXTH SENSE
did.  It's bloody and violent (hence the name), but it's as unique a
film as you're likely to see this year.  I don't wanna see any hate mail
about this review... or else we're gonna have to take this outside.
http://www.foxmovies.com/fightclub/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Cherry Falls (2000)
By now, the audience for slasher films is perfectly attuned to the
rhythms of Scream and its spawn of imitators, each more formulaic than
the next.  Attractive teenagers flirt with one another, meander around
campus chatting on their cell phones, then abruptly find themselves
isolated in an abandoned library or, God forbid, alone in the house. 
That's when the masked killer attacks.  Cue the shrieks.
Put Cherry Falls a notch above the competition for the audacity of its
wry comic twist.  Yes, there's a creepy, longhaired psychopath, either a
convincing drag queen or a ferociously strong woman, deliberately
seeking out virgins for slicing and dicing.  Virgins.  The resourceful
students of Cherry Falls High School soon realize that they have a
deliciously simple choice: fucking or death.  Which would you choose?
Not even their sensitive "Mr. Nice Guy" teacher (Jay Mohr, Jerry
Maguire) can prevent the hormones kicking into overdrive when an
elaborate bacchanal is planned for Friday night.  Considering the
alternative, randy boys and horny girls seek salvation in each other's
arms.  Yeah, baby, yeah!
The local sheriff (a well-cast Michael Biehn, Aliens) turns a blind eye
to those naughty kids while following the only lead he's got.  Could it
be that ever reliable plot device of a dark secret in the town's past
which can no longer remain hidden?  He's determined to find out.  No
sooner has he told his headstrong young daughter Jody (Brittany Murphy,
Clueless) to mind her curfew than she's sleuthing around herself. 
Daddy's little girl suddenly becomes the slasher's chief target.
You'll have no trouble deducing the killer from the handful of suspects,
though screenwriter Ken Selden's choice of leaving the gender a mystery
certainly helps.  Senden also creates a very well-written
father-daughter chat for Biehn and Murphy where the birds and the bees
are not so easy to categorize.  When he asks whether she could still go
a little further, it's unclear just what he's intending to protect.
For the most part, Cherry Falls sticks to the tried and true formula,
bringing to mind words like adequate or functional.  Geoffrey Wright
(Romper Stomper) deftly handles his directorial chores, maintaining
well-crafted suspense without adding any particularly original new
tricks to the proverbial cinematic bag.
In addition to the clever touch of kids breaking the fundamental rule of
slasher films (where only virginal heroines survive,) Cherry Falls has
one other vital ingredient.  Brittany Murphy has all the makings of a
movie star, a girl with beauty and brains.  On top of that, she's quite
a capable actress, much more believable as an eager high schooler than
scream queen bimbos Neve Campbell or Jennifer Love Hewitt.
If anyone deserves to inherit the mantle of Halloween's Jamie Lee
Curtis, it's Cherry Falls' leading lady.  Her most challenging roles
have been on stage (Arthur Miller's A View From the Bridge) but she
hasn't struck gold onscreen.  With a little luck, who knows?  If the
Jamie Lee comparison is accurate, she could go on to star in the 21st
century's answer to A Fish Called Wanda.  Memo to Hollywood: Give
Brittany Murphy more work!
http://www.cherryfallsmovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
     It's tough to say what ENTRAPMENT will be remembered better for:
Sean Connery's hairpiece, or Catherine Zeta-Jones's ass.  I pick the
ass, and the way it's featured in the trailers for ENTRAPMENT, I'd say
the producers do too.
     If only the rest of the movie was so interesting.  While the idea
is pretty cool: a cop and an art thief tangle in a cat and mouse game,
constantly switching sides, all on the eve of the millenium... it's the
execution that gets 'em every time.
     Connery's the thief, and he does fine work.  Zeta-Jones is the
cop.  Well, she's not a cop.  She's an, um, well, how do I put it? 
She's an *insurance agent*--although unlike any I've ever encountered...
not by a long shot.  And when Connery steals a valuable Rembrandt, does
insurance boss Will Patton send in the feds to catch him?  No!  He sends
Z-J.  Why not?
     Well, most of ENTRAPMENT plays out in head-scratching "Huh? Why?
Eh?" moments like these.  Like how do you "download" money off of a
mainframe?  Why doesn't Connery have locks on the doors to his castle? 
Can you just check valuable art in your baggage?  Why would you leave
DNA evidence (on gum) at the scene of the crime?  And wow do you get
away with the crime if they know exactly who you are?  And why does an
insurance agent get to carry a gun?
     There are no answers to these little riddles... but it's really
moments like Zeta-Jones playing gymnast through "invisible laser beams"
and the constant "disappearing behind a moving train" maneuvers that
really had 'em rolling in the aisles in our screening.
     That's not to say that ENTRAPMENT isn't without its little charms. 
There's exotic locales, clever hi-tech gadgetry, and of course, the
aforementioned ass.  Something to remember when the plot's a distant
memory.
     The presskit claims ENTRAPMENT was sold to Fountainbridge Films
after a Ron Bass pitch only seven lines long.
Director: Jon Amiel
Producer: Sean Connery, Michael Hertzberg, Rhonda Tollefson
Writer: Ron Bass, William Broyles
Starring: Sean Connery, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Ving Rhames, Will Patton,
Maury Chaykin
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Cirque du Soleil: Dralion (2000) (V)
Cirque du Soleil is back with this direct-to-video production, Dralion,
89 minutes of jumping, flying, dancing, and wordless gags that will
leave you either breathless or, in my case, fumbling for a vial of
Tylenol.
Typical of any Cirque production, Dralion features a jaw-dropping and
expansive litany of acrobatic stunts, presented in rapid-fire succession
so that you never know what's coming at you.  A martial arts-style
performance with flags for swords will be succeeded by a juggler with
seven balls in the air.  A trapeze act will abut a gaggle of little
Asian girls who stack themselves five-high on one another's shoulders. 
For comic relief, "clowns" will come out and goof around -- the best
part of the video being a short, bald man who picks someone out of the
crowd to use as an unwitting ally in his own stunts (though later the
"audience member" turns out to be a Cirque troupe performer).
Sounds good so far.  Alas, the problem with Dralion is not in its
action, it's with its filmmaking.  While the filmmakers should be
congratulated for having so many cameras, the editor should be shot for
feeling compelled to cut among them every couple of seconds.  Flash! 
We're in a wide shot overlooking the arena.  Flash!  We're on a close-up
of a performer's agonized face.  Flash!  We're watching one of the
singers who would otherwise be in the background.  Flash!  We're looking
at a kid in the audience eating cotton candy.  Flash!  We're back to the
wide shot.
This rapid-fire editing is incessant, never pausing for a minute, and
stands as one of the worst examples of cutting a film together I've ever
seen.  Not only does this detract from the performance, it makes it
virtually impossible to see what's going on altogether.  The use of
video to capture the goings on doesn't help either, lending a Circus of
the Stars feel to the proceedings.  Like most Cirque films, the actual
acrobatics are fun and fine, but the way they are presented simply
blows.  Literally, watching the film gave me a headache inside of 25
minutes.
And that's got to hurt more than trying to balance your whole body on
one arm.
http://www.cthv.com/cgi-bin/CTHV.storefront/405357269/Product/View/06139
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Sol del membrillo, El (1992)
     One is tempted during the opening of Dream of Light to proclaim it
one of the most fascinating documentaries ever made.  For 15 minutes,
there is nearly no dialogue, as Antonio López García, a renowned Spanish
painter, prepares a canvas for his next work: a painting of the sun as
it dances across the leaves and fruit of a quince tree.  The detail is
remarkable, and you sit up in your seat, waiting for things to really
get going.
     But about an hour into the painting (and six or so weeks in his
real life), you start to realize that the emperor may indeed be without
clothes.  García's painting indeed slowly comes to life, the key word
being slowly.  In fact, it's so slow it is literally mind numbing.  Yes,
you will fall asleep.  No, you won't miss anything.  And even after
that  hour, you've still got 88 minutes to go.  But then comes the
kicker: Imagine your surprise when García actually quits his painting
because Spain's bad weather makes the light all wrong and he can't
continue.
     No, really.  After 90 minutes, this documentary about a painting
becomes a documentary about the drawing García decides to make instead.
     Or is it even that?  Dream of Light is shot in a documentary style,
but it's clearly not a traditional documentary.  Why?  Because multiple
camera angles, seamless intercutting, and pro-grade production design
make it clear that multiple takes were involved, and that, in other
words, at least some of Dream of Light has been staged for the benefit
of the viewer.  How do I feel about this?  I'm not sure.  But maybe if
all this work had created a film worth sitting through I wouldn't be as
perturbed as I am about it.
     Whether it's a documentary or not, the sheer dumbness of the way
this movie was put together is alone enough to drag it down.  Director
Víctor Erice spends plenty of time with García at his work, showing us
the painstaking detail he takes in getting through a project, but he
also sidetracks the movie with a half-dozen side stories that are as
meaningless as they are dull.  I'd describe them... but I can't.  I
never did figure out the identities of all the bizarre people who wander
into García's backyard to watch him painting the quince tree.  Some are
family, and one appears to be a fellow painter, but most seem to be
handymen working on a construction job in his house.  And they add to
this story how?  Largely unreadable subtitles don't help things at all.
     Ultimately, like many films about art, Dream of Light is a pretty
movie that is pleasing on the eyes.  But like much of the art itself, it
also leaves a lot open for interpretation, and even more to the
imagination.  Too much for my taste.
Director: Víctor Erice
Producer: María Moreno
Writer: Víctor Erice, Antonio López García
Starring: Antonio López García, Marina Moreno, Enrique Gran, María
López, Carmen López, Elisa Ruiz, José Carretero, Amalia Aria, Lucio
Muńoz, Esperanza Parada, Julio López Hernández, Fan Xiao Ming, Yan Sheng
Dong, Janusz Pietrzkiak, Marek Domagala, Grzegorz Ponikmia
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Ghost World (2001)
It's been seven years since director Terry Zwigoff impressed moviegoers
with his documentary Crumb, an uncomfortable look at pop comic artist R.
Crumb and his disturbing, grotesque, dysfunctional family.  Zwigoff's
ability to make viewers squirm and laugh at the same time is again in
full bloom, with the fictional Ghost World, a funny, sympathetic look at
a whole new group of awkward, unhappy people.
Based on a comic/graphic novel by Daniel Clowes (who co-wrote the
screenplay adaptation with Zwigoff), Ghost World provides the
point-of-view of young Enid, just out of high school, and aimless in
both direction and identity.  In the able hands of Thora Birch, who's
already suffered the ennui of suburbia in American Beauty, Enid is a
caustic, sarcastic, yet charming, sweetie.  Birch is in practically
every scene of the film, and anchors it with perfect tone.
Enid pals around with best friend Rebecca (a mopy, wonderfully
understated Scarlett Johansson), wondering about their futures, and
looking for cheap thrills.  Their dialogue is an exciting mix of slacker
smarts, movie fantasy, and the words of the inexperienced.  Rebecca
proclaims that she wants to "fuck" the worst stand-up comic in the world
(a guy they see on TV, appearing at the "Humor Grotto"), but she wants
to "make love" to the mullet-wearing spaz working at a pathetic
50s-style diner.  Zwigoff's choice of words, as well as biting settings,
give Ghost World a strange, easygoing sensibility that's tough not to
like.
As Rebecca gravitates toward the straight and narrow, Enid spends more
time with Seymour (played with appropriate shamelessness by indie hero
Steve Buscemi), a slightly pathetic record collector who's painfully
self-aware of his anti-social tendencies.  In Seymour, Enid sees a soul
mate, someone else who can't figure out humanity, and may just despise
it.  What Seymour doesn't know is that the pair's unlikely meeting is
the result of a heartless practical joke that Enid and Rebecca have
initially played on him.
The wonderful thing about Ghost World is that it finally provides an
original mood to the "misunderstood teen" genre.  One wrong move and
Enid's just another Daria (from the animate TV series; indeed, Ghost
World is originally a comic book).  Too much bitching about life, and
these characters would seem as familiar as those in other movies that
have tried to capture this tough period of a person's life (Reality
Bites, subUrbia, etc.)  Instead, Zwigoff skews everything just
left-of-center, including important details in music, costumes, and even
freaky background players.
Zwigoff's total package so successfully bucks convention that when Ghost
World slides off-course or pushes a bit long, it's easily forgiven. 
Soon enough, we're back in a revealing conversation between Enid and
Seymour, or in Illeana Douglas' hysterical remedial summer art class,
which Enid must pass to get the hell out of high school.
Some interesting visual references are made to the director's old
friend, R. Crumb (pale, sorry-looking mini-strip malls, a crisscross of
endless power lines), and the look of the movie is always exciting. 
Zwigoff even works in blackly comic comments about the interpretation of
art, race in America, and the culture of political correctness.
In an early scene, one of the girls proclaims, "That's so bad, it's
good."  The other replies, "No, that's so bad, it's gone past good, and
back to bad again."  This sort of retro-retro is exactly where Terry
Zwigoff has gone, creating a mood that's so geeky, it's gone right past
hip, and back to geeky again.  But it's still pretty cool.
Director: Terry Zwigoff
Producer: Lianne Halfon, John Malkovich, Russell Smith
Writer: Daniel Clowes, Terry Zwigoff
Starring: Thora Birch, Scarlett Johansson, Steve Buscemi, Brad Renfro,
Illeana Douglas, Bob Balaban, Teri Garr, Stacey Travis
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
     Tarzan the Ape Man gets the Disney treatment this year.  For some
classic characters (Snow White, Bambi), the transition has been a
positive one.  For others (Pocahontas), it's been a disaster.
Thankfully, TARZAN is among the former group.
     The last time we saw Tarzan, he was saving a Lost City in the worst
film of 1998 (shockingly titled TARZAN AND THE LOST CITY).  The story is
a bit more traditional this time, with Tarzan adopted by gorillas after
his human parents are killed by a leopard.  When he grows up, a group of
British explorers stumble upon him, and after the `You Tarzan, me Jane'
exchange, the British bad guy, Clayton, decides he's going to take all
the gorillas back to Britain for sale.  Adventure ensues, along with a
love story and singing.
     For an animated Disney plot, it's considerably better than recent
fare.  In fact, it might be too good  the kids in our audience were
more often found cowering in the aisles than watching the picture from
their seats.  Be aware that TARZAN has its share of adult moments
(including a hanging, seen in shadow)  more than I'd thought
appropriate.  The animation is top-notch, of course, and most of that
will be wasted on the youngsters, too.
     TARZAN is also (thankfully--most thankfully) light on the musical
numbers.  There's only one song performed by the characters, when the
gorillas take over the human camp and do a rendition of `Stomp.'  The
rest of the music is all in the background, fairly well done by Phil
Collins.  Again, it's awfully nice to *not* have to put up with a diva
or two on the soundtrack.  Even the whole talking animals thing makes
sense this time: Tarzan can speak to them.  The other humans cannot.
Well done.
     As for the annoying sidekicks (voiced by Rosie O'Donnell and Wayne
Knight), I leave them for either your mirth or your displeasure.
Ultimately, this Disneyfied TARZAN ends up somewhere between THE LION
KING and HERCULES.  You can decide for yourself exactly where.
Director: Chris Buck, Kevin Lima
Producer: Bonnie Arnold
Writer: Bob Tzudiker, Noni White, Tab Murphy
Starring: Tony Goldwyn, Minnie Driver, Glenn Close, Alex D. Linz, Rosie
O'Donnell, Brian Blessed, Nigel Hawthorne, Wayne Knight, Lance Henriksen
http://disney.go.com/DisneyPictures/tarzan/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1

Title
Review for Now and Then (1995)
     Let me just start by saying I'm probably not the best person in
the world to be reviewing a film about the coming of age of four
twelve-year old girls in suburban America.  I'm going to give it my
best shot--just bear in mind who you're dealing with here.
     The cutesy premise of NOW AND THEN is this:  Now ... Samantha
(Rosie O'Donnell), Teeny (Melanie Griffith), Roberta (Demi Moore), and
Chrissy (Rita Wilson) are gathering together to help Chrissy through
her pregnancy.  Then ... the characters are the same, only 25 years
younger, played by Christina Ricci, Thora Birch, Gaby Hoffman, and
Ashleigh Aston Moore.  The film plays out over the summer of 1970
(there's a whole lot more Then than Now), where the girls' perform a
seance that leads them to investigate the mysterious death of a 12 year
old boy, long since buried in the local cemetery.
     The girls also struggle with their blossoming sexuality, the evil
boys down the street, practical jokes on each other, female bonding,
and parental-driven teen angst.  It's kind of like THE BIG CHILL meets
THE GOONIES meets LITTLE WOMEN.  If this sounds corny to you already,
believe me, it's twice as corny on the screen.  Slathered in slapstick
humor and lots of female anatomy jokes, NOW AND THEN quickly
degenerates into an occasionally funny comedy with the heart of a sappy
melodrama about "growing up."
     There are plenty of pop culture references to 1970, most notably a
hip retro soundtrack, but unfortunately, not much was going on in
America in 1970.  After all, that's why they sent FORREST GUMP to
Vietnam.  So, to supplement the lack of character in the setting,
director Leslie Linka Glatter has given the film two things instead:  a
lot of celebrity cameos, and a lot of scenes of girls almost drowning.
No, it doesn't make sense, but at least it's distracting.
     I like to think I generally understand shows like "My So-Called
Life," but NOW AND THEN escapes me.  After all, anything featuring Demi
Moore as a novelist comes off as believable as, well, Demi Moore as a
novelist.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Psycho Beach Party (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Robert Strohmeyer.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/cba54b75eb5a04238825696100047644?OpenDocument
Not since Rocky Horror has the film world produced such a vibrant farce
of teen angst, violence, and sexual deviance.  And here comes Rocky's
comeuppance, as off-Broadway cult icon Charles Busch has scripted a work
of sheer demented brilliance in the gleefully absurd Psycho Beach Party.
Originally performed on the stage, Psycho Beach Party is the story of a
teenage girl who wants desperately to surf.  It's also the story of a
female cop who used to be a man.  And some homoerotic surfers.  And a
beautiful movie star who's hiding from Hollywood.  And an alcoholic
mother with no grasp of the present.  And a psychotic killer who hacks
people up for their imperfections.  And it all takes place at Malibu
Beach in 1962.
Visually resplendent and constantly hilarious, this film has all the
makings of a teen cult favorite.  Combining the setting concepts of
production designer Franco-Giacomo Carbone and the costuming of Camille
Jumelle with the romping weirdness of an absolutely bizarre cast, Psycho
Beach Party is a hilarious revelation of the pervasive neuroses welling
up within the generation it represents.
Deftly acted to a sprightly, refined camp under the direction of Robert
Lee King (Boys Life, The Disco Years), the entire cast deserves kudos. 
Particularly noteworthy is Lauren Ambrose (In & Out, Can't Hardly Wait)
as Chicklet, the 16-year-old tomboy around whom the film's drama
revolves.  Through Ambrose's performance, Chicklet comes off like a
psychotropic Gidget, the sort of girl the word "spunk" might seem to
have been invented for.  Her sudden, schizophrenic shifts from one
personality to another are refreshingly ridiculous, riding a thin wire
of sincerity and self-mockery one seldom sees in celluloid.
Thomas Gibson (ABC's Dharma & Greg) is funny in his role as surf-guru
Kanaka, but often appears to be left out of the joke.  Fortunately, the
rest of the cast appears to get it and keeps the story rolling through a
cavalcade of dorky music, lame plot twists, and insanely bad special
effects.  This is a movie you can laugh both with and at.
Charles Busch's role as Captain Monica Stark is funny and self-effacing.
Australian beauty Kimberly Davies (The Next Best Thing) gives a
performance evoking Gilligan's Island's Ginger as B-movie
starlet-in-hiding Bettina.  And keep and eye out for Splendor's Kathleen
Robertson as Rhonda the wheelchair-bound psychobitch.
This movie is everything it sets out to be.  Go for the cheap thrills;
stay for the surprise ending.
Director: Robert Lee King
Producer: Ginny Biddle, Jon Gerrans, Marcus Hu, Victor Syrmis
Writer: Charles Busch
Starring: Lauren Ambrose, Thomas Gibson, Nicholas Brendon, Matt Keeslar,
Andrew Levitas, Nick Cornish, Kathleen Robertson, Danni Wheeler, Amy
Adams
URL: http://www.psychobeachparty.com
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Third Miracle, The (1999)
     In the immortal words of singer Fats Waller, "I believe in
miracles...."  Who else is a believer?  Agnieszka Holland, best known
for poetic period pieces like WASHINGTON SQUARE and trite garbage like
TOTAL ECLIPSE, who finally ventures into the modern era (or reasonably
modern: 1979) with THE THIRD MIRACLE.
     Based on the poorly-received novel of the same name, THE THIRD
MIRACLE follows a down-and-out drunk of a priest named Frank Shore
(Harris), on his assignment to debunk (or bunk) a claim of sainthood
regarding a Chicago woman named Helen.  The main case for sainthood?  A
young girl who prayed to the woman has been cured of lupus.  Now the
statue where that girl prayed is crying Helen's Type-A human blood.
People are flocking from around the nation.
     Shore, a man of lost faith who lives in a tenement building, is
called back to active service thanks to a perfect record of finding
fault with every saint applicant that crosses his path.  During his
investigation, he reexamines that faith, spars with an archrival
Archbishop (Mueller-Stahl), has a very unlikely and unbelievable fling
with Helen's daughter (Heche), and generally becomes an all-around good
guy.
     The film, on the whole, is intriguing and keeps your interest
throughout.  It's hardly a laugh riot:  This is serious stuff, and
oftentimes it's a damnation of Catholicism.  It's DOGMA, but with
feeling.  But the film's self-importance and rambling, often-lost
narrative (a perpetual problem in Holland's work) robs it of its
luster.  For religion buffs, it's a must-see.  For the typical
moviegoer, it's a toss-up.
     One question by way of spoiler (quit reading now if you intend to
see the film):  What's the deal with the title?  Catholic tradition
requires three miracles for sainthood, and Helen languishes with a mere
two.  At the film's end, Anne Heche shows up with a newborn daughter.  A
more cynical critic might point out that *that* would be a miracle
indeed.
Director: Agnieszka Holland
Producer: Fred Fuchs, Steven Haft
Writer: John Romano, Richard Vetere
Starring: Ed Harris, Anne Heche, Armin Mueller-Stahl, Michael Rispoli,
Charles Haid, James Gallanders, Jean-Louis Roux
http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/thethirdmiracle/index.html
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Lucky Numbers (2000)
The tagline for this movie reads, "When they put their heads together...
it's a no-brainer."  I'd say that about sums it up, but I feel obliged
to add that this witticism might aptly be suited not only to the film,
but to the entire cast and crew of Lucky Numbers.
This is the story of two lovers.  Well, except that they don't really
love each other, but isn't that always the way?  Russ Richards (John
Travolta) and Crystal Latroy (Lisa Kudrow) are two self-absorbed local
television celebrities looking for a little respect.  And money.  You
see, Richards is more than just a locally renowned weatherman with his
own private booth at Denny's.  He's also a snowmobile dealer.  Or would
be, if only it would snow.
But when the bank forecloses on his dealership, his house of cards
collapses and the only thing that could possibly save him is the state
lottery.  Therefore, at the advice of local gentleman's club owner Gig
(Tim Roth) and with the help of his fair-weather lover Crystal, Russ
sets out rig the drawing in his favor -- and winds up owing favors all
around.
It's amazing how little a collection of some of Hollywood's hottest
stars can accomplish when they really put their minds to it.  This is
one of the finest casts ever brought together for the creation of such a
third-rate film.  Except for Travolta, whose small, whiny voice makes
him delicately suited to only a few grown-up roles, this cast really
shimmers.  Even Friends star Kudrow manages to put a little acting into
it.  Roth, though obviously typecast from his Pulp Fiction limey thug
persona, is clever and endearing as the creepy and conspiratorial club
owner.  And Bill Pullman is subtly hilarious as the sleazy, slack-off
anti-hero cop.
This movie sports some truly funny moments, mostly surrounding the
climax of events, but it's just not enough to carry it off.  The set-up
takes far too long, and most of the story is plainly obvious starting
with the end of scene two, after which time we endure a predictably
shallow slide into the action of the film.
Fundamental to this flick's flaws is the lack of character depth.  Russ
Richards and Crystal Latroy are so primally empty that they never become
interesting.  Not that shallow characters can't be interesting, but
these ones just aren't.  There is no emotional investment in their
plight, no reason to care for them, because they so clearly care nothing
for either themselves or each other.  So we just watch them duly perform
their little antics, stooges in THX.  And when the lights come on, we
have experienced nothing.
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for While You Were Sleeping (1995)
     In case you aren't already prepared, brace yourself for a literal
onslaught of summer movie romances.  WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING is one of
1995's early entries.  It certainly isn't going to be the best.
     As heavily promoted as it's been, you should know the plot by know. 
Sandra Bullock is Lucy, a goofy, salt-of-the-earth Chicago Transit
Authority toll booth attendant who falls in love (at first sight) with
Peter (Peter Gallagher), a yuppie lawyer.  Almost immediately after Lucy
swoons, Peter gets pushed onto the train tracks, whereupon Lucy comes to
the rescue.  Then the obligatory "misunderstanding" occurs:  Peter's
concerned parents think Lucy is Peter's fiancee, pulling Lucy into the
family as a new member.  But when Peter's brother Jack (Bill Pullman)
arrives on the scene, Lucy and Jack begin to fall in love and, well ...
you get the picture.
     Or maybe you don't.  Most of the film is pretty nonsensical.  It's
predictable at best and just plain dull most of the time, focusing ad
nauseam on Lucy's moral dilemma about whether or not to end her charade. 
Slapstick is the preferred method of making the audience laugh:  there is
a considerable amount of falling down and other humorous forms of injury. 
Peter's dysfunctional family is good for a few laughs, but otherwise I
barely cracked a smile.
     The sad thing about WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING isn't just the lack of
originality and humor, rather, it's the statement that the film ultimately
makes.  The movie's apparent bottom line is that people can be really
shallow, but that's okay, because love will conquer everything, and it
doesn't matter who gets trampled along the way.  When you think about it,
it's not just annoying, it's insulting.

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
     L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, despite what you've heard, is not the best film in 20
years.  It's not even the best film of 1997 (current titleholder: IN THE
COMPANY OF MEN).  But if you consider all films ever made that have the nasal
Danny Devito providing voice-over work, L.A. CONFIDENTIAL is certainly at the
top of that list.
     Comparisons to CHINATOWN are obvious and appropriate.  Both films take
place in the Los Angeles of yesteryear, feature multi-layered crime riddles,
and have stars with questionable morals as ersatz heroes.  And both are very
good.  While Brian Helgeland and Curtis Hanson's script isn't the tight
masterpiece that CHINATOWN is (the writers meander for a good 45 minutes
before his story starts to shape up), and Faye Dunaway wasn't half the
cheeseball that Kim Basinger is as the femme fatale, CONFIDENTIAL makes the
audience do what few films of the 90's have achieved:  think.
     And you'll have to.  Director Hanson's convoluted plot -- tracing the
rise, fall, and redemption of L.A. cops played by Guy Pearce, Russell Crowe,
Kevin Spacey, and James Cromwell -- is all over the map until its handy,
bloody ending (body count > 25).  Even then, you probably won't have all the
details figured out.  But at least it's fun to try.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
     Since few people saw DROP DEAD GORGEOUS, HAPPY, TEXAS will likely
not be remembered as the second beauty pageant comedy of 1999.
     The lighthearted story of two convicted felons who break out of
jail and find themselves impersonating a pair of gay pageant producers
in the sleepy town of Happy, Texas, this film has a lot riding on what
amounts to a one-joke concept.
     And boy, how they work that joke!  Wayne Wayne Wayne Jr. (Zahn) and
Harry Sawyer (Northam) are complete opposites.  They both find love
interests in the town, but everyone thinks they're gay!  Even the
sheriff (Macy) thinks so, if you catch my drift.  And they don't know
anything about beauty pageants!  Oh, the comic possibilities!
     And for the most part, those possibilities are wasted.  Whereas a
film like WAITING FOR GUFFMAN took a more savvy approach to basically
the same movie, HAPPY wastes its energy on one increasingly lame gay
joke after another.  Add to that the fact that Walker and Douglas (born:
Massachusetts) just don't fit as Texas belles, and HAPPY is a bit of a
mess.  Sure, it's cute and funny at times (thank the hilarious Zahn for
that), but overall, HAPPY is flat.
Director: Mark Illsey
Producer: Mark Illsley, Rick Montgomery, Ed Stone
Writer: Mark Illsley, Phil Reeves, Ed Stone
Starring: Jeremy Northam, Steve Zahn, William H. Macy, Ally Walker,
Illeana Douglas
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Unforgettable (1996)
     Winner of this year's "Most Ironic Title" award, UNFORGETTABLE is
anything but, taking a subject with some promise--memory transfer--and
managing to butcher it into a hackneyed thriller.
     UNFORGETTABLE reteams star Linda Fiorentino with director John Dahl,
who worked so well together in 1994's THE LAST SEDUCTION.  Unfortunately,
Fiorentino, who was mentioned more than once as that year's best actress,
has been in free-fall ever since, starting with JADE and now turning to
this.  In UNFORGETTABLE, Ray Liotta plays David Krane, a Seattle medical
examiner whose wife was murdered years earlier.  Krane was the prime
suspect, but a technicality got him off, all the while with him protesting
his innocence (yes, it's O.J. *again*).
     When a similar crime takes place, Krane goes on he prowl for the
killer, eventually hooking up with Martha Briggs (Fiorentino), a ditzy
neurobiologist who has invented a serum which, when combined with
someone's cerebro-spinal fluid, can transfer memories.  Krane steals some
of the serum and experiences the lives (and gruesome deaths) of the murder
victims, including his wife.  All the while, the side effects begin to
take their toll on Krane's body, as he tries to solve the case before they
become fatal.
     Sadly, UNFORGETTABLE is somehow able to be confusing and predictable
at the same time, relying on mild shock value and graphic violence to keep
the viewer interested.  It doesn't really work, and the picture drags on
until the silly ending and the requisite playing of Nat King Cole's title
song.  Dahl's direction is otherwise good, but it's wasted on Bill
Geddie's dull script.  The supporting cast (including Peter Coyote,
Christopher McDonald, Kim Cattrall, and David Paymer) perform with
workmanlike effort--there's really not a lot here for them to do, as the
story just gets in the way.
     All said and done, do like the moviegoing public will do when
UNFORGETTABLE is screened:  forget it.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Feast of July (1995)
     When you see a lousy movie, it's usually fun to be able to mock it
afterwards.  This way, you at least get a little satisfaction from the
otherwise complete waste of time and money.
     FEAST OF JULY is a lousy movie, but it allows no such opportunity. 
>From the first frame to the end, this film is nothing but sheer *boredom,*
an Art Movie that wants to be oh-so-classy and ends up not even
approaching a "feast," but rather becoming more fodder for the cinematic
gristmill.
     The story is a simple plot of a brooding "mystery woman," Bella
(Embeth Davidtz), trying to track down her ex-lover in 1880s England. 
Along the way about 3 other guys fall for her, most notably a guy named
Con (Ben Chaplin), who convinces Bella to marry him.  Again, the story is
very simple, but the film is so convoluted as to make this plotline
indiscernible for the first 40 minutes, most of which is consumed with odd
discussions of shoes and hats, bad dancing, and Bella falling down a lot.
     There is so much wrong with FEAST OF JULY that I don't know where to
begin.  The acting is atrocious, especially Davidtz (who previously shone
so brightly in SCHINDLER'S LIST), here doing nothing but wandering around
in a daze.  The direction is also bad (this is Christopher Menaul's first
feature), as is the editing.  Worst of all is the screenplay by
Christopher Neame, which merits marks only when a few of the many
obnoxious characters are killed off.  The film does start to get a tad
interesting in its final reel, but it is way to little, far too late.
     This movie is billed as "a Merchant Ivory Production," but don't be
misled.  Ismail Merchant executive produced (read:  did nothing) on this
picture, and Ivory is nowhere to be found.  (The Merchant Ivory *company*
produced the picture, not the filmmakers.)  Their flair is difficult to
copy, and FEAST OF JULY proves it.
     In a nutshell, FEAST OF JULY is an extraordinarily difficult to
follow film, full of talky, dull melodrama and the glamorization of
"proper" 19th century sensibilities.  Puh-leeze.  The press notes call
this film "unforgettable."  I'm glad they reminded me.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for America's Sweethearts (2001)
Would you believe -- in real life, I mean -- that if you were Julia
Roberts, that you'd be the ugly underdog to your sister, the creepy
Catherine Zeta-Jones?
Let me tell you what reality is.  Reality is that you are megastar Julia
Fricking Roberts and your brother is Eric Roberts, and he picks up
whatever crumbs of stardom fall off your coattails as you blaze across
the sky in a golden chariot.
That's reality.  America's Sweethearts is the opposite of reality, a
train wreck that tries to sell Julia as a scruffy also-ran, presumably
because she wears horn-rimmed glasses and used to be overweight
(uh-huh).
The plot follows two married, mega-movie stars, Gwen and Eddie
(Zeta-Jones and poor, poor John Cusack, whose material gets worse every
year), on the eve of their new star vehicle's release, a film called
Time Over Time.  The only problem: Gwen and Eddie have gone through a
nasty separation, and the press and public have not been forgiving
(think Meg and Dennis).  Gosh, and the director has vanished with the
film, holding the only print hostage.  Veteran PR agent Lee (Billy
Crystal) is called upon to clean up the mess, throwing a press junket in
the Nevada desert to woo them with the story of a possible
reconciliation between the Gwen and Eddie, presumably distracting the
stupid, stupid film critics into forgetting they haven't seen the movie
at all.  (Note to Sony: Any studio executive that thinks this plot is
going to win points with the reviewing press needs to check into rehab.)
And did I mention Gwen's sister Kiki (Roberts) is along for the ride? 
And that she and Eddie just might fall in love along the way?
Oh Billy, you're a scamp!  The script you've co-written with Peter Tolan
(What Planet Are You From? and Bedazzled -- need I say more?) is a roast
of Hollywood and celebrity, sure, but it's not a funny one.  Yes,
Crystal tells us, Hollywood is lying to our faces!  If you are surprised
by this, you might want to check on your subscription to People
magazine.  It's about to expire.
Aside from a scant few zingers (Yeah, Seńor Winces rules!), America's
Sweethearts' jokes aren't funny, its pace is choppy, and the whole
affair comes off as a vanity project -- not for headlining star Julia
Roberts -- but for Billy Crystal to deliver a bunch of lame punch lines
that he wrote himself.  I didn't time it (the movie's not that bad), but
it's Crystal who really has the most screen time and is the unequivocal
focus of the film.  Bad move, Billy -- your jokes suck.  The crotch
humor is outpaced only by the meanness of the movie's gags -- and with
unsubtle sexual innuendo dripping from every scene, how this movie
earned a PG-13 rating is a mystery to me.
Julia overcame a lot of spiteful writing and acting to make My Best
Friend's Wedding into a winning film, but not even that 90-tooth smile
can save her here.  Obviously aware of the ugliness before him, director
Joe Roth turns to goofy supporting characters like Hank Azaria (as a
lisping Spaniard), Christopher Walken (the insane Time Over Time
director), and Alan Arkin (a New Age guru in a fright wig) to crack
wise.  None of the stereotypes is successful except for Walken; Azaria
comes off as a preening queen when he's supposed to be macho.  As for
Roth, in case you don't know, went from direcing Revenge of the Nerds II
to launching his own movie studio, Revolution, which produced this
work.  He's back behind the camera for the first time in 11 years. 
It'll probably be another 11 before he's back again.
I could drone on about how America's Sweethearts will only appeal to the
mouth-breathing morons who talk on their cell phones during the movies,
but that would get old.  Instead, I'll settle for discussing the movie's
worst sin: that Sweethearts is painfully contrived and wholly
unbelievable, not just in its plot but in its sentiment.  Every single
character in this film (with the arguable exception of Kiki) is simply
hateful, and putting them in a romantic comedy is a waste of a bunch of
villains.  When you leave the theater, you'll ask yourself, too: Why
would I want any of these jerks to be happy?
Director: Joe Roth
Producer: Susan Arnold, Billy Crystal, Donna Roth
Writer: Billy Crystal, Peter Tolan
Starring: Julia Roberts, Billy Crystal, Catherine Zeta-Jones, John
Cusack, Hank Azaria, Stanley Tucci, Christopher Walken, Seth Green, Alan
Arkin
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/americassweethearts/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Once Were Warriors (1994)
     The opening scene of ONCE WERE WARRIORS, a highly-acclaimed new
film from New Zealand, demolishes any outdated notions you may have
that the island is a pastoral paradise, that families live on fields of
green with herds of sheep, and that all is well in this world as a
whole.
     This unexpectedly powerful melodrama is the story of a Maori
family in urban New Zealand, trying to make ends meet and coping with
the overbearing presence of the family's father, a drunken brute who
regularly beats those who cross him into bloodied pulp.  Some of the
most disturbing and explosive fight scenes on film result from this, as
well as a tragically heart-breaking story line that inevitably
follows.  Because the family does nothing to stop the father, his
madness goes unchecked.  And when he shows a tinge of kindness, it is
always soon replaced with retribution.
     ONCE WERE WARRIORS is obviously not light fare.  It is a painful
and very effective tale about the destructive power of abuse, rape,
alcoholism, and violence in general that easily transcends its New
Zealand origin.  The title refers to the fact that the Maoris were once
a race of slaves and fighters, born with the rage of their ancestors
deep in their souls.  The story tells us what has become of the
centuries of rage, leaving the audience with a warning about what may
be happening in your country, in your town, in your home.

Title
Review for Felicia's Journey (1999)
     Atom Egoyan is no stranger to the top ten lists of filmcritic.com.
THE ADJUSTER (#7, 1991), CALENDAR (#6, 1993), EXOTICA (#7, 1995), and
THE SWEET HEREAFTER (#3, 1997) attest to some amazing staying power over
our minds.  And while Egoyan's latest effort, FELICIA'S JOURNEY, is
certainly a watchable film, it's likely to be his first of the decade
that doesn't make the cut.
     Why?  While Egoyan is a master at working with cryptic source
material, FELICIA'S JOURNEY lends itself more to its source as a novel
than the big screen.  Basically, this is the story of two people.  First
is Felicia (Cassidy), an Irish lass who's travelled to the U.K. to
search for the father of her unborn child.  Along the way she encounters
Joseph Hilditch (Hoskins), a sweet and friendly `catering director' who
hides a secret that other critics will undoubtedly reveal, but I won't.
     FELICIA'S JOURNEY quickly becomes one of codependency.  Hilditch,
the son of a famous TV cooking show star (Egoyan regular, his wife
Khanjian), needs the woman to dote upon.  Felicia needs him to help
search for her Johnny, and to feed and shelter her.  We do manage to get
inside the heads of both of these characters, particularly interesting
in flashbacks to Hilditch's bizarre life as a child.  But I posit that
the film may have been just as understandable without them.  These
characters just aren't all that deep, especially Felicia, who gets on
your nerves after her prettiness wears off.
     By the end, we realize we've been watching a couple of crazies for
the last two hours.  The resolution arrives exactly as expected, which
is *not* Egoyan's typical M.O.  The movie ends, the theater clears, the
story feels unfinished and trifling.
     Artisan has already begun a campaign to get Hoskins a Best Actor
nomination, and rightfully so.  But aside from his impressive,
slow-burning work along with typical Egoyan cinematic beauty, FELICIA
has little to add to Egoyan's repertoire.  There are moments of
greatness, punctuated by stretches of predictable narrative.
Ultimately, the film just feels too much like something you'd see late
at night on Showtime.  Okay, maybe better than that, but nothing to send
a postcard home about.
Director: Atom Egoyan
Producer: Bruce Davy
Writer: Atom Egoyan
Starring: Bob Hoskins, Elaine Cassidy, Claire Benedict, Brid Brennan,
Kriss Dosanjh, Nizwar Karanj, Arsinée Khanjian, Peter McDonald, Gerard
McSorley, Sheila Reed, Danny Turner, Ali Yassine
http://www.feliciasjourney-movie.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for Rock, The (1996)
     Long touted as the low-budget (in action movie terms) alternative to
this summer's Hollywood blockbusters, THE ROCK has been something of a
question mark among movie forecasters.  It doesn't have any real special
effects like TWISTER or INDEPENDENCE DAY.  It doesn't build on a 40
year-old history like MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE.  It doesn't even have any big
name action stars.
     What it *does* have is some of the best actors working in film today
(Nicolas Cage, Sean Connery, and Ed Harris), seasoned producers Jerry
Bruckheimer and the late Don Simpson (TOP GUN, for starters), BAD BOYS
director Michael Bay, and some relatively unknown screenwriters (David
Weisberg, Douglas S. Cook, and Mark Rosner), who all pull together to tell
one hell of a story -- and hands-down the best action flick of the
year-to-date.
     Based on the first 15 minutes of the film, I started off with some
severe doubts.  Poorly photographed and edited, the intro barely managed to
belch out the premise of the movie: that jaded General Francis X. Hummel
(Harris) and his gang of marine mutineers are taking over Alcatraz with 15
rockets full of V.X. nerve gas, holding the city of San Francisco hostage
until his demands are met.  (These demands are pretty stupid, involving
some cash and reparations for injury to the honor of dead marines.)  Well,
actually paying the money is never an option, so the FBI sends in a group
of Navy SEALS, plus biochemist Stanley Goodspeed (Cage) and hardened
criminal/Alcatraz escapee Patrick Mason (Connery).
     But after this 15 minute lull, THE ROCK explodes into an
incredibly-paced actioner that turns in one of the best entries of the
ever-growing DIE HARD genre.  The best part of the film is Cage and
Connery's chemistry -- the fact that they are such unlikely action heroes
makes them so very believable and so fun to watch.  The comedy in the film
also goes a long way -- something Bay is also good at, as he proved in BAD
BOYS.
     THE ROCK has one thing going for it that no other summer actioner
does, and that's believability.  It's just outrageous enough to make a
movie out of -- just real enough to make you wonder why it couldn't happen
tomorrow.  Plus, you get to see a guy's face melt off, which is always a
bonus.  (The production notes say that this V.X. stuff is *real*.)
     Minor quibbles aside (composer Nick Glennie-Smith ripping off his own
CRIMSON TIDE score and a huge 10-minute meaningless car chase), I highly
recommend action fans see THE ROCK when they finally wake up and realize
just how stupid MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE *really* is.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
     Well, Cronenberg is back, and after a couple of misfires like
CRASH, M. BUTTERFLY, and well, pretty much the last ten years of his
oeuvre, he's got a solid flick with EXISTENZ.  In fact, I'd say it's his
best work since 1983's VIDEODROME.
     The story is straight outta modern/near-future pop culture: Using a
"bioport," you can jack your body and mind into an immersive game
world--a world served up by a handheld bio-engineered creature called a
"game pod" that is essentially a blood-pulsing Nintendo.  There are no
computers in the film: just the mutated organisms that are Cronenberg's
trademark.  And oh does he put them to good use.
     Leigh is Allegra, not an allergy medication, but rather the
designer of the hottest games on the planet. And eXistenZ stands to be
her masterpiece.  The object of the game-as is the case with all games
that become the centerpiece of movies--is to learn the object of the
game.  And in this instance, it turns out that some anti-game "Realists"
are on Allegra's tail, so she has to head inside eXistenZ to ensure
everything's kosher, with helpful Jude Law as a sidekick.
     Or so we are led to believe.  EXISTENZ the movie quickly becomes a
game within a game within a game within etc....  Not only are we unsure
of what's real and what isn't, neither are the characters. 
Unfortunately, this conceit kinda gives away the whole film, making it
overly simplistic and cliched for what I'd expect from Cronenberg. 
Frankly, THE MATRIX did it better.
     Still, EXISTENZ is a good ride.  But eat before you come.  The
meals on display here are for presentation only.
Director: David Cronenberg
Producer: David Cronenberg, Andras Hamori, Robert Lantos
Writer: David Cronenberg
Starring: Jennifer Jason Leigh, Jude Law, Willem Dafoe, Ian Holm, Don
McKellar
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
     Leave it to Disney to finally come up with a family-friendly way to
explore natural selection.  Much like The Lion King's "Circle of Life,"
Dinosaur regales itself in survival of the fittest, only few people are
going to be humming "Hakuna Matata" after this one.
     For starters, Dinosaur is that rarest of Disney animation flicks
which is not a musical.  There's a thumping James Newton Howard score,
but the only singing here comes from trumpeting iguanodons and
brachiosaurs.  The story, on the other hand, is typical Disney kiddie
fare: Iguanodon Aladar (D.B. Sweeney) is orphaned as a wee dino-egg on a
remote island, where he is raised, Tarzan-style, by a family of lemurs
(er... okay).  When a freak meteor strike blows the island away, along
with much of the rest of the world, Aladar swims to the mainland with
his lemur family on his back, where he meets up with the surviving
herbivorous dinosaurs who have banded together to trek to "the nesting
grounds," a Waterworld-style vale which hasn't been reduced to desert
and ruins like, apparently, the rest of the earth.  (And never mind the
fallout; there is none...)
     Pushed on by embittered leader Kron (Samuel E. Wright), the group
struggles across the wastelands, with Aladar quickly becoming the
dissenting voice of teamwork, goodwill, and intelligence.  Despite his
sheltered upbringing, Aladar soon proves to be The Smartest Dinosaur of
All Time, managing to save the clan time and time again by magically
learning how to dig for water in the desert, how to fight off carnotaurs
by banding together as a group, and even advanced tunneling-through-rock
techniques.  Part warrior, part motivational speaker, Aladar is your
dino-Spartacus.
     I won't bother to go into the various love-story subplots
(involving, quite naturally, Kron's sister Neera (Julianna Margulies)),
but suffice it to say there's at least one martyr who takes it for the
team, a triumph over evil, incredible odds shattered, and a happy Disney
ending.  Dinosaur does not go lacking for obviousness.
     As for its animation, computer-generated movies took two giant
leaps forward with Toy Story and Toy Story 2, yet fall far behind with
Dinosaur.  While the textures and movements of the dinosaurs look quite
realistic, the fur of the lemurs (which appear so prominently, Lemur
might have been a better title) look oddly like Muppets on a bad hair
day.
     Compounding the problems is the weird confluence of genuine
landscape photography with digital animation: Imagine animated beasts
splashing around in Wild Kingdom streams.  This does not convince the
audience in the slightest and is disarmingly reminiscent of 1970's TV
show Land of the Lost.  The effect is so cheesy I was expecting the
Sleestaks to show up.
     Some of the humor is funny, but a lot of the jokes are recycled
("Is he going to gum us to death?").  My personal favorite part of the
film is the anklyosaur Url, who plays the dialogue-free part of a
panting lap dog.  Not highbrow, but humorous.
     Kids will probably enjoy the film since it lets them see dinosaurs
as heroes of the past.  There's not much to think about, and by and
large it's all in good fun.  In its production notes, Disney
acknowledges it took liberties with history by placing lemurs and
dinosaurs in the same era.  However, its bigger liberty is not mentioned
at all: Dinosaurs could not speak English.  Oh well.
Director: Eric Leighton, Ralph Zondag
Producer: Pam Marsden
Writer: John Harrison, Robert Nelson Jacobs
Starring: D.B. Sweeney, Julianna Margulies, Joan Plowright, Alfre
Woodard, Max Casella, Ossie Davis, Hayden Panettiere, Della Reese, Peter
Siragusa, Samuel E. Wright
http://disney.go.com/disneypictures/dinosaur/dinomain.html
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
     I was excited to see the rerelease of THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK, but
I had forgotten about how masterful the film is realized, and I had
especially forgotten what it looked like on the big screen.
     EMPIRE, newly restored by George Lucas and his cronies, makes the
remastered videotape look like a comic book.  While not much new has
been added (what has is pretty obvious, mainly an impressive sound
clean-up and digital animations of the Millennium Falcon's descent into
Cloud City), the story has held up monumentally against the INDEPENDENCE
DAYs and TWISTERs of the world.
     I've always found EMPIRE to be the HAMLET of science fiction,
basically because nothing good happens to the hero in the entire story. 
Luke Skywalker almost dies in the tundra of Hoth (watch for the
still-cheesy claymation(?) Tauntauns), sees the rebels sent on the run
through the galaxy, meets Yoda and fails to complete his Jedi training
on Dagobah, sees his pal Han Solo encased in carbonite, and loses his
hand in a fight with Darth Vader, whom he has learned is his father. 
All that, and C-3PO gets blasted, too!
     It's enough to make you cry, or enough at least to make you really
really want to see RETURN OF THE JEDI when it hits theaters again in
March.  I know I'm hooked!
     EMPIRE was always my favorite of the trilogy, and seeing it on the
big screen is not to be missed.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Big Night (1996)
     One reality in this world is certain:  nice guys finish last.  And
while the case can be made that Primo and Secondo aren't the nicest guys
around, it's pretty clear from the beginning of BIG NIGHT that they are
doomed to be taken advantage of.
     This little gem, a darling of the festival circuit and cause for a
huge rebirth in star, co-writer, co-producer, and co-director Stanley
Tucci's career, tells the beautiful and touching story of two brothers
(Tucci as Secondo, and "Wings" cab driver Tony Shalhoub as Primo) trying
to make it as restaurateurs, straight off the boat from Italy.
     Primo, the head chef, refuses to compromise on the tiniest detail
regarding the food, while Secondo does battle on the business end.  The
meals they serve are second to none, but all the customers go down the
street to their rival's (an Italian Ian Holm) thanks to his singing
waiters.  With the bank ready to foreclose, Primo and Secondo try to
turn things around, and they put all they've got into one last feast in
honor of jazz great Louis Prima, who may or may not actually be showing
up.  A big night indeed.
     Intertwining the restaurant drama with the brothers' unsatisfying
personal lives, Tucci and co-writer Joseph Tropiano tell a beautiful and
touching story that resonates with a authenticity rarely found in
today's films.  Tucci, Shalhoub, and Holm are all excellent, as are
Isabella Rossellini and CIRCLE OF FRIENDS's Minnie Driver as Secondo's
love interests.  Tucci and co-director Campbell Scott (co-star of
SINGLES) also do excellent work considering their amateur status.
     While the film can get a bit talky at times (beware of the scenes
with subtitles), it's overall a very moving and delightful first work
for these guys.  Deserving special notice are the exquisite
cooking/dining scenes, which do for Italian food what EAT DRINK MAN
WOMAN did for Chinese.  All-in-all, it's a warm, funny, and at the same
time heartbreaking look at one big night in the company of some truly
interesting people.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
     You know, I've seen NETWORK before, and it's a much better film.
     BULWORTH is, in the kindest of words, an "homage" to that picture, and
at least it has an excellent role model.  Simply take the story about a TV
newsman who goes nuts, stirs up controversy, and fatally angers the
establishment and change it to a US Senator who does the same thing, and
you've got BULWORTH.
     Warren Beatty's title role performance is the only reason BULWORTH has
anything going for it at all.  Much like Tom Cruise in JERRY MAGUIRE, Beatty
takes a difficult character and makes it his own, and while Beatty as a
foul-mouthed politician is not exactly playing against type, it's still his
very aggressive performance that carries the picture.
     Everything else, from the dismal supporting cast (Halle Berry has never
looked so lost) to the throw-away one-liners (you've seen all the best over
and over again on the trailers) is cut-and-pasted from NETWORK or clearly
dredged from some late night rewrite session.
     Still, Beatty's in fine form, and his outrageous wackiness takes the
film halfway to where it could have been.  (And geez, he directed, produced,
wrote, and starred in the film... maybe someone was a little too busy?)  But
overall, the missed opportunities, the overtly silly anti-PC message backed
up by nothing, and the all-too-forseeable ending make BULWORTH little more
than a fable that we already knew: That anyone involved with politics is
totally insane.
Director: Warren Beatty
Producer: Warren Beatty, Pieter Jan Brugge
Writer: Warren Beatty, Jeremy Pikser
Starring: Warren Beatty, Halle Berry, Oliver Platt, Don Cheadle, Paul
Sorvino, Jack Warden, Christine Baranski, Joshua Malina
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
     With more Go-Go's songs than any other film this year, ROMY AND
MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION is a treat if for no other reason than to
hear the 80's soundtrack.  The plot?  Simple:  Romy and Michele have
gone nowhere in the ten years since high school, so they create
themselves into seriously unbelievable "businesswomen" in an attempt to
impress their fellow graduates at the reunion.  Much like GROSSE POINTE
BLANK, though, too much emphasis is placed on nostalgia and not enough
is placed on the script.  Mira Sorvino and Lisa Kudrow prove to be a
powerful duo on-screen, but with jokes that hit about 50 percent of the
time, not even the shiniest of outfits can pull them through the low
points of this film.  Janeane Garofalo disappoints here, also, reprising
the stereotypical, crusty, chain-smoker she has played a hundred times. 
It all boils down to a fair-enough experience... you know... like,
whatever.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Dracula: Dead and Loving It (1995)
     After the vastly disappointing ROBIN HOOD: MEN IN TIGHTS, Mel Brooks
really needed to prove himself by getting back to his YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN
and BLAZING SADDLES-type comedy.  The Dracula legend seemed like the
perfect way to do it.  But sadly, Brooks manages to hack it up like he did
to poor Robin Hood, thanks to some very stale jokes and overly repetitious
gags.
     Brooks basically takes BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA (Francis Ford Coppola's
film) and gives it the once-over, recreating the plot and characters
almost directly from that movie, and giving them supposedly funny lines. 
The problem is that BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA was pretty silly to begin with,
and Brooks' version comes off as poking fun at a film that was already
doing a good job of it all by itself.
     There are thankfully a few good lines in the film (my favorite:  Van
Helsing: "She's Nosferatu!"   Renfield: "She's Italian?"), but overall,
the movie sinks.  Casting Leslie Nielsen as Dracula was a good move, as
his antics are always good for a chuckle or two, but the continual
overexposure of people like Amy Yasbeck (as Mina) in films like this
leaves nothing new for the viewer to expect.  And while Lysette Anthony's
sultry Lucy is fun to watch...they kill her after 45 minutes.
     Most of the movie's gags involve tripping, falling down, running into
a wall or a window, or some other slapstick device.  But the most tedious
of the jokes is the nearly constant mocking of accents and overdramatic
speech the various characters use.  This gets old after the second scene,
where the stereotypical trill in a gypsy's voice is made by the manual
quivering of the skin around her throat.  Ha ha.
     Brooks fans won't be pleased, and neither will the vampire
aficionado.  Stay away from this film, and let it bury itself. 
Figuratively speaking, that is.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Zeros, The (2001)
A wry and independent black comedy, The Zeros turns the road trip inside
out with a funny -- yet ultimately bleak -- look at a young man facing
impending death in a not-so-distant dystopia.
Mackenzie Astin (The Last Days of Disco) stars as Joe, who is told by
his rather flippant doctor he has a matter of days or weeks to live.  A
despondent Joe throws caution to the wind and figures he'll go on a
cross-country trip of self-discovery, ostensibly in search of his
childhood friend Joyce (Jennifer Morrison).
Rest assured that the charm of The Zeros isn't ferreted away in my
pathetic attempt at a plot description.  Rather, as the saying goes, the
fun is in getting there.  Joe's trip takes him to a nursing home, a
roadside cult, a circus, a Texas millionaire's personal playground, and
most outrageously, a karaoke-strip-club-roller-disco.  Sure, there's not
much sense of direction in all of this, but it's an awfully good time.
Writer/director John Ryman fills the film was clever touches of black
and devilishly funny comedy -- from the millionaire's habit of blowing
up cows for sport to a friend he meets who wears an eye patch because it
makes "the ladies" feel sorry for him.  His sick and too-near future is
also cleverly created from modern day trappings given a sadistic twist. 
It's just too bad the narrative that holds these outrageous moments and
settings together is so wafer thin (and ultimately bogs down the last
act of the film with too many saccharine histrionics).  Still, while The
Zeros peters out in its dying breaths, it's a worthwhile picture in an
era of lackluster independent film.
Shot on Super 16 and premiering at the 2001 SXSW film festival, Ryman's
film shows great professionalism in its production, from the
cinematography to the acting, ultimately belying its low budget
reality.  The sound design is unfortunately off, but it doesn't detract
too much from the wackiness before your eyes.  And I mean that in a good
way.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Snow Day (2000)
     It's tough for a Texas boy to relate to the concept of a snow day.
We had the occasional sleet day or hurricane day, sure, but snow?
Whether you live in the tundra or not, I'm sure everyone can relate to
the real story of SNOW DAY, the tale of a boy who pines for the school
beauty, a girl far above his station with whom he never has a shot.
     Maybe we can relate a little too well.  This story has literally
been done to death (it feels practically like a remake of 1995's ANGUS),
but at least SNOW DAY is reasonably funny along the way.  Thanks to the
movie's "fresh new stars," SNOW DAY feels newer than it should.  And
thanks to leading kids Mark Webber (DRIVE ME CRAZY) and Schuyler Fisk
(daughter of Sissy Spacek), the movie has a lot of charm and heart.
     This is a kid movie, to be sure, and the little ones will have to
contend with four plotlines, all held tenuously together by the notion
that a sudden, freakish snowstorm shuts down their New York town and
that "anything can happen."  Center stage is Hal (Webber), who pines for
who must be the tannest girl in New York state, a girl named Claire
(Emmanuelle Chriqui), who comes off as cold and distant -- while the
earnest Lane (Fisk) wears her heart on her sleeve.  Hal's dad is hapless
weatherman Chevy Chase, who fights with his rival on another station.
And Hal's kid sister Trachtenberg wages war with Mr. Snowplow Man
(Elliott) to fight for a second snow day.
     The plot involving workaholic mother Jean Smart doesn't hold a
candle to the rest of the film, and I found myself often hoping for a
return to the core of the picture - Hal's hilarious pursuit of Claire.
But I'm sure you'll find one thing more annoying than the saccharine
Smart: the audience.  Only I don't know which is worse: the kids or
their trying-to-be-hip, mouth-breathing parents.
Director: Chris Koch
Producer: Albie Hecht, Julia Pistor
Writer: Will McRobb, Chris Viscardi
Starring: Chris Elliott, Mark Webber, Jean Smart, Chevy Chase, Kyle
Alisharan, J. Adam Brown, Emmanuelle Chriqui, Schuyler Fisk, Zena Grey,
Pam Grier, David Paetkau, Josh Peck, Iggy Pop, John Schneider, Rozonda
'Chilli' Thomas, Michelle Trachtenberg, Jade Yorker
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for If Lucy Fell (1996)
     1996 is shaping up to be a great year for comedy.  IF LUCY FELL is
the fifth romantic comedy I've reviewed this year, and it is the fourth to
get my **** rating (no other genres have reached this high in 1996,
according to my archives).
     So, am I getting soft for romances?  Maybe so, but the quality of
American comedy writing really seems to be on the rise.  IF LUCY FELL was
written, directed, and stars one of our most promising up-and-comers, Eric
Schaeffer, whose docu-comedic first (independent) film, MY LIFE'S IN
TURNAROUND, was a sleeper hit in 1994.
     IF LUCY FELL brings Schaeffer into the world of big budget Hollywood,
where he has adapted quite well, bringing another fresh and extremely
funny comedy to the screen.  The picture focuses on two long-time friends
and roommates, Joe (Schaeffer) and Lucy (Sarah Jessica Parker), who vow to
commit suicide on Lucy's 30th birthday if they haven't found true
happiness (or some semblance thereof) by then.  Turns out that's a month
away.
     Even worse is the fact that Joe and Lucy seem to be completely
dysfunctional.  Joe is a wired and slightly deranged artist, obsessed with
the neighbor in the window across the alley (Elle Macpherson, and I'd be
obsessed too).  Lucy is a therapist who probably needs the help a little
more herself.
     Schaeffer's writing provides nonstop laughs for a solid 50 minutes
before the film settles onto the steadier track of how IF LUCY FELL
inevitably ends, but those are a fun 50 minutes, enhanced by some great
supporting characters and subplots.  Schaeffer himself is the hands-down
show stealer, with his character so well-written as to be readily
identifiable to every guy who's ever had an intense longing for a woman
combined with the total inability to speak to her (hey, that's me!).
     Of course, IF LUCY FELL, while a great date movie, isn't going to be
loved by everyone.  Some parts (the beginning) are a lot better than
others (the end).  The conclusion is far too tidy and convenient.  A
couple of characters are annoying (both happen to be Lucy's
dalliances--Dick (a monotone Bill Sage) and Bwick (a goofball Ben
Stiller)).  And sometimes the plot isn't entirely credible (you'll know
what I mean when you see it).  But these problems are far outweighed by
the down-to-earth, "I can relate" comedy that Schaeffer has judiciously
woven into the film.
     (P.S. Be sure to watch for cameos by "The Late Show's" Mujibur and
Sirajul!)
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Safe (1995)
     I first heard of SAFE a good twelve months ago and was instantly
intrigued by the film, a story about a woman who becomes sick for no
medically detectable reason.  Upon seeing the movie, we discover one
possibility for her disorder:  she is "allergic to the 20th century."
Twentieth Century Disease (also known as Multiple Chemical Sensitivity)
is a very frightening, very real disability with no cure.  The disorder
is brought about by some 60,000 chemicals present in our environment,
many of which have devastating effects on MCS sufferers, even present
in tiny amounts.
     SAFE tells the tale of Carol White (Julianne Moore), an otherwise
healthy, high-society homemaker who gradually comes down with a number
of inexplicable symptoms.  It begins with headaches and a rash, and
soon spirals until she develops dizziness, nausea, and has a seizure.
And things continue to get worse.  All the while, none of her doctors
can explain a thing.  Eventually, Carol discovers the reality of MCS
and heads for the Wrenwood Colony, a "safe" zone which is free of
pollutants.  Here, she begins her inward search to find the true reason
for her illness.
     Director and writer Todd Haynes does a great job of leaving the
cause of Carol's disorder open for debate.  Is it just a latent
allergy?  Or is it psychosomatic?  The question is never answered, just
as, in Carol's life, it never will be.  "It's just for a short time,"
she says of her stay at Wrenwood.  We can feel her pain as it becomes
evident that the opposite is most certainly the case.  We even feel
sorry for her estranged husband, who can't understand Carol's malady.
     Regular readers of mine will know by now that Julianne Moore is
hands-down my favorite actress on the planet, and SAFE marks the best
role of her career.  Moore easily deserves an Oscar nod, if not the
statue, and Haynes deserves recognition for his very, very cool
direction.
     While sections of the film are weak in comparison to the picture's
truly stunning scenes, supporting cast are only fair, and the ending is
unsatisfying, SAFE still remains one of the most powerful pictures of
the year.  It should not be missed.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter & Novelist
-Contributing Editor, Mike's FEEDBACK  /  Film Critic, Texas Business Weekly
-[R]eply to be added to movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Return to Me (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Robert Strohmeyer.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/04be3ea01433c70a882568ab005bf52c?OpenDocument
Director:  Bonnie Hunt
Producers:  Jennie Lew Tugend, C.O. (Doc) Erickson, Melanie Greene
Screenwriters:  Bonnie Hunt, Don Lake
Stars: David Duchovny, Minnie Driver, Carrol O'Connor, Robert Loggia,
Bonnie Hunt, David Alan Grier, Joely Richardson, Jim Belushi
MPAA Rating: PG
Year of Release: 2000
Let's cut to the chase; the Weekly World News could have given us a
better story about a man and a woman united by a heart transplant.  It's
not for lack of talent, either, that this flick stumbles.  If anything,
Return to Me hosts almost as overqualified a cast as Brian De Palma's
lame duck blockbuster, Mission to Mars.  The real problem here seems to
be lack of directorial focus.  After a career of feature film supporting
roles, television walk-ons and cartoon voiceovers, Bonnie Hunt somehow
convinced MGM to let her sit in the folding chair.  The result is a
charming romantic comedy tragically bogged down by the uncomfortable
avoidance of its central plot point.
The drama of this film is the elephant in the room that everyone
pretends to ignore.  Bob Rueland (David Duchovny-The X-Files) is a
successful Chicago architectural engineer who is emotionally crushed
when his gorilla-training wife (a role apparently inspired by real-life
Gorilla Foundation president Dr. Penny Patterson), Elizabeth (Joely
Richardson-101 Dalmatians), dies in some unspecified accident that we
never really see.  I guess they thought it might bring us down.
Fortunately, Elizabeth filled out her organ donor card, affording local
waitress Grace Briggs (Minnie Driver-Good Will Hunting) a second chance
to live.
The wacky bonus, of course, is that the uncanny Hand of Fate brings
Grace and Bob together.  From this point forward, the unrealized drama
of Elizabeth's death is completely overshadowed by about ninety minutes
of schticky banter in which Archie Bunker, er Carrol O'Connor, runs
through a non-stop routine of Sinatra references and boob-job jokes.
And Bob and Grace fall in love.
The romance of this picture is fun and believable.  Duchovny and Driver
have a chemistry that's heartwarming and funny to watch.  This movie
would have gone a lot further if they'd either dropped the heart
transplant all together or taken it more seriously.  It's never really
justified anyway and only winds up distracting us from the film's
central relationship.  Performances from Robert Loggia and Jim Belushi
are endearing and enjoyable, and director Bonnie Hunt gives a strong
performance as Grace's supportive friend, Megan.  David Alan Grier could
have made a valuable contribution in his rare dramatic role as Bob's
comforting buddy, if the character's relevance hadn't been undercut by
the removal of all drama from the film.  Whoops!
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Leaving Las Vegas (1995)
     The main way LEAVING LAS VEGAS has been described to me is this: 
"It's very, *very* sad."  Finally able to see for myself, I can confirm
that indeed the film is *not* the feel-good movie of the year.  And while
it's sad and spooky enough to send shivers down your spine, it is
surprisingly able to avoid melodramatics and still leave us with a
powerful message.
     LEAVING LAS VEGAS tells the tragic story of Ben Sanderson (Nicolas
Cage), a once-powerful movie executive who is fired from his job and ends
up moving to Las Vegas.  Ben is painfully and obviously an alcoholic;
drinking, quite literally, consumes his life.  We get a glimpse of the
demons in Ben's past from time to time, but by the time the film begins,
Ben is already too far gone to be remotely curable.  Alcohol has become
his reason for existence.
     In Vegas, Ben resigns to drink himself to death, burning his
severance pay to the tune of $200 to $300 a day on liquor and the
occasional prostitute, one of whom turns out to be his alter-ego, Sera
(Elisabeth Shue).  They both share a common bond of misery and loneliness,
and soon develop a rich closeness that can nearly be described as love. 
Sera is deeply committed to Ben, and vows to accept him as he is--drunk or
not.  Her devotion even leads her to buy him a flask for his poison, while
inside, she is desperate to find some way to help him sober up. 
Inevitably, the couple spirals downward to the film's tragic conclusion. 
We know all will never be well.
     Cage's masterful performance is matched by superb direction by Mike
Figgis (who also wrote the screenplay and the jazzy music for the film),
and Shue admirably sheds her ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING goody-two-shoes
look.  While some of the plot elements are confusing (including a bit
about Sera's Russian pimp, played by Julian Sands) and the film drags at
times, the movie is very haunting without becoming overly graphic, a
delicate line that the filmmakers have successfully walked.  Like I said,
this isn't your everyday crowd pleaser, but if you're looking for a
thoughtful drama, LEAVING LAS VEGAS is one of the best bets of the year.
     The true power of this film lies in its exploration of the themes of
acceptance, resignation, and despair.  Based on John O'Brien's
autobiographical 1991 novel, the realism in the movie is simply
unparalleled, maintaining an accessibility that lets us all relate.  In an
ironic twist of events, O'Brien actually committed suicide in 1994, a mere
two weeks after the film rights were sold.  He never got to see his vision
realized on the screen, and he probably never needed to, but his legacy
leaves a lesson we could all stand to learn.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Denise Calls Up (1995)
     I finally had a chance to see DENISE CALLS UP after it had pretty much
made its art-house rounds, but I thought I'd write a short review anyway.
     The one-joke premise is this:  seven friends in New York basically
live their lives without ever really meeting.  Instead, they talk on the
phone.  Dates are set, parties are planned, sex is had, even children are
born -- but no one is there, in the physical sense.
     For 80 minutes, we are treated to variations on one of the above
scenes, often with funny-ironic results.  The film is never really
funny-ha-ha, but it never bores the viewer at all thanks to Hal Salwen's
direction.  I found myself hoping it would speed along at times, but that
was basically because I had to (ironically) leave my apartment to meet some
people in person -- and you can only watch so much of people talking on the
phone.  Still, it was a fun movie to watch, and I feel it would be great
"just to have on," making it an excellent video purchase.
     Stars Tim Daly, Caroleen Feeney (not a typo), Liev Schreiber (also not
a typo), Dana Wheeler-Nicholson, Dan Gunther, Aida Turturro, and Alanna
Ubach (who plays Denise, also not a typo), are all B- or C-list actors, but
everyone does a fine job.  No Oscars here, but no raspberries, either.
     If you live one of these ultra-busy lives and never leave the house,
DENISE CALLS UP is the film for you.  If not, you may get a kick out of it
anyway, but don't expect much more than a protracted phone call.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Mother (1996/II)
     As Norman Bates said it:  "A boy's best friend is his mother."  And
just as Norman's family had its own brand of extreme dysfunctionality,
Albert Brooks dredges up more of his neuroses in MOTHER, a new comedy
about making peace with your past -- particularly with Mom.
     At least I think that's what it's about.  MOTHER starts off with a
definitive whimper, and it takes a long time to get to the real story. 
(Lisa Kudrow makes a short appearance at the film's opening -- which
bodes ill for the film, as it violates the "Never put a 'Friend' in a
movie" rule which was established early last year.)
     So, in the first 15 minutes, here's what we do get.  Brooks plays
John Henderson, a frustrated science fiction writer who is just
finishing all the paperwork on his second divorce.  His life is a
shambles, and John flails about for some kind of answer to the questions
of life.  His ingrate brother (Rob Morrow) is no help, so John turns to
the one person who understands him *least* -- his mother.
     John drives the 400 miles from L.A. to Sausalito and finds Mom
(played by the wonderful Debbie Reynolds) a reluctant host, plying him
with 3-year-old sherbet and frozen cheese.  John is moving back home
with one thing on his mind:  "The Experiment," a kind of soul searching
that isn't easy to explain in the context of a film review (the one time
John tries to explain it in the film, Mom turns and replies, "I'm sorry
John, I wasn't listening...").
     And while you may not really understand this Experiment thing, the
give and take between the two leads makes for some excellent comedic
moments:  Mom talks about John's divorce to the pet store clerk, John
takes Mom into Victoria's Secret to buy her some crotchless panties. 
You get the idea.
     The gist of the rest of the film revolves around John trying to
figure out why animosity exists between he and his mother, and when he
does, everything ties up a little too nice-and-neatly, and everyone's
happy again.  But cut him some slack; relationships are by definition a
tricky subject, and Brooks is to be praised for exploring one like
this.  I don't know if he's right about the whole thing, but I had a
good time watching him try to figure it all out.  If you have a mother,
you should too.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
     With all the recent rehashing of old movies and T.V. series, (anyone
catch the new TARZAN movie?) you wouldn't be blamed if you didn't expect too
much from this one.  But on the bright side, this one does have Anthony
Hopkins taking on an entirely new ethnicity, which is always interesting.
     Hopkins's performance aside, THE MASK OF ZORRO somehow managed to keep
itself afloat despite steamrolling through almost every action movie cliche
in the books.  In retrospect, ZORRO never loses its freshness precisely
because we are continually presented with new formations of the action movie
spectacle in a genre we haven't seen much of in a while.  Part ROBIN HOOD,
part disaster movie, part young warrior in training movie, another part
ROBIN HOOD, ZORRO seems to take the most classical elements of all of these
action genres and put them together in a way that we know we've seen it all
before, yet still enjoy the ride.
     None of this is to say that THE MASK OF ZORRO is a film masterpiece. 
Despite a strong performance by the hit-and-miss Antonio Banderas and an
enchanting turn by Catherine Zeta-Jones as the princess/noble woman/whatever
with a heart of gold, this film subjugates emotion to action.  So don't
expect to be swashbuckling out of the theater.
Director: Martin Campbell
Producer: Doug Claybourne, David Foster
Writer: John Eskow, Ted Elliott, Terry Rossio
Starring: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta-Jones
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/zorro/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Albino Alligator (1996)
     One of a growing list of recent directorial debuts by actors,
ALBINO ALLIGATOR is Kevin Spacey's (Best Supporting Actor winner from
THE USUAL SUSPECTS) baby, and his film is probably the best of the lot. 
Because with this movie, Spacey proves that he can work just as well on
either side of the camera.
     A "box drama" of classic design, ALIBINO ALLIGATOR is a
psychological thriller set largely inside a New Orleans Prohibition-era
bar still open in the 1990's.  Dova (Matt Dillon), Milo (Gary Sinise),
and Law (William Fichtner) are criminals on the run.  After killing
three cops with their car, the trio holes up in Dino's Last Chance Bar
until things cool over, but the cops catch up with them soon enough.  A
game of cat-and-mouse hostage negotiation ensues, with Faye Dunaway,
Viggo Mortensen, Skeet Ulrich, John Spencer, & M. Emmet Walsh as the
victims, and Joe Mantegna as the head cop on the case.
     Christian Forte's script is top-notch, save for a few dialogue
relics leftover from the Prohibition era themselves (I've never actually
heard anyone refer to two dollars as "a deuce").  In fact, the script
does most of the real work in the picture, leaving Spacey plenty of time
to concentrate on building tension and experimenting with some cool
camera tricks, all without getting too heavy-handed with his direction. 
And having all his talented friends act in the principal parts doesn't
hurt, either.
     Spacey does a nice job at getting across some relevant social
commentary along the way, even if the film stays a little inaccessible
due to the lack of any real heroes or very likable characters.  A better
editing job (especially continuity) could have made a big difference
here as well.
     But all is forgiven -- Kevin Spacey adds another title to his long
list of credits, and it might prove to be one of his best.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Substitute: Failure Is Not an Option, The (2000) (V)
Admittedly, I'm not up on all the nuances of the Substitute series,
which began with Tom Berenger in 1996 as the mercenary-cum-schoolteacher
and continues this day with The Substitute 4.  Treat Williams took over
the role in Substitute 2, and as he watches his career fall further and
further into John Travolta/direct-to-video land, we can only snicker at
his plight.
One of the more audacious plots I've seen, this sub's mission is to
infiltrate a Neo-Nazi group at a military prep school and bust it up. 
It's not hard to find the Nazis -- they're the ones with bizarrely
shaved heads and the swastika brands.  But when they start shooting
bazookas at the nosy substitute, well, that's when things get rough.
Equally audacious is the casting of vamp redhead model Angie Everhart as
a military medical officer.  I will say she looks good in uniform,
though she's out of it as much as she has it on.
Naturally, The Substitute 4 is wholly ridiculous, and its silly tagline
invites far too many obvious jokes at its expense.  That said, it's not
nearly as bad as I thought it would be -- and at least it goes out on a
limb and says that Nazism was a really bad thing.  Kudos for that one.
Director: Jamie Thraves
Producer: Sally Llewellyn, John Stewart
Writer: Jamie Thraves
Starring: Aidan Gillen, Kate Ashfield, Dean Lennox Kelly, Tobias
Menzies, Rupert Procter, Samantha Power, Deanna Smiles, Maggie Lloyd
Williams
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
     Pity poor Greg Focker.  Not only is the man employed as a male
nurse with an unfortunate name, but he's about to meet his girlfriend's
parents in order to ask dad for her hand in marriage.  Only dad is about
as humorless as, say, Robert De Niro.  And poor Greg can't do anything
right to save his skin.
     It all reminds me, with flashback-like intensity, of meeting my own
father-in-law-to-be, a guy so stern he makes De Niro look like Jim
Carrey.  Picture Ben Stiller as Focker (or me) and De Niro as himself,
and, like magic, you've got yourself one hell of a comedy that will see
few equals this year or any other.  (Note to Dr. Carder: This is just a
joke that I know you'll laugh about because we have such a great
relationship!  See you this Christmas!!!)
     De Niro comes off surprisingly perfect as the straight man to
Stiller's streetwise doofus, equally apt in his role as the guy who will
never be good enough for the girl (Teri Polo).  At first we see De
Niro's Jack as a harmless but hard-nosed retiree, with Focker (a name
which is repeatedly said aloud with great comic effect) doing everything
in his power to make dad like him.
     But as things like this typically go, nothing works out, and before
long the septic tank has overflowed, a fire has been started, the other
daughter's wedding has been ruined, and an incident involving a
champagne bottle, and urn, and a very naughty cat have filled your eyes
with tears so thick you can't see the screen.  Which is no good, because
you can't hear anything either due to all the laughter.  I literally
found myself gasping for breath during Meet the Parents' most comic
moments, wishing I could rewind the film.
     Ultimately, Meet the Parents is one of the funniest comedies I've
seen since Annie Hall, a film with which it shares a wry sensibility
about modern romance.  Jack, his true nature revealed, is so obsessed
with perfection for his daughter that he gives Greg a lie detector test
about his past.  Greg is so obsessed with making a good impression he
spray-paints a stray cat to look like Jack's pet when it goes missing. 
All of these situations are, against all expectations, utterly
believable, and invariably they are hilarious.  To top all that, somehow
the film has been kept suitable for teens with a PG-13 rating, yet it is
perfect for couples with its upbeat love story, and equally good for
anyone looking for a good comedy where they can let go and yuk it up.
     Director Hal Roach (of Austin Powers fame) handles the camera well,
framing Focker in scenes that would be worthy of The Fugitive if they
weren't so funny.  I can't think of much in the film that isn't done
equally well.  Randy Newman's title song "A Fool in Love" should earn an
Oscar nomination, along with the script and the two lead actors if
there's any justice in the world.  Altogether, Meet the Parents is one
of few films that I can highly recommend to anyone.
     But perhaps the best part of the film is its ending, which leaves
plenty of room for at least two sequels.  Like me, I'm sure you'll be
hoping they decide to make them before you're even back to the parking
lot.
Director: Jay Roach
Producer: Jane Rosenthal, Nancy Tenenbaum
Writer: James Herzfeld, John Hamburg
Starring: Ben Stiller, Robert De Niro, Blythe Danner, Teri Polo, Nicole
DeHuff, Jon Abrahams, James Rebhorn, Phyllis George, Owen Wilson
http://www.universalpictures.com/meettheparents/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
     It's getting to the point where I've just seen enough movies about
crazy musicians and whacked-out siblings. HILARY AND JACKIE gives us
both(!), so if you haven't had your fill of these two genres, here's a
chance to knock both out at once.
     The true story of the Du Pre sisters, we get to see them grow up
and become famous musicians. Hilary (Griffiths) ends up opting out of
the limelight to raise kids and chickens in the country. Jackie (Watson)
goes all-out in her quest to be a solo cellist, and of course, she goes
totally bonkers before too long.
     The film meanders along, mainly following Jackie's psychosis and
later, her development of multiple sclerosis, from which she died at the
age of 42. The film is made in a bizarre style - the kids grow up
together, then the movie focuses on Hilary's life, then it backtracks
and tells us what happened to Jackie during the same period of time.
Obviously an attempt to (a) be clever, and (b) break away from typical
story structure, HILARY AND JACKIE ends up failing at the former, more
important, task. The movie ends up being repetitious and, frankly,
annoying by the time it's over.
     Still, Watson's performance and the ambition of the picture can't
be denied. The music sounds great in surround sound (I screened it on
video), and the cinematography is quite lush. Too bad it all doesn't
come together very well.
http://www.octoberfilms.com/hilary-jackie/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Eye for an Eye (1996)
     This movie kinda sneaked up on us, huh?  You've probably never even
heard of EYE FOR AN EYE.  (I hadn't until the screening pass arrived in
the mailbox last week.)  But you'd think with a cast of Sally Field,
Kiefer Sutherland, Ed Harris, Beverly D'Angelo, and Joe Mantegna, the
studio would be pushing it a little harder.
     As well they should, because, put simply, this isn't your typical
Sally Field movie.  A long way from "Gidget," EYE FOR AN EYE is the very
aptly titled story of Karen McCann (Field), a white bread mother whose
daughter is raped and murdered (in an exceedingly disturbing opening
scene) by a nutcase killer (Sutherland).  Ed Harris plays Mack, Karen's
second (and very understanding) husband, and Mantegna is the investigator
on the case.
     The killer is apprehended, but a legal technicality sets him free. 
Frustrated with the legal system and obsessed with vengeance, Karen
decides to take the law into her own hands, with some interesting
consequences.
     What makes this a really creepy film is not so much the plot and
Karen's morbid fascination with the killer, but it's the fact that it's
*Sally Field* with a streak of retribution running through her.  Adding to
the chilly mood is a perfectly cast Sutherland, looking and acting like
he's straight out of ten years in Attica.
     The movie itself could have been a lot more than it ended up being. 
The plot turns out to be pretty much open and shut, as not much in the way
of a classic "thriller" ever starts you guessing or even makes you jump in
your seat.  Instead, the slow pace gets the film to evolve into more of an
in-depth character study than anything else, which probably isn't the
direction this picture needed to take.  Put simply, the movie just never
*grabs* you.
     In the end, EYE FOR AN EYE turns out some good performances in ho-hum
roles.  And while the tension slowly builds up over the course of the
film, it never quite makes it to where it desperately needed to go.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Birdcage, The (1996)
     It's a rare event when a remake of a film rivals the greatness of the
original.  THE BIRDCAGE, based fairly closely on LA CAGE AUX FOLLES,
achieves just that, memorably updating the earlier film's script with
modern humor and a distinctly American setting.
     The story has been done a thousand times, but LA CAGE AUX FOLLES was
one of the originals.  Armand Goldman (Robin Williams) is an openly gay
drag club owner in South Beach, Florida.  Albert (Nathan Lane, best known
as the voice of the weasel in THE LION KING), aka Starina, is Armand's
feature performer...and his "wife."  When Armand's son-via-one-night-stand
Val announces his impending marriage to Barbara (a dead ringer for Audrey
Hepburn), Armand freaks.  When Barbara's arch-conservative parents (Gene
Hackman and Dianne Wiest) drop by for a visit, it gets even worse.
     The most choice parts of the story involve Albert's attempt at
transforming his very non-butch persona into a faux "man," from his John
Wayne swagger to his mustard-spreading technique.  In the process, Lane
manages to do what has heretofore been impossible:  to upstage Robin
Williams, who plays a distant second (or even third) fiddle to his
costars.  The potential second is an almost unrecognizable Hank Azaria as
the couple's unbearably hilarious Guatemalan house boy.
     Of course, bits and pieces are lacking in THE BIRDCAGE, most notably
stuck-on subplots involving Val's real mother (Christine Baranski) and the
tabloids coming after the gang, but on the whole the film is a hilarious
modernization of its acclaimed predecessor.
     And while THE BIRDCAGE isn't really what I'd call insulting to any
particular group, don't expect any political correctness awards to be
handed out for the film.  Instead, just expect to hear a whole lot of
light-hearted laughter.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
     I'll preface this review with the disclaimer that I am indeed aware
that James Bond thrillers do not bear any semblance to real-life
scenarios.  I'll also say that since I was a kid I've been a huge Bond
fan.
     And I'll also say that THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is one of the worst
Bond films to come along in years.
     What's to fault?  Look no further than the story, the product of
five screenwriters who appear to have reported to a committee that
mandated no fewer than one bad pun every two minutes.  As a script, it's
a patchy mess of scenes largely lifted from any number of other Bond
flicks, while at the same time feeling like a complete anachronism in
relation to the rest of the series.
     How silly is the story?  James Bond (Brosnan) is... drum roll,
please... a bodyguard for an oil magnate's daughter (Marceau).  Sounds
like a job for the British Secret Service, doesn't it?  What a film like
this needs is a good villain, and we get Renard (Carlyle), who has a
bullet lodged in his brain and has lost his sense of touch (and can't
feel pain).
     Cool idea, only it turns out Renard is the biggest wuss of all in
the pantheon of Bond villains.  Punch him in the stomach, and he
crumples like a daisy.  Where is Jaws when you need him?
     The rest of the film is just as worthless.  Denise Richards is the
least credible nuclear physicist I can imagine, Marceau tries to vamp
her way through the film and is inexplicably dressed in a robe in almost
every scene, Brosnan looks alternately tired and bored, and whole chunks
of plot appear to have been hastily excised at the last minute.
     But the worst failing of the film is that, despite lavish
production values and intricately staged action scenes, the `action' is
amazingly lacking.  I hate to say it, but the lifeless score is largely
at fault for this, never rising to the fevered pitch that the classics
of the series could do.  Ultimately, THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH will be
forgotten quickly, adding nothing to the Bond mythology, and making one
long for the dramatic stylings of past 007s.
Director: Michael Apted
Producer: Barbara Broccoli, Michael G. Wilson
Writer: Bruce Feirstein, Michael France, Neal Purvis, Dana Stevens,
Robert Wade
Starring: Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Denise Richards, Robert
Carlyle, Judi Dench, Robbie Coltrane, Samantha Bond, Desmond Llewelyn,
John Cleese
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
     The Coen brothers are back and in a big way.  Bigger, as a matter of
fact, than ever before, because with FARGO, the Coens have produced a
masterpiece of a film that outclasses anything they've done yet--from
RAISING ARIZONA to BARTON FINK to even BLOOD SIMPLE, the movie that put
them on the map.  FARGO is perhaps the best movie to come down the pike
since PULP FICTION--so good that it earns my seldom-awarded five-star
rating.
     FARGO is one of those rare pictures about which I have nothing
negative to say.  Based on a true story that took place in North
Dakota/Minnesota in 1987, FARGO is the instantly enthralling tale of the
financially-troubled Jerry Lundergaard (William H. Macy), a plan to kidnap
his wife (Kristin Rudrud), her wealthy father (Harve Presnell), the
halfway-competent criminals who screw everything up (Steve Buscemi and
Peter Stormare), and the pregnant cop who's on the case (Frances
McDormand).
     What makes a film like this, done a hundred different times in a
hundred different ways, so good?  Joel and Ethan Coen's script is the
base--a wickedly funny and quirky screenplay that is executed with
perfection by the leads, particularly Oscar-caliber Macy and McDormand. 
The brothers, who grew up in Minneapolis, where a large chunk of the
action takes place, have also imbued the film with a rich and realistic
regional flair--authentic from the weather to the clothes to (especially
good) the accents.  It's so real, I was actually hungry for back bacon
when I left.
     Every shot of FARGO is executed like it's a piece of art with the
Coens' typical style; there is nothing at all wasted in the film, as the
Coens make even what would normally be dull establishing scenes fun. 
Also, while FARGO is as black as black comedy can get, it isn't completely
over the edge (the problem that shattered THE HUDSUCKER PROXY).  More
restrained--very much "back to basics" a la BLOOD SIMPLE--the Coens have
truly found their stride.
     So don't read any more about the film.  Just go see it, and prepare
to have a blast.  Don't be daunted by the typically poor Coen brothers
film title of FARGO (not only is it nondescript, but not much of the movie
is even set in Fargo (that's North Dakota)).  Just bundle up against that
icy cold.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Solomon and Gaenor (1999)
Solomon & Gaenor may not be directed squarely at the American Pie crowd,
but nonetheless it revolves around the similar theme of young love (and
young lust).
Solomon sells fabric and women's clothing door to door.  Gaenor is the
prim and very Christian daughter of a mining family in a nearby
village.  Inexplicably, Gaenor is unable to discern from Solomon's mass
of curly black hair and occupation in the textile business that he is
Jewish, and they soon develop a lusty relationship, replete with
hay-rolling booty calls in a local barn.
This, in case you're wondering, is Wales in 1911.
Solomon hides his Jewish heritage from Gaenor, as he would never make
his way into her arms otherwise due to the prejudices of the era.  As
you might expect, the deception leads to all kinds of trouble for the
star-crossed lovers.  Civil unrest and a miners' strike make things all
the worse.
Despite its gloomy promise, Solomon & Gaenor manages to hold your
attention throughout its running time, thanks to strong performances
from its two quirky leads, Ioan Gruffudd (Wilde) and Nia Roberts.  The
love affair is mostly believable, falling somewhere between The Piano
and The Way We Were in degree of heat.  Borrowing heavily from Romeo and
Juliet, the film works with good source material while it puts a unique
spin on things.
It certainly could have gone a lot worse, another morose Feast of July
to send you screaming out of the theater.  But while Solomon & Gaenor is
hardly uplifting, it remains a very good example of the period romance.
In English, Welsh, and Yiddish (with subtitles for the latter two).
Director: Paul Morrisson
Producer: Sheryl Crown
Writer: Paul Morrisson
Starring: Ioan Gruffudd, Nia Roberts, Sue Jones-Davies, William Thomas,
Mark Lewis Jones, Maureen Lipman, David Horovitch, Bethan Ellis Owen
http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/solomonandgaenor/index.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
     Unlike most critics, I've been largely unimpressed with Billy Bob
Thornton's work in the past.  From ONE FALSE MOVE to A FAMILY THING,
I've always found his writing to lack depth and miss a true focus.
     But then there's SLING BLADE, and with Thornton in complete control
as the writer, director, and star of the show, I do believe he's created
a real gem.
     SLING BLADE has its origins in Thornton's little-seen (and kind of
dull) short film, "Some Folks Call It a Sling Blade."  The short, a
10-minute black and white affair, is actually incorporated -- nearly
verbatim -- into the feature.  It presents to us the character of Karl,
a mentally deliberate man who, as a boy, killed his mother and her lover
some 25 years ago.  After a long spell in the mental hospital, Karl is
"well" and is being released into the world.
     That's where the short film ends, and that's where my plot
description ends as well, because from there on out, SLING BLADE is a
true original.  The film is an American Gothic tale, following Karl's
reluctant return to modern rural Bible Belt society, complete with
small-town closet homosexuals (John Ritter, surprisingly good here),
bigoted rednecks (Dwight Yoakam), and the Frostee Cream.  Unable to deal
with the cacophony of new things, Karl just tunes them out, living in
the garage of his new little friend (Lucas Black) and subsisting on
french fries and mustard, working as a small engine repairman.
     But while Karl is simple, he shows us the complexities of life
through less experienced eyes, and yet the film never wanders into the
campiness of FORREST GUMP.  Inside is to be found a tale of true
friendship, the meaning of love, an amazing morality fable, and some
beautiful imagery.  All of it to be found in the simplest of places.  It
feels slow at times, but the pacing actually enhances the experience of
being pulled in to the Deep South.
     I loved your movie, but don't get cocky, Billy Bob; I want to see
another great one.  After all, *I* know Molly Ringwald was in your short
film...
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Best in Show (2000)
     Just when you thought the mockumentary had mocked everything worth
mocking, here comes a new gem of the genre that will have you rolling in
the aisles once again.
     Up for skewering this time around is the dog show, as Best in Show
takes the absolutely inane shenanigans of dog breeders and handlers,
impaling their obsession with a caliber of wit unseen since This is
Spinal Tap made rock gods look like buffoons.
     Not that this is a surprise.  Writer/director Christopher Guest
wrote and composed the music for Spinal Tap, directed the funny-hmmm
Waiting for Guffman, and even starred in the masterful and sarcastic The
Princess Bride.  His The Big Picture is one of the most underrated
parodies -- attacking Hollywood -- of all time.  Guest knows comedy, and
he is still at the top of his game.
     Best in Show owes its hilarity to its script, which gives us the
simple premise of pet owners from around the country converging on the
Mayflower Dog Show in Philadelphia (you know, where they make the cream
cheese).  And while the script is stellar, opening with a yuppie couple
in group psychotherapy with their depressed Weimaraner, it's the dead-on
casting that makes Best in Show so teary-eyed goofy.
     With some dozen characters, it's hard to single out any one actor
who steals the show, but I'd have to give top honors to John Michael
Higgins (the guy who played Letterman in The Late Shift), a screaming
queen with a Shih Tzu named Miss Agnes and a straightish "companion"
played by Michael McKean.  Parker Posey is always a treat to watch as
half of the yuppie couple; with their matching braces and testimonials
about being so fortunate to be raised "with catalogs," the Starbucks set
has never looked more embarrassing.
     Guest has a role as a hick Bloodhound-owner cum ventriloquist, and
Eugene Levy and Catherine O'Hara give their best as pathetic,
lower-than-white trash Terrier wranglers.  (O'Hara's slutty vixen even
sticks her name tag right on her chest instead of her top.)  Finally
there's Jennifer Coolidge (Stifler's Mom from American Pie) as a Philly
society gal, Anna Nicole Smith-like in her buxomness and adamancy that
her marriage to an octogenarian is filled with love.  Who will win the
silver cup?  Who cares?  They're all fall-down funny.
     What unfortunately drags Best in Show off its game is the fact that
most of these actors have been around the block a time or two in this
kind of material.  At least a half-dozen of the main players are Second
City or Spinal Tap comedy veterans, including Fred Willard's loutish
announcer, who wonders on the air why the Bloodhound can't put on a
Sherlock Holmes hat and a smoke a pipe.  There's just no opportunity to
mistake Best in Show for a real documentary -- as some did when Spinal
Tap came out, and as many still do with a movie like Dadetown.  While
the documentary style is intact, these faces are just too familiar to
pull that off.
     That and a few missed joke opportunities aside, Best in Show has
easily gained a spot on my top ten list this year.  Maybe not the blue
ribbon, but definitely the red.
Director: Christopher Guest
Producer: Karen Murphy
Writer: Christopher Guest, Eugene Levy
Starring: Bob Balaban, Ed Begley Jr., Jennifer Coolidge, Patrick
Cranshaw, Christopher Guest, John Michael Higgins, Michael Hitchcock,
Don Lake, Eugene Levy, Jane Lynch, Michael McKean, Catherine O'Hara,
Parker Posey, Fred Willard, Jim Piddock
http://www.bestinshowonline.com/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Up at the Villa (2000)
     Hey, who hasn't been clamoring for a Kristin Scott Thomas-Sean Penn
romantic drama?  At long last, Up at the Villa is the answer to all
those unspoken dreams.
     Up at the Villa reunites the director of Angels and Insects, Philip
Haas, with Thomas, his former star.  And true to most re-pairings, the
film feels oddly familiar -- as if we've seen Thomas doing this before:
In pre-WWII Italy, a high-society (though penniless, natch) widow named
Mary (Thomas) is being wooed by an older man of some wealth (James
Fox).  He proposes, then promptly jaunts off for a few days so she can
consider.
     Naturally, the world opens up to Mary as she deliberates, and she
soon finds romance in the arms of an Austrian refugee (Jeremy Davies),
which culminates in a lone night of wild monkey love (in an era where
lone nights of wild monkey love are frowned upon).  Mary finds herself
in a jam when the refugee gets a little clingy, and Sean Penn's roguish
Rowley has to come in to help her out.
     All the while, Mary faces the budding turmoil of pre-war Europe and
the shenanigans of her friend Princess (Anne Bancroft, truly living up
to her character's name)... and you are somehow supposed to care about
all of this.
     Up at the Villa's prime flaw is that Mary is hardly a sympathetic
creature.  Her beauty is espoused by all when she actually looks quite
plain.  Her kindness is talked about when she's actually quite
duplicitous.  She throws her affections around on a whim.  Hardly a role
model.
     That said, Penn is lots of fun as Rowley, but he actually has far
less screen time than one would think.  And Bancroft is entertaining in
that Great Expectations sort of way.
     Acting is one thing, but ultimately, Up at the Villa falls flat
because the "intrigue" of this little drama is sorely lacking.  The
Nazis are coming and the best villain we get is a corrupt policeman?  Il
Duce would have been sorely disappointed.  The cover-up that comprises
the latter half of the movie feels treadworn, at best, pedestrian, at
worst.  Pokemon has more thrills.
     Lastly, the romance is neither very believable nor very torrid.
Penn and Thomas have absolutely no chemistry.  For that matter, neither
do any of Thomas's other romantic entanglements in the film.  In other
words: This is not The English Patient.  It's more of a cadaver.
Director: Philip Haas
Producer: David Brown, Geoff Stier
Writer: Belinda Haas
Starring: Kristin Scott Thomas, Sean Penn, Anne Bancroft, James Fox,
Jeremy Davies, Derek Jacobi, Massimo Ghini

Title
Review for That Darn Punk (2001) (V)
This unapologetic indie certainly feels like a festival-circuit entry. 
Alas, no -- Kung Fu Films has poured its $21,000 into That Darn Punk
with intent to make a profit.  Hence, it's straight to video and a big
soundtrack release.
Foolish?  Hardly.  According to the press notes, soundtrack preorders
have covered the cost of production fourfold.  Now that's a business
plan!
It's no surprise the soundtrack is inspiring some enthusiasm.  Scored by
The Ataris, Nerf Herder, Rancid, AFI, No Motiv, Lagwagon, The Vandals,
and a half-dozen other punkish outfits, That Darn Punk is indeed an ode
to, well, punk.  And its star, Joe Escalante, just so happens to be the
bassist for The Vandals.
So what's it all about?  Oh, the plot.  Yeah.  Well, Escalante plays a
punk rocker in a Vandals-like band called The Big Tippers, and after an
ill-advised near-fling with a music video moll, his girlfriend kicks him
out in nothing but his boxers, he is abducted and taken to the desert,
and a series of wacky hijinks involving murder, drugs, and aliens occurs
-- all so unlikely that you'll be drawing comparisons to Ed Wood flicks.
It's not a bad comparison to make.  That Darn Punk is goofy fun with
basement-level production values a la Repo Man.  Is it a witty ride
through existentialism?  No.  Is it something you might want to put on
at a party if for no other reason than to hear the kickin' soundtrack
and hope that your drunken guests will get a laugh out of the video?
Director: Jeff Richardson
Producer: Jeff Richardson, Joe Escalante
Writer: Jeff Richardson, Robert Stinson
Starring: Joe Escalante, Katalina, Mia Crowe, Kandis Scalise, Lisa
Hannan, Zander Schluss, Warren Fitzgerald
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Unstrung Heroes (1995)
     Diane Keaton's directorial debut is a very impressive one.  UNSTRUNG
HEROES is a smart, bittersweet drama about a boy growing up in postwar
suburbia.  Twelve-year old Steven Lidz (Nathan Watt) is surrounded by his
inventor father (John Turturro) and nearly-insane uncles Danny and Arthur
(SEINFELD's Michael Richards and Maury Chaykin).  When his mother Selma
(Andie McDowell) develops cancer from her chain smoking, Steven's life
begins to slowly unravel.
     The pressures of Selma's illness take their toll on everyone, and
Steven becomes lost in the cyclone of anger and sorrow that accompanies
any tragedy like this.  To find peace, Steven runs away to stay with his
uncles, where he finds a new world of self-realization, living on his own
terms instead of the indifferent rules set down by his father and by
society.
     Along the way, the antics of Steven's uncles and the outrageous
inventions that his father develops are hilarious, and the trio play off
of each other like a seasoned comedy troupe.  Watching Steven's
metamorphasis from introvert to extrovert is similarly funny.
     This film is worth seeing if for no other reason than to see
Richards's Oscar-caliber performance, but UNSTRUNG HEROES offers so much
more.  The story of loss and rebirth is genuinely touching, and while the
plot meanders and seems to break down in places, it somehow seems
appropriate, almost mimicking the characters' lives.  Ultimately, the
picture is a truly memorable look at dealing with pain while maintaining
your sanity.
     On a personal level, I also enjoyed the general contempt that the
medical profession receives in the film, especially regarding the doctors'
constant inability to act or even offer explanations for Selma's illness. 
It's a frightening metaphor that's just as relevant today.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
     John Cusack returns to film after a string of disappointments (CITY
HALL, MONEY FOR NOTHING) with... yet another disappointment!  GROSSE
POINTE BLANK is full of possibilities (a great hook, a sharp cast, and a
wry cynicism that is shamefully lacking from film these days) but comes
up short on all sides.  As Martin Blank, Cusack had the chance to
portray a hitman coming to terms with his own mortality on the eve of
his high school reunion.  And while he performs with characteristic
charm and sly sarcasm, as do his compatriots (including Joan Cusack,
Jeremy Piven, and the object of his affection Minnie Driver), it's the
blown opportunities for hit-it-home funniness that really make the whole
experience somewhat lackluster.  Apart from that, GROSSE POINTE BLANK is
really a poorly made movie on a technical level.  Editing,
cinematography, and continuity are all just plain bad, and together they
give the impression of an amateurish rush job, despite the fact that the
film is already dated (taking place in 1996).  Let's hope Romy and
Michele have more to offer next week....
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Collectors, The (1999)
     John Wayne Gacy, serial killer?  Or John Wayne Gacy, artist?  The
new documentary Collectors lets you decide whether a mass murderer who
paints in his cell produces something to be treasured or something to be
despised.  Not surprisingly, filmmaker Julian P. Hobbs has found plenty
of people on both sides of the issue.
     Collectors largely revolves around the art -- most of it very good
-- of Elmer Wayne Henley, who in the early 1970's killed some 27 young
boys with the help of Dean "The Candyman" Corll in southwest Houston. 
In 1973, Corll turned on his accomplice and Henley shot him.  Henley is
now serving six life sentences for his crimes.  He has little to do but
paint.
     Oddly, I grew up in southwest Houston and had never heard of this
case until now.  Recently has Henley turned up in the news again, as his
Houston art shows have been sell-outs, with curious onlookers anxious to
own a piece of a killer's psyche.
     Hobbs takes us inside the overstuffed homes of the serial killer
art collectors while providing equal time to the victims' relatives and
rights advocates (all staunchly against the sale of the art, despite the
fact that up to 1/3 of proceeds go to rights groups).  He also visits
with authors and shrinks, all anxious to explain why Joe America would
dirty his hands with this stuff.  Ironically, none of the arguments are
compelling on either side.  The collectors can't explain their passions,
and the naysayers adhere, as naysayers tend to do, to the irrational
belief that nothing good should come from the crimes.  We are left to
our own devices to figure out why someone would want a demon scrawled by
the likes of Richard Ramirez.
     As a documentary, Collectors is nothing short of fascinating.  We
see countless samples of killer artwork -- much of it atrocious
pen-on-paper sketchwork, but some quite good.  We get to hear Henley
himself, and we see that he is not a monster.  As well, Hobbs' choice of
music matches the mood of the film perfectly, and the photography is far
beyond what anyone would hope for from an independent documentary.
     Ultimately, Hobbs keeps an even keel and lets you decide what you
want to think about Henley and co.  But a better question to ponder is
this: Which is creepier: the serial killer artists or the collectors
themselves?
Director: Julian P. Hobbs
Producer: Julian P. Hobbs, Christopher Trent
Starring: Rick Stanton, Tobias Allen, Harold Schechter, Elmer Wayne
Henley, Walter Scott, Andy Kahan, Joe Coleman
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
     Woody Allen always does his best work when he's both in front of
and behind the camera.  Small Time Crooks give us Woody once again as
the star, once again making us laugh by proving that he and only he
knows how to deliver the exact and peculiar cadence of his written
humor.
     An unabashed comedic fable, Small Time Crooks presents Woody as Ray
Winkler, an ex-con living in a New York rathole and scraping by as a
dishwasher.  His wife Frenchy (Tracy Ullman) does nails by day, gives
Ray a whole lot of lip by night.  And when Ray comes home with a new
"master plan" that promises to make them rich so they can retire to
Florida (the dream to end all dreams in Small Time Crooks), Frenchy
becomes a reluctant partner.
     The plan is this:  Rent out the closed shop two doors down from a
big bank.  Then tunnel underneath and into the bank, making off with the
cash.  Ray enlists his pals (including Michael Rapaport and Jon Lovitz)
and the plan is launched.  Frenchy fronts the shop with a cookie
business, which the fellas dig their tunnel.  It isn't giving too much
away to tell you that the bank robbery plan goes bust, while the cookie
business front becomes a smash success.  And that's just the beginning
of the fun.
     Small Time Crooks marks a return to fine form for Allen, who hasn't
really dazzled me in a long while.  While it hardly carries the depth
of, say, Annie Hall or Hannah and Her Sisters, Crooks is the flat-out,
wry, New York, Woody Allen-neurosis humor that we remember so fondly.
     As its star, it's oddly disconcerting for Allen to be playing such
a schlub.  Ray has no class whatsoever and is extremely stupid, despite
his prison nickname of "the brain" -- which Lovitz's character goes to
pains to point out was "sarcastic."  Woody Allen is a real-life
sophisticate, and though his character has all the obsessions you'd
expect, the man is a bit too smart to pull off a character this dumb.
     Ullman, on the other hand, really develops her role far beyond its
opening volley as a mere Julie Kavner understudy.  Taking the trampy,
former-stripper ditz character and breathing in layers of nuance into
the role is inspired acting.  I've never been a huge fan of Ullman's,
but this movie may make me a convert.  Also of note, Hugh Grant has a
memorable and dryly funny part as a "Dr. Dolittle" type who later takes
Frenchy on as a student of the high life.
     Acting aside, Crooks ultimately succeeds on the strength of a
wickedly hilarious script that proves Woody still has his funny bone.
This isn't some art-house comedy for high-society types, it's a genuine
crowd-pleaser that you can't help but enjoy.
Director: Woody Allen
Producer: Jean Doumanian
Writer: Woody Allen
Starring: Woody Allen, Tony Darrow, Hugh Grant, George Grizzard, Jon
Lovitz, Elaine May, Michael Rapaport, Elaine Stritch, Tracey Ullman

Title
Review for Postino, Il (1994)
     The story surrounding the making of THE POSTMAN is almost as
interesting as the film itself.  English/Austrian Michael Radford was
hand-picked by the star of the picture, Italian Massimo Troisi, to direct
the dramatization of a Chilean novel about the story of Pablo Neruda
(Phillippe Noiret), a Chilean poet exiled to an Italian island, where he
befriends a local fisherman-cum-letter carrier.
     Radford accepted the assignment, and Troisi assumed the title role of
Mario, a simple Everyman whom Neruda slowly cultivates from tongue-tied
wallflower to smooth Romeo.  With Neruda's advice and introduction to
poetry, Mario is able to overcome his awkwardness and enchant the woman of
his dreams, the darkly beautiful Beatrice (Maria Grazia Cucinotta), and
subsequently he convinces her to marry him.  His transformation complete,
Mario finds inside himself the romanticism and courage that we all wish
for.
     Radford, director of the spectacular 1984, creates a memorable and
refreshing film about unadulterated love without resorting to gimmicks
like modern Hollywood romances do.  In THE POSTMAN, Troisi brings to
starkly realistic life the character of Mario as the personification of
emotion--feeling strongly for both a woman and his mentor.
     Only a few problems stand out as noticeable.  The subtitle
translation could use some work, and the characters tend to mumble on
occasion, making the extraction of emotion from a language I don't
understand all the more difficult.  Otherwise, I have no complaints. 
Everything in this unlikely movie seems to work well.  Even THE POSTMAN's
slow pacing fits the film perfectly.
     The eye-popper to the story surrounding the film is that Troisi, a
man with a long history of heart problems, died some 12 hours after the
film wrapped.  One could speculate that his devotion to the project kept
him alive just long enough to finish shooting.  And if that doesn't say
something about what you can expect to see from Troisi on the screen, I
don't know what does.

Title
Review for What I Like About You (1999)
     Independent romantic comedy is often a sketchy proposition.  The
money put into the production -- hiring great actors, getting enough
takes to catch the nuance of every joke, and having top-notch editing --
invariably makes a big impact on the end result of the picture.  And the
indies don't have money.
     Which isn't to say that having no money means you have no hope.
CLERKS and THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN are probably the two best examples of
no-budget comedies that were smashing successes.  WHAT I LIKE ABOUT YOU
is a far cry from either of these films, but it's a really good try.
There's a whole lot of heart in this picture, and everyone in the
production puts on a good face.  Unfortunately, as a whole, the movie
feels a bit derivative, moderately contrived, and ultimately simplistic
-- while still being a reasonably good time.
     WHAT I LIKE ABOUT YOU is at heart a good-old love triangle.  Ollie
(Marie Black) runs a quaint bookstore with her rich fiancée Michael (Ben
Pascoe).  Michael decides he wants to sell the store to a mall developer
(and big chain Book City), *plus* he is having an affair, thus doubly
crushing poor Ollie's spirit.  Enter Adam (Ryan Wickerham), the nutty
traffic reporter at the local radio station.  When their paths cross,
Ollie and Adam first hate each other, but soon enough they fall in love
and save the bookstore in the process.  Birds sing.  Sun shines.  If
only life were this wonderful!
     Wickerham is the real star of this movie -- his kinetic frenzy
invokes a young Jim Carrey, especially when he is given wide leeway to
ham it up.  Black is less charming in her star turn, coming off as
generally cold and often stilted in her line delivery.  Supporting
characters like the "Unabomber Wannabe," "Accent Man," and "Joe Buck"
(the radio station owner) lend a lot of life to what could have been
dull exposition, and the film blossoms thanks to these little details.
     As a comedy, WHAT I LIKE ABOUT YOU hits and misses.  Fortunately,
it hits slightly more often than not, and any fan of the indie scene
will find this a worthy diversion.
Director: Jeff Stolhand
Producer: Tony Hewett
Writer: Marie Black, Scott von Doviak
Starring: Marie Black, Ryan Wickerham, Cameron Johnson, Ben Pascoe
http://www.whatilikeaboutyou.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
     From the opening scene, showing drops of blood on a pristine white
surface, we know we're in for... well, not your ordinary slasher flick.
Turns out the "blood" is a berry sauce being applied to a plate of haute
cuisine.  And the mind games of AMERICAN PSYCHO have only just begun.
     Steeped in controversy and mired in production for years, AMERICAN
PSYCHO tells the story of Anybroker Patrick Bateman (Christian Bale), a
highest-society late 1980's Wall Street investment banker with a
penchant for murder and a bloodlust that doesn't quit.  Think of it as a
portrait of Gordon Gecko as a young man.
     With knives, axes, guns (bullet and nail), and/or chainsaw, Bateman
hacks up homeless people, hookers, and even a few of his friends,
especially if they talk nasty about him behind his back.  Between bouts
of rough sex, a rigorous shower and exercise routine, drinks and dinners
with friends and dates, and listening to his favorite music (Huey Lewis,
Phil Collins, and Whitney Houston), it's surprising that Bateman
actually has time to get to work.
     And murder's just not enough for Bateman.  He's engaged to Evelyn
(Reese Witherspoon) but is boning her sister (Samantha Mathis) and a
whole lot of whores, to boot.  Everyone but his assistant (Chloë
Sevigny) is getting a piece of the action.  Not that you'd want any,
because most everyone who visits Patrick's apartment ends up in the
fridge.
     AMERICAN PSYCHO has the tendency to be a character in search of a
plot, as was the case with the novel, but director Mary Harron has
infused Bret Easton Ellis's tale with so much twisted and neo-farcical
psychosis that she's really turned a rambling psychothriller novel
tinged with comedy into a ribald satire tinged with thrills.  The
murders in AMERICAN PSYCHO aren't particularly gruesome, it's the glee
with which Bateman carries them out that makes him a true villain.  Even
the novel's most gruesome killing (which I won't detail here, but which
involves a bound woman, a starving rat, and a Habitrail) has been cut
from the film.
     As for Bale, well, I think we've just witnessed the defining moment
of his career: the role for which he will forever be compared to.
(Think Leonardo DiCaprio (who was rumored to be taking this part at one
time) in TITANIC.)  He certainly plays Bateman to a T, even if the
dialogue he's been given is a bit flat.
     Harron has often described this film as a work of feminism.  I
don't know about that.  It's scattered and often random (like the novel)
and any female point of view was lost on me.  No matter.  AMERICAN
PSYCHO vibrates between being deliriously funny and just plain
delirious.  And for some reason, it made me really want to work on my
abs.
Director: Mary Harron
Producer: Christian Halsey Solomon, Chris Hanley, Edward R. Pressman,
Ron Rotholz
Writer: Mary Harron, Guinevere Turner
Starring: Christian Bale, Willem Dafoe, Jared Leto, Reese Witherspoon,
Samantha Mathis, Chloë Sevigny
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
     This is not SPINAL TAP.  And if DROP DEAD GORGEOUS has a singular
flaw, it's that it tries too hard to be SPINAL TAP.  And that's
unfortunate, because as far as spoof documentaries go, DROP DEAD is an
otherwise gorgeous entry.
     GORGEOUS actually began life as a sleepy independent film called
DAIRY QUEENS, but, as is common in Hollywood, the gears began a-shiftin'
in the heads of sundry studio executives, and before you knew it, DAIRY
QUEENS became a big Hollywood movie.
     Sort of.  GORGEOUS keeps a measure of its indie charm by placing
the action in a tiny Minnesota town called Mount Rose, which is hosting
its annual teen beauty pageant, to the delight of the town's residents.
And in the grand tradition of films like WAITING FOR GUFFMAN, the real
story is in the quirky inhabitants of the town, not the main plot line.
     The beauty pageant, in a nutshell, pits rich girl Becky (Richards)
vs. trailer trash Amber (Dunst), while Becky's mom (Alley) presides over
the pageant.  Naturally, cat fights and backstabbing ensue, and it
becomes readily apparent that the fix is in for Becky.
     Well, nothing goes according to plan, and we follow the girls to
the state pageant, and through their personal lives, and for the most
part, DROP DEAD GORGEOUS is drop dead hysterical.
     But there's something missing.  In the rush to invent a clever faux
documentary, the filmmakers have left out much of that indie feel.  Too
much is obviously and blatantly staged for anyone to think for a second
this is real.  Hollywood can never leave well enough alone.  By the time
we get to the third act (the state pageant), the film has gone so far
over the top that it loses its charm.
     Still, I recommend GORGEOUS on the overall strength of its comedy.
But in that little `documentary' text opener, how much I would have
given to see it followed by the words: `Their footage was found buried
in the woods a year later.'
     [As a side note, I have to add that it's been a pleasure watching
Kirsten Dunst grow up on celluloid.  From LITTLE WOMEN to `ER' to
GORGEOUS, Dunst is becoming a real actor.  filmcritic.com offers its
congratulations.]
Director: Michael Patrick Jann
Producer: Gavin Palone, Judy Hofflund
Writer: Lona Williams
Starring: Kirstie Alley, Ellen Barkin, Kirsten Dunst, Denise Richards
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Athan Bezaitis.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/d66da9a762ecfecb8825684b000a1a94?OpenDocument
Football is as engrained in our society's mores as deeply as war, family
values, and politics -- at least that's what Oliver Stone would like you
to believe.  To back up this statement, ANY GIVEN SUNDAY analyzes the
effects of a culture that elevates professional athletes and coaches to
a plateau, which immortalizes them as heroes of the common man.  Stone's
football fairytale is a culmination of every anecdote, highlight, or
soundbite you've ever seen associated with the pigskin, wrapped up in an
aesthetically pleasing Christmas package, and sealed with a kiss from
team owner Cameron Diaz.  Stone aims to please, and he doesn't miss a
single cliché of the revered and scrutinized American athlete.
At its core, ANY GIVEN SUNDAY is the story of Miami Sharks coach Tony
D'Amato (Al Pacino - THE GODFATHER, DOG DAY AFTERNOON) and his two
quarterbacks, Willie Beamen (Jamie Foxx - THE GREAT WHITE HYPE, BOOTY
CALL) and Cap Bowman (Dennis Quaid - THE BIG EASY, INNERSPACE).  The
quarterback is the most vital position in the game.  He is the team
spokesperson and field chief, and he serves as a crucial link between
coaches, administration, and players.  When legendary two-time Pantheon
Cup (aka: Super Bowl) champion Cap Bowman ruptures a disk after a bone
crushing hit, coach Tony is left with Willie Beamen (Foxx), an athletic,
yet untested QB.  His team has lost four straight and appears to be
plummeting in a downward spiral with the playoffs right around the
corner.   He's got delusional team owner Christina Pagniacci (Cameron
Diaz) and sports analyst Jack Rose (John McGinley, doing his best Jim
Rose impersonation) breathing down his neck because of his outdated
coaching style, and a team of players he's losing control of.
When Willie Beaman turns out to be a phenom and his team makes the
playoffs, Coach D'Amato must decide whether to stick with Cap, the
battered yet savvy veteran, or turn the reigns over to the flamboyant
prodigy, Beaman, who has been changing plays in the huddle, and is
selfishly leaving the rest of the team out of his newfound success.  In
choosing, Coach D must analyze his place in the history of the game, the
modern athlete versus the ghosts of the past, and the sacrifices he has
made of family and friends in living up to the team motto, "Whatever it
takes!"
If you're even vaguely familiar with the Oliver Stone movie formula,
you'll know in advance that there will be about eight subplots going on
at once.  Lawrence Taylor, the NFL all-time sacks leader, is an aging
linebacker faced with a nerve injury that could take his life, but he
can't collect his million dollar-signing bonus unless he continues to
play.  James Woods is Dr. Harvey Mandrake, a slimy team doctor with no
compassion for the physical well being of his players, who will
authorize or withhold the athletes from competition at the discretion of
the team owner.  Mathew Modine (THE BLACKOUT, VISION QUEST) is his
medical assistant, who attempts to act as a moral blockade for the
corrupt Mandrake.  Meanwhile, Ann-Margaret, (GRUMPY OLD MEN) the
matriarch of the Pagniacci family, maintains that the pressures of
owning a professional football team were responsible for killing her
husband and the cause of her miserable existence.  The intertwined side
stories add much-needed volume to the basic theme of the coach and his
quarterback controversy.
Oliver Stone unveils the Miami Sharks from all angles.  The film goes
inside the lives of the players: from the expensive women, to the drugs,
to the seemingly endless flow of money, and into their volatile home
lives.  He plays the race card effectively by making references to the
problem of all-white ownership in a sport that is dominated with black
athletes.  Yet his proclamation is not overly bold, because at the same
time, he casts Dallas Cowboys owner Barry Switzer as a color
commentator.  He also criticizes the media for its suffocating coverage
and idolatry of the league's players through his portrayal of
pretentious sports personality Jack Rose.
The football scenes are accompanied with music and lighting reminiscent
of a music video.  A true fan may find some of the action scenes a
little hard to swallow, but they're fun to watch, even when they're
unbelievable.  Also noteworthy is the fact that the coach would surely
notice if a QB were changing plays in the huddle.  For Pacino to have to
find out from LL Cool J, his star running back, is preposterous.  Just
ask any football coach.
On the plus side, the enormous ensemble cast is fantastic and there are
more cameos than I can count or make reference to.  See if you can pick
out some of the NFL greats yourself.  Pacino is once again stunning and
James Woods is like a chameleon putting on yet another credible
performance, but Cameron Diaz's act really takes the cake as a heartless
owner caught up in the high stakes of a winning football team that's
losing money.
Overall, it's a high-octane testosterone laden picture.  If you like
football, you'll love this film.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Man Who Wasn't There, The (2001)
I was warned in advance about The Man Who Wasn't There, having been told
it was "definitely a Coen brothers movie."  Indeed, there's no better
description for this film aside from that vague insult.
Shot in black and white as an homage to film noir, The Man Who Wasn't
There (no relation to the Steve Guttenberg movie of the same name) tells
the tale of Ed Crane (Billy Bob Thornton, sporting a veritable work of
art on his head as a toupee), a mild mannered, chain-smoking barber in
sleepy 1940s Santa Rosa, California.  As Ed's life consists of cutting
the same heads of hair day in and day out, he can be forgiven for a
little dissatisfaction with his life.
So, when a stranger (Jon Polito) passes through looking for an investor
in a nutty "dry cleaning" operation, Ed decides to blackmail his
neighbor and local department store magnate Big Dave (James Gandolfini)
for the seed capital -- because he also happens to think Dave is having
an affair with Ed's wife Doris (Frances McDormand).  This of course is
only the beginning, as a body count starts to rise and nothing turns out
to be as it seems.
Or actually, as everything turns out exactly as it seems.  If it weren't
for the usual populace of Coen brothers "wacky characters," The Man Who
Wasn't There would be little more than Z-grade noir unfit for the
bargain pulp rack at the drugstore.  As it stands, it's merely Z-grade
noir full of weird non-sequiturs like some utter nonsense about alien
abductions and a bit with a would-be piano prodigy (Ghost World's
Scarlett Johansson, utterly wasted here).
Shot with that typical Coen brothers flair in stark and shadowy black
and white, the evocation of noir is impressive -- but in the end this is
completely and utterly ruined beyond any hope by the fact that the boom
is visible in almost every scene.  Readers will think I'm exaggerating,
but I'm serious.  At least 30 times a honking black microphone -- and
often the pole to which it is attached -- can be seen bobbing over the
heads of the actors, even moving around in the scene to pick up the
voices of different players.  It's distracting to the point where you
wonder if it's something the Coens put in the movie as a nutty gag.  If
that's the case, knock another star off my rating.
But the noir hopes for The Man Who Wasn't There are limited even with
its pathetic technical work.  Thornton's narration comes nonstop,
initially a charming throwback to the real days of noir but inevitably
overdoing it to the point where you never want to hear his voice again. 
The entire second act revolves around Doris's wrongful arrest and trial
for murder, but the legal case is so absurd it's wholly impossible to
believe.  That's too bad, because the appearance of Tony Shalhoub as
Doris's lawyer is one of the few highlights in the movie.
While it's pretty to look at and occasionally clever, the movie rambles
incessantly and just ends up as unsatisfying on a number of different
levels.  I hate to say it, because I'm a fan of much of the Coen oeuvre,
but The Man Who Wasn't There is barely there itself.
Director: Joel Coen
Producer: Tim Bevan, Ethan Coen, Eric Fellner
Writer: Joel Coen, Ethan Coen
Starring: Billy Bob Thornton, Frances McDormand, Michael Badalucco, Adam
Alexi-Malle, James Gandolfini, Katherine Borowitz, Jon Polito, Scarlett
Johansson
http://www.themanwhowasntthere.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
     It's the most heavily-hyped and anticipated indie film I have ever seen.
     It's a foul and grotesque exercise in nausea, yet completely
engrossing from the start.
     It's the most experimental film to gain a large release in America
since SLACKER.
     Its subject matter is something eschewed by almost everybody -- heroin
addiction.
     Its unique structure, built around metaphor and over-the-top imagery,
will make the film inaccessible to most audiences, as if the thick Scottish
accents that make most of the dialogue indecipherable don't already.
     Making an independent movie about drug addiction isn't the easiest
thing in the world.  Gus Van Sant tried it awhile back, in DRUGSTORE
COWBOY, with fair success.  This time it's director Danny Boyle (who helmed
last year's Movie Emporium #1 Film of the Year, SHALLOW GRAVE), with a few
familiar faces from the aforementioned masterpiece (led by GRAVE's Ewan
McGregor, as our narrator Renton) and a lot of Boyle's signature
avant-garde direction.
     The story is based on Irvine Welsh's cult novel of the same name, as
TRAINSPOTTING tracks the downward -- and upward -- spirals of a group of
heroin-addicted friends in Scotland.  The title comes from a popular
pastime in Britain, where people apparently sit by the tracks and record
every possible detail of the passing trains -- sometimes for days at a
time.  The futility of this task is yet another metaphor in a
metaphor-bloated picture, where nothing on the screen is exactly what it
seems.
     The film truly defies description, and even a full 12 months of hype
couldn't adequately prepare me for what I eventually saw.  Suffice it to
say that this horribly nasty and raw expose of how unglamorous the junkie
life really is manages to overpower anything else I've seen on film in a
long while.  Beyond that, you'll just have to see for yourself.  But *be
prepared* to be shocked, disgusted, and at the same time, enthralled.
     I could talk about the bothersome aspects of TRAINSPOTTING:  an
annoying techno soundtrack, a dragging middle section, and rapid-fire,
heavily-accented dialogue that went in my ears and never quite reached my
brain.  Or I could talk about how, after leaving the theater, I wanted to
immediately see the film again.  But, as TRAINSPOTTING's Renton puts it,
why would I want to do a thing like that?
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
     We've already had three movies based on TV shows this year, plus a
film based on a TV commercial, but I think it's a really bad omen when a
film is based on a series of trading cards.
     The film is MARS ATTACKS!, and with it Tim Burton serves up the
worst production of his once-blossoming career, a movie wherein he
indulges every excess of his demented psyche, pays no attention to
entertaining the audience, and recycles every joke he can get his hands
on.
     The joke recycling would be okay, even appropriate, given Burton's
predilection for shtick, if only the jokes were *funny*!  But they're
not.  Nothing much is funny in MARS ATTACKS!, whose mildly amusing "War
of the Worlds" story can best be described as... Mars attacks.
     Burton obviously started this production in the casting -- Jack
Nicholson as the president, Glenn Close as his uppity wife, Annette
Bening as a New Age freak, Pierce Brosnan as a sophisticated science
advisor.  You get the idea.  I guess Burton figured that throwing Tom
Jones (as himself) into the mix would make it all better.
     And maybe it would have, except the performances look like they're
cobbled together from the days off that the cast of some 15 "name"
actors happened to have.  Bits and pieces of what should be on the
editing room floor have somehow made their way into the final print
instead, and in no particular order, either.  Only one running joke
stands out as worthy -- a flirtation between two disembodied heads (I
won't say who).
     I realize that MARS ATTACKS! was supposed to be a tongue-in-cheek
homage to the cheesy, old sci-fi flicks (but Tim, you *already* made ED
WOOD), but MARS ATTACKS! isn't even any good as a farce.  The movie just
plain looks bad -- too bad to be taken seriously, but not bad enough to
look bad on purpose.  And Burton's use of ultra-campy stars like Lisa
Marie and Pam Grier?  Puh-leeze.  Where's Richard Roundtree, Tim?
     Got the point yet?  Because I'm tired of writing about this dead
film.  I wonder if we'll ever know what Burton had in mind when he put
together this giant waste of time, but then again, who cares?
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Lone Star (1996)
     LONE STAR can be simply described as an incredible mess.
     John Sayles, darling of the indie film movement, has created
this picture, an epic study of racial tension in mythical Frontera,
Texas, a border town in the Rio Grande Valley.  (The film was
actually shot in Eagle Pass, quite a ways upriver from the Valley.)
Set against the backdrop of a son investigating his father's
involvement in the murder of a sheriff some 40 years earlier, Sayles
wanders, SHORT CUTS-like, through the lives of 15 or so major
characters. 
     The film is full of excellent performances, including Chris
Cooper (Sam Deeds, the current sheriff and investigating son),
Matthew McConaughy (Buddy Deeds, his dad, in flashback), Kris
Kristofferson (the evil and long-dead ex-sheriff Charlie Wade),
Elizabeth Pe=F1a (Pilar, Sam's girlfriend), and Frances McDormand (in
a cameo as Sam's ex-wife).  The problem is that Sayles's script could
have used some work, as it meanders through 2 1/2 hours of plot that
is mostly irrelevant to the primary story line.  One of these
side-tracks involves Pilar's Mexican family, their prejudices, how
they want to teach Texas History, illegal immigration, and a host of
scattered other themes.  Another subplot involves the black
community, a closing Army base, a family drama between grandfather,
father, and son, and how this all fits in with the 40-year old murder
(answer:  very, very sketchily). 
     Sayles's biggest problem is that he likes the sound of his
writing so much that he lets it go on forever.  In fact, he
continually prefers to *talk* about things that have happened than to
actually *show* them happening (thus violating the first rule of
screenwriting).  It's no wonder that your legs (and mind) are asleep
when the movie's over. 
     Sayles also has a poor understanding of what the Valley is
really like, giving it a large black community that simply does not
exist there.  With LONE STAR, Sayles is trying to jam every racial
theme he's ever thought of into one movie, but he fails due to this
glaring inaccuracy (and interestingly, it's that very subplot which
is the poorest). 
     By the time the engrossing final 15 minutes arrive, we're
already too bored to care too much.  Sure, there are a few nice
twists along the way, and as a director, Sayles's use of flashbacks
is well-done and breaks up the monotony of the script.  Also, the
aforementioned solid acting does a lot to give this otherwise
mediocre film some credibility.  A real editor (Sayles did that, too)
would have saved the picture, though, by trimming off 45 minutes. 
     Finally, with this serious drama set in remote, rural Texas,
Sayles will achieve two things with certainty:  1) That most critics
will drool all over him with praise, and 2) that no one will actually
pay to see the film.  Sorry, John.  RATING:  ***
-Christopher Null  /
null@filmcritic.com -Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/ -and e-mail
requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Rob Roy (1995)
     The classic Rob Roy cocktail:  pour 1-1/2 oz. scotch whiskey and 1/2
oz. sweet vermouth into a mixing glass with ice, stir, and strain.  Add
one maraschino cherry.  Make more than one; you'd better drink up before
you head off to see this dog of a picture.
     ROB ROY is not, unfortunately, a film about bartending.  Rather, it's
the first of three upcoming swashbuckler movies for 1995.  Liam Neeson is
Robert Roy McGregor, the famed Scottish highlander with a heart of gold. 
Jessica Lange is his headstrong wife.  After half an hour of proving what
a Great Guy he is, Rob plans to make a bundle of profits on driving some
cattle across Scotland.  He borrows some money from a nobleman to fund
this campaign, only to have it is stolen by Bad Guy Cunningham (Tim Roth).
     Well, the nobleman isn't so happy that his cash is gone, so he sends
none other than Cunningham (who's running scams on everyone) to hunt poor
Rob Roy down.  This goes on for quite some time.  Two and a half hours, to
be exact, until the Big Swordfight Scene...which turns out to be
not-so-big, and rushes us into the obligatory Happy Ending.
     ROB ROY can basically be summed up in one word:  boring.  When it
isn't boring, it's incomprehensible.  And when it isn't incomprehensible,
it's disgusting, featuring very off-color humor, bodily excretions, the
disembowelment of rotting cattle, and the like.  Believe me, I did *not*
need to see Jessica Lange squatting.  (Yes, I'm serious.)
     Only some lush scenery saves this film from utter disgrace.  Trivial,
predictable, and, in the end, irrelevant, I almost couldn't bear to sit
through it.  Director Michael Caton-Jones and everyone else involved in
this disaster should be shot for wasting the public's time.  The rating is
generous.

Title
Review for Wave Twisters (2001)
Wave Twisters, the brainchild of a foursome of turntable DJ's, is
practically a 45-minute animated music video wherein DJ QBert's spins
and samples are given Technicolor life.  There's a story of sorts inside
the movie -- though the dialogue is, as near as I can tell, all sampled
from TV commercials and old sitcoms.  For those who insist on playing
along, it's a sci-fi-ish tale a la Star Wars, wherein the animated Inner
Space Dental Commander must use his own brand of "force" (aka spinning
records) to wage battle against the villainous DJs (who play themselves
in live footage among the animation, Roger Rabbit style).
Full of pop culture references -- villains with Palm Pilots, Macs that
ask you about alcoholism, robots that need to be reset with a paperclip
-- Wave Twisters is reasonably fun; it's just not what I'd call great
cinema.  Rather, it's something that would probably play better
projected on the wall at a rave instead of in a dark and quiet movie
theater.  (No doubt, most people who see Wave Twisters will do so
standing up.)
Alas, I never got the "All your base are belong to us" payoff I was
hoping for in the movie, but I guess Wave Twisters was created a tad too
early for that craze.  But what do I know?  The film tied for best
"midnight film" at this year's SXSW film festival.  Here's to the hip
kids.
http://www.wavetwisters-themovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Destiny Turns on the Radio (1995)
     Quentin Tarantino has made an interesting choice for his first
follow-up to PULP FICTION.  He's chosen to act in a supporting role, as
Johnny Destiny, a mystically supernatural creator of luck in this odd
film: DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO.
     Unfortunately, Tarantino's talents are wasted here.  Instead, the
film focuses on the melodrama/comedy of the relationship between prison
escapee Julian (Dylan McDermott) and lounge singer Lucille (Nancy
Travis), plus their ex-partner in crime Thoreau (James LeGros), and
Lucille's new boyfriend Tuerto (James Belushi).
     Exactly what this film is about is difficult to describe because
the plot is minimal at best.  Basically, they are all in Las Vegas,
trying to change their lives for the better.  But for 100 or so minutes
the movie drones on and on about a bunch of characters we don't seem to
care about or particularly like.  Even the hero Julian is pretty
obnoxious and unlikeable.
     The acting is way over-the-top.  In an attempt to make this a hip,
ultra-cool "magical comedy," the result is simply pure nonsense.  Some
truly funny moments arise, but basically the film drones on and on
without getting anywhere.  Sure, it's unpredictable, but who cares?
     I expect Tarantino fans will rush out to see DESTINY in droves. 
Expect to be disappointed; it certainly isn't up to standard.

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
     The idea of a "revenge comedy" naturally appeals to my dark side,
and I've always been a Matthew Broderick fan -- so what could keep me
from getting out to this little film?  Not much.  Not the fact that the
first act feels like it was put together while the writer was under
anesthetic.  Not the fact that the film's editing is better described as
butchery.  Not the fact that Broderick as a hick astronomer is a bit
far-fetched.  Not the fact that Kelly Preston is an unbelievable bore to
watch.
     No, none of this could keep me from laughing at the hysterics of
Broderick and Meg Ryan trying to win back and irrevocably destroy their
respective lovers.  While ADDICTED TO LOVE has more gaping plot holes
than you can shake a stick at, it's still awfully funny when it wants to
be, largely carried on the shoulders of Broderick's natural charm and a
cast of thousands (of roaches).  And Meg Ryan ain't bad, either.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Map of the World, A (1999)
     What AMERICAN BEAUTY did for the suburbs, A MAP OF THE WORLD aims
to do for the farm life.
     I said "aims," of course.  A MAP OF THE WORLD is deeply flawed yet
still worth a look, especially if you're into grandiose, weepy,
self-important dramas.  And hey, who isn't?
     Obviously based on an Oprah-class novel, WORLD is the story of
Alice Goodwin (Weaver), a put-upon school nurse who lives on a Wisconsin
farm as part of an "experiment" by her rather oblivious husband Howard
(Straitharn).  Right with the voice over at the film's beginning, it's
clear that Alice is going to have some Bad Times ahead, and within 20
minutes, said Times are upon us.
     Alice is so frazzled she can't even keep an eye on the neighbors'
precious daughter, who wanders off about 200 yards to the pond and
promptly drowns.  Hair tearing and chest beating ensues, and Alice's
mindset only gets worse.  Then the kicker: A real bitch of a woman
(Sevigny) accuses Alice of abusing her son, a student at the school
where Alice works.  Go to jail, Alice.  Courtroom drama follows.
     As a story, WORLD is all over the map (no pun intended) -- from
marital troubles between Alice and Howard to in-law problems (Fletcher
playing Howard's doting mother) to legal mumbo-jumbo to a bizarre and
out of place stretch with Alice doing time in jail during her trial.
The whole notion of jail as a metaphor for Alice's mental healing (you
know, a personal prison for dealing with her anguish over the death of
the neighbor child?) is unbelievably over-the-top and just comes off as
phony.
     In fact, very little of this holds together as a narrative, and at
127 minutes, so much of this is extraneous padding that the film
positively crawls.  Even worse is Weaver's character (not necessarily
Weaver herself, mind you).  Alice is so selfish, melodramatic, and just
plain dumb that the character hurts the film.  Contrary to speculation,
there will be no Oscar nod for Weaver this year.
     Still, there's something to like.  Most notable is Julianne Moore
as the too-perfect neighbor whose daughter dies.  Her character grows
more than the rest of the cast combined, and her heartfelt performance
makes up for a lot of the rest of this WORLD.  Still, the film can't
ride on her surprisingly small role alone, so unless this all sounds
like your idea of a great way to spend an evening, you'll probably want
to pass.
Director: Scott Elliott
Producer: Kathleen Kennedy, Frank Marshall
Writer: Peter Hedges, Polly Platt
Starring: Sigourney Weaver, Julianne Moore, David Strathairn, Ron Lea,
Arliss Howard, Chloë Sevigny, Louise Fletcher
http://www.flp.com/films/map%20of%20the%20world,%20A/pix/map_oscar_poster.htm
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
     Well, comic book freaks can take a breather, as another sci-fi
fantasy hits the big screen, this time in the long-awaited,
highly-anticipated, it-better-be-good X-Men.
     Without too much regret, I can say that X-Men will be palatable to
fans and newbies alike.  It's not a great film, but it will probably
follow the arc of the Superman and Batman movies -- tons of sequels of
variable quality until an abrupt and dismal end a decade later.
     The film is largely focused on introducing the very idea of the
has mutated to the point where various members of it find themselves
endowed with superhuman abilities: telepathy, walking on water/through
walls, regeneration, and the like are commonplace.  As with most modes
of difference, the mutants find themselves vilified by the public, and a
Senator (Bruce Davison) launches a crusade to mandate "mutant
registration."
     How the group of X-Men came to be is unclear, but we do know that
Dr. Xavier (Patrick Stewart) is their leader and that he's wealthy
beyond belief, funding an apparently tuition-free school for mutant kids
where they can harness their powers in peace.  Dr. X (X-Men, get it?)
recruits adults, too, with monikers like the laser-eyed Cyclops (James
Marsden), the weather-controlling Storm (Halle Berry), and the
telekinetic Dr. Jean Grey (Famke Janssen) -- the only X-Person who
doesn't have a nickname.  Together, the X-Men peacefully oppose the
government's anti-mutant tide, while battling the "evil" Magneto (Ian
McKellan), a concentration camp survivor that can control metal with his
mind.
     Soon the film begins to turn around newcomers to the X-Men -- the
super-tough Wolverine (Hugh Jackman) and the power-stealing Rogue (Anna
Paquin) -- and a Magneto plot to capture them consumes the rest of the
movie.  Ultimately it is revealed that Magneto's plan is to give all the
human leaders of the world a mutation of their own, through a
contraption he's built that will be unveiled at a conveniently-timed
"World Summit" on Ellis Island.  Whew!
     Strangely enough, X-Men is not as complicated as it sounds.  In
fact, its major flaw is that it spends the bulk of an hour simply
explaining what mutations are, who the good guys and bad guys are, and
what their respective powers are.  Everyone has two names -- a real one
and a nickname like "Sabretooth" -- and at least one has the power to
shift shape (an unrecognizable Rebecca Romijn-Stamos with no lines in
her own voice).  The exposition is necessary to have the movie make
sense, but it weighs the film down with a tedium that takes you
completely out of the action.
     That aside, X-Men's biggest flaw is that all mutants appear to be
stupid beyond belief.  Xavier and Magneto are presented to us as genius
arch-rivals, but the plots Magneto cooks up to capture the enemy are
straight out of an old "Batman" TV show episode.  Why go to all the
trouble to trick one mutant and poison another when you can just send
your shapeshifter in to do the dirty work?  Why can't Dr. X figure out
why Magneto is interested in Wolverine?  I suppose questioning the logic
of a movie called X-Men makes me sound a bit nutty, but there it is.
     While fans will appreciate the largely accurate portrayal of the
team (with the notable exception of Rogue being played as a barely
pubescent teenager), inside jokes like cracks about Wolverine's yellow
Spandex will be lost on most of the audience.
     Ultimately, X-Men is a reasonably entertaining movie, but it's one
that started to bother me the moment I left the theater.  Here's why: 
The X-Men want to stop a potential war between humans and mutants, and
Dr. X thinks Magneto is brewing this war up.  But Magneto isn't doing
anything of the sort.  He's cooked up this machine that will give
mutations to humans -- and therefore a better understanding of mutants,
and ergo, no war.  Magneto has a great idea!  If his machine worked
right, everything would have been peachy.  The fact that it doesn't
feels inserted by one of the half-dozen uncredited screenwriters just to
make the movie a little less nonsensical.
     Anyway, I predict the legacy of X-Men to be this:  1) There will
undoubtedly be a sequel.  2) It will be a whole lot better than the
original.  Vive la difference.
Director: Bryan Singer
Producer: Lauren Shuler Donner, Ralph Winter
Writer: David Hayter
Starring: Patrick Stewart, Hugh Jackman, Ian McKellen, Halle Berry,
Famke Janssen, James Marsden, Bruce Davison, Tyler Mane, Rebecca
Romijn-Stamos, Ray Park, Anna Paquin
http://www.x-men-the-movie.com/index.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Sense and Sensibility (1995)
     Finally, a film to make Jane Austen proud.  The third adaptation of
her work this year (the first being CLUELESS's modernization of "Emma;"
the second, the dreadful PERSUASION), first-time screenwriter Emma
Thompson and director Ang Lee have crafted a magnificent and exquisitely
detailed piece of art which redeems the failures of the other two.
     SENSE AND SENSIBILITY tells the story of the Dashwood family, who,
after the death of Mr. Dashwood, lose all their wealth to the son of Mr.
Dashwood's prior marriage.  The four Dashwood women, the mother and three
daughters (Elinor [Emma Thompson], Marianne [Kate Winslet], and young
Margaret), must find a way to make ends meet as the elder daughters face
the daunting problems of love and romance.
     Competing for the affections of Marianne are the dashing playboy
Willoughby (newcomer Greg Wise) and the upright Colonel Brandon (Alan
Rickman).  Meanwhile, Elinor finds herself falling for Edward (Hugh
Grant), who, without spoiling the plot, isn't completely forthright with
Elinor about his availability.  Throughout it all, the high society
gossips make everyone squirm with their constant chatter.
     Sound like a 19th century soap opera?  It is, and an awfully good one
at that.  But on top of a nicely-crafted story, Thompson has enriched what
could have been a dull period piece (see PERSUASION for a frightening
example of this) with an unexpectedly hilarious series of vignettes that
underscores the endless procession of romantic misunderstandings and
entanglements that weave through the girls' lives.  And oddly, though the
romance and courtship of that bygone era is archaic, the scenes are
equally relevant today.  Of course, it's not all mirth and hilarity: 
judging from the bawling woman sitting next me, this film can really pull
the tears out, too.
     Thompson and especially Winslet (who was so exquisite in 1994's
HEAVENLY CREATURES) are perfectly matched as near opposites who find some
common ground as the film progresses.  Grant and the other supporting cast
members are also admirable.  Taiwanese director Ang Lee infuses the film
with some variety and cleverness, too.  In all, the film really comes
together as a whole.
     While some of the overly talky scenes tend to drag on too long (thus
pushing the film into 2 1/4 hours of length), making the mind often start
to wander, we're still left with a memorable film that brings out
everything we love about these kinds of stories.  And best of all, it
leaves us with the message that while nothing is ever as perfect as it
seems, things have a funny way of working out for the best.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
     Mr. Kubrick would have been upset.  I take that back.  He would
have been totally pissed.  I'll get it out up front: Our screening was
interrupted by a fire alarm, which sent the entire San Francisco press
constituency outside for a full hour, and ultimately forced us to miss
about five minutes of the movie, right in the middle, where it was
getting juicy.
     That aside, this is one hell of a movie.  A somewhat bizarre cross
between A CLOCKWORK ORANGE and THE SHINING, EYES WIDE SHUT is the work
of a meticulous craftsman -- a luscious and rich odyssey through the
streets of New York, and into the minds of a couple of its residents.
     Those residents are Doctor Bill Hartford (Cruise) and his wife
Alice (Kidman), who live a pretty good life in Manhattan.  But when a
friend's (Pollack) party gets a little kinky  just enough to stir up
some long-hidden emotions  Alice confesses to a one-night stand that
never actually happened... but which she desperately wanted to.
     This sets Bill's mind in motion, sending him on something of an
accidental journey through the bowels of NYC, from a brief visit with a
hooker to a costume dealer who whores out his daughter to the biggest
damn orgy you've ever seen.  Or at least the biggest that I've ever
seen.
     All the while, Bill gets more and more convinced that his wife is
depraved and wanton, which only fuels his desires even more.  More than
a journey of the eye through these lavish sets, Bill's is a journey
inside the mind of the paranoid, and it gets him in a little too deep by
the movie's end.
     The movie isn't as raunchy as you might have heard.  In fact, it
almost seems tame except for the big orgy scene and a ton of naked
Kidman shots.  And no, Cruise does not wear a dress in the movie.
     EYES WIDE SHUT is a thrill to watch  if for no other reason than
to try and guess who is an underground sexual deviant and who isn't
(hint: everyone is, of course).  It is chilling and delicious at the
same time, and while the film is a bit obtuse, lacking the
gripping/clever endings of the rest of Kubrick's repertoire, it's a
fitting end to a brilliant career in the cinema.
Director: Stanley Kubrick
Producer: Stanley Kubrick
Writer: Stanley Kubrick, Frederic Raphael
Starring: Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman, Sydney Pollack, Todd Field, Marie
Richardson, Alan Cumming, Leelee Sobieski
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Girlfight (2000)
     Enjoyed Stand and Deliver?  Well get ready to stand and deliver...
an uppercut to the jaw!  And are you prepared for a girl to come out
fighting and go toe to toe with a man?  Can this be?  Women's boxing? 
Let's get ready to rumble!
     Ahem.  Girlfight would have you believe the rather commonplace
sport of women's boxing was a freakish thing, barely known in the real
world.  Never mind that women occasionally fight on the undercard for
heavyweight title bouts.  And never mind that boxing mini-stars like Mia
St. John have graced the cover of Playboy.  No, female boxing can't be
real, despite three international federations devoted to the sport.
     But put all that aside for a moment.  What we're here for is what
all good boxing movies have to give: that Rocky feeling.  We want a
story about a hard-luck champ trying to pull himself (er, or herself) up
and out of the slums with nothing more than guts and spit.  Star
Michelle Rodriguez has plenty of both, imbuing her troubled Brooklyn
teen Diana with enough bullish spirit to dub her an instant, um,
Rockette.
     Sadly, the bulk of Girlfight is heavy on the girl, light on the
fight.  It takes 30-plus minutes before Diana ever laces up a pair of
gloves, not to mention the considerable wringing of hands over Diana's
poor school attitude, her relationship to her father (Paul Calderon),
and a strained yet totally expected romance with rising amateur boxer
Adrian (hmmmm...), played unevenly by Santiago Douglas.  Fortunately,
Rodriguez is such a scrappy charmer, she carries this picture entirely
on her muscled shoulders, and I'd be remiss not to say she deserves
early Oscar consideration.  Get her moving and she's a powerhouse, and
the film flows with her.
     The rest of the picture is not so fortunate.  While Diana's trainer
Hector (Jaime Tirelli) performs admirably in his trainer role as the
analogue of Rocky's Paulie, initially skeptical that a woman could fight
but eventually pushing her to heights, the remainder of the cast feels
plucked from, well, Brooklyn.  This lends the picture some needed street
cred (with Pulp Fiction bit player Calderon the only recognizable face
in the cast).  But it's way too much, as the overall production suffers
from an utter lack of competence in the editing department (no surprise:
Plummy Tucker, a self-indulgent John Sayles collaborator, is responsible
for the mess) and off-kilter photography that misses a lot more of the
action than it captures.
     However, easily the biggest problem with Girlfight is its length. 
At nearly two hours, the film is -- quite literally -- twice as long as
it should have been.  For comparison's sake, that's about four
full-length boxing matches.  Do the math.
     Fortunately, Theodore Shapiro's frantic piano score does a lot to
assuage the damage, livening up the atmosphere considerably despite the
pace.  The movie also manages to float (like a butterfly) around the
theme of boxing as the only way out of the hood for a lot of its
denizens, though it never quite drives home the desperation of its
characters, none of whom seem to have many genuine problems.
     Girlfight is not a bad time, to be sure, but I have to say I was
expecting something else.  Oh well.  It coulda been a contender.
Director: Karyn Kusama
Producer: Sarah Green, Martha Griffin, Maggie Renzi
Writer: Karyn Kusama
Starring: Michelle Rodriguez, Jaime Tirelli, Paul Calderon, Santiago
Douglas, Ray Santiago, Elisa Bocanegra, Shannon Walker Williams
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/girlfight/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for American Pimp (1999/I)
     Such is only one of hundreds of truly great lines in AMERICAN PIMP,
the rather self-explanatory documentary from the Hughes brothers (MENACE
II SOCIETY, DEAD PRESIDENTS).  As a documentary, PIMP displays uncommon
humor, as its over-the-top subjects probably don't realize they're being
mocked, preferring instead to bask in the limelight of the movie being
made about them.
     As expected, these guys are utter jokes, as are their "hos."
Everything you may suspect about the pimp trade, as it turns out, is
absolutely true.  They wear gold jackets with 'gator skin shoes.  They
drive Rolls Royces.  They treat their employees very badly, and they
keep all the money.
     As such, there's not a lot of insight into "pimpology," as all the
stereotypes are validated.  To be sure, the tales of Rosebudd, Fillmore
Slim, and Too $hort (among others) are worth the price of admission for
their entertainment value, but this is the same ground covered in HBO's
"Pimps Up, Ho's Down" last year.  (Also of note: the HBO documentary was
widely trashed as being phony: Not so.)
     Still, it's amazing the Hughes brothers got these stories out of
these characters.  Intercutting the film with classic 1930's-1990's
blaxploitation films and TV shows is pure genius and offers some of the
best moments in AMERICAN PIMP.  Like they say, it's all Mack.
Director: Allen Hughes, Albert Hughes
Producer: Allen Hughes, Albert Hughes, Kevin J. Messick
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
     The first film is an eye-popping, jaw-dropping action/adventure, a
study of tornadoes and the carnage they create wherever they land.  A story
of two maverick "stormchasers" who try to launch a data-gathering probe
into the heart of one of these twisters and risk life and limb in doing so.
     The second film is a lifeless character drama, a tired old story about
a couple going through a divorce, the man with his prissy wife-to-be, the
woman still pining for their old relationship.  It is also the story of a
second, group of cartoonishly "evil" stormchasers who compete to launch
their own probe into a tornado.
     The first film is fantastic.  The second film is awful.  And they are
both called TWISTER.
     Never before have I experienced a picture that could have been so good
and that had so much going for it, that blew it so badly.  TWISTER's
groundbreaking effects carry it a *long* way.  These include, but are not
limited to, a tractor dealership being sucked into the air, a semi dropped
from the sky, a house rolling across the plains (which is driven through on
its side), flying bovines, and of course, lots of faux tornadoes.  I can't
remember how many times I muttered "Oh my God..." during the screening.
(Thanks go to SPEED director Jan de Bont.)
     I likewise can't remember how many times I started to doze off during
the predictable, shopworn, boring "character development" scenes, *none* of
which are effective.  You'd think that in an hour of development, we'd
learn more about the leads, all of whom can be fully described in 15 words
or less:  Bill (Bill Paxton), leaving the stormchasing world (and his wife)
for more peaceful conditions; Jo (Helen Hunt), Bill's maniacally devoted
wife, driven to near-madness by a tornado trauma as a youth; Melissa (Jami
Gertz), Bill's hollow and uptight girlfriend (and Chicagoan Gertz looks
ridiculous made-up as a Southern belle); and Jonas (Cary Elwes), the
stormchaser who "sold out" by getting (the horror!) a corporate sponsorship
(and Brit Elwes is even more ridiculous as a Southern beau).  There's even
an Aunt Meg (Lois Smith)!  Welcome to Oz, folks.
     The film follows a pattern more predictable than a Tyson fight:  a big
tornado scene, then a boring talking scene, then a big tornado scene, then
talking...and on and on.  After two hours, the tornadoes go away and so
does the talking.  Thank God for the latter.  And fortunately, the action
scenes are much more memorable than the drama scenes, and they serve to
sway this critic into the recommend side of the ratings scale.
     Now you know what you're up against when you see the film, and like
its precursor, JURASSIC PARK, you *should* see it on the big screen, or
else you'll be wasting a video rental.  I think TWISTER might mark the
first time where the only real response the heroes have against the enemy
(the tornadoes) is to run away, and we cheer for them to do so.  It's also
the first time since HIS GIRL FRIDAY that an estranged leading couple were
so obviously perfect for each other.
     And as for tornado-knowledge, this is what I got:  if you're in a
tornado, just hold on to a big metal pole in the ground and everything will
be just fine.  Promise.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
     Yikes!  Turning the tables on political correctness, affirmative action,
and especially, the feminist movement, never seemed so fun on film!  IN THE
COMPANY OF MEN teaches you that everything you know is wrong and slaps you in
the face for enjoying it.  This phenomenal gem is, on the surface, a simple
tale about two jilted male co-workers, who, on a six-week long business trip,
decide to take revenge on all the females of the species by jointly finding a
"corn-fed" wallflower, making feel like she's a beauty queen, then dumping her
like a sack of bricks.  Hard.  Chad (Aaron Eckhart) is the smooth one.  Howard
(Matt Malloy) is a lovable Winnie the Pooh type.  Together, they're
devastating... until "the game" ends up having unpredictable effects on the
both of them, as well as Christine (Stacy Edwards), their deaf victim. 
Unpredictable and wholly unique, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN is a powerful
moviegoing experience.  Take my advice, and watch it with someone you love.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Priest (1994)
     The controversy surrounding PRIEST has been forefront in much of
the cinematic trade literature for weeks now.  Miramax, the film's
distributor, actually had the guts to release the movie, a powerful
criticism of Catholic doctrine, on Good Friday.
     PRIEST is the story of Father Greg (Linus Roachel), an idealistic
young priest in Liverpool.  The problem is that the young priest is
gay, and he's torn between his hidden, inner desires and his faith in
the church.  Add to this his mentor, Father Matthew (Tom Wilkenson), an
unconventional, karaoke-singing priest who is also breaking his vow of
celibacy, and a teen-aged girl who confesses to Father Greg the
incestuous abuse she experiences at the hands of her father.  Greg is
the victim of classic Catholic dilemmas:  whether or not to break the
seal of confession; whether or not to entertain his passion; whether or
not to remain a member of the cloth.
     The film is unrelenting in its prodding at the darker side of
religion, showing in painful detail the hypocrisy of many of its
tenets.  It's enough to make you seriously question what you think you
know, whether you're Catholic or not.
     While PRIEST is a jaw-dropper overall, it is lacking on a number
of levels that often make it frustrating.  The erratic pace of plot
development, stereotyping, and a substandard score make the film
sometimes awkward and forced.  Also, the characters seem to become
close friends (or lovers) for no reason at all.  Surprisingly, and to
much relief, PRIEST involves a huge amount of comic relief, such as a
funeral conga line, to break the omnipresent tension.
     Be warned, PRIEST is a graphic and taboo-breaking film.  It is a
forceful blow to the centuries of Catholic history, and tells a story
that is unique in every way.  Be sure you know what you're getting in
to if you go.

Title
Review for Persuasion (1995/I)
     Whew!  Sitting through 112 minutes of PERSUASION is a true
exercise in persistence.  Full of performances that could have been
done better by hand puppets, sloppy direction, and a script that's
nearly impossible to follow, PERSUASION has very little to redeem it.
     Pay close attention:  the story follows Anne Elliot (Amanda Root),
a prim and proper twenty-seven-year old in 1814 England.  Having once
turned down a proposal from Frederick Wentworth (Ciaran Hinds), he has
turned back up to try again.  Also in the picture are Anne's younger
sister Mary (Sophie Thompson), her husband (Simon Russell Beale), and
his sisters (Emma Roberts and Victoria Hamilton), both of whom
Wentworth chases after.  Not to mention Anne's cousin William (Samuel
West), who also chases after Anne in the hopes of getting his fingers
on her father's estate.  The story is based on the Jane Austen novel,
and as you hopefully can tell by this rousing description, it's about
as exciting as...a Jane Austen novel.
     To keep track of these totally bland and uninteresting blokes, the
producers were kind enough to throw in a handy genealogical chart to
help keep track of no fewer than 15 major characters.  Unfortunately,
you won't get one of these with your ticket, so you'll likely be
staring up at the screen in total confusion.  Even more unhelpful is
the costuming, of which two basic varieties are used:  male and
female.  And I've never seen so much *brown* in my life.
     Some fun costumes might have helped ease the pain of sitting
through PERSUASION, considering that all these dull people do is talk
and eat.  Amanda Root is being trumpeted by the producers as the next
Emma Thompson.  I don't think so, seeing how she spends the entire film
just gawking at things like a wide-eyed Chihuahua and then whining
about them.  Oh, and don't expect any grandiose Merchant-Ivory style
landscapes or ballrooms.  Instead, to break up the monotony of the
cramped sitting room settings, director Roger Michell opted for totally
inappropriate MTV-style moving camerawork to capture the sheer nothing
that is going on.
     I hope this is enough to dissuade you from bothering with
PERSUASION.  And I hope I'm not spoiling anything here, by giving away
the movie's final line of dialogue: "Anne?  Why would you want to
marry Anne?"  I'm still working on the answer to that one.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Blue in the Face (1995)
     It took all of five days after wrapping the shoot of SMOKE to
create BLUE IN THE FACE, an (allegedly) all-improvised follow-up to
Wayne Wang and Paul Auster's feature centered on a tiny smoke shop in
Brooklyn.  It's a weird experiment in filmmaking, studded with cameos
by Lou Reed, Madonna, Michael J. Fox, Roseanne, Lily Tomlin, and more.
Unfortunately, you've probably seen all the funniest bits in the
movie's trailer.
     Separated into segments with titles like "Brooklyn Attitude," BLUE
IN THE FACE explores the Brooklyn mystique and the Brooklyn experience
with video interviews and impromptu sketches.  Everything "Brooklyn" is
praised, from Ebbets Field and Jackie Robinson to Belgian Waffles and
the sanctity of the local cigar store.
     A lot of this is hilarious:  Reed as the smoke shop
employee/eyeglass frame inventor who's been thinking about leaving the
city for 35 years; Jim Jarmusch as Bob, who is finally giving up his
Lucky Strikes; Fox in an insanely comical turn as a spontaneous social
analyst/psychologist; Mel Gorham as Violetta, Auggie's only partially
stable girlfriend.
     Holding the craziness together (sort of) is Auggie (Harvey Keitel)
and the Brooklyn Cigar Co. where he works.  When news that the store
has been sold arrives, Auggie does his best to change the owner's
(Victor Argo) mind, culminating in the appearance of the ghost of
Jackie Robinson, who convinces him the store should stay open.
     This is not your typical Hollywood fare.  It's not typical
*anything.*  Clocking in at about 76 minutes, BLUE IN THE FACE clearly
has the look and feel of a spontaneous collection of vignettes, some of
which work, and some of which don't.  It's worthwhile for the funny
bits, and the film isn't long enough to make you lose interest when it
drags.  I suppose it did what it was supposed to do (that is, give
everyone who wasn't in SMOKE something to do for a few afternoons).
You'll have to be the judge if that was a good idea or a bad one.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
     These are words that could be used to describe the emotions of John
Sayles' characters in his latest, LIMBO.  But no, I use them to describe
myself after sitting through his latest little exercise in indie
egomania.
     I can forgive many things.  But using some hackneyed, whacked-out,
screwed-up *non*-ending on a movie is unforgivable.  I walked a
half-mile in the rain and sat through two hours of typical, plodding
Sayles melodrama to get cheated by a complete and total copout finale.
Does Sayles think he's Roger Corman?
     LIMBO is the story of a bunch of deadbeats in a small Alaskan town
who pretty much have nothing to live for, but make a go of it anyway.
These deadbeats include David Strathairn as Joe Gastineau, a washed-up
fisherman, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio as Donna, a washed-up singer, and
Vanessa Martinez as Noelle, her freakish daughter.
     LIMBO begins as light comedy, with these characters lightheartedly
interacting, and Joe and Donna slowly getting together as a couple.  But
an hour later, Joe, Donna, and Noelle decide to take a boat trip with
Joe's deadbeat drug runner of a brother, Bobby, and all hell breaks
loose, leaving them stranded on a cold and wet island off the coast of
Alaska.
     The movie then becomes THE EDGE by way of THE PIANO.  As the trio
tries to survive on nothing, we learn of this little issue of some men
who may be looking for them.  By the end, we've finally started to care
(barely) about these characters, but only after 120 minutes of babbling
and preaching.  The moment of truth arrives.  Roll credits.
     Whoops.  I'd give away the ending but I *can't.*  There is nothing
to give away because there is no ending.  Ho ho, you're supposed to
reflect on the movie and draw your own conclusions.  We're left in
`Limbo,' get it?  Screw that!  Sayles is a hack of the worst sort.
People deserve a little payoff after spending their cash and their time
on a film.  Our crowd would agree.  I've never heard such booing in a
theater in all my life.
     I was going to give LIMBO three stars.  Even though it has fifteen
minutes of a character reading aloud from a book.  Even though my butt
hurt like a nail went through it after sitting in an uncomfortable seat
for so long.  Like I said, I was going to give LIMBO three stars for
giving it the old college try.
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
     "Joey, do you like movies about gladiators?"  Hey, who doesn't!?
     The awe-inspiring trailers for Gladiator may have you dreaming of
Spartacus and Ben-Hur, but you may be surprised to find this film in
reality a less palatable mélange of Braveheart and Mad Max: Beyond
Thunderdome.  This isn't altogether a bad thing, but those expecting a
new Roman epic that will stand the test of time (like Spartacus and
Ben-Hur) are in for some surprises.
     The currently hot Russell Crowe stars as Maximus, "the general who
became a slave" who begins the film as a commander so high in the
echelons of the Roman army that the aging Caesar Marcus Aurelius
(Richard Harris) hand-picks him to become the next Caesar... instead of
his own son Commodus (not pronounced Commode-us, played by Joaquin
Phoenix).
     Joaquin Phoenix's appearance in a movie always means trouble, and
sure enough, dad is soon dead, Commodus is Emperor, and Maximus is off
to execution.  It's a roundabout road (that lasts 150 minutes) to get
from general to slave and slave to gladiator.  From there, Maximus ends
up in Rome at the Colosseum (you know: THE Colosseum), threatening to
overthrow the Emperor and return power to the Republic.  And here we
are, 1600 years before the American Revolution.
     Gladiator's finest hour comes when the gladiating begins (though
this is a good 60 minutes into the picture).  And we are talking serious
carnage.  Bloodletting.  Decapitations.  People severed in two.  Dirty
fighting.  Joey would like this movie.
     Shot in an aggressive yet vaguely annoying chop-chop style,
Gladiator borrows heavily from the camera style Spielberg used in Saving
Private Ryan's battle scenes:  Print every other frame of film twice,
and run at regular speed.  This casts everything in a dreamlike quality,
which sometimes works in the film but gets old due to overuse and
overall poor lighting.
     Then there's the chit-chat of Gladiator's "plot," a threadbare bit
of political intrigue, with Commodus worried sick about Maximus's rise
to popularity via the mob crowds at the pit, Connie Nielsen's Lucilla
(Commodus's sister), also worried sick in fear that her son will be
killed... blah blah blah.  I zoned out whenever one of these weepy
people took the stage, waiting for the fighting to start again.  You
know, with the chariots!  And the tigers!
     There's something Jerry Springeresque about Gladiator, but Crowe
lends a lot of legitimacy to the proceedings.  Less effective is
Phoenix, who invites you to believe he is an actual Emperor of Rome.
This turns out to be impossible, as Phoenix comes across as, well, River
Phoenix's little brother.  There's also the little issue that Gladiator
stretches the boundaries of "historical fiction" to new and impossible
lengths, which almost goes without saying.  Almost.
Director: Ridley Scott
Producer: David H. Franzoni, Steven Spielberg, Douglas Wick
Writer: David H. Franzoni, John Logan, William Nicholson
Starring: Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Richard Harris, Djimon
Hounsou, Tomas Arana, Spencer Treat Clark, Derek Jacobi, Ralph Moeller,
Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed
http://www.gladiator-thefilm.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Clean, Shaven (1995)
     Faster than you can say, "Toys in the attic," it becomes painfully
aware that Peter Winter (Peter Greene), the main character of Lodge
H. Kerrigan's new film, is not quite right.
     CLEAN, SHAVEN is a brief but extremely powerful look at a page from
the life of a schizophrenic who is on a quest to see his daughter who has
been taken from him.  Peter's mental illness, we discover, is a little
more than a small problem, creating in him a near-constant need to be
clean and free of body hair.  Throughout the film, Peter is constantly
shaving, in an attempt to rid himself of the "receiver and transmitter"
that he believes are housed within his body.
     Peter makes it to the village where his daughter Nicole (Jennifer
MacDonald) lives, only to find himself hunted by the police.  The reason? 
Alongside Peter's arrival in town came the slaughter of a local young
girl.  The cops figure Nicole is next.  Everyone *always* blames it on the
psychos.
     Clocking in at a spare 80 minutes, CLEAN, SHAVEN looks more like an
episode of "The X-Files" than a feature film, yet manages to pack more
punch than most films twice its length.  The feel is that of a
documentary, and the picture appears so real at times that it's hard to
remember it's a fantasy.  Kerrigan has created a creepy, disturbing, and
graphic atmosphere.  Dialogue is hardly required to get the emotions of
Peter across: you can see it in his face, and in his actions.  In fact,
Peter goes so far as to cut off his fingernail (in vivid color) in order
to get "the transmitter" out of his system.  The collective groaning in a
crowded theater must be tremendous.
     This movie is definitely not for everyone.  I'm not even sure if it's
for *anyone,* but the bottom line is that CLEAN, SHAVEN is a spectacular
example of how movies should be made.  Greene deserves an Oscar nod for
his work here, playing Peter so well as to make Norman Bates look like Mr.
Rogers.  Another hand goes to Kerrigan's direction, which plays perfectly
off of Greene's acting.
     If you go, be *sure* you know what you're getting in to.  This one is
definitely not for the faint of heart.

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
     I'll skip the cute introduction.  Let me cut to the chase and tell
you what you want to know.
     Yes, the reissue is as good as the original.  Yes, it lives up to
the greatness of the rest of the series.  Yes, the enhancements are
top-notch and they really add to the enjoyment of the film.
     What's new?  Basically three things:  A new, surprisingly funny,
song-and-dance sequence in Jabba the Hutt's palace, preceding the Jedi
knight Luke Skywalker's arrival to save his friends.  Enhanced footage
of the creature inside the sand pit, where the heroes are forced to walk
the plank at Jabba's whim.  And a new, much more satisfying ending
sequence -- showing the celebrations of victory over the Empire on
different planets throughout the galaxy, instead of the little Ewok
party on Endor.
     What's the same?  Well, the guts of this epic finale from this
terrific trilogy.  The thrill of good finally conquering evil, seeing
the upright son converting his once-lost father -- the first feel-good
sci-fi movie series ever produced.  (Never mind the still-horrendous
blue-screen footage of Luke fighting the Rancor monster in Jabba's
palace.)
     People ask me what they should go see in the theaters right now,
and I always point them to the STAR WARS trilogy.  These films
absolutely deserve another viewing on the big screen, and I just can't
push you in that direction hard enough.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
     One approaches the release of Red Planet with a singular, desperate
thought:  There is no way... it is not possible... it is
inconceivable... that Red Planet could be worse than Mission to Mars.
     Indeed, Red Planet makes for a far better film than Mission to
Mars.  While that's not saying a whole lot (since Mission currently
ranks as the worst movie I've seen all year) Red Planet is at least
competently constructed and mildly engaging, so long as you put aside
the sappy melodramatics.  Of course, this isn't that easy to do.
     A narrated prologue by Carrie-Anne Moss's Commander Kate Bowman
clues us in to some of what's ahead through its drippy introductions of
the setting and the cast.  By 2025 we've apparently destroyed the earth,
so we're getting ready to move to Mars thanks to a terraforming project
that has oxygenated the atmosphere.  Unfortunately, something seems
amiss: the sensors have vanished, and the algae they put up there seems
to have gone away.  To find out what gives, our last best hope -- a
human crew -- is sent to the planet to discover what went wrong.  And,
while 2025 is not an eco-friendly era, it is an equal-opportunity one,
and the buxom Bowman is in charge.
     Along for the ride are a rogues gallery of characters -- notably
Val Kilmer (surprisingly tame here) as the ship's mechanic and Tom
Sizemore (surprisingly lacking dialogue) as the chief scientific officer
onboard.  And then there's AMEE, a robotic CGI dog (very well-done, I
must add) ostensibly with some kind of navigation job... despite its
legacy of military programming that fundamentally makes it a deadly
weapon.  (A better recipe for trouble I can't imagine.)
     The discovery mission is soon underway, but, well, do movie space
missions ever turn out very well?  Before you know it, we're in
MacGyver-esque search-and-rescue mode after a fire hits the ship, and
most of the crew is stranded on the surface with the now-crazed robot
dog.  At this point the film unfortunately degenerates into any number
of recent space cinema entries -- take your pick from Lost in Space,
Mission to Mars, Apollo 13, or Pitch Black (though some of these are
better movies than others).  All the while we are meant to wonder, what
happened to the algae on Mars?  (Now there's something that'll get a
PG-13 audience on the edge of its seat!)
     Once we've made it this far, the movie really starts to bog down. 
Red Planet's plot holes come at you at a dizzying pace, and they can be
rather extreme.  To wit: Why isn't the off-screen murder of one
character simply heard over the other characters' headset radios?  How
does a homemade solar radio work in the dark?  How do you get sparks in
space from smashing metal?  The answers to these questions and more are
not forthcoming.
     On top of this, the weird cosmo-metaphysics espoused by Terence
Stamp's grandpa-like character ("the soul of the ship") don't make the
movie any better.  Instead, it comes across as an attempt to be like
2001: A Space Odyssey, somehow implying a greater force beyond mankind
imploring us to care for the world we have.  It comes as no small irony
that Stamp's is the first character that is gotten rid of.
     But putting the silly-talk aside, in its quest to show off its
obviously-not-really-Martian landscapes, Red Planet unfortunately misses
a big lesson that 2001 proved so very well:  Getting there can be all
the fun.  Next time Hollywood decides to take a trip in space, let's
hope they take it slow.
Director: Antony Hoffman
Producer: Bruce Berman, Mark Canton, Jorge Saralegui
Writer: Jonathan Lemkin, Channing Gibson
Starring: Val Kilmer, Tom Sizemore, Carrie-Anne Moss, Benjamin Bratt,
Simon Baker, Terence Stamp
http://www.redplanetmovie.com/cmp/redplanet.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Whatever It Takes (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Robert Strohmeyer.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/c82c9deb90bed1e3882568aa000a4c71?OpenDocument
I sat down to write this review with a gleeful sparkle in my eye,
anticipating the bitter contempt I would quickly unleash on the entire
cast and crew of Whatever It Takes, citing an array of blunders ranging
from laughable dramatic moments to a disappointingly predictable
adaptation of the already over-used plot movements of Cyrano de
Bergerac.  Then I remembered Porky's and had a change of heart.
Whatever It Takes is actually a solid pinning of the high school
romantic comedy.  There's nothing especially original about its plot or
characters, but most of its target audience won't notice.  Basically,
what we have here is the standard
boy-wants-girl-but-she's-out-of-his-league-so-his-friend-coaches-him-and-she's-gullible-enough-to-fall-for-it
picture. The twist is that this is a two-way exchange.  Ryan Woodman
(Shane West) is a supposedly geeky high school senior lusting after
popular girl Ashley Grant (Jodi Lyn O'Keefe -- She's All That).  Chris
Campbell (James Franco of Freaks and Geeks) is a dumb but popular jock
looking to bed Maggie Carter (Marla Sokoloff), the smart-but-undervalued
hottie who lives next door to Ryan.  So the two begin a completely
unsurprising story arc in which the two most prominent teenage girl
stereotypes fall for every line in the book without ever suspecting a
thing.
The interplay between Chris and Maggie is everything you might expect
and totally uninteresting.  Ryan and Ashley, on the other hand, are a
riot.  While O'Keefe's role may set the women's movement back about
twenty years as the classic self-hating bimbo, it is pretty funny to
watch.  But then again, I'm a guy.  James Franco's acting is about the
same in this picture as on Freaks and Geeks, which isn't saying a lot,
but his delivery of Chris's chauvinistic lines is believable enough.
Shane West is bland but endearing as Ryan, and Marla Sokoloff has enough
irritable spunkiness bring Maggie to life.  What really makes this film
work is the supporting cast, including Colin Hanks as the Tyler
Durden-esque prankster, Floyd.
Aside from some excruciatingly bad sharing moments between Maggie and
Ryan on their neighboring balconies, the dialog carries well throughout
the film.  Screenwriter Mark Schwahn has written some of the funniest
one-liners in a teen movie since Sixteen Candles.
All-in-all, this is not a brilliant film.  It's not even at the top of
its genre.  It's about as close a resemblance to actual teenage life as
Days of Our Lives is to the daily tribulations of the Salem elite.
While its characters and story line aren't particularly convincing, it
has heart, good humor and plenty of sex.  I expect it'll succeed with
high-schoolers in the same way American Pie and The Breakfast Club did
before it-by relying on a soundtrack.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for I Dreamed of Africa (2000)
     Kim Basinger has gone off to Africa on safari, in search of a
follow-up Oscar to the one she landed for L.A. Confidential.  Looks like
she'll be coming home empty-handed, I'm sad to say.
     Drawing comparisons to such Man vs. Nature films as Out of Africa,
A Far Off Place, and The Ghost and the Darkness, I Dreamed of Africa
tells the true story of Kuki Gallmann (Basinger), an Italian divorcee
who upends her life to move to Kenya with her second husband Paolo
(Vincent Gallo), who, ahem, dreams of buying a 100,000 acre cattle ranch
in the middle of nowhere.
     Life in Africa, Kuki finds, is hard.  Though her son Emanuele (Liam
Aiken; later Garrett Strommen) loves it, she has a tough time adapting
to the "different rhythm" of the wilderness -- mainly because that
rhythm involves fighting off elephants, snakes, lions, poachers,
bandits, bad weather, and Kuki's frou-frou mother Franca (Eva Marie
Saint, returning to the big screen).
     Kuki and Family survive one disaster after another -- until the
wilds take their toll, none of which seem to faze anyone very much.
Usually, Kuki will shed a brief tear, make a speech, and then move on
with life.  Two hours of this and the movie is over, and we've borne
witness to a largish chunk of Kuki's existence... but to what end?
Ultimately the movie becomes The Mosquito Coast, only set in Africa and
without an ending.
     I Dreamed of Africa sounds suspiciously like the adaptation of
Kuki's autobiography, which, of course, is what it is.  And as a book
adaptation, the story feels strangely abridged, as if the screenplay is
based on every other page of the book, willy-nilly.  The plot bounces
around without much cohesiveness, and few of the characters are
developed enough to become lovable.  This might all have been redeemed
if Basinger had turned in a tour de force performance, but ultimately
you don't get a real sense of what Kuki is all about.  You don't even
get a sense that Kuki is supposed to be Italian.
     In the end, we learn little more than the fact that Africa is both
beautiful and difficult.  Oddly, just like the movie.
Director: Hugh Hudson
Producer: Stanley R. Jaffe, Allyn Stewart
Writer: Paula Milne, Susan Shilliday
Starring: Kim Basinger, Vincent Pérez, Eva Marie Saint, Liam Aiken,
Garrett Stommen, Daniel Craig
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/dreamedofafrica/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
     After all that running, LOLA had better be in shape.  Indeed,
relatively unknown German filmmaker Tom Tykwer has put this film through
such an exhaustive workout that not only is it in tip top condition for
viewing, it'll leave you a little out of breath when it's over.
     A simple RASHOMON meets GO tale of a lost sack of cash and twenty
minutes to find 100,000 Deutsche Marks to replace it, RUN LOLA RUN (aka
LOLA RENNT) follows Lola (Potente), the girlfriend of a hapless guy,
Manni (Bleibtreu), a low-down on the organized crime totem pole. When
Manni foolishly leaves said cash on the subway, Lola figures it's up to
her to fix the situation before Manni does something even more stupid in
the next 20 minutes, before the appointed time for the money drop.
     So she runs.  And how.  Hatching a plan to beg her banker father
for the money, she crisscrosses Berlin on foot.  The genius of LOLA is
not the story, though.  In fact, the plot is pretty simplistic.  It's
Tykwer's use of diverting story lines and clever devices for tying up
loose threads that keep you in constant suspense and curiosity about
what he'll do next.
     Eventually, the 20 minutes run out, and through a force of will (of
sorts), Lola rewinds the clock and plays the scene out again and again 
each time with different consequences.  It's a clever thesis on the
age-old notion that minuscule differences in the way we act at a certain
point in time could have overwhelming consequences down the road.
     For intellectuals, it's a thrilling exercise.  For action- and
visual-lovers, it's pure eye candy.
http://www.lolarennt.de/ (in German)
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
     Hugh Grant hit paydirt once this summer, in NOTTING HILL.  Can he
do it again if you take away Julia Roberts?  And throw in an unlikely
comedy about murderous gangsters, an auction house, and a botched
wedding?  
     Yes he can!  MICKEY BLUE EYES, against all odds, is nothing short
of fall-down funny  on par with NOTTING HILL, SOUTH PARK, and AUSTIN
POWERS 2 as one of the best comedies of the summer.
     The plot involves Grant's milquetoast auctioneer, who, after three
months of dating, proposes to his girlfriend (Tripplehorn), whom he
doesn't realize is the daughter of a major New York Mafioso (Caan).
Hilarity ensues when the mob family tries to rein Grant in for various
money laundering schemes, dubbing him `Mickey Blue Eyes.'  Enter the
FBI, and accidental shooting, nocturnal shallow-grave burials, and a
payback/revenge scheme, and you've got some pretty weighty elements here
 but BLUE EYES usually makes the most of them all  in a comic sense,
of course.
     Don't be fooled: Grant carries this picture all by his lonesome.
Tripplehorn is fine, but uninspiring.  The mob guys are broadly drawn
stereotypes.  Caan is playing his usual tough guy and doesn't have a
whole lot of screen time.  With the exception of a few bizarre
supporting characters (see also NOTTING HILL, again), Hugh Grant owns
this show.
     And therein we see what a comic talent he really is.  Essentially,
MICKEY BLUE EYES is a fish out of water tale, only the water finds the
fish this time around.  And watching this fish squirm is one hell of a
good time.
Director: Kelly Makin
Producer: Elizabeth Hurley, Charles Mulvehill
Writer: Adam Scheinman, Robert Kuhn
Starring: James Caan, Hugh Grant, Jeanne Tripplehorn, Scott Thompson,
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Flirting with Disaster (1996)
     You know, I was in a real downer of a mood when I went to see
FLIRTING WITH DISASTER, but, incredibly, the raw comedy of this film could
only cheer me up.  And I thought I was a cynic....
     The sophomore effort of writer/director David O. Russell (whose first
film, SPANKING THE MONKEY, was a real jaw-dropper by virtue of its title
alone) is a comedy/romance that somehow captures the feel of both a home
movie and an acid trip together.  On the surface, the story of Mel Coplin
(Ben Stiller) and his search for his birth parents is a tried-and-true
tale.  In reality, FLIRTING WITH DISASTER has more twists than a French
braid and as much comedy as, well, as much brash and uncompromising comedy
as anything else has given us this year.
     Stiller is his typically wacky self but is not as overbearing as he's
been in films like IF LUCY FELL and REALITY BITES.  Instead, Stiller's
presence is deftly underplayed as he balances the performances of his
supporting stars, which include wife Patricia Arquette, Mary Tyler Moore &
George Segal as his brash adoptive parents, Richard Jenkins as a staunch
yet progressive ATF bureau employee, Alan Alda & Lily Tomlin as Mel's real
folks, and Glenn Fitzgerald as Mel's psychotic real brother.  The writing
and dialogue here are fantastic, and after a somewhat slow start,
Russell's film quickly speeds into overdrive and never lets up.
     And how can I go without mentioning co-star Ta Leoni as a
drool-inducing homewrecker/adoption agency employee who all but steals the
show?  I can't!  Leoni is nothing short of fantastic here, and I'm so
enthralled with her graces that I'd probably watch two hours of her doing
her laundry.
     Russell's greatest achievement with FLIRTING WITH DISASTER is his
ability to draw us into the tale he is weaving, to make a fresh and
outrageous film that is completely believable and, incredibly, ethically
upstanding by its end.  It's also a pleasant reminder that, hey, no matter
how miserable you are, it really could be a lot worse...and it could turn
out for the best.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Clueless (1995)
     Oh, how the mighty have fallen.  Amy Heckerling, director of the
now-classic FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH, after free-falling through
LOOK WHO'S TALKING and its (first) sequel, has turned in an
unquestionably dismal look at the wealthy teen's life in the mid-90's.
     But this ain't no 90210.  Starring Alicia Silverstone and a gaggle
of talentless teen actors and actresses, the title of CLUELESS is
perfect Truth in Advertising.  Told as a "This is my life" from rich
kid Cher (Silverstone), the film follows the socialite through her
daily ritual--schmoozing for better grades, applying makeup, leading on
boys, and generally being a snob (but proud of it).  Flat jokes abound;
the laughs are *at* the cast, not with them.
     I don't know that I was expecting a lot from Silverstone.  With
her track record, CLUELESS is actually one of the better entries.  Of
course, this role isn't much of a stretch for Aerosmith's moll.  With
dialogue like "You know ... stuff!" Silverstone really seems to find
herself at home.  Maybe I just didn't get it because I'm not a
17-year-old girl living in Beverly Hills.
     There's simply not much else to be said about CLUELESS.  My
prevailing thought during the film was "How long have I actually been
watching this hideous movie?"  The answer?  Forever and ever.  Even
traditionally classic comedians like Wallace Shawn and Julie Brown
(plus about 50 pounds) are given dull parts and little screen time.  A
more unnecessary film hasn't been made this year.
     Maybe I would have liked it better if it had been in focus.  Well,
probably not.

Title
Review for Kiss of Death (1995)
     Ever get the feeling that no matter what you do, you're screwed? 
That basically sums up the life of Jimmy Kilmartin (David Caruso), an
ex-con trying to go straight in the new feature, KISS OF DEATH.
     Jimmy, his wife Bev (Helen Hunt), and their daughter live an
inner-city dream, trying to make ends meet.  When Jimmy's cousin Ronnie
(ZEBRAHEAD's Michael Rapaport) shows up, begging for a driver for his chop
shop caravan, all hell breaks loose.  Jimmy is busted, and his descent
back into the pit of crime, prison, betrayal, and the government begins. 
Soon, Jimmy and his family are hounded by cop Calvin (Samuel L. Jackson),
asthmatic psycho kingpin Little Junior (Nicholas Cage), and a host of
other unsavory players.  We are invited to watch and see how Jimmy
extricates himself from the mess.
     As you may well expect, KISS OF DEATH is loaded with violence.  I
didn't expect it to be so funny, though.  It's worth the price of
admission just for a certain hilarious twist in Little Junior's strip
joint.  Cage's Junior gets all the best lines, but Caruso owns the picture
with his dynamic and striking portrayal of a man with a past and little
hope for a future.
     On the minus side, director Barbet Schroeder flubbed the first
half-hour of the picture, which deals with the dull tale of Jimmy vs.
Ronnie, before the guts of the action, Jimmy vs. Junior, begins.  Hunt's
talent is wasted as Jimmy's estranged wife, and it appears that a big
chunk of her screen time was left on the cutting room floor.  PULP
FICTION's Ving Rhames also has a few great lines as another deviant
could-be criminal but is otherwise squandered.
     Despite all that, once you cross that half-hour hurdle, KISS OF DEATH
becomes a powerful thriller not quite like anything I've seen recently. 
Nothing too original or flashy, just a gritty story that rings completely
true.

Title
Review for Total Eclipse (1995)
     Picture this:  A movie about two 19th century French poets.  How
does that sound?  It sounds like a bad idea because it *is* a bad
idea.
     It's a worse idea than the talent in this picture would probably
care to admit to.  Leonardo DiCaprio stars in yet another
true-story-about-poets movie this year, following up his excellent
portrayal of teenage wacko Jim Carroll in THE BASKETBALL DIARIES with
one of even more wacko teenager Arthur Rimbaud in TOTAL ECLIPSE.  David
Thewlis (NAKED) is Paul Verlaine, a slightly older poet who becomes
entranced with Rimbaud, who returns his affections with little more
than scorn and physical abuse.  Verlaine in turn passes this abuse on
to his pregnant wife, Mathilde (Romane Bohringer).
     Verlaine tries to get inside Rimbaud's skin, ostensibly to make
himself a better poet, and the film spends inordinate amounts of time
following their misadventures:  Verlaine and Rimbaud crash a party;
Verlaine and Rimbaud frolic in a field; Verlaine and Rimbaud frolic on
the street; Verlaine and Rimbaud frolic on a beach.  Are you still
awake?
     Rimbaud ends up converting Verlaine from a mild-mannered gentleman
into a certifiable nut bar.  And for some reason, they keep stabbing
and shooting each other when they aren't drinking absinthe to excess.
In the end, the movie is a nearly unwatchable look at a couple of
people who we don't understand any better by the time the film is
over.  In other words:  a complete waste of time.
     It wouldn't have been so bad if there was a speck of likeability
in any of these characters, but they are so disgusting and crass, I
just wanted to leave the theater halfway through.  But I didn't.
Instead, I stuck it out to see if some big payoff awaited me for wading
through the 110 minutes of boredom, but alas there was none.  I was
afraid the movie was never going to end with its drawn-out, weepy,
melodramatic finale.  Boo hoo.
     Director Agnieszka Holland has a bad habit of making either really
good movies (EUROPA, EUROPA) or really bad ones (OLIVIER, OLIVIER).
TOTAL ECLIPSE is her worst, with the stylistic direction earning the
film its 1/2 star.  That's being generous.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for City Hall (1996)
     There's two things I dislike:  politics and long, boring speeches. 
CITY HALL has plenty of both, and while Al Pacino is almost cool enough to
make me think politics can be okay, it's got so many long speeches that I
started looking for the remote control after the third or fourth one.
     CITY HALL is a drama/thriller with most of the thrill sucked out of
it.  After a ridiculously convoluted opening, filled with the weak
voice-over of the Deputy Mayor of New York City, Kevin Calhoun (John
Cusack), we find ourselves embroiled in the world of Mayor John Pappas
(Pacino).  As the film opens, we find a cop and mobster killed in a
shoot-out, taking with them the life of a six-year old boy.
     The ensuing investigation turns up evidence of corruption in the
judicial system, focusing on Judge Walter Stern (Martin Landau, whose
talents are wasted here) and in politics, with show tune-singing official
Frank Anselmo (Danny Aiello) under the gun.  Helping Calhoun in his
inquiries is attorney Marybeth Cogan (Bridget Fonda, also wasted, but with
a cool haircut)--with whom he develops the requisite love interest.
     CITY HALL has all the elements of a great film except one:  *a
script.*  Four writers worked on the film, and that was obviously three
too many.  As a result, the storyline is completely limp.  There's no
suspense at all, and you'll see the one measly plot twist coming a mile
away (not that it makes any sense, just that it's obvious).
     And oddly, the remainder of the film is superbly crafted.  The
ensemble cast is nearly flawless, especially Cusack as the go-for-it
right-hand man who has no life outside the Mayor's Office.  And after
almost two hours, Al Pacino really *is* the Mayor of NYC.  The cityscapes
of New York are awesome on the big screen, as well, and the witty humor
that punctuates the film does a good job at relieving the tedium from
watching the film's lifeless story.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Time to Kill, A (1996)
     Remember the hoopla over the novel "A Time To Kill"?  It was
celebrated author John Grisham's second book -- actually his *first* book
-- the book he published after "The Firm" became a hit.  The book that no
one wanted before he was famous.  The book, apparently, that, if it hadn't
had his name on it, would never have been published.
     Now it's the fourth Grisham movie to be made, continuing in grand
fashion that franchise of increasingly average film versions of his
increasingly average writing.
     In fact, A TIME TO KILL is the *most* average of all of these films,
and it hinges on two vital elements:  if you take a book written by John
Grisham and throw in Sandra Bullock in a see-thru tank top, you've got
yourself a hit!  And the producers are probably right.
     The story is so simple it barely merits retelling here:  A young girl
is raped.  Her father, Carl Lee Hailey (Samuel L. Jackson), faster than you
can yell "Oswald!", murders the two rednecks responsible.  Young upstart
lawyer Jake Brigance (Matthew McConaughey, playing the most-pumped-up
lawyer of all time) defends him, with a little pro bono help (if you catch
my drift) from Ellen Roark (the tank-topped Bullock).  Bad guy Rufus
Buckley (Kevin Spacey) prosecutes.  And good ol' boy Judge Noose (get it?)
(Patrick McGoohan) presides.
     Never has a 145 minute film been less thrilling and more predictable.
>From a continuity standpoint, it makes absolute perfect sense why each
scene follows another.  From an audience standpoint, this is *terribly*
boring.  Sure, A TIME TO KILL has some frightening imagery (particularly of
the KKK uprising) and some great speeches (Brigance's closing argument
brings everyone on the screen to tears, and probably some of the audience,
too), but you can't overcome a limp plot with that stuff.
     I suppose that's where Bullock's clothing comes in.  And another thing
-- why is everyone so *sweaty* in every scene?  I know this is the deep
South, but they do have air-conditioning in Mississippi, don't they?  And
why doesn't Brigance ever light his cigar?  Little questions... but
annoying ones.
     Who knows the answers?  Who cares?  Fine performances all around,
typical Joel Schumacher direction, and a nice analysis of Southern race
relations make for a movie that is simply indescribable as anything other
than...
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
     Every year like clockwork there's a film that tries to intertwine a
dozen characters into one monster story: SHORT CUTS (1993), TWENTY BUCKS
(1993), PULP FICTION (1994), 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY (1996), to name but a
few.  1998's entry crept in under the wire: PLAYING BY HEART... and it's
finally in wide release.
     Now on its third (and worst) title in as many months, HEART follows
about a dozen Los Angelenos en route to love and/or misery.  Among them
are Anderson and Stewart as a couple of silly/wacky would-be lovers;
club kids Jolie and Phillippe; ice queen Stowe (having an affair with
Edwards); and wedded veterans Rowlands and Connery.
     The script relies on two things: making you think hard about how
all these people fit together (it's actually quite obvious after 30
minutes, though most of the half-wits in my audience were vocalizing
"Hmmmm..." and "OH!" frequently).  Second, of course, is MAKING YOU
CRY.  Trying to, anyway.  If you're like my wife, the touching poetry
read by Burstyn to dying son Mohr will have you all aflutter.  If you're
like me, you'll think it's cute but overbearingly manipulative.  Perhaps
that's why 85 percent of our audience was female....
     None of this is meant to say that PLAYING BY HEART is a bad film. 
It's actually pretty funny, and while some actors (Anderson, Jolie,
Stewart) are better than others (Mohr--beyond over the top), and some
are just plain bizarre (Quaid), the film works well as a whole and is
lively from start to finish.  Hell, I can't imagine any other director
getting Connery to do an impression of a slobbering lap dog (really).
     While most other intricate follow-the-plot movies do it better,
HEART is one that's worth a look, especially if you're into that weepy
sorta thing.
Director: Willard Carroll
Producer: Willard Carroll, Meg Liberman, Thomas L. Wilhite
Writer: Willard Carroll
Starring: Gillian Anderson, Ellen Burstyn, Sean Connery, Anthony
Edwards, Angelina Jolie, Jay Mohr, Ryan Phillippe, Dennis Quaid, Gena
Rowlands, Jon Stewart, Madeleine Stowe
http://www.miramax.com:8888/mm_front/owa/mp.entryPoint?action=1&midStr=969
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Diabolique (1996)
     I've been awaiting this update of the 1955 classic French thriller
with a mixture of nervous anticipation and deep-seated dread.  The
original DIABOLIQUE was one of the few examples of how thrillers ought to
be made...and I figured Hollywood would find some way to screw up the
remake.  (They did, of course.)
     The story is timeless.  Evil boarding school principal Guy (Chazz
Palmenteri) is married to ex-nun Mia (Isabelle Adjani), a nervous "child
bride" with a penchant for heart medication.  Guy also has at least one
mistress, the cold-as-ice Nicole (Sharon Stone), and everyone knows of and
quietly accepts the affair.  They all work and live under the auspices of
the school, and in the darkness of its halls, a plot is hatched by Mia and
Nicole to do away with Guy for good.  It starts to get a little hairy
when, after a seemingly perfect murder is pulled off, things start to seem
not-so-perfect and questions over potential witnesses and the actual
life-or-death-ness of Guy begin to surface.
     As it turns out, my skepticism that DIABOLIQUE could be successfully
Americanized and transplanted into the future 40 years was partly
unfounded.  While it retains a distinctly nostalgic look and feel, the
update is mostly a seamless job.  Stone pulls off an excellently icy
performance, reminding us why audiences like her so much, and Adjani,
while maintaining a look of total surprise on her face for the whole film,
is too innocently cute to think anything ill of.  Pieces of DIABOLOQUE are
stylish and cool, even bordering on edge-of-your-seat suspense at times.
     Then come the problems.  Enter Kathy Bates, whose philosophy about
acting is "More is Better," as an obnoxious investigator who really gets
on your nerves.  Add Palmenteri's just-like-I-did-in-JADE performance and
you've got a mixed-quality picture already.  The kicker is the pasted-in
additions to the script, as writer Don Roos just couldn't leave the
original alone, adding in some long and uninteresting expository scenes,
some silly high-tech bits, and, the worst of all, a new, schlocky
horror-style ending.  With all this, the picture starts to seriously fray
around the edges.
     What this all ends up with is some good performances and some bad
ones in an uneven film with some high points and some low ones.  The
remake ends up nowhere near the mastery of the original, which *still*
ought to surprise you even after you watch the 1996 version.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for X (1996)
An old Japanese Anime pic gets new life (and English dialogue) in time
for its rerelease in the states.  Anime fans will no doubt be thrilled
by the movie, but many of my fellow moviegoers will likely echo my
overall opinion about X: It just doesn't make any sense.
>From what I can put together, the story is this.  The world is ending,
and one man must destroy one of the Dragons that are warring over the
world.  Should he destroy the Dragons of the Earth or the Dragons of the
Heaven?  Destroying Earth will destroy earth.  Destroying Heaven will
keep the earth intact.  Two buxom sisters predict (and seek) opposite
outcomes.  And our hero is wooed by each sister.
Lots of flying around and stabbing people with swords and energy blasts
ensues, and Tokyo is ground zero for their fight.  Much of Tokyo gets
destroyed anyway during the epic battle (buildings collapse, the subway
is demolished, etc.), but oddly, no one seems to mind much.  Near the
end of the film, there's very little evidence of any battle at all.
X contains a few moments of haunting beauty, separated by long,
drawn-out scenes of exposition that only confuse the plot even further.
The animation is spotty at best.  It seems much effort has gone into
making a few choice scenes perfect, which the rest languishes in
lifeless backdrops upon which to kill the supporting cast in fountains
of blood.

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
     With the long-awaited release of M. Night Shyamalan's Unbreakable,
the moviegoing world has one question on its mind: will it be
unexpectedly great like his last film The Sixth Sense, or will it
unexpectedly suck eggs like his first film Wide Awake?
     Sadly, the answer is neither, though an overexcited populace
spoon-fed on a year's worth of hype is likely to lean toward the latter
owing to severe disappointment.  It's hard to blame them.
     This time out we're back to gloomy Philadelphia in a story about
one David Dunne (Bruce Willis), a security guard who wakes up after a
catastrophic train wreck to discover he is the sole survivor of the
crash, with nary a scratch on his body.  The next day David finds a
cryptic note on his windshield, leading him to the Biblically-inspired
Elijah Price (Samuel L. Jackson), a comic book dealer with a fragile
bone disease that has crippled him.  Elijah tries to convince David that
he is possessed of superhuman strength and is, as the title suggests,
"unbreakable."
     David pooh-poohs the idea, but slowly he begins to accept the
possibility that, yes, he can't be hurt, but he can lose his hair.  Will
Bruce become our first major superhero with male pattern baldness?
     At this point, Unbreakable had me (and likely everyone else)
wondering if I was in the right movie.  From the trailers and the
advance press, wasn't this supposed to be some kind of metaphysical
exploration of the meaning of life and death, about how a man learned
some secret of the universe that's eluded us for all these years,
perhaps, all due to a fluke train crash?  What the hell, we ask, is all
this superhero crap?
     Putting the story aside for a moment, Unbreakable is extremely
competent in the hands of its crew, coming together on a slow burn as
bit by bit of the story is revealed, just like in The Sixth Sense. 
Sure, it's a little overindulgent, as every other scene is photographed
upside-down, reflected in a TV, or some other such trickery, but it
keeps you interested in watching (and the superhero zaniness may incline
you otherwise).
     And just as you're about to get sucked in, there goes Jackson,
being forced as if at knifepoint to utter lines like, "It's like
kryptonite," with total seriousness.  The mind begins to reel.  The
movie begins to suffer.  And even a now-trademark M. Night Big Plot
Twist At The End won't change your mind.  (Overheard from one Disney
publicist during the screening: "It's one of those movies that grows on
you."  We'll see.)
     Ultimately, Unbreakable is an extremely charming and well-produced
film about something that's so silly and unbelievable it makes you
wonder why people went to all the trouble to put it together.  But
ironically, Unbreakable could have worked extremely well as a real
superhero movie.  Say you change the title to The Protector and make it
the story of a regular guy who suddenly finds out he's a superhero, and
get rid of all the overwrought train crashes and such.
     Or better yet, make it a movie called Unbreakable, and it's about a
guy who learns the meaning of life and death... some secret of the
universe that's eluded us for all these years.
Director: M. Night Shyamalan
Producer: Barry Mendel, Sam Mercer, M. Night Shyamalan
Writer: M. Night Shyamalan
Starring: Bruce Willis, Samuel L. Jackson, Robin Wright, Spencer Treat
Clark
http://studio.go.com/movies/unbreakable/intro.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
     MISSION TO MARS starts out with so much promise, it's hard to
believe it could be anything but successful.  The film has already taken
a lot of flack for appearing to be a ripoff of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY,
but maybe, I thought, it would transcend Kubrick's early sci-fi drama
and put a new spin on things.  Maybe blend it with a little ARMAGEDDON -
you know, do the space movie right for once.
     In 2020, the first manned mission to Mars is about to launch.
Under the command of Luke Graham (Don Cheadle), the craft lands without
a hitch, and within days they've made a startling discovery.  A little
radar probing turns up a strange metal just under the surface of Mars,
and a mysterious disaster quickly wipes out the crew.
     Enter Commander Woody Blake (Tim Robbins), his wife Terri (Connie
Nielsen), co-pilot Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), and goofy scientist Phil
Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell), and it's rescue time: ARMAGEDDON, full
throttle.
     Uh-oh, problems on the rescue ship.  Now it's time for some APOLLO
13 action.  Tense drama ensues, which isn't half bad.  But things don't
turn out so hot, and just as quickly we're thrown into a space ROBINSON
CRUSOE.
     With a handful of survivors on the red planet, they figure they'll
do a bit of investigating since, you know, they're *there* and all.  In
a matter of hours, McConnell's got the secrets figured out and *wham!*
we're into CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND.  (Here's a hint straight
from the movie's dialogue: "They are us.  We are them."  Yes, I'm
serious.)
     Which takes us straight into CONTACT, and from there we degenerate
into every bad Disney movie ever made.  From the god-awful organ
soundtrack alone, you'll think you've landed dead smack in the middle of
THE LITTLE MERMAID.  But in space.
     If my rampant sarcasm hasn't clued you in yet, MISSION TO MARS is
so unredeemably bad it drew ribald laughter during its Seriously
Dramatic Moments and horrendous booing over the closing credits.  The
acting is so wooden it might as well have been performed by
marionettes.  The script is so awful I have trouble believing it was not
written by primates.
     The unintentional humor in MISSION TO MARS can certainly make for a
lively time at the movie theater, but it's hardly a reason to pay money
to watch this disaster on celluloid.  If Disney wanted to make this a
comedy, they should have taken this advice:  Try casting Mike Myers,
Eddie Murphy, Janeane Garofalo, and Jason Alexander as our space
heroes.  Now *that* would be a mission to Mars.
Director: Brian De Palma
Producer: Tom Jacobson
Writer: Jim Thomas, John Thomas, Graham Yost
Starring: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O'Connell, Kim
Delaney, Tim Robbins
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Showgirls (1995)
     What is Joe Eszterhas going to do *now?*  First came FLASHDANCE.
Then he shocked us with BASIC INSTINCT.  Now he writes SHOWGIRLS, an
ultra-explicit NC-17 drama about a Las Vegas showgirl who goes from
nobody to "Goddess" by playing the Power Game better than everyone
else.
     No longer the innocent wallflower from "Saved By the Bell,"
Elizabeth Berkley has been transformed (by an excellent plastic
surgeon) into Nomi Malone, a sexy vamp who is nothing but trouble.
This role is going to haunt Berkley for the rest of her life, if not
longer, largely due to the fact that she is pretty much naked in every
scene.  We're talking "Totally Nude," no holds barred.  And not just
Berkley, there's a whole harem of strippers to support her.  They
parade around in their scanties so much (and so well) that it's pretty
easy to forget about little details like plot, acting, and character
development.
     But at least these things exist in SHOWGIRLS.  The plot is typical
Eszterhas:  Nomi has a shady past and wants to start over.  A whole
bunch of slimy guys get in her way.  And Eszterhas is never one to
forget to throw in a little lesbian subplot (in this case, with Gina
Gershon, as Nomi's arch-rival Cristal).  The acting is as much as one
can expect from essentially two-dimensional characters, most of which
are carbon copies of each other.  Thankfully, Nomi holds our attention
well, and while Berkley hams up the role to an extreme, she's still
interesting to watch.  For Nomi, *everything* is a show.
     The setting really makes this film worthwhile.  Director Paul
Verhoeven (TOTAL RECALL) slices open the underbelly of Sin City for all
to see, getting behind the scenes and facades of the big casinos by
taking us directly into the action.  We're on the stage when Nomi makes
her big entrances; everything is raw and vivid.  There's no sense of
"seduction across a crowded room."  It's laid out in Technicolor
through a two word image:  pure lust.
     The dance numbers are truly incredible--this is *not* FAME.  Your
$6.50 movie ticket will get you admission to a good half dozen shows
during the course of the film.  That's a lot cheaper than Vegas.
     In closing, I feel compelled to say something meaningful about
gratuitous nudity and sex in American cinema, but I won't.  Yes, it's
extreme, but this story really won't work any other way.  (And after 45
minutes, you really don't notice any more.)  I'm glad the creators
fought to keep it this way, and I applaud the risks they took to get it
on the screen.  It's a rough world out there, especially in Vegas, and
it's a full-sensory experience that simply can't be censored.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter & Novelist
-Contributing Editor, Mike's FEEDBACK  /  Film Critic, Texas Business Weekly
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Permanent Midnight (1998)
     Well, there's nothing like missing a fad by a few years to show how
*really* behind the curve you are.  PERMANENT MIDNIGHT, the new film about
the rise and fall... well, mostly the fall... of TV writer Jerry Stahl
should prove to be the final nail in the short-lived, and now
painful-to-watch, genre: the drug movie.
     Perhaps best known as the chief influence behind the TV show "ALF,"
MIDNIGHT is a simplistic retelling of Stahl's tell-all autobiography.  Ben
Stiller, the only remotely passable part of this film, plays Stahl with
gusto, but twenty minutes of Stiller going berserk as a strung-out junkie
are more than enough.
     Sadly, that's all this movie is: a whopping 85 minutes of Stiller on
heroin.  There's precious little about his life before or after his
addiction.  It's just a few pages out of the life of a junkie.  And I
couldn't have cared less.  Plot development?  Ha!  First-time director Veloz
obviously feels it's beneath him.
     Maybe the worst part of MIDNIGHT is that it's told completely in
flashback, as Stahl reminisces to some blonde girl who picks him up at a
fast food joint.  Played by Maria Bello, this outta-nowhere character is so
devoid of, well, of *anything* that my cat could have played her with the
same conviction.  Bello had best start rethinking that "ER" departure,
*pronto*.
     I won't waste any more time droning about how bad PERMANENT MIDNIGHT
is.  But I will say one thing: at least it explains a lot about "ALF."
http://www.permanentmidnight.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Dragonheart (1996)
     Trying as hard as possible to be BRAVEHEART with a dragon (hell, look
at the title!), DRAGONHEART is a pretty dismal affair, punctuated by a
couple of good performances, a show-stealing computer-generated dragon
(with a heart of gold), and a really, really hackneyed story line.
     The story line in question is this:  young Einon (Lee Oakes) is heir
to the throne in 982 A.D. England.  His mentor is Bowen (Dennis Quaid), who
tries to teach him "the Old Code" of honor and knighthood.  When the King
dies, Einon suddenly finds himself the ruler of England, but not before a
nearly-fatal wound.  Mom (Julie Christie) is quick to the rescue...
suggesting that the dragon on the hill (voice:  Sean Connery) can heal him.
He does, by giving him half of his heart.  Stop laughing; there's more.
     Well, Einon (now David Thewlis) grows up to be a real jerk and Bowen
blames the dragon for this.  He sets out on a quest to kill all the dragons
in the land and almost succeeds.  When he meets one last dragon many years
later, they, well, they become friends.  And then they overthrow the bad
king, and there are some more silly things that happen... but basically
this is just a story about a dragon.
     The good things in DRAGONHEART are rather hard to come by.  A number
of scenes are genuinely exciting.  Pete Postlethwaite as a wayward monk is
the most fun of all the characters.  And regular readers will understand
why Dina Meyer's crimson-haired sidekick character earns my special praise
as well.  But of course, the only *real* reason to see the film is Draco,
the animated dragon.  He's not quite Puff... but he kicks a lot of ass.
     Then again, that may not be such a good reason at all.  It's really
hard to get excited about computer-generated effects these days, especially
when they are used in place of a decent story.  The really dumb script just
kills this picture.  For example:  the prince is such a jerk, I was ready
to kill him in the opening scene; Bowen's hatred of dragons is about the
most irrational thing in the world; can you imagine a dragon using the word
"Yikes?"; Bowen is essentially indestructible; how many dragons have a
voice like Sean Connery anyway--I think Bowen would be able to recognize
him by that alone; and much, much more!
     DRAGONHEART also manages to pack every fantasy movie clich=E9 in the
world into the picture, from the big scene teaching the villagers how to
fight to the damsel in distress to the big mano a mano duel at the end.
The only original take on any of this is Draco running amok in the scenes.
Add to that an finale that's supposed to be touching but turns out to be
just plain goofy, and you've got an enormous mess on your hands.
     The tagline to this film is, "You will believe."  Insert your own joke
here.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Love & Sex (2000)
     But fear not the women's romantic comedy, gentle readers.  While
Love & Sex won't win any Oscars or many hearts, it's a capable movie
worth a chuckle or two.
     Famke Janssen (recently seen in X-Men) stars as Kate, a somewhat
hapless fashion-rag journalist looking for love in the big city of Los
Angeles.  Only she's "complicated," - and not to mention, like, eight
feet tall - so no guy "understands" her.  That is, except for artist
Adam (Swingers' Jon Favreau), a sort of L.A. version of a Woody Allen
neurotic, the kind of guy who obsesses over a woman, jumps out of the
relationship when it slows down, and of course immediately regrets his
decision.  Adam's stalker-like behavior with Kate becomes a focus for
the film, with the pair meeting periodically to tear out their
respective hair.
     First-time writer/director Valerie Breiman has made an often funny
but always scattered picture in Love & Sex.  Kate's endless
quest-for-love saga is pretty obviously drawn from Breiman's own life,
which probably explains why the movie is all over the map:  She's just
giving us the high points, the ones that might make for good jokes.
     To bad for Janssen that Favreau gets all the good lines. 
Singlehandedly he makes Love & Sex watchable, carrying it through the
rocky comic moments (first date, strip tease, etc.) and past the few
dramatic cliches these movies always seem to have (hint: she's
pregnant).  For her part, Janssen looks so much like Sandra Bullock in
this movie that it's disturbing.
     Fortunately, Janssen and Favreau have enough chemistry to mostly
carry Love & Sex through its rocky moments... of which, there are quite
a few.
Director: Valerie Breiman
Producer: Timothy Scott Bogart, Martin J. Barab, Brad Wyman, Mark Damon
Writer: Valerie Breiman
Starring: Famke Janssen, Jon Favreau, Noah Emmerich, Cheri Oteri, Ann
Magnuson
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Primal Fear (1996)
     It's been a long time since a *really* bad movie has come down the
pike, but it had to happen eventually.  This time up, it's PRIMAL FEAR,
yet another badly-titled Richard Gere-as-a-lawyer flick that will keep you
groaning in your seat when you aren't busy laughing at the unintentional
humor.
     If you had the misfortune of seeing Gere in 1992's FINAL ANALYSIS,
you'll be familiar with the setup.  Gere plays Martin Vail, a
self-described bigshot defense attorney in Chicago.  Laura Linney is Janet
Venable, a crass and unlikable public prosecutor, who spends most of the
film developing her primary character trait:  being a bitch.  Aaron
Stampler (Edward Norton) is who the lawyers fighting over (when they
aren't rehashing their 6 month-long affair), because it turns out that
Aaron butchered the local Archbishop.  Maybe.
     And before you can say "O.J." the oh-so-exciting plot twists start
coming, and these include but are not limited to multiple personalities,
malingering, a pedophilic porn video, and corruption in the church and
city officials.  Most of it is a wild goose chase.  All of it is idiotic. 
And worst of all, it goes on *forever.*
     What makes PRIMAL FEAR so bad?  The plot is stupid.  The characters
are plastic and all of them are loathsome, from the victim to the killer
to the lawyers and even to the judge (played horribly by Alfre Woodard). 
The dialogue is ridiculous, especially in the big courtroom scenes.  Hell,
even the ill-fitting *costumes* are bad!
     The only redeeming feature of the picture is PRIMAL FEAR's campy and
unmeant hilarity (which starts with the title of the film), but that isn't
saying a whole lot.  In the end, all I can say about PRIMAL FEAR is this: 
be afraid.  Be very afraid.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Bottle Rocket (1996)
     The moment you know that Dignan's really lost it is during the trio's
getaway from a not-so-daring bookstore robbery, when he excitedly states,
"We're heading back to Bob's, we're gonna split up the loot, and go on the
lam!"
     In this hilarious first feature from director Wes Anderson and
screenwriter Owen Wilson, a trio of young men with questionable work
ethics try in vain to become hardened criminals.  Anthony (Owen's brother
Andrew Wilson) has just "escaped" from a voluntary mental hospital with
the help of old pal Dignan (Owen), a neo-manic-depressive who's mapped out
his life with felt-tip pen in a 75-year plan.  Bob (Bob Musgrave) is the
group's timid getaway driver whose main qualification is that he owns a
car.
     After a practice robbery on Anthony's Dallas house, the plans for the
first big score, a strip center bookstore, are put into action.  With
literally *hundreds* of dollars, the men then find their way to a
middle-of-nowhere motel, planning to return for the job that will launch
them to the Big Time:  robbing a cold storage center.
     Filmed by Texans in Texas, BOTTLE ROCKET is a surprisingly funny look
at childish obsessions and "growing up" as a twentysomething.  Wilson's
dialogue is maddeningly comical and oddly realistic--we've all had a
friend like Dignan who doesn't quite have all his screws in.  The
performances by the principal actors are dead-on, too.  Throw in a
supporting role by James Caan (his best since HONEYMOON IN VEGAS) and a
bizarre final heist, and you've got yourself a pretty good film.
     The only time the movie is derailed is during an ill-thought-out love
sequence with a motel housekeeper (Lumi Cavazos).  It doesn't really seem
to belong in this picture, but at least it's somewhat entertaining.  The
picture's selection of music is a very unconventional one, too, and while
it's somewhat refreshing in its difference, it can also be distracting.
     Details aside, I recommend BOTTLE ROCKET to anyone who enjoyed last
year's THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN.  And while not the unequivocal success the
latter film was, BOTTLE ROCKET is still a phenomenal ride that manages to
be consistently funny, without once resorting to someone being struck in
the groin.
     *** Watch for an exclusive interview with the filmmakers at
http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/! ***
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Frighteners, The (1996)
     GHOSTBUSTERS meets TWIN PEAKS?  Michael J. Fox's comeback movie?  A
film about a lazy guy who catches ghosts for a living?  A supporting cast
of unknowns?  Does anyone want to see a movie like this?
     *Yes!*  And you'd better get to the theater quick, because THE
FRIGHTENERS, in a manner suggested be the above questions, will not make
huge waves at the box office in a crowded field of summer blockbusters.
     Nevertheless, THE FRIGHTENERS is one of those gems that deserves to be
seen for its fresh and funny approach to the horror genre.  Peter Jackson,
writer-director and master of schlock, is behind the camera for the first
time since 1994's HEAVENLY CREATURES.  His tale this time is most simply
described as... GHOSTBUSTERS meets TWIN PEAKS.
     It all starts with spirit-chaser Frank Bannister (Fox), whom everyone
thinks is a con-man except for the unhappy Lucy (Trini Alvarado).  And when
people suddenly start turning up mysteriously dead in the town of
Fairwater, Frank becomes Suspect #1.  While the cops and feds come after
him, Frank starts a witch hunt of his own, chasing a Grim Reaper-type
character who is really responsible.  Meanwhile, Frank's spiritual friends
come to his aid.
     No, the one-paragraph description doesn't do it justice, but trust me,
after 30 minutes of rough exposition, Jackson hits his stride, even if it
doesn't make a whole lot of sense until 10 minutes from the end.  No
matter, because the payoff is worth it, and along the way we are treated to
the end-result of the morphing effects Jackson began meddling with in
HEAVENLY CREATURES.
     Even better is a performance by co-star Alvarado, who steals the show
from Fox *and* the ghosts (not an easy feat) with her graceful beauty and
excellent acting ability.  If I were a studio exec, I'd be throwing lots
and lots of money at her right now, because this girl (who most recently
appeared in LITTLE WOMEN, is going to be a star.  I have to admire
Jackson's casting ability -- after all, he discovered Kate Winslet for
HEAVENLY, now Alvarado... who's next?  (Me!)
     And my gushing about fair Trini is not to detract from Fox or the
other co-stars, the most notable of which are R. Lee Ermey, recreating (as
a ghost) his sergeant role from FULL METAL JACKET, and Jeffrey Combs (yes,
THE RE-ANIMATOR himself), as the most twisted FBI agent you'll ever see on
film.
     Jackson's innovative use of flashback and humor overcome the script's
shortcomings and some surprisingly bad (and annoying) voice dubbing, but
only if you give the film a chance to pick up some steam.  Early judges
will not be pleased.  Jackson's fans will be elated.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
     What has Mr. T been doing for all these years since The A-Team? 
Well, he's been hard at work in medical school, obviously, and now he's
Dallas's most sought-after OB/GYN!
     We were admonished by a studio rep at the beginning of Dr. T and
the Women not to spoil the plot twists in our review.  Well, I'm going
to spoil one right now by telling you this:  Mr. T does not appear in
this movie!
     Dr. T and the Woman is the relatively harmless tale of the
aforementioned Texas gynecologist (Gere) and the women who surround
him.  His wife (Farrah Fawcett) is a nut job with a psychiatric illness
so rare and strange (it makes her act childish) that it can only be
fictional.  His sister-in-law (Laura Dern, barely recognizable) is a
high-society drunk.  His head nurse (and he has about a dozen of them),
played by Shelley Long, secretly has a crush on him.  The local golf pro
(Helen Hunt) is a dangerous temptation against his wedding vows.  His
daughter Connie (Tara Reid) is a JFK conspiracy theorist.  And his other
daughter Dee Dee (the square-jawed Kate Hudson) is a Dallas Cowboy
cheerleader wannabe who's about to get married in one of the most
seamless weddings ever planned, especially considering every member of
her family is either drunk, crazy, or poring over uteruses all day.
     Dee Dee's wedding drives much of the action in the film, and the
place settings would have been required in order to follow the who's-who
of Dr. T, if not for the fact that every character is a shallow
stereotype that merits little more description than given above.  From
the moment we see a naked Farrah (and there's an awful lot of nudity in
Dr. T for what is, essentially, a women's picture) frolicking in a
public fountain, we know we're going to be calling most of the action
before it happens.  Ultimately, Dr. T and the Women is a messy tangle of
estrogen and errant plotlines.  And let's just say that you'd better
prepare yourself in advance to witness a graphically real childbirth. 
Real enough, anyway.
     What Dr. T lacks in character development and story line it makes
up to some degree in charm.  Most notably, the film pegs Southern Gaudy
to a T (no pun intended), and ironically, the frequent and kitschy
scenes with Dr. T's (male) hunting buddies are the best part of the
movie.  An intrusive score doesn't help matters, though, and Anne Rapp's
screenplay (Rapp had better luck with last year's Cookie's Fortune, also
for Altman) isn't likely to win any awards.  One also has to question
Altman's casting judgment:  Will Dr. T be the film that revives Shelley
Long's long-deceased career?  And Farrah Fawcett?  Um, no.
     In the end, Dr. T's observations about life and love amount to the
rather plain insight that a bunch of chicks can drive you nuts.  Believe
me, this I already know.
Director: Robert Altman
Producer: Robert Altman, James McLindon
Writer: Anne Rapp
Starring: Richard Gere, Jani Vorwerk, Helen Hunt, Farrah Fawcett, Laura
Dern, Shelley Long, Tara Reid, Kate Hudson, Liv Tyler, Robert Hays, Matt
Malloy, Andy Richter, Lee Grant, Janine Turner, Gail Cronauer
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Play It to the Bone (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Aileo Weinmann.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/5c79ff984f1980fa8825684e0020fd46?OpenDocument
I didn't watch PLAY IT TO THE BONE  I sat through it.  If you've ever
seen a boxing match where you wish the guy who was knocked down didn't
get up, just so it would be over, you know what I'm talking about.  The
overall limpness of this production greatly overshadows a few worthwhile
moments of comedy, drama, and sport.
Vince Boudreau (Woody Harrelson  WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP, THE PEOPLE VS.
LARRY FLYNT) and Cesar Dominguez (Antonio Banderas  DESPERADO, THE MASK
OF ZORRO) are best buddies whose careers as professional boxers are on
the downswing.  Fortunately for them, the undercard for the Mike Tyson
match tonight just lost its scheduled fighters to a car accident and a
drug overdose.  If Vince and Cesar can make it from L.A. to Vegas by
Showtime, they'll be paid to fight for the first time in years, facing
each other, with a title shot going to the winner.
Vince's ex and Cesar's current gal Grace Pasic (Lolita Davidovich 
BLAZE, COBB) agrees to drive them in the hopes that she'll find an
investor to fund one of her wacky inventions at the fight.  A
long-standing rivalry becomes increasingly heated between Vince and
Cesar as the trip progresses, jockeying for a psychological edge and
Grace's attention.  Add free-spirited hitchhiker Lia (Lucy Liu  `Ally
McBeal') to the mix, and Grace's feisty disposition turns downright
spicy.  A couple of decent laughs aren't nearly enough to sustain what
drags into a tiresome majority of the film.  The bout itself proves to
be a monumental battle, with both fighters delivering and sustaining
almost inconceivable punishment in their quest for victory.
The central flaw of PLAY IT TO THE BONE is its failing to convince the
audience to care about its characters.  The bout itself is less than
climactic because by then it doesn't matter who wins or loses.  While
Harrelson and Davidovich do a fine job with their parts, I found myself
less likely to wince at the graphic depiction of the boxing match than
Banderas' performance as an actor.  If you're looking for a good boxing
movie, head to the video store for a copy of RAGING BULL.

Title
Review for O (2001)
None of this is meant to say that O is a total waste of time.  At the
very least, it's a far better film than the obtuse 1995 version of
Othello, which starred Lawrence Fishburne and strayed far from the
original tale but still relied on cryptic Elizabethan-era English.  O is
far more faithful to the original story than I would have suspected,
even handling those tricky asides and character-hiding-in-a-closet
scenes with aplomb.  Ultimately, the source material keeps O mostly
afloat, telling a unique and tragic story about how a single,
well-placed rumor can ruin the life of somebody who otherwise has it
made.
Mired in the "marketing violent movies to teens is bad" controversy of
1999-2000, O has been sitting on the shelf for a while, building a large
volume of clips that claim it's the most violent thing since Natural
Born Killers.  A word to audiences -- this is far from the truth.  In
fact, those expecting a Columbine-style rampage (a ridiculous link which
I've nonetheless found in 538 articles on Nexis.com) will be
disappointed by the relatively tame ending -- comprising four gunshots
and a quiet strangling.
Director: Tim Blake Nelson
Producer: Daniel Fried, Eric Gitter, Anthony Rhulen
Writer: Brad Kaaya
Starring: Mekhi Phifer, Josh Hartnett, Julia Stiles, Martin Sheen, Elden
Henson, Andrew Keegan, Rain Phoenix, John Heard, Rachel Schumate,
Christopher Jones
http://www.lionsgate-ent.com/dnm/profile.html?pid=IN-L-00046
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Strange Days (1995)
     I've never really given much thought to what the turn of the
millennium is going to bring.  Will it be a new beginning for society
and the world?  Or will it bring on the apocalypse foretold by
Revelations?
     STRANGE DAYS continuously plays these two possibilities off of
each other, and in L.A., on December 31, 1999, it seems either one is
equally likely.  Ralph Fiennes plays Lenny Nero, a bottom-feeder ex-cop
who peddles "clips," full-sensory pieces of memory from real people's
lives.  These clips are played on "the wire," a device which delivers
experiences directly into the brain.  The very illegal wire is also the
source of a whole slew of problems, including the murder of one Jeriko
One, a very influential rap star, and the subsequent stalking of Faith
(Juliette Lewis), Nero's ex-girlfriend, for whom he still pines.
     As it turns out, this Jeriko has been heralded as the next
Messiah, and the circumstances of his murder stand to cause riots of
unprecedented horror.  When a clip containing the identity of Jeriko's
killers falls into Nero's hands, it's anybody's guess who he can
trust.
     The greatest part of STRANGE DAYS is easily the first-person
photography that is used whenever a clip is played--so the audience
gets to see everything as if they're part of the action.  This is
remarkably effective, and as it gets more and more gruesome later in
the film, the technology's dangers are almost palpable.
     Fiennes is terrific, as is Angela Bassett, who plays his best
friend, Mace.  Nero's insecurity is truly refreshing in this day and
age of indestructible action heroes, and although his frequent
confessions to Mace wear thin after two or three of them, he still does
plenty with the role to make the character real:  he is selling bits of
people's lives but doesn't have one of his own.
     Sadly, STRANGE DAYS is no bed of roses.  Example: here's what I
learned about the future.  In 1999, playing really, really bad rap
music is almost enough to earn you sainthood.  In 1999, no one wears
much in the way of clothes, especially female rock singers.  In 1999,
the music pretty much sucks, too.  And everyone gets beat up.  A lot.
And no one seems to mind.
     While the film is intriguing all the way through, it never really
gels together.  Director Kathryn Bigelow does some admirable work, but
the result is a BLADE RUNNER meets CLOCKWORK ORANGE meets Rodney King,
and some strange hybrid results that makes STRANGE DAYS feel like two
movies playing at once.  It's a troubling problem that is fortunately
balanced by the style of the feature, but the end result is an
interesting little film that's just, well, "strange."
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Go (1999)
     Believe it or not, this is a Christmas movie!  And here it is, the
middle of April, and there's nothing else I'd rather see.
     Let me put it this way: GO is the best movie I've seen since
FARGO.  Doug Liman, the man behind the brilliant SWINGERS (which, I
realized, came out much too long ago, in 1996), has concocted such a
film that I'm almost compelled to pay the whopping $8.50 to see it
again.
     GO is a seamier look at life than SWINGERS, brilliantly
deconstructing Gen X life in latter-day Los Angeles, giving a new
perspective on rave culture, drug dealers, the lure of Vegas, and even
Amway distributorship.  Through the lead characters of Ronna (Polley),
Claire (Holmes), and Simon (Askew), you'll never look at grocery store
clerks the same way.
     GO owes its clever structure to PULP FICTION, following multiple
interlocking storylines and bouncing back and forth chronologically.  To
attempt to distill the plotlines here is to do the film an injustice,
but it centers around Ronna's attempt to get $380 to pay the rent, which
leads her to try to sell 20 hits of Ecstasy in a drug deal gone awry. 
Really awry.  Completely unpredictable.  Hilarious.  All of it unified
through the phrase, "Go!"
     I can't say enough good things about GO, and I urge you to see it. 
The acting, directing, and especially August's writing are all far
better than we're all used to.  You may not even know how to react.
     That's why GO gets filmcritic.com's coveted and rarely awarded:
Director: Doug Liman
Producer: Matt Freeman, Mickey Liddell, Paul Rosenberg
Writer: John August
Starring: Desmond Askew, Taye Diggs, William Fichtner, J.E. Freeman,
Katie Holmes, Jane Krakowski, Breckin Meyer, Jay Mohr, Timothy Olyphant,
Sarah Polley, Scott Wolf
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/go/
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Public Access (1993)
     A few words about PUBLIC ACCESS, a 1993 film that is now getting a
limited theatrical release.  Produced by the team that brought us THE
USUAL SUSPECTS, PUBLIC ACCESS is a "first work" that is only now being
distributed to ride on the 1995 film's coattails.  Upon watching PUBLIC
ACCESS, it's pretty clear why this film never went anywhere at the time it
was made, even though it won the Grand Jury Prize at Sundance.
     PUBLIC ACCESS is a perplexing little movie about an insidious drifter
named Whiley (Ron Marquette) who stirs up controversy by starting his own
public cable access show in the small town of Brewster.  He asks one
question of his viewers, "What's wrong with Brewster?"  And slowly, it
becomes clear that there's an awful lot wrong, culminating in several
murders.
     I heard screenwriter Christopher McQuarrie speak about the film, of
which he was highly embarrassed.  Most viewers were confused about some
aspect of the movie, as was I, and McQuarrie's canned answers to their
questions generally ranged in the "We had 10 days to write it," and "It
was our first movie" type of responses.  These are valid excuses.  PUBLIC
ACCESS, as a feature film, seems far from finished, as if it needs another
run or two through the editing room.  The unfortunate result of this is
that when the movie isn't incomprehensible, it's pretty dull...so boring
that I actually dozed off.
     Fans of THE USUAL SUSPECTS may get a kick out of seeing what
McQuarrie and director Bryan Singer have risen from.  Otherwise, you're
just as well off watching your own public access channel.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Extreme Adventures of Super Dave, The (2000) (V)
Ever wished longingly for the glory days when you could watch "Late
Night with David Letterman" and catch a little bit of that wacky Super
Dave Osborne, the stuntman who just can't get things right?  Well now
you can relive those happy moments at your leisure, by taking Super Dave
home in his theatrical -- er, straight-to-video -- debut: THE EXTREME
ADVENTURES OF SUPER DAVE!
What, you aren't frantically dialing your phone to reserve your copy at
the video store yet?  Take off your shoes and put down the car keys.  If
this video has proven anything, it's that what can be funny for 1/2 a
minute probably usually won't make it for 91.  Oh, how SUPER DAVE proves
it.
In the film, Bob Einstein, aka Super Dave Osborne, finds himself a
washed-up stuntman.  His manager has run off with his fortunes, his fun
park is failing, and he finds himself in the charge of a sick little
boy.  Dave retires to train up-and-coming stunt stars, and soon an heir
apparent arises, even dubbing himself Super Dave Jr.  But Jr. turns out
to be a traitor in the employ of Dan Hedaya's evil promoter.  A grudge
match is announced, and Super Dave must jump half a mile of cars in
order to win the prize and save the kid.
That smell is not your garbage can, it's this movie, which has all the
plot of a box of Cheerios.  Perhaps less, if you include the maze on the
back.  Most of the nutty stunts are repeats from "Letterman"'s of old,
and while a few earn a chuckle or two, you aren't likely to break much
of a smile during the running time of this dog.  The production might as
well have been made with a Handicam, and the shot sequence of Dave - car
falling - dummy gets crushed by car gets very old, very fast.
But wait!  Don't give up yet!  filmcritic.com's exclusive inside news
says that next we can expect a feature-length "Top Ten" list!  You gotta
dream.
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
     James Bond is back  NOT!  as one vaguely remembered star of stage
and screen might have said.
     Instead of Bond, it's super-groovy spy Austin Powers (Myers) making
his triumphant return to the silver screen, the British secret agent
frozen in the 60's and thawed in the 90's, where/when he returned to
active duty.  THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME picks up right where the original
left off, with Dr. Evil (also Myers) banished to space in his Big Boy
statue/spaceship, and Austin settling down with new wife Vanessa
(Elizabeth Hurley, in a cameo re-appearance).
     Alas, Dr. Evil will not stay in exile for long.  He soon returns to
earth, where he hatches a plan to travel back to 1969 and `steal
Austin's mojo'  mojo that looks a bit like raspberry jam.
     It's up to Austin to travel back in time himself to get his mojo
back, of course, and it's back in '69 that he meets up with American CIA
agent Felicity Shagwell (Graham), goes on a wild car chase or two, faces
off with a new villain named Fat Bastard (also Myers), goes toe to toe
with a midget clone of Dr. Evil (Troyer), and ends up on the moon to
spoil the plan to build a, ahem, `Death Star' set to wipe out
Washington, D.C.
     Naturally, *none* of this is taken seriously, and AP2 takes the
farce to new heights (and lows).  Is THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME as good as
the original?  Actually, it's better by quite a bit.  While the original
was fun, it was too much about the one character of Austin and how out
of place he was.  The follow-up is much better-handled, with plenty of
fun characters (I loved Green as Dr. Evil's son, again) and some really
shagadelic situations.  See, it's catching.
     Problems?  In a shocker, it turns out that Heather Graham just
can't do comedy.  And while I won't deny that Heather is extremely hot,
she ends up weighing down the movie considerably with her seriousness
and deadpan line delivery.  Yawn.  Also, the Fat Bastard character is
quite an exercise in makeup technology, but haven't we gotten past the
point of mocking grossly overweight people?  And the Scottish thing?
Come on, Mike.  That one's older than Sprockets.
     While AP2 feels a bit like it was written in one night while under
the influence of controlled substances, I can't deny that it's really,
really funny.  The first 20 minutes represent the most I've laughed at a
film this year.  And I saw WING COMMANDER, don't forget.
     Stay to the end.  There are a couple of credits-running scenes you
really have to see.  Also notable are the two `Jerry Springer'
recreations (with Springer himself).  I'll leave you with a fun fact:
Did you know that Demi Moore was a producer on this film?  Did you know
that Demi Moore was a producer at all?
Director: M. Jay Roach
Producer: Demi Moore, Mike Myers, John S. Lyons, Jennifer Todd, Suzanne
Todd
Writer: Mike Myers, Michael McCullers
Starring: Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Robert Wagner, Seth Green, Rob
Lowe, Verne Troyer
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
     When you're a star as big as Tom Hanks, you can do whatever the
hell your heart desires.
     Such is the lesson to be taken away from THAT THING YOU DO!,
Hanks's screenwriting and directorial debut.  And just what is THAT
THING YOU DO?  Well, if you don't know, you must live in a cave, and a
small one at that.  The title refers to the one and only hit song of
"The Wonders" (get it?).  It is a song that is repeated throughout this
film... over and over... in full or in part, a total of *11* times.  I
counted.
     Hanks's ridiculously simplistic tale follows a couple of months in
the lives of a small-time band from Erie, Pennsylvania, who almost by
accident hit it big with their titular single.  The cast is spearheaded
by Tom Everett Scott, a young man who looks, sounds, and acts exactly
like Hanks, and even has the same first name.  Scott plays Guy, aka
"Shades," the group's drummer who is somehow alternately nerdy when he
isn't being supercool.  Add on moody frontman Johnathon Schaech, who
looks down-right frightening, plus wisecracking Steve Zahn, and you've
pretty much got the band.  (Hanks plays the group's manager in later
scenes.)
     THAT THING YOU DO! takes The Wonders from playing talent shows to
pizza parlors to getting a manager to a record deal to Billboard
magazine to getting go-go dancers on stage with them, which is, I guess,
as high as a music career ever gets.  Then the band breaks up and the
movie is over, and then you get to go home and go to sleep with the
comfort that this is not a movie that's going to keep you up at night
wondering about plot twists.
     Without any bulky plot to get in the way of his perfectly linear
story, Hanks is free to do what he does best -- crack jokes like he
learned on "Bosom Buddies" with then-co-star and THAT THING cameo-man
Peter Scolari.  It's funny in the same way that the aforementioned show
was funny -- not witty, but good for an occasional laugh when someone
falls down.
     Yes, everything is funny in this Tom Hanks world of peaches, cream,
and racial harmony (this is supposed to be 1964).  I don't know if you
can blame Hanks alone for this senseless and totally obvious film that
is devoid of emotion, but I hope that Hollywood takes from this the
lesson that a big movie star does not a talented writer/director make. 
But I doubt they will.
     In all fairness, THAT THING YOU DO! is a pleasant film perfect for
a brain-dead matinee, and the theme song is a catchy tune that gets your
foot tapping quickly.  And while the movie, like the song, has a nice
beat and you can dance to it, why settle for this single when you can
get a double CD's worth of fun or intrigue in the theater next door?
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
     THE GREEN MILE?  Let's talk about 26 miles.  The length of a
marathon.  Start the race and the movie together: The race would long be
over before the film.  The winner would be at home, taking a nap.  Yes,
THE GREEN MILE is three hours long.
     Not that long movies have never been successful, and not that THE
GREEN MILE is bad.  You might even think a long movie is required here.
Pulled from Stephen King's acclaimed series of six books by the same
name, King returns to the kind of work he was doing in THE SHAWSHANK
REDEMPTION (based on a short story of his), the kind that seems to
perform the best, away from splatter and gore, and into the minds of the
strangest of characters.
     The resemblance to SHAWSHANK is uncanny.  Both are epic prison
films that ultimately tell stories of personal growth and
enlightenment.  But THE GREEN MILE isn't about the prisoners, it's about
the guards -- and one, notable prisoner that crosses their paths.
Leading the crew of the 1935 southern prison is guard Paul Edgecomb (Tom
Hanks), a kind man who treats his death row inmates with all the dignity
he can.  His latest charge is John Coffey (Michael Duncan), a gentle
giant with alarming powers of the spirit who was convicted of killing
two little girls.
     Before it's time for Coffey to walk The Green Mile (the road to
"Old Sparky," the electric chair), he has a profound effect upon the
other guards and inmates.  And Paul is the centerpiece.  Mr. Jingles,
the prison's mouse, takes second billing.  The light bulbs, which
explode more dramatically and more often than in any other film in
history, take third.
     There's plenty here to make you laugh and cry, and director Frank
Darabont (who also did SHAWSHANK) knows how to tug each string.
Surprisingly, it's Hanks who is forgettable in his role, mainly because
his phony southern accent wavers unconvincingly between those used in
his parts in FORREST GUMP and SAVING PRIVATE RYAN.  Duncan is the one to
watch here, and I'll put money on him right now for an Oscar nod.
     Sadly, the legacy of TITANIC has told directors that pacing is
irrelevant and a film's length can be boundless.  THE GREEN MILE even
bookends with Paul's character as an old man, looking back on his life
-- sound familiar?  But unlike TITANIC, you really feel the length in
this film, and it's just not necessary this time around.  I checked my
watch close to a dozen times during the film during the draggy parts --
a bad sign for those prone to sore butts.
     But maybe Darabont did this on purpose.  Sitting there, glued to my
seat, entranced by thoughts of what might happen next yet slowly rotting
while life passes me by outside... my, it feels just like I'm in prison,
waiting for my own trip down The Green Mile.
Director: Frank Darabont
Producer: Frank Darabont, David Valdes
Writer: Frank Darabont
Starring: Tom Hanks, David Morse, Bonnie Hunt, Michael Duncan, James
Cromwell, Michael Jeter, Graham Greene, Doug Hutchison, Sam Rockwell,
Barry Pepper, Patricia Clarkson, Harry Dean Stanton, Jeffrey DeMunn
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
Nine years out of the 80's and we already have our first nostalgic look back
in Adam Sandler's THE WEDDING SINGER, an entertaining romantic comedy which
recalls the days of big hair, Thriller, and Miami Vice with a sense of fondness.
Essentially, THE WEDDING SINGER follows Adam Sandler as Robbie Hart, the
titular character, who is fixated upon the idea of participating in his own
wedding.  Devastatingly, though, when the big day comes, his bride to be is a
no-show.  She has realized that she could not spend the rest of her life with
a lowly wedding singer.  Consequently, the break-up has traumatized Robbie so
much that he must avoid the painful experience of weddings altogether.  Thus,
his new line as a Bar mitzvah singer.  Shortly thereafter, Drew Barrymore as
Julia begins to open his eyes to love again, at which point Robbie must
contend with her creep fiancee Glen for her affections.
>From that point, the story develops into something oddly familiar, and we
become aware that THE WEDDING SINGER hearkens back to not only the fads and
fashions of the 1980's, but also to the romantic comedies from that era such
as CAN'T BUY ME LOVE and the John Hughes / Molly Ringwald movies.  Those
movies concerned the lovable loser that had to compete with the bigshot jock
or cheerleader for the affections of their true love.  In this remake, the
high school protagonists of those films have aged into Sandler's Robbie, ten
years out of high school but not far removed.  But the sentiment of those
films remains.  Instead of being a high school stud, Glen is a corporate stud,
and there is no doubt in our minds that he is the enemy.
With the modern trend in romance films like MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING and AS
GOOD AS IT GETS being to present some sort of true internal conflict to the
relationship (such as a likable significant other or a psychological illness),
THE WEDDING SINGER gleefully bucks this trend for the black and white, good
vs. evil approach of the romantic comedy of the 80's.  THE WEDDING SINGER is a
witty comedy that dwells on every aspect of pop culture from the decade past
(from Boy George to breakdance), and no laughable reference is left untouched.
 In the end though, it is a simple love story from a simpler time crafted as
skillfully as ever.
Director: Frank Coraci
Producer: Jack Giarraputo, Michelle Holdsworth, Robert Simond
Writer: Tom Herlihy
Starring: Drew Barrymore, Steve Buscemi, Adam Sandler, Christine Taylor
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Amateur (1994)
     Hal Hartley's latest film, AMATEUR, is quite a departure from his
earlier work.  Gone is his traditional lead, the crimson-haired ingenue
Adrienne Shelly, and in her stead are two foreign actresses, Isabelle
Huppert (as a lapsed nun trying to make it as a porn story writer and who
believes she is a nymphomaniac) and Elena Lowensohn (as Sofia, a somewhat
psycho porn star).  Hartley's favorite male lead, Martin Donovan, remains
as Thomas, the slimeball husband of Sofia.
     The plot is this:  Sofia is fed up with Thomas, so she tries to kill
him.  He doesn't die--he just cracks his head and develops amnesia. 
Isabelle finds him and takes him under her already fragile wing.  Throw in
an extortion plot wherein the old Thomas was trying to blackmail a
nameless entity, and add the thugs trying to kill him.  Eventually,
everyone gets sucked into this scheme, and nothing works out for any of
them.
     Why AMATEUR?  Well, all the principals are new at something: 
Isabelle is new at the porn game and a virgin to boot.  Sofia is new at
trying to extort money from someone.  Thomas is new to life in general. 
Clever, right?
     Well....  The problem is that the plot is revealed so cryptically and
moves so slowly that it renders the movie stagnant.  It's difficult to
follow, and the characters drone on and on at each other, philosophizing
at length, about what, I can't even remember.  The action/comedy sequences
are superb, but there just aren't enough of them to carry the film.  The
end result is that AMATEUR is a fabulous story that's told rather badly.
     At least the acting is on target, and the story is original.  And
some of the film's scenes, especially the ones involving the two thugs,
Thomas's old partner, and his torture and revenge, are so bright as to dim
the rest of the movie.
     Hartley's characteristic oddball-ness is here, all right, but the
fresh and funny approach to the way we live our lives is absent.  AMATEUR
could have been an action-driven comedy instead of a sloppy narrative;
Hartley made a "deep" and tragic movie about big-time people.  Whereas a
movie like TRUST, a film about lower-middle class twenty-somethings, was a
comedic riot.  Hal, I hope you return to your old ways.

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
     What does anyone in Hollywood know?  You *can* make a movie with
absolutely no likeable characters.
     Neil LaBute does exactly that with this highly anticipated follow-up to
IN THE COMPANY OF MEN, a film so anti-humanity it's practically a sequel.
     Sadly, LaBute doesn't quite pull off YOUR FRIENDS AND NEIGHBORS, and
compared to COMPANY (a film that was this critic's #1 film of 1997), it
pales considerably.
     Why?  Well, turns out there's just not much of a story here.  Sure,
each of these characters are bizarre and twisted enough to amuse you through
the 99-minute running time of the picture, but in the end, you realize there
really wasn't much of a point to any of it.  And LaBute has engineered it
that way: he *doesn't* want you to get attached to these people.  In fact,
the characters don't even have *names!*  (However, they are "named" in the
credits of the film.)
     Just look at the roll call: Keener couldn't look worse if you dragged
her through mud.  Eckhart must have gained 50 pounds for his bohunk role
(and not in a good way).  Brenneman is a nearly frigid woman who still makes
room for adultery.  Stiller is a total basket case.  Kinski is apparently a
brainless moron.  And Patric, well, you'll just have to hear some of his
misogynistic prattle to believe what they've done to him.  Oddly, Patric's
sadistic OB/GYN is the most compelling player in the bunch, for sheer shock
value alone.  Still, it goes to show that just because you *can* make a
movie with six hateful characters... doesn't mean you *should.*
     NEIGHBORS also suffers from hideous cinematography (by Nancy Schreiber)
which is out of focus half the time and bad editing (by Joel Plotch) that
feels pieced together with scissors and snot.  Altogether, LaBute just seems
out of sorts doing an ensemble piece that tries to tell too many stories but
ends up telling them all badly.
     Not that I blame him for trying.  It certainly was an ambitious project
and it does have some pretty hilarious moments.
Director: Neil LaBute
Producer: Steve Golan, Jason Patric
Writer: Neil LaBute
Starring: Amy Brenneman, Aaron Eckhart, Catherine Keener, Nastassja Kinski,
Jason Patric, Ben Stiller
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Minus Man, The (1999)
     I'm still trying to figure out how to look at THE MINUS MAN.
Either it's supposed to be a dark, black comedy, or it's supposed to be
a thoughtful, pensive drama/thriller a la SLING BLADE.
     And it has so much going for it.  Owen Wilson, who was so great in
films like BOTTLE ROCKET.  Janeane Garofalo, who I like pretty much
universally.  Hampton Fancher, who adapted the screenplay for BLADE
RUNNER.  What's not to like?
     THE MINUS MAN takes as its premise that your average,
thirtysomething, white male is the most likely serial killer around.
Vann (Wilson) fits the profile perfectly, a quiet, blonde, super-polite
drifter who poisons people at random.  The town of Owensville is no
different, as Vann randomly offs people, narrating to himself along the
way along with two imaginary cops.
     There's a romance of sorts, with Garofalo as a postal worker
smitten with Vann, and her screen time turns out to be the only stuff
worth watching.  The rest of the film is interminable, boring, and
ultimately plotless, meandering from scene to scene with no discernable
direction.  Frankly, I gave up on THE MINUS MAN after 30 minutes.
Turned out there were 90 more to go.
     I don't know what the ultimate point of this film was supposed to
be.  That there are crazy people all around?  That life and film can
ultimately lack meaning?  That rock stars (Crow) can do whatever they
want?  That once-great actors and writers can produce junk now and
again?
Director: Hampton Fancher
Producer: Fida Attieh, David L. Bushell
Writer: Hampton Fancher
Starring: Owen Wilson, Brian Cox, Mercedes Ruehl, Janeane Garofalo,
Dwight Yoakam, Dennis Haysbert, Sheryl Crow
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Basquiat (1996)
     BASQUIAT -- or "Sasquiatch," as I am becoming increasingly fond of
calling this film -- may teach you a thing or two.  Now you may not want
to know any of the stuff you learn during its two long hours of running
time, but like it or not, you will learn something.
     That something is a base level of information about Jean Michel
Basquiat, a Haitian artist=E9 in the early 80's who became Andy Warhol's
favorite son.  (What is it with Warhol movies this year?)  Basquiat rose
from living in a cardboard box and decorating the streets of New York
with cryptic graffiti to a high-profile yet short-lived career in the
highest of art circles.  All before his not-too-untimely death at the
age of 27 from a (take a guess) *heroin* overdose.
     Now hailed as something of a James Dean to the art world,
Basquiat's bizarre life story is being told.  The idea was apparently
this:  take every freak working in American cinema in the 1990's and
transform him or her info a freak who lived in the 1980's.  And they got
all the freaks -- *all* of them -- starting with the granddaddy of all
that is inexplicable, David Bowie (as Warhol), plus runners-up Dennis
Hopper, Christopher Walken, Gary Oldman, Benicio Del Toro,
newcomer-freak Claire Forlani, Parker Posey, Willem Dafoe...  Hell, they
even got *Courtney Love* for God's sake!  The freaks are here.  All of
them.
     Perhaps the least freakish is he who plays Basquiat himself, soap
star Jeffrey Wright, who flits from scene to scene in his be-dreadlocked
hairdo (maybe a bit fancy for a guy living in a cardboard box), trying
his best to keep up in the race to see Who Can Overact The Most.  In
this regard, Wright does well.  And as you can imagine, this race runs
the film right into the ground.  Then again, it's a race that can be fun
to watch at times.
     I don't envy anyone the task of writing a screenplay about the
short life of a not-universally known person, someone who was basically
a strung-out junkie, overall a jerk of a guy, and whose sole talent was
making what, in limited circles, must pass for avant-garde art. =
However, Julian Schnabel has taken this challenge, and in most regards,
has failed, coming up with a self-indulgent work that captures what's
going on in Schnabel's head, and that's about it.  Basquiat's life is,
from the start of the film to the finish, succinctly described by the
first sentence of this paragraph -- little more than an wacko that was
hyped into the big time.  Not that that's suprising.  It happens even
more often today.  It just doesn't deserve a *movie.*
     Schnabel does pose one interesting dilemma -- when Basquiat is on
drugs, he's (apparently) a brilliant artist.  When he's clean, his art
sucks.  The question of "Is it worth it?" is an interesting one, but not
too interesting.  For Schnabel, it isn't interesting enough to justify
an answer... and that's sad, because by the end of BASQUIAT, there are
even fewer answers than when we started.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
     Sad but true, that's all it takes to boil down INSTINCT, a curious
blend of thriller and feel-good prison movie that manages to somehow be
neither.
     The story of Ethan Powell (Hopkins), a highly intelligent doctor
(sound familiar yet?) and primatologist who opts to live with the
gorillas in Rwanda for a couple of years, and goes a bit primal on us.
Several years later, Doc Powell is extradited after murdered a few
Rwandans.  Oh, and he won't speak any more.  So they bring in hotshot
psychiatrist resident Theo Caulder (Gooding) to deconstruct Powell and
bring him back into the fold.
     Here's where we throw in a little CUCKOO'S NEST (in fact, several
of the inmates of Powell's prison seem lifted from CUCKOO's NEST
entirely!).  I half-expected to see Chief along the way.
     Despite the movie's pretense, there's little mystery along the
way.  We know all along who gets killed and why.  If *you* can't figure
it out, you need to go see STAR WARS again.  But aside from some lightly
humorous moments, INSTINCT is largely predictable and tiresome, and it
isn't likely to click with many audiences.  And let me just add that
Maura Tierney (Powell's daughter) has *always* rubbed me the wrong way.
     INSTINCT is not a bad movie.  It's just not a terribly well-made
one.  Regardless, I'm sure I won't be the only one (accidentally)
calling it "Instink".
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1

Title
Review for 101 Dalmatians (1996)
     Well, another new Disney movie is coming out and with it comes the
theaters packed with screaming babies, very restless kids kicking your
seat, and throngs of grownups providing running commentary of everything
on the screen (to themselves, not the kids).
     This is not a good thing.  This time, the Disney movie is 101
DALMATIANS, the live-action version, and if any movie could make me long
for a quick and painless death, this is it.
     In an era when we get smart "children's" movies like BABE, why does
dreck like this have to continue to be made?  The new 101 DALMATIANS
goes like this:  Roger (Jeff Daniels) is a video game designer in London
(where all the best video game designers live, I'm sure), and Anita
(Joely Richardson) is a fashion designer in the employ of one Cruella
DeVil (Glenn Close).  Roger and Anita both have Dalmatians, and the
super-smart dogs conspire to get Roger and Anita together.  He proposes
marriage an hour after he meets her, they get hitched, the Dalmatians
have puppies, and Cruella decides she wants them for a coat.  Cruella
steals the happy couple's puppies plus a bunch more from other people. 
Dogs outwit baddies and escape, bringing down Cruella and her evil
henchmen.
     Well, la-dee-dah.  This plot couldn't be less interesting if it was
written by HOME ALONE's John Hughes.  Oh, wait a minute!  It *was*
written by John Hughes!  Silly me!!!  In fact, 101 DALMATIANS is almost
*exactly* the same movie as HOME ALONE.  Point in fact:  Kid/dogs in
trouble; bad guys chase him/them; kid/dogs end(s) up being much more
resourceful; bad guys fall down a lot.  Oh, funny!
     Maybe you're saying, "Hey, this is a kid's movie!  Lighten up!" 
Well, I don't think it's anywhere near being suitable for children,
despite it's G rating -- there are blatant sex jokes, dead/dying
animals, reactionary Puritanical attitudes (women should stay in the
home), and downright destructive messages.
     And this movie isn't for adults, either, because this next brick in
the wall of the Disney empire is so dumbed-down it ends up just rotting
the audience's brains.  There's never any sense of "thrill" to this
adventure, the acting is mundane, and I laughed at *one* single joke
("Who gets the gold?")  But hey, this is Disney, and maybe brain rot is
what they're aiming for!  (Because then you'll pay to see next year's
animated HERCULES, which, from the trailer, looks even worse.)
     So what do we learn from 101 DALMATIANS?  That your dog is smarter
than you?  That if your dog saves someone else's dog, you get to keep
it?  Who can say?
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
     Part of me feels like I didn't really get THE LIMEY.  Though it's a
spare 85 minutes, director Steven Soderbergh always has a trick or two
up his sleeve, and I was sure some twists were in store for me.
     Witness OUT OF SIGHT, with criminal and cop falling into an
unlikely romance.  Witness SEX, LIES, AND VIDEOTAPE, which broke the
indie film scene wide open.  Witness SCHIZOPOLIS  you know, all of it.
     But no matter how many ways I slice it, despite the critical smash
that THE LIMEY has become, the film failed to impress me much.  The
story is trite:  British ex-con (Stamp) flies to L.A. to avenge his
daughter's death, which he assumes is the result of foul play due to a
music magnate (Fonda).  Expecting a clever plot twist, I waited and
waited, and then the movie was over.
     This isn't to say that THE LIMEY isn't a well-made film.  As usual,
Soderbergh is innovative behind the camera, with flashbacks,
flash-forwards, flashes sideways, alternate realities, and optical
trickery.  While this is distracting, it does server to make the film
more visceral and fun.  Stamp and Fonda make for interesting rivals, but
neither really owns the film.  The most intriguing part of THE LIMEY is
Stamp's limey slang: words like `snaffle' and `doolally' that spice up
the lingo a la A CLOCKWORK ORANGE (though never with the same power).
     Unfortunately, THE LIMEY falls into that class of films that is
perfectly watchable but ultimately forgettable.  Soderbergh fans will
rejoice.  The rest of the world will scratch its collective head.
Director: Steven Soderbergh
Producer: John Hardy, Scott Kramer
Writer: Lem Dobbs
Starring: Terence Stamp, Peter Fonda, Lesley Ann Warren, Luis Guzmán,
Barry Newman, Joe Dallesandro, Nicky Katt, Amelia Heinle, Melissa George
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
     Call me crazy, but I'm dead certain I saw the Transamerica Pyramid
(in San Francisco) in the opening scene of THE BONE COLLECTOR, which is
otherwise set in New York.  In fact, this film, about a cab driver who
kidnaps and murders his victims, might have been better suited to a S.F.
setting, where a cab driver recently kidnapped and murdered his victim.
     THE BONE COLLECTOR presents us with the strange case of Lincoln
Rhyme (Washington) a crack NYPD forensics officer and prolific crime
author.  Enter young protégé Amelia (Jolie), when Rhyme is busted, er,
paralyzed on the job.  Immobilized in his apartment, rookie Amelia is
sent out to be Lincoln's eyes and ears when our murderous cabbie goes on
a killing spree, carefully leaving clues for the cops.
     So is THE BONE COLLECTOR something we'd really call art?  As a
moody and visceral experience, it isn't bad.  Mind you, I'm not going to
have any nightmares tonight, but COLLECTOR has its moments.  Not that
I'm giving those points for originality: A hodgepodge of THE SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS and COPYCAT, THE BONE COLLECTOR is as derivative as they come.
     What about the spook factor?  As a thriller, THE BONE COLLECTOR
rarely rises above a moderate level of anxiety.  A few tense scenes are
driven by sudden audio tricks and spooky music, but rarely is it driven
by the plot, and rarer still does anything come of all the hubbub.
     Figuring out whodunit is an exercise in futility, too.  I was sure
the trailer gave it away, but no: A ridiculous and unforgivable climax
is tacked on to the picture.  Plus there's the obligatory denouement and
awkward attraction scenes (which are particularly bizarre given that
Rhyme is paralyzed from the neck down).
     Ultimately, THE BONE COLLECTOR is not a bad film, and it's better
than some of the tepid thrillers like DOUBLE JEOPARDY we've seen this
year.  Crime story fans will enjoy the picture.  And those who don't
like crime stories will be fascinated the entire two hours just by
staring at Angelina Jolie's enormous, oversized lips.
Director: Phillip Noyce
Producer: Martin Bregman, Michael Scott Bregman, Louis A. Stroller
Writer: Jeremy Iacone
Starring: Denzel Washington, Angelina Jolie, Queen Latifah, Michael
Rooker, Mike McGlone, Ed O'Neill
http://www.thebonecollector.com/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Simpatico (1999)
     I love a good thriller.  And no one makes good thrillers any more.
Enter SIMPATICO, with a cast boasting both Nick Nolte and Jeff Bridges,
not to mention Albert Finney and Sharon Stone -- all set among the
intrigue of a scandal involving horse racing, blackmail, and steamy
sex.  How could this miss?
     By being as straightforward as, well, a horse race.  It's just a
big loop from start to finish.  No real surprises along the way, just
jockeying for position.  SIMPATICO finishes right where it started, with
a time of 106 minutes.
     Based on the play by Sam Shepard, Nolte, Bridges, and Stone play a
trio of friends, long since torn apart by a scam gone awry in their
youth.  As we quickly learn, Bridges (now a famous horse breeder and
racer) is now being blackmailed by his old pal Nolte (now a bum in
California).
     The plot thickens.  Nolte phones out of the blue: Something is
amiss.  Bridges quickly flies to California, but things don't go as
planned.
     The problem with SIMPATICO is that no one expects things to go as
planned.  That Nolte is going to double-cross Bridges is a given.
Exactly why is a mystery, and that's one that, sadly, never gets
explained.  In fact, that can be said for the entire film.  Example: Why
Bridges decides to send Nolte's girlfriend to Kentucky to work a deal
for him is inexplicable and bizarre.
     Ditto the behavior of all the characters.  SIMPATICO merits barely
a "Hmmm" on the surprise-o-meter.  Instead of crafting deft plot twists,
the film relies on random behavior and a confusing structure designed to
dole the story out in tiny bits over the entire running time.
     Why?  If they told it like it really was, you'd realize there
wasn't much of a movie here.  SIMPATICO is a very pretty film, and its
stars do as much as possible with their roles.  It's just that the roles
don't do much for them.
Director: Matthew Warchus
Producer: Jean-François Fonlupt, Dan Lupovitz, Timm Oberwelland
Writer: Matthew Warchus, David Nicholls
Starring: Nick Nolte, Jeff Bridges, Sharon Stone, Catherine Keener,
Albert Finney, Shawn Hatosy, Liam Waite, Kimberly Williams
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
     Just so you know, "patient" refers to a man with a medical
condition, not the ability to sit through a film that flirts with a
three hour running time.
     You think I'm kidding, but I'm *serious* -- THE ENGLISH PATIENT has
got to be the longest romance movie I've ever seen.  Well, OUT OF AFRICA
was awfully long, too, but that doesn't make it okay!  (Like your mother
might say, "If Meryl Streep jumped off a cliff, would you do it too?")
     Okay, I'm being melodramatic, but my three hours in the front row
(not by choice) didn't do my neck a bit of good, and if this review
seems a bit grumpy, I refuse to be held responsible.
     THE ENGLISH PATIENT is a grand tale of love and loss set during the
backdrop of the African theatre of WWII.  Told using a structure that
busts Hollywood's Three Acts wide open, we follow a man we eventually
come to know as The Count (Ralph Fiennes), whose plane has been shot
down near the start of the war.  Horribly disfigured in the resulting
fire and an apparent amnesiac, the Count finds himself in the hands of
Hana (Juliette Binoche), a Canadian nurse.  While the war plays out,
with Hana and the Count holed up in an abandoned monastery, so does the
truth about the Count's past -- an intrigue-filled tale of adventure,
love, and tragedy.
     Fiennes is spectacular is the mystery man, and Kristin Scott Thomas
(who plays the Count's flashback love interest) shows that, when she
dyes her hair blonde, she can seriously burn up the screen.  Also look
for Willem Dafoe in one of his most earnest and accessible roles to
date.  Serious praises are deserved by the film's art director and
editor, and I'll be absolutely shocked if THE ENGLISH PATIENT doesn't
take home a Best Makeup Design Oscar.
     The only problem with the film, besides severe butt-ache, is a
number of holes in writer/director Anthony Minghella's (TRULY MADLY
DEEPLY) screenplay.  You'd think that with that extra hour, he could
fill these holes up, but I guess not.
     No matter.  THE ENGLISH PATIENT is still a solid story and an
exquisitely-produced film.  There's always enough going on to hold the
viewer's eye, or even get you to shed a tear or two.  Just be forewarned
that the best films always have sad endings.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Lie Down with Dogs (1995)
     "When you lie down with dogs, you get up with fleas."  This chorus is
the unifying theme of Wally White's new feature, LIE DOWN WITH DOGS, a
disappointing film about the letting go of guilt and, basically, the
embracing of promiscuity and shallowness.
     The film starts out as an odd "get inside my mind" piece about a gay
man named Tommie (played by White himself), who decides to head off for one
last summer of frolicking in Provincetown, Massachusetts ("the ultimate gay
resort").  Leaving the big city of New York behind, Tommie casts his worries
aside, whips out a few credit cards, and, badda-bing, it's party time.
     Tommie embarks on what starts out as a promising voyage of self-
discovery, but after about five minutes, the film sadly degenerates into an
over-the-top quest for nonstop, meaningless sex.  And Tommie is only one of
a large ensemble cast of totally unlikable characters, all of whom are
carbon copies of one another: shallow, stupid, and unbearable.  The
ostensible point of the film, ultimately, is that you should live your life
to the fullest and without any shame or guilt, but I have to believe that no
self-respecting person would take things to the extremes promoted here.
     The production values are, well, strange.  White breaks down the
"fourth wall" and spouts a number of droll monologues about how crummy his
life is, directly to the camera.  And when he's not talking, the director of
photography is generally experimenting with new camera tricks like a kid
with a new toy.  I can't begin to count how many times the "spinning camera
shot" was used, but after the first 15 times, you'll be too dizzy to care.
In the end, the only saving graces are a couple of good jokes and a few of
these camera tricks that are actually clever.
     Unfortunately, there's no big payoff at the finale; Tommie has no
sudden realization that he's a nimrod.  The end result is 80 minutes of film
that seem like 160--with no socially redeeming value whatsoever.  White was
correct on one count, though: When you lie down with dogs like this movie,
you do get up with fleas.
-Christopher Null / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
     Break out the R2-D2 costume, the Yoda puppet, and Jabba the Hutt:
STAR WARS is back, with EPISODE I - THE PHANTOM MENACE.
     If this were any other movie, it would have had the most horrible,
over-long, dumb-sounding title in history.  If this were any other
movie, I'd have been laughing at all the wrong places.  If this were any
other movie... well, this *isn't* any other movie, is it?  Far from it. 
The most anticipated movie, some say, since GONE WITH THE WIND, and when
a screen of blue text reading "A long time ago, in a galaxy far, far
away..." gets enormous applause, that's hard not to believe.
     Let's cut to the chase.  EPISODE I is a worthy entry into the Lucas
oeuvre, but die-hard fans of the series are bound to be disappointed,
mainly because, plot-wise, the episode is largely recycled from the
original STAR WARS and RETURN OF THE JEDI.
     EPISODE I is at its most thrilling when it's doing something
completely new (and nobody's talking).  In this case, it's the
much-vaunted "pod race," where a young Anakin Skywalker (Lloyd, destined
to become Darth Vader in an episode or two) shows off his uncanny
agility, cunning, and precognition.  The pod race lasts maybe seven
minutes, and it had me on the edge of my seat the entire time.
     Lucas has really outdone himself when it comes to integrating
computer imagery with reality.  Screw JURASSIC PARK: This stuff looks
real.  I had originally thought the skinny droids from the commercials
looked a bit fake.  Not so on the big screen.  Finally someone has
crossed the line where reality and fantasy are indistinguishable.
     Sadly, there's not as much luck with the Gungan, the race of
amphibioid creatures which our heroes (Qui-Gon Jinn and Obi-Wan Kenobi
(Neeson and McGregor, respectively)) band with to save the planet of
Queen Amidala (Portman).  The Gungan, personified in the Chewy-esque,
floppy-eared Jar Jar Binks is not the best-animated digital persona I've
ever seen.  And he speaks a pidgin English that becomes bothersome after
five minutes, incomprehensible after ten.
     And let's not forget that Lucas's last film was JEDI, a good movie
when it came out in 1983, but hardly the best of the series. 
Apparently, 16 years haven't resulted in many new ideas:  The climactic
end of EPISODE I features (no surprise this one) intercutting among a
space battle, an all-out land war, and a light-saber duel.  Sound
familiar?  Well, that's the way all these movies have ended, more or
less.  And frankly, it's getting a bit predictable and tiresome.  I
won't tell you whether good or evil wins this time out.
     My disappointment with the ending notwithstanding, EPISODE I is a
heart-thumper of a film.  It really gets the blood going, and, for all
its cliches, my soul was with the good guys here.  Yes, I'm ready for
EPISODE II, as watching young Skywalker become corrupted by the dark
side has got to be one hell of a story.  Again, it's a cliché, but that
Good vs. Evil thing gets me every time.
     No, it's already been said that THE PHANTOM MENACE is not a "Great
Film."  It's an event movie.  One made to be enjoyed on a visceral
level, not something that you watch for its witty dialogue (think Mark
Hamill).
     In the end, you'll have to decide how you're going to watch the
movie.  A piece of advice:  Use the Force.
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
     Any more of that brooding atmosphere and I might have to strangle myself.
 I don't know how Michael Douglas does it, much less manage to keep himself
alive and kicking through two hours of torment, all of which may or may not be
a fantasy "game" his brother (Sean Penn) has enrolled him in.  Douglas plays
an uber-rich tycoon who has everything he could want and is bored to tears
with all of it.  When kid brother promises the game will fill in what's
lacking in his life, Mikie finds himself drawn to it, and a labyrinthine
all-too-realistic game of murder, deceit, and betrayal begins.  Set in my
newly adopted home of San Francisco, I find this city full enough of intrigue
even without machine gun-toting assassins and attack dogs chasing me around
back alleys.  And I can't imagine what I'd do if a cabbie drove us into San
Francisco Bay... but I suppose that's why you have to watch the movie.  As a
thriller, THE GAME is the work of a craftsman (SEVEN director David Fincher),
but be warned:  don't even *try* to think about the plot lest it break down
before your very eyes.  Instead, just think to yourself, "don't ever let this
happen to me."  You'll thank me later.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Doors, The (1991)
I figure most of us thought The Doors was plenty of movie at 138
minutes.  Little did we realize that one of Oliver Stone's least
favorably received movies would call for a two-disc DVD set with 43
minutes of deleted scenes, numerous documentary extras, and a feature
length commentary track from Stone.
Ten years after its initial release, I found The Doors a lot like I
remembered: a long and meandering -- yet dutiful -- retelling of Jim
Morrison's life (and which ultimately had far more to do with him than
the band he fronted).  Stone traces all the high points -- from
Morrison's struggle to achieve fame in Venice, California during the
height of the surf music craze, to his run-ins with Ed Sullivan and Andy
Warhol.  But it's mainly Jim's self destruction via drugs, alcohol, and
scandalous behavior (antics that ultimately forced him to flee to Paris
to escape an obscenity conviction) that is the focus of the film, and
that relatively shallow effort is hard to sustain over nearly 2 1/2
hours.
Shot with Stone's characteristic, psychedelic style, the film is a
memorable one thanks to Val Kilmer's inspired portrayal of Morrison, not
to mention nude scenes of hundreds of Hollywood actresses -- notably the
prudish Meg Ryan and Kathleen Quinlan.  There's also a prodigious volume
of music to contend with -- as virtually ever Doors song worth hearing
is at least sampled on the movie.  And ultimately, it's the music that
tells you more about the nihilism of Jim Morrison than Oliver Stone ever
could.
Director: Oliver Stone
Producer: Bill Graham, Sasha Harari, A. Kitman Ho
Writer: Randall Jahnson, Oliver Stone
Starring: Val Kilmer, Meg Ryan, Kyle MacLachlan, Michael Wincott,
Michael Madsen, Josh Evans, Dennis Burkley, Billy Idol, Kathleen
Quinlan, Kevin Dillon, Frank Whaley, John Densmore, Gretchen Becker,
Jerry Sturm, Sean Stone
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
     One has to wonder if Martin Scorsese's worldview stops at the New
Jersey state line.
     A shocking disappointment, BRINGING OUT THE DEAD marks Scorsese's
first film since KUNDUN, and his first contemporary movie since CASINO.
So neither of these took place in New York, but Scorsese is so in love
with his hometown, it shows through in all his work.  DEAD actually
begins with the title card, `This film takes place in New York City' (or
something close to that), just so there's no confusion.
     Confusion about where you are?  Impossible.  DEAD is little more
than a series of only-in-NYC horror stories about New York paramedic
Frank Pierce (Cage), a burnt-out ambulance driver who's slowly going
crazy, and who thinks he sees the spirits of the people whose lives he
didn't save.  His partners are all nuts (Goodman, Rhames, and Sizemore 
who together save this picture from the dustbin), and he finds himself
inexplicably attracted to Mary (Arquette), the daughter of a patient
whom he inexplicably revives.
     In fact, inexplicable is an apt word for most of BRINGING OUT THE
DEAD.  Despite a promising concept (get inside the head of a wacked-out
paramedic), it's one blown opportunity after another.  (See PUSHING TIN
for another film with the same problem.)  Instead of good writing, the
story meanders interminably, relying on a hip soundtrack and cute camera
tricks to propel the plot.  Frank's obsession with the deceased Rose is
baffling, yet it drives most of the action.
     BRINGING OUT THE DEAD is based on the novel of the same name, and
indeed, it feels like the novel has been adapted in full for the screen,
with long, dull voice-over monologues, surreal dream sequences, quirky
supporting cast members, and go-nowhere subplots.  This is not an
effective way to make a film.  Scorsese obsessives will love it.  The
rest of the world will not.
     Kudos to Ving Rhames as the best of Cage's partners, a character
best described as John Shaft meets Jimmy Swaggart.  He'll be on my short
list for Best Supporting Actor, even if he did only have five minutes of
screen time.
http://www.bringingoutthedead.com/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Dancer in the Dark (2000)
     Early on in Dancer in the Dark, Peter Stormare confesses to Björk
that he doesn't understand movie musicals, because all the characters
suddenly start singing and dancing for no reason.  He doesn't start
singing and dancing for no reason, he says.
     Selma, as played to perfection by the almost childlike Björk, does
her share of singing and dancing, but she's got a reason:  It's all in
her head.  And with that said, get ready for the creepiest, most
depressing, and certainly the most unique movie musical ever put on
film.
     At its heart, Dancer in the Dark is the simple story of Selma, a
Czech immigrant to a small town somewhere in America, somewhere in the
recent past.  By day she works in a factory stamping out metal
cafeteria-style tubs.  By night she attaches bobby pins by hand to
cardboard displays, readying them for sale, all to raise a little extra
cash.  Frugal with her money, Selma saves every penny because she is
quickly going blind due to an unnamed genetic disorder.  But her son can
avoid the same fate if he undergoes an operation -- to which all Selma's
savings are being put.  Naturally, dad is long gone.
     Her only thrills are evenings out watching (as best she can) old
Hollywood musicals with her friend Kathy (a sparkling Catherine
Deneuve), plus her chance to star as Maria in the local theatrical
production of The Sound of Music.  If only she could see the other
actors....
     For those not paying attention, Selma's life is obviously set up
for some serious tragedy, and it doesn't take long before Selma has gone
suddenly and totally blind, she's lost her job, and her savings have
disappeared from the trailer home she lives in.  On paper, this all
sounds like either a soap opera or a country-western song, but believe
me, on screen it goes well beyond the clichés of melodrama and into the
realm of near-genius, the tale of a truly lost soul told by Danish
auteur Lars von Trier as only he could tell it.
     Dancer's charm lies in its conceit:  To escape her melancholy,
Selma imagines herself as part of the musicals she enjoys so much.  She
daydreams one musical after another, where people do suddenly begin to
sing and dance, and where she is the star.  One second, she's cranking
out metal tubs, the next the factory is a hive of tap-dancing, jumping,
spinning, and singing workers, each wielding a broom or a hammer as a
prop or musical instrument.  It's Stomp by way of Laverne and Shirley.
     Before long, the line between Selma's fantasy and reality has
blurred, just as her life has become so miserable it can't get any
worse.  But of course it does get worse, and watching Selma slip down to
her fate is both gut-wrenching and, oddly, richly rewarding.
     When every movie coming out of Hollywood is the same as the last,
it's wonderful to see something with astonishing originality that defies
comparison.  Lars von Trier is no stranger to challenging fare, with
work that includes Breaking the Waves and the Danish hospital soap The
Kingdom, all rich psychodramas that semi-adhere to his Dogme 95
principles of shooting in available light, on location, and with
hand-held cameras.  Dancer is probably his best work to date, and with
the film winning best picture and a well-deserved best female
performance (for Björk) at Cannes, I'm not alone in this assessment. 
For its acting and ability o generate an emotional response, I don't
think you'll see a more capable film this year.
     Then again, of course, there's the slapdash editing -- a trademark
of von Trier's -- that can be nauseating and ineffective.  At 2 1/3
hours in length, the often poor pacing is also responsible for robbing
Dancer of some of its passion.  Perhaps my biggest complaint, however,
regards the songs that lilt out during Selma's daydreams.  Composed and
performed by Björk herself, the music doesn't stand up on its own,
unlike the memorable tunes in The Sound of Music, a constant reference
point for the movie.  In Dancer, the songs are unilaterally middling,
most notably the final fantasy production number, which one would expect
to be a real smash, but is actually the worst of the bunch.
     Gripes aside, Dancer in the Dark is bound to be a film that
frustrates as many viewers as it pleases.  The movie is long, with
difficult material and a deeply disturbing theme that tells us, indeed,
we can't always get what we want.  Hollywood would have us believe
otherwise.  That Selma shines through it all is a testament to Björk's
ability as an actress (which she has reportedly now sworn off for good),
von Trier's ability as a teller of tragedy, and the audience's ability
to enjoy a movie that just doesn't "feel good."  But trust me, you can
take it.
Director: Lars von Trier
Producer: Vibeke Windelřv
Writer: Lars von Trier
Starring: Björk, Catherine Deneuve, David Morse, Peter Stormare, Joel
Grey, Vincent Paterson, Cara Seymour, Jean-Marc Barr, Vladan Kostic, Udo
Kier, Siobhan Fallon, Zeljko Ivanek, Stellan Skarsgĺrd
http://www.tvropa.com/tvropa1.2/dancer/main.asp
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Mute Witness (1994)
     The making of MUTE WITNESS must have been an incredible process.  The
first shots were taken back in 1985, when a chance encounter with the
film's "Mystery Guest Star" led to some on-the-fly cinematography.  In
1993, principal photography began in Moscow, only to be interrupted by
"fines" in customs, Boris Yeltsin's "October Revolution," -23 degree
weather, a diphtheria epidemic, a drug addicted actor, and another with
kidney disease.
     Nothing was boding well for first-time feature film writer/director
Anthony Waller (even this morning's screening was plagued with
difficulties).  But eventually, everything worked out, and MUTE WITNESS
has finally hit the big screen.
     After such an ominous start, you might be expecting a dismal film. 
Or, you might be the optimist and expect a gem.  MUTE WITNESS is neither. 
(At least they didn't call it SPEAK NO EVIL, completing the trilogy of
"handicapped victim of a killer" flicks.)
     The story is catchy:  an American, mute (not deaf) special
effects/makeup artist, Billy Hughes (Russian actress Marina Sudina), is
working in Moscow on a film.  Trapped in the studio after hours, she
witnesses a snuff film in the making, or so she thinks.  After escaping
from the bad guys, she tells her sister (Fay Ripley), her director/boss
(Evan Richards), and the cops, but no one believes her story.  Regardless,
an enigmatic man known as The Reaper (the "Mystery Guest Star"--I won't
spoil it), who organized said snuffing, wants Billy killed, and the chase
is on.
     Making the film-within-a-film in a Russian setting puts a few unique
spins on the classic stalker movie.  First (and worst) is lots and lots of
Russian dialogue, which I'm doubting many American viewers will
understand.  Second is a fair amount of obvious improvisation on the
screen, which tends to make the plot quite difficult to follow at times,
particularly when it goes off on its blackmail/double-cross tangent at the
end of the film.  Fortunately, the money saved on shooting in impoverished
Russia allowed Waller to spend it on some cool photography, a nice score,
and some of the best Russian actors the country has to offer.
     I really enjoyed Sudina's performance, and given that she has no
lines, it's easy to mistake her for a seasoned American pro, rather than a
Russian novice.  Supporting performances are fine, and Waller's clever
direction always gives us something interesting to look at, even if you
the script doesn't make any sense.
     All-in-all, MUTE WITNESS is a fair first effort, but believe me, it's
better than a lot of the crap Hollywood is passing off as thrillers these
days.  (Note:  In Russian, English, and sign language(!) without
subtitles.)
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Ghost and the Darkness, The (1996)
     Or, as Meryl Streep might say, "I had a bridge in Africa..."  Only
a couple of wicked lions ate half my workers and the rest ran away.
     That's THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS in a nutshell.  And while it may
be, as the press materials say, "one of the most thrilling true stories
ever told," it has somehow turned into one of the most boring movies of
the year, owing to a downright dull directorial job by Stephen Hopkins
and a surprisingly flat script by double Oscar-winner William Goldman.
     Set during the rush to colonialize Africa in 1898, Val Kilmer stars
as John Patterson, a bridge-builder working for the British railroad. 
Down in the belly of the country on assignment, two lions suddenly show
up and begin decimating the crew, and no one is able to stop them.  Even
renowned hunter Charles Remington (Michael Douglas) is brought in, but
the lions seem unstoppable.  Hundreds are killed by these "man-eaters,"
and the natives eventually give them the monikers, the Ghost and the
Darkness -- devils.
     I'll admit, I think there's a story there, it's just not a movie,
mainly because of the simplistic direction the film takes (no lions -
lions - no lions).  Everything is earnest in trying to convince the
viewer that this is a True Story, I guess so you'll have a little more
sympathy for the limp plotline.  But like I said, THE GHOST AND THE
DARKNESS keeps you waiting, and waiting, and waiting... and it just
never revs up.
     Combine this arrow-straight plot with a whole lot of gore (more
than many people in the audience at my screening wanted -- as some of
them left and never returned) and you get a picture that resembles a
slasher movie much more than it does an action/drama.
     That's not an altogether bad thing, but it's certainly not what I
was expecting.  (Points only for cinematography, fine acting, and cool
supporting characters.)
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
     O, there's nothing like a natural disaster to bring people
together!  That's the poorly masked theme ("They all look the same!")
behind VOLCANO, the first really big disaster movie we've seen since,
gosh, mid-February.  It least this VOLCANO doesn't blow -- figuratively
speaking -- like DANTE'S PEAK did, and that's mainly because it's so
much more fun to watch Los Angeles be decimated by unceasing lava flow
instead of a puny Pacific Northwest village.  Co-stars Anne Heche and
Tommy Lee Jones prove more than able at evading not only the encroaching
magma, but also the horde of bad actors that follow them throughout the
movie.  And while the film is full of creeping cheese, complete with
death-defying leaps to safety, slow motion shots, and kitschy
one-liners, I shock myself even by saying that, for the most part, it
feels *real.*  They even thought to include Dennis Woodruff's infamous
car, the cheesiest of Hollywood landmarks, floating along in a river of
fire.  Where else would they think of that!?  I really do love L.A...
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
     Some houses should never be visited.  And some movies should never
be remade.  THE HAUNTING represents both of those tenets.
     A loose remake of the 1963 HAUNTING, this version gives us a creepy
haunted house and four hapless people to populate it.  Chief among them
is Eleanor (Taylor), a real wacko who believes there are children's
spirits in the house that speak to her.  And she's right!  Wow,
original!  And hey kids, the sexy Zeta-Jones plays a *bisexual* in the
movie!  Oooooh, scandalous!  (Sarcasm, people.)
     So how does Jan de Bont, made famous as director of SPEED but
best-known as the director of SPEED 2: CRUISE CONTROL, get to make a
horror film?  He was probably the only sucker in Hollywood desperate
enough to take a dog of a film like this.  The fact that he's never done
a horror flick just compounds the problems.
     As a result, THE HAUNTING is not scary -- at all.  Instead it's
just a conglomeration of cheap fright tactics and a booming bass track
meant to get you to jump out of your seat.  Which doesn't work.
     THE HAUNTING also features such a dumb story line and such bad
dialogue it's almost pathetic.  For a horror film to be frequently
*boring* is unforgivable.  And I wager that anyone who bothers to spend
money on this lemon won't be able to forgive themselves either.
     A really cool set (that ultimately serves no purpose) is the only
shining spot in the film.  Otherwise, feel free to skip this one.
Director: Jan de Bont
Producer: Susan Arnold, Donna Arkoff Roth, Colin Wilson
Writer: David Self
Starring: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson, Lili Taylor,
Bruce Dern
http://www.asylum.com/movies/h/haunting/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
     It's crocodile season, opening the hunting period on an animal that
has been woefully underused in the horror movie litany to date.  But
unlike most horror/thriller pics, this one features a script by David E.
Kelley, best known as the creator of TV's `Ally McBeal.'
     So there's some promise here.  But does this monster movie rise
above recent crap like ANACONDA or JAWS 3-D?  A little.  It's better
than ANACONDA, anyway.
     High concept plot: Giantest crocodile on earth stalks Black Lake
(*not* Lake Placid) in Maine.  When a guy gets eaten, local fish and
game warden (Pullman) and New York paleontologist (Fonda) come to
investigate.  Croc chase ensues, with help from `eccentric millionaire
mythology professor' Platt and local yokel sheriff Gleeson.
     About the only thing that rescues LAKE PLACID from drecksville is
Kelley's flair for sarcastic dialogue, which punctuates just about every
line from the mouth of every character  and is most notably funny
coming from Betty White (local eccentric lake dweller).  But witty
repartee a five-star movie does not make.
     Coming in at about 80 minutes running time, witty repartee does
make for a passable way to spend an hour.  Too bad they couldn't have
just worked this plot into an episode of `Ally McBeal.'
Director: Steve Miner
Producer: David E. Kelley, Michael Pressman
Writer: David E. Kelley
Starring: Bridget Fonda, Bill Pullman, Oliver Platt, Brendan Gleeson,
Betty White
http://www.foxmovies.com/lakeplacid/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Tailor of Panama, The (2001)
Somebody told Pierce Brosnan to change his image.
In The Tailor of Panama -- based on John Le Carré's novel and directed
by John Boorman (Beyond Rangoon, Zardoz) -- Brosnan trades in the
sophistication of James Bond for the identity of crude, disgraced spy
Andy Osnard, an MI-6 operative that has to be shipped off to Panama on
account of his loathsome behavior.  Once he arrives in Panama City, the
bad behavior doesn't stop: Osnard immediately sets upon the task of
uncovering "what's going on" with the Panama Canal.  Rumors swirl that
it will be sold to another country now that Panama has it back from the
U.S.  Or perhaps there will be a coup from a populist underground?
Osnard's first task is to hook up with an informant, and he quickly
ferrets out that Harry Pendel (Geoffrey Rush -- Shine, Quills) is not
the mild-mannered expatriate tailor he pretends to be.  Not only does he
serve as the tailor for virtually everyone in Panamanian society
(including the President), he also has a past that includes a stint in
prison.
Stricken with financial troubles, Pendel uses Osnard as much as Osnard
uses him.  Andy pays the tailor for information gleaned from his
government clients.  Pendel, a peon in their eyes, simply makes stuff up
in order to get the payoffs.
Of course, this spirals out of control until a real crisis develops --
but who knows how far it will go, all based on the lies of a lowly
tailor?
To be honest, who cares?  The outrageous and wholly unbelievable plot
developments of The Tailor of Panama are hardly its selling points. 
Instead, it's fun to delight in the performance of Brosnan as a
borderline bad guy -- an unrepentant lech who spews invective and
innuendo at every turn.  Rush's character, playing opposite him in
virtually half the movie, blurts his responses out well enough so that
he just about keeps pace with Osnard.  Their interchanges are fun, and
the opposite actors work well onscreen together.
Less interesting but also worthy are the supporting players, including
Jamie Lee Curtis (somewhat miscast as Pendel's brazen wife), Catherine
McCormack, and Brendan Gleeson -- all pawns in the various plots going
on.  Boorman's direction is vintage Boorman -- which is to say, there
isn't much of it, but at least it doesn't get in the way.
The Tailor of Panama is hardly a great movie -- but maybe it's because
it's just too soon for Noriega-era nostalgia.  I mean, we're only on our
second President Bush.  But if it were 20 years later, or if the plot
were a little more straightforward or if they picked up the pace, would
it really have mattered?  I doubt it; ultimately, The Tailor of Panama
is no more unlikely a tale than your typical Bond movie -- it's just a
lot less fun.
Director: John Boorman
Producer: John Boorman
Writer: John Boorman, Andrew Davies, John Le Carré
Starring: Pierce Brosnan, Geoffrey Rush, Leonor Varela, Jamie Lee
Curtis, Brendan Gleeson, Harold Pinter, Catherine McCormack, Daniel
Radcliffe, Lola Boorman
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/tailorofpanama/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Charlie's Angels (2000)
The spy game is up.  You can thank Charlie's Angels -- the movie -- for
that.
When did banality and pandering become okay?  Just steal from Hong Kong,
The Matrix, and a kitschy TV show from the mid-1970s and that's a
movie?  Charlie's Angels is one of the worst examples of action film
homogeneity and shameless duplicity in any film I've seen in ages.
Charlie's Angels is dumb.  Just plain dumb.  As we all know, three of
the hottest females on the planet -- Drew Barrymore, Cameron Diaz, and
Lucy Liu -- are three super-agents working for the mysterious
millionaire named Charlie.  They all drive fast cars, look
oh-so-fabulous even in the morning, and don't seem to get a scratch even
when fighting armed men, having buildings explode ten feet in front of
them, or flying through the air in Matrix slow-motion.  And while the
entourage spends 90 minutes romping around in cleavage-busting wetsuits,
cleavage-busting waitress uniforms, and cleavage-busting wet t-shirts,
they scarcely succeed in resembling so much as a group of annoying,
drunk sorority girls, the kind who hit on everybody at a party.
The actual plot revolves around the ridiculous story of a millionaire
computer engineer -- the great Sam Rockwell -- who gets kidnapped by a
mysterious rival computer company.  Of course, the rival wants control
of his new personal identification system, which involves such
latter-day buzzwords as GPS, cellular tracking, and even mainframe.  The
amazing Crispin Glover lends his acting chops as a crazed henchmen
involved in all the nasty things that happen to the Angels -- like
battling each of them in many round-robin Matrix rip-off (again) fight
sequences and harboring a strange attraction to sliced-off locks of the
Angels' hair.  The coup de grace is Bill Murray as Bosley, serving as
Charlie's manservant, or, more to the point, the Angels' pimp.
The rest of the movie comprises a revenge arc, enough costume changes to
fill three productions of Les Miserables, carbon-copy fight sequences
that would lend credible evidence to a Jackie Chan and the Wachowski
brothers lawsuit for intellectual property theft, and the strange
transformation of Sam Rockwell into Mickey Rourke's long-lost brother.
Charlie's Angels starts off with a bang and ends up being a soggy
burrito left out overnight.  Nothing is difficult, plausible, or
believable in any of the Angels' actions.  It feels like The Matrix,
Mission: Impossible 2, and Cleopatra Jones and the Casino of Gold all
rolled into one.  Diaz is a knucklehead.  Barrymore is the "dangerous
one," mean and tough and about as believable as Katie Holmes in the
role.  Liu is just... Lucy Liu, looking good in a skin-tight black
leather suit.
The list of movies from which Charlie's Angels is directly lifted is
equally astonishing.  The writers apparently ran the copier all night
stealing scenes from Armageddon, Lethal Weapon II, all of Jackie Chan's
movies, The Great Escape, Saturday Night Fever, Revenge of the Nerds,
Payback, Darkman, Dr. No, The Matrix (as mentioned), and even TV's
Friends.  It's a shame, too, because one of the many screenwriters, John
August, was at the helm of last year's favorite, Go.  Then again, what
can you expect from a director known solely as "McG."
There is no camp value in the film, no interesting main characters, no
invigorating action scenes, no reason at all to waste your time except
to ogle the hot chicks and enjoy the performances of a few supporting
players.  Note to Hollywood: Next time, let's leave the TV shows on the
TV.
Director: McG
Producers: Leonard Goldberg, Drew Barrymore, Nancy Juvonen
Starring: Cameron Diaz, Drew Barrymore, Lucy Liu, Bill Murray, Sam
Rockwell, Luke Wilson, Crispin Glover
Writers: Ryan Rowe, Ed Solomon, John August
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/charliesangels/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Waterworld (1995)
     In the future, the polar ice caps have melted, the world is
covered by water, and everyone is left to fend for themselves as
scavengers in a grim reality.  This is WATERWORLD, and you'll be glad
to know: even in this harsh realm, the women still shave their legs.
     The most expensive movie ever made (the final word is $172
million), WATERWORLD will be a true monument in Kevin Costner's
career.  Unfortunately, this film isn't going to have quite the effect
something like DANCES WITH WOLVES had.  The bottom line is WATERWORLD
is a marginal film: always extravagant, sometimes entertaining, often
preachy and dull--a pure formula picture.
     The story is time-tested and painfully simple.  Costner plays The
Mariner, a lone drifter on the watery surface of the earth who talks
about his boat more than Forrest Gump.  Jeanne Tripplehorn (THE FIRM)
plays Helen, the love interest and the protector of Enola (Tina
Majorino), a child with a strange tattoo which just may show the way to
the mythical paradise of Dryland.  The obligatory bad guy is The Deacon
(Dennis Hopper), a slave driver/preacher with heavy artillery that acts
a lot like, well, Dennis Hopper.  I won't be the only one to say, "It's
MAD MAX on water."
     Of course, The Deacon wants the kid.  The Mariner wants to protect
her and falls in love with Helen.  So for 134 minutes, The Deacon
chases the trio, turning up over and over and over, always out of
nowhere (ever try to hide on the ocean?), and always being thwarted by
The Mariner.  Basically, it's Costner trying to be a superhero,
swinging around on a *lot* of ropes and blowing up everything else.
     This gets pretty old after awhile, especially since Costner looks
more concerned with what's for dinner than what's on the screen.  The
other problems are innumerable:  it's hard to figure out where the
story is headed, the bad guys act like members of a bumbling Keystone
Coast Guard, and a number of effects are obvious digital fakes.  There
are a few bright spots, but it ends up being a passable story with
lackluster execution.
     All the hype surrounding this film has really spoiled what there
was to enjoy.  If you see it, you'll probably be trying to figure out
where all that money went, too (I only counted about $100 million).
It's too bad; you'll need that brainpower just to figure out what's
going on.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
     When I asked Wes Anderson and Owen Wilson what would be next after
1996's BOTTLE ROCKET, they told me they were working on a number of
projects about "serious things."  I expressed skepticism then, and it
turns out it was justly founded.  RUSHMORE is anything but serious,
despite the Presidential-sounding name.
     So, what is Rushmore?  Rushmore is a prestigious private school in
Nowhere, U.S.A. (actually Houston and Dallas, Texas), where its most
vocal student, Max (Schwartzman), is also its worst academically. 
RUSHMORE the movie follows Max in his travails at school, where he falls
hopelessly in love with teacher Miss Cross (Williams, straight from THE
POSTMAN and a haircut).  Unwilling to accept that the age differential
is a concern, the 15-year old Max embarks on a grand scheme to build an
enormous aquarium as a symbol of affection.  That he builds it on the
school's baseball diamond is what gets him thrown out of Rushmore.
     Lest I forget myself in failing to mention Oscar-worthy Bill Murray
(with Billy Bob Thornton, one of the only two Best Supporting Actors
1998 had) as the wrench in Max's master plan.  Murray appears as one Mr.
Blume, a rich curmudgeon of an industrialist who at first funds Max's
plans, then tries to steal Miss Cross away for himself.
     Typing it out, it all sounds very conventional, but it's not.  Next
to THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, RUSHMORE is one of only a handful of
solid, funny comedies of 1998.  And how funny it is!  Anderson and
Wilson's writing is spot-on yet surrealistic.  The dialogue is bizarre
and full of non-sequiturs, yet wildly entertaining.  The whole film
plays as a near fantasy, where the adults act like children, and the
children act like adults.  And no one's the wiser to the switch.
     RUSHMORE is a truly American film that deserves to be seen by many,
many people.  How many of those are going to "get it" remains a mystery.
Director: Wes Anderson
Producer: Barry Mendel, Paul Schiff
Writer: Wes Anderson, Owen Wilson
Starring: Jason Schwartzman, Bill Murray, Olivia Williams, Brian Cox,
Seymour Cassel, Mason Gamble
http://movies.go.com/rushmore/index.html
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
     DEEP IMPACT makes no apologies for being a sob-fest.  I mean, how else
do you smash a comet into the earth without killing off a few hundred
million people, and breaking a few hearts in the process?  As the first
disaster-from-space film of the year, DEEP IMPACT sets the bar at an
interesting level.  It's not an action film, although it has action
elements.  It's not a thriller, although suspense is in the mix.  It's more
a drama than anything else, the main story lines being a reporter (Leoni)
estranged from her father, a young astronomer (Wood) who finds he can't
abandon his girlfriend, and a codgery astronaut (Duvall) who gains
acceptance among a younger crew.
     Against the backdrop of a giant comet en route to the planet, it's a
surprise that there are so many lulls in the story where there's little to
do but check your watch.  Still, ER veteran Leder directs the action with
sufficient flair to keep you interested and keep those Kleenex in action.
     I'm not immune.  Once you get past the urge to dismiss the whole
shebang as an unlikely bit of Hollywood trickery, there are so many
sacrifices in the film from so many characters... even a cynic like me can
get a bit teary-eyed.
     Overall, it's a refreshing change of pace from the big budget
extravangzas that Tinseltown regularly trots out.
Director: Mimi Leder
Producer: David Brown, Richard D. Zanuck
Writer: Bruce Joel Rubin, Michael Tolkin
Starring: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave, Morgan
Freeman, Maximilian Schell, James Cromwell, Ron Eldard, Jon Favreau, Laura
Innes, Mary McCormack
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
     Paul Verhoeven's latest homage to Big Acting and overdirection is
light on the naked chicks and heavy on the violence, because, as it
turns out, being invisible makes you insane and clearly Mad With Power. 
And the chicks just get in the way of that.
     I guess I'm getting ahead of myself.  The Invisible Man gets a
millennial upgrade to Hollow Man, when a team of government-contracted
scientists led by Kevin Bacon's Sebastian Cole figures out how to "phase
shift" (ahem) a person to become completely invisible.  As we are told
during one briefing, the phase shifting is the easy part (of course). 
It's undoing the process and making someone visible again that's tricky.
     When Cole successfully un-phase shifts a gorilla, he figures, what
the hay, he'll try it on himself.  All goes well until, oopsy, the
un-shifting doesn't work on humans!  As Cole simmers as an invisible man
trying to figure out how to revisible-ize, stuck at the lab -- located,
quite naturally, in a pit dug hundreds of feet into the earth and with
only one exit -- he starts to go crazy.
     To be honest, even the most bored observer will see that Cole was
crazy to begin with, and it comes as no surprise when he starts offing
his staff, who are threatening to tattle about the illegal/unethical
human trial to their Pentagon benefactors.  Most notable among them is
Linda (Elisabeth Shue), an ex-girlfriend who's now having a fling with
another researcher named Matt (Josh Brolin)....  Two guys out of four on
staff?  Linda must be the trampiest medical professional on film to
date.
     For good and for bad, Verhoeven avoids the ambition of grandiose
movies like Starship Troopers, and Hollow Man ends up taking place
mostly in the budget-friendly underground cave -- just like any number
of "trapped on a ship" sea monster movies, only with no water and an
invisible monster.
     To say that Kevin Bacon is a ham in this film would be insulting to
pigs.  (Insert your own "bacon" joke here.)  While Shue makes a more
credible scientist here than she did in The Saint, it's still a stretch
to see her in a role that isn't either a prostitute or a babysitter.
     But ultimately, Hollow Man is simply a paean to some dazzling
special effects, the sophistication of which I don't think I've ever
seen -- mind-bending in their complexity, blood curdling in their
goriness, and almost unthinkable in their realism.  There's
water-covered invisible man, burning invisible man, and blood-spattered
invisible man.  The capper of course is the phase shift process, one of
the more gruesome events ever put to film, and not merely because of the
prominence of Bacon's skin-stripped male member.  Of course, never mind
the ersatz scientific holes (mainly, if you un-phase shift from the
inside-out, why do you phase shift from the outside-in? -- the serum
still starts in your veins and works through the body that way).
     Whatever.  Hollow Man is disturbing enough to be fun, and utterly
dumb enough to not get in the way of the former.  Just like that other
Verhoeven classic.  You know:  Showgirls.
Director: Paul Verhoeven
Producer: Alan Marshall, Douglas Wick
Writer: Andrew W. Marlowe
Starring: Kevin Bacon, Josh Brolin, Kim Dickens, Greg Grunberg, Mary Jo
Randle, Elisabeth Shue, Joey Slotnick
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/hollowman/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Watcher, The (2000)
     Following one of the most pitiful title sequences I've ever seen,
The Watcher actually proceeds to become one of the most pitiful
thrillers I've ever seen.  And that takes some doing... but let me tell
you how.
     I give the movie half a point for its mildly eyebrow-raising
premise.  An L.A. serial killer (Reeves) has finally worn down the cop
who was chasing him (James Spader) to the point where he can no longer
function in society.  The cop gives up on the chase after a dozen-plus
murders go unsolved, moves to Chicago, and tries to drop out of life
with his migraine medication.  Only the killer tracks him down, 2,000
miles away, and tries to revive their old cat-and-mouse game, by mailing
our hero a photograph of an anonymous and lovely young lady, sentencing
her to die in 24 hours if the cops can't track her down.  Surprise:
Witness some of the worst police work in movie history as the cops can't
track her down.  Rinse and repeat.
     Like I said, it's a semi-interesting premise once you get past the
fact that Nancy Drew could put these cops to shame.  But of course, it's
all ruined by shoddy acting and some just-plain-God-awful filmmaking
that is shameful in its incompetence.  Reeves is utterly wooden, as if
he is reading his lines from a TelePrompTer that's running too slow, and
with nary a "Whoa" to utter.  Spader is fine yet unimpressive.  And
Marisa Tomei -- starring as Spader's shrink and a would-be victim of the
killer -- has turned positively ghoulish now that she's reached
maturity.  (Note: She's supposed to be one of those "lovely young
ladies" I mentioned above.)
     But let's get down to the worst offendor.  Director Joe Charbanic
(absolutely no credits on record aside from a few crappy music videos)
has no business being behind a camera at all and should retire now
before someone gets hurt.  This is Film School 101 stuff, what with the
ridiculous use of blurred-motion video footage (you see, we're looking
through the killer's eyes!), the positive-negative-positive effect to
make things oh-so-creepy, sudden flashes of white light, and, well, more
blurred-motion video footage.  My cat could puke up a better film after
a diet of canned tuna and fur.
     Which reminds me: As a funny footnote to The Watcher, Keanu Reeves
has actually hired Charbanic to direct a music video or two for his band
Dogstar (which is reportedly quite awful).  My poor kitty may be spared
some work after all.
Director: Joe Charbanic
Producer: Chris Eberts, Elliott Lewitt, Jeff Rice
Writer: David Elliot, Clay Ayers
Starring: Keanu Reeves, James Spader, Marisa Tomei, Ernie Hudson
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi III: Chao ji jing cha (1992)
     The Jackie Chan franchise continues to expand in America.  Riding on
the success of last year's RUMBLE IN THE BRONX, Chan returns to U.S.
screens with the release of SUPERCOP.
     Relying on the three pillars of Chandom -- blazingly fast fights,
awesome stunts, and bad dubbing -- Chan once again turns out a crowd
pleaser full of karate chops and busted skulls.  Basically a continuation
of Chan's POLICE STORY series, fans of this genre will find themselves in
familiar territory.
     Okay, there's a bit about him infiltrating a Hong Kong heroin cartel
and, with some serious help from his associate (Michelle Khan), pretty much
kicks everyone's butt.  (How the studio justifies advertising Chan as
"single-handedly" kicking said butt is a mystery to me.)
     So on top of a watery James Bond plot are fights so fast you can't
tell whose limbs are whose, Chan's unique brand of humor, and, as I said,
lots of really, really bad dubbing.  At some level, one begins to wonder
whether this is intentional or not -- if this is just another aspect of the
comedy or if it's really the best they can do.  (About half the Asian
characters have British accents.)
     But who cares?  You don't see a Jackie Chan movie for the sound
quality any more than you watch a Pauly Shore movie for poignant and witty
observations about life.  What you see it for is some huge-ass explosions,
Chan and Khan beating the living crap out of everyone in sight, and a
helicopter-meets-train finale that makes MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE look like an
episode of "Sesame Street."  Then again, that plot gets in the way an awful
lot, slowing down the film unbearably at times... but overall, the picture
manages to keep moving along.
     Special kudos for Ms. Khan, who plays, without a doubt, the strongest
female character I've ever seen in film.  And, as always, don't forget to
stay through the final credits for Chan's twisted version of bloopers, most
of which involve a painful injury of some sort... in case you hadn't gotten
enough of that in the prior 90 minutes.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Bullfighter (2000)
     And here I was, expecting a movie about bullfighting.
     This cryptic little indie starts out with the story of a Frenchman
(Olivier Martinez) in Mexico, fascinated with bullfighting, indeed.
When his cute little girlfriend unleashes a bull on him for some unknown
reason, she ends up getting gored.  That's bad enough, but her dad turns
out to be a major crime boss, and he proceeds to go on a rampage against
our poor Frenchman.
     Hooking up with Mary (Star Trek: TNG's Michelle Forbes), the duo
begin a "fantasy adventure" that transcends any sense of reality,
culminating in the birth of a new messiah who is dubbed "Pumpkin."
     BULLFIGHTER is ultimately a blatant ripoff of Robert Rodriguez's EL
MARIACHI, made for obviously no money by indie vet L.M. Kit Carson and
his crew.  Strangely enough, Rodriguez actually has a cameo in this
movie, which says to me he's paying off Carson for all his support of
indie filmmaking.
     And while EL MARIACHI is a truly great film, BULLFIGHTER is
anything but.  The story is supposed to be farcical (I think), but it
just comes off as stupid and tiresome.  The camerawork is bad, the
editing is atrocious (each scene transition uses a grating
jump-back-and-forth-five-times method which makes you want to kill
yourself after 10 minutes of it).  The special effects typically involve
a strobe light.  This is not a good thing.
     What is mildly good is Forbes (the only real actor in the picture),
and Martinez makes for a curiously understated action hero.  If only he
didn't mutter all his lines beneath his breath, thus rendering the
picture even less comprehensible.
Director: Rune Bendixen
Producer: L.M. Kit Carson, Majken Gilmartin, Cynthia Hargrave
Writer: Rune Bendixen, Hunter Carson, L.M. Kit Carson
Starring: Michelle Forbes, Olivier Martinez, Michael Parks, Jared
Harris, Willem Dafoe
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Climax (2000)
Truth be told, Climax is not about anything at all.
What might consume 90 seconds in any other movie is drawn out to 84
minutes here: the party scene.  Set during an anonymous suburban rager
in some guy's parents' house, the mostly-male college-age crew assemble
here to wax about their high school past, discuss the ins and outs (so
to speak) of pornography, drink a lot of beer, puke even more of it, and
play Coca-Cola baseball by taking swings at full cans of soda.
Sounds like a party to me, but a movie it really doesn't make. 
Reportedly based on surreptitious recordings of other people's party
conversations over nearly 10 years the film has a vaguely anachronistic
feeling... almost like it's based on surreptitious recordings of other
people's party conversations over nearly 10 years.  And not to nitpick,
but never have I seen so much production equipment (namely lights)
caught on camera.
Still, watching the jerks and the geeks collide over Dr. Who nostalgia
is enough fun to merit sitting through its short running time, though
its utter lack of structure may have you wishing you'd opted to spend
the night at a swanky club instead of swilling from the keg in some
guy's garage.
Director: Sean Baker
Producer: Koorosh Yaraghi
Writer: Sean Baker
Starring: Fred Berman, Matthew Dawson, Paul Weissman, Susan Stanley,
Matthew Maher, Vincent Radwinsky, David Ari
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Cité des enfants perdus, La (1995)
     The long-awaited follow-up to DELICATESSEN is another surrealist
adventure into the questionably sane minds of French creators
Jean-Pierre Jeunet and Marc Caro.  It's been four years since that
film, and their new picture, THE CITY OF LOST CHILDREN, is twice as
strange and almost as good.
     A twist on the typical fairy tale, THE CITY OF LOST CHILDREN is
the story of an evil genius named Krank (Daniel Emilfork) and his
henchmen of mechanically-enhanced Cyclops, six identical Clones (all
played by Dominique Pinon), the tiny and bossy Miss Bismuth (Mireille
Mosse), and a disembodied brain (voiced by Jean-Louis Trintignant)
which provides the philosophical foundation for the group.  The band of
genetically-engineered characters live on a man-made island off shores
of a coastal city, and it is from this city that Krank's thugs kidnap
children.  Why?  Because Krank is unable to dream, he attempts to steal
them from the children's minds.
     When the adopted brother (Joseph Lucien) of a circus strongman
named One (Ron Perlman) is stolen, One goes on a crusade to save him.
On his way, he hooks up with a nine-year-old ingenue/street punk named
Miette (Judith Vittet), and they develop a symbiotic bond in their
quest to destroy Krank's plot.
     If you saw DELICATESSEN (and I highly recommend you do), you'll
know what I mean when I say it gets *much* stranger than this.  Full of
vibrant imagery and elaborate sets that seem half from the 1700's and
half from the 2100's, THE CITY OF LOST CHILDREN pushes style to the
limit, while occasionally causing substance to lag behind.  While the
movie sometimes gets so convoluted it's impossible to tell exactly
what's going on, it's always fun to watch.
     Be sure you know what's on the menu if you decide to see this
film.  Expect some incredible effects, especially Pinon's unprecedented
six-fold presence, plus one of the best serendipitous-chain-of-events
sequences ever filmed.  Angelo Badalamenti (who scored "Twin Peaks")
provides appropriately haunting music as well.  You might not "get"
this film when you leave the theater, but you'll be sure to have had a
terrific time.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Michael Collins (1996)
     The time between 1916 and the 1920s saw the worst of a revolt that
caused the creation the IRA and heightened the fight for independence
between Ireland and the crown in London.  At the head of this fight,
like it or not, was Michael Collins, a demagogue/saboteur/freedom
fighter that lived as a hero and died a martyr.
     Read it once again -- this is *not* BRAVEHEART.  BRAVEHEART took
place something like 600 years earlier, and just a stone's throw across
the North Channel, in Scotland.
     Otherwise, it's the same movie, except Neil Jordan's paean to the
Irish hero leaves much to be desired by the discriminating viewer. 
Jordan, best known for his masterpiece THE CRYING GAME, really seems to
be falling apart these days (did *you* stay awake during INTERVIEW WITH
THE VAMPIRE?).  Now he's back with MICHAEL COLLINS, a rambling,
138-minute epic that could have easily been cut to 90, and has its good
points and its bad -- but the bad really stick out like sore thumbs.
     Using more scrolling title cards than I've ever seen before, at
first I thought MICHAEL COLLINS was going to be a read-along.  But
instead of incorporating this information about Collins (Liam Neeson)
into the story, Jordan tacks on the printed Michael Collins at-a-glance
biography and just plugs the movie full of the same sequence over and
over again.  (That sequence is this:  the IRA guys are asleep, then the
Brits come on a raid, then the IRA guys get away just in time.  Whew!)
     Then there's the what-on-earth-were-you-thinking decision to put
Julia Roberts in this movie as Kitty Kiernan, the woman torn between
Collins and his once-best friend Harry Boland (Aidan Quinn).  Seriously,
my Irish accent is better than Roberts's, and I'm from *Texas*.
     The real story of Michael Collins may be a good one -- full of
intrigue, infighting with the Irish President Eamon De Valera (Alan
Rickman), bloody war with the English, and a struggle to get the girl
with the bad Irish accent.  The problem is that Jordan tells the story
like it's a history lesson, and a dull one at that.  Yes, the movie's
full of good acting (exception noted above), gory violence, and lavish
sets (all of which are blown up by the end of the film), but it ends up
being just another over-indulgent sermon by a misguided preacher.
     [The author of this review is not responsible for historical
inaccuracies in either the film or this critique.]
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Finding Forrester (2000)
     They're already calling it "Good Will Hunting in the hood," and
it's for good reason.  Gus Van Sant's latest takes us back to the inner
city (or The Bronx, at least) for a second verse of that feel-good
feeling, with none other than Sean Connery as a crotchety old shut-in
who teaches (and learns from, natch) a local teen (Rob Brown) who sneaks
into his apartment.
     If you've seen the trailer, you know the story.  The local Bronx
kids live in fear of "the window," a ghostlike man who stares down at
them creepily while they shoot hoops.  On a dare, young Jamal (Brown)
sneaks into the place, finding it cluttered with books.  He's given a
scare and Jamal runs off, leaving his backpack behind.
     The next day, his backpack returns from the sky, and lo and behold
we learn of Jamal's true passion -- not for basketball, no.  For the
written word.  And inside the pack, he finds his six journals, which
apparently go everywhere with him, have been edited and critiqued by the
man in the window.
     It's tortuous plotting, but eventually Jamal befriends the peeper
(Connery), who turns out to be none other than William Forrester, the
famed author of a single novel published some 50 years ago -- a novel
which won a Pulitzer and inexplicably drove its author into hiding.
     An obvious stand-in for J.D. Salinger, Connery's character is a
neurotic shut-in, crippled with anxiety and unable to leave his home. 
He drinks and pontificates and wears his socks inside out.  And he
starts teaching Jamal how to write.  (And as a side note from this
professional writer to any aspiring writer types reading this review --
please do not try to take Forrester's advice.)
     Events transpire and Jamal winds up in a Manhattan prep school
where he is soon accused of plagiarism due to his astounding,
accelerated growth as a writer.  That he is one of few blacks in a
ritzy, almost-all-white environment (you know, he plays basketball) adds
fuel to the fire.  It'll take a miracle to get Jamal out of this jam --
and you'll just have to imagine the shocking conclusion of the film. 
Unless you already saw it in the trailer, I mean.
     Unfortunately, the fact that the entire story of Finding Forrester
can be told verbatim in 60 seconds during a TV commercial doesn't really
matter.  This is the kind of film where our young hero has time in every
day for playing basketball, writing at Forrester's place, writing at
home (as he's not allowed to remove his work from Forrester's
apartment), plus, ostensibly, doing his schoolwork and sleeping.  (What,
no part-time job?)  This is a Hollywood movie, and it's unabashedly so. 
Forrester is larger than life in the way that only Connery can be. 
Jamal is larger than life as well, the actor that plays him custom-made
to repeat that Matt Damon/Ben Affleck Good Will Hunting Oscar magic. 
You'll hear this a lot: Rob Brown was born in Harlem and has no training
as an actor.  And he isn't acting here, he's reading his lines, being
himself, and wondering how the hell he got on the set of a big-time
movie.  The press is going to eat this guy up like buttah.
     Again, this is Hollywood, and all the old school
wannabe-blockbuster elements are there.  There's a commentary on class
and race, there's Busta Rhymes provided for some well-done comic relief,
and lest we begin to take the movie seriously, there's Joey Buttafuoco
making a cameo as a security guard (no, really).  The picture has the
body of Girlfight and the ending of Scent of a Woman.  It is unoriginal
and long, it is predictable and mildly pleasant, it is cranked out for
the least common denominator, and it won't offend anyone -- not even the
prep school bozos it vilifies.  That's fine.  Movies like this don't
hurt, and if they convince a few disenfranchised youths to pick up a pen
and start some writing, all the better.
     While Finding Forrester is an average film that earns my average
rating, the real disappointment is its ultimately disheartening theme
that makes you wonder how it ever got made.  (I wondered the same thing
about Good Will Hunting, but that's another story.)  The problem is
this: Much as in Hunting, which told us that anybody can pull himself
out of the hood... if they're a super-genius, Finding Forrester says
that anybody with a little talent can become a great writer... if
they're tutored by a Pulitzer Prize winner.
     I guess those kids will have to keep dreaming after all.  Merry
Christmas.
Director: Gus Van Sant
Producer: Sean Connery, Laurence Mark, Rhonda Tollefson
Writer: Mike Rich
Starring: Sean Connery, F. Murray Abraham, Michael Nouri, Rob Brown,
Anna Paquin, Busta Rhymes
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/findingforrester/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Total Recall (1990)
Arnold Schwarzenegger made a smart bet with Paul Verhoeven's futuristic
splatter-pic Total Recall.  Unlike most of the hulking killers from his
body of work (The Terminator, Conan the Barbarian), befuddled
construction worker Douglas Quaid is at a loss over how to proceed with
his memory-bending dilemma.  No amount of physical brawn will crack the
central question: Who am I?  Am I who I think I am, and if I'm someone
different, does that mean I can move beyond my former crimes?  The sleek
band of assassins are chasing him through the Orwellian streets, and
poor Quaid may be kicking the hell out of them, but Arnie is as
terrified as he's ever been.  Inside of this mountain is a mousy
everyman -- he never asked to become a superspy.
Quaid should be A-OK.  He seems satisfied with his job as a construction
worker and is married to a seemingly docile wife (Sharon Stone).  He
gets on well with his fellow employees, though his head is often in the
clouds as he dreams of Mars.  How to solve the problem?  A handy-dandy
trip to the false memory transplant center will make all his dreams come
true, asking the technogeeks to make him believe he's a top secret agent
en route to Mars on a mission (with the woman of his fantasies being a
sassy brunette, as opposed to his demure blonde wife).  No sooner has he
received the implanted memory than he starts to freak out, beating
people up, claiming that he is not Quaid.  When he wakes up, he's
himself again but unexplained killers are out to destroy him, his wife
cheerfully tries to knife him in the kitchen, and videotapes of "Quaid"
appear, telling him he's an indispensable part of the underground
resistance fighting corrupt political figure Copenhagen (Ronny Cox,
perfectly smarmy).
For the first 45 minutes, we're playing catch-up.  Is Schwarzenegger
really a spy whose trip to the false memory center triggered a series of
disturbing flashbacks, or is he just stuck in a psychotic dream world
where he gets to become the hero in his own life?  This audience
mind-bender was based on a short story by Philip K. Dick (Blade Runner),
whose fiction often dealt with different levels of perceived reality. 
Read into it what you will, it's basically The Twilight Zone with guns
and ample bloodshed.  When Rachel Ticotin shows up as the dark haired
woman of Arnie's dreams, it brings to bear the fantasy world as
escapism.  (The fact that Total Recall turns out to be a cop-out in the
Philosophical Discourse Department shouldn't surprise anyone -- it's a
popcorn movie, for cryin' out loud!)
Total Recall begins on a futuristic earth which bears more than a
passing resemblance to the financial districts of most major cities. 
Paul Verhoeven continues the mordant humor and plastic-sheen aesthetics
of his superior Robocop (and none of the Total Recall villains are as
memorable as Kurtwood Smith's nerdish superfreak, Clarence "You Burnt
the Fuckin' Money" Boddiker, who was half the size of Robocop and thrice
as deadly).  It's fast paced and surprisingly inventive with the gadgets
Quaid employs to get himself out of danger -- these include the
obligatory tracking equipment, but also a memorably eccentric "masking"
device that almost gets him through the airport terminal unharmed (as an
overweight female tourist in a bright sunflower dress.  Trippy, man. 
Phil Dick might've dug it.)
Verhoeven is unable to keep a good thing going, though.  The entire
philosophical premise and sleek look both corrode when Quaid arrives in
Mars.  Sitcom antics involving various goofball aliens in a bar give way
to endless shoot-outs.  When you can't think of anything else to do,
bring out the big guns and start splattering villains in memorably
gruesome ways.  There seems to be a desperate need to fill the audience
entertainment gap: We can't figure out how to end this flick, so let's
bring out the fireworks!  Faster, Pussycat!  Kill!  Kill!  On top of
that, the bright red textures of Mars are gauche and tacky.  Red Planet,
for all its flaws, managed to find a unique color scheme of exotic
shades (finding room for lush greens and radioactive purples).  Total
Recall is not half as ambitious, bathing everything in an unflattering
lava lamp red.  Yuck.
One more thing:  Arnold Schwarzenegger is a fool to think he'll make it
as the Johnny Carson of action films.  Sometimes it's fun, but more
often than not his reflex gag one-liners remind me of the empty Reagan
years.  On the surface, we're supposed to be amused, but there's not
much going on underneath besides heaps of bullshit-bathed swine, rotting
in the kennel.  This actually ties in with the nihilistic violence
Verhoeven relishes in.  A bullet in the head is easier to take if the
hero makes a joke after the fact.  Who's gonna cry over spilled milk or
broken bones if we're "lighthearted" about it?  Honey, I don't want to
marry you.  Excuse me while I bury the hatchet in your forehead.  Got
it, baby?  Consider that a divorce.
Director: Paul Verhoeven
Producer: Buzz Feitshans, Ronald Shusett 
Writer: Ronald Shusett, Dan O'Bannon, Jon Povill
Starring: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Rachel Ticotin, Sharon Stone, Ronny
Cox, Michael Ironside
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Crimson Tide (1995)
     CRIMSON TIDE is a new action/psychodrama about a mutiny aboard a U.S.
nuclear submarine.  When World War III is about to erupt thanks to Russian
coup-artists, the USS Alabama, helmed by Captain Frank Ramsey (Gene
Hackman) is sent to prepare for the worst.  When the order to launch comes
in, Ramsey's executive officer, Lt. Commander Ron Hunter (Denzel
Washington), clashes with the Captain over a last-minute, incomplete order
which could recall the missile launch.  The result is mutiny, with half the
ship siding with the Captain's single-minded, stubborn decision to fire,
half standing with Hunter, who wants a confirmation before blowing up the
world.
     Sound thrilling?  Well, after about 45 minutes of the two principals
philosophizing about life and war, trading quips, and smoking cigars,
*then* the action part of the film comes to life.  Unfortunately, this
prologue does little more than develop the characters like this:  Captain
Ramsey is a obstinate military man, Hunter is a thoughtful peace-lover.  In
fact, most of the lengthy dialogue is arranged to show just what a great
guy Hunter is, and that Ramsey is on the verge of being a Captain Ahab,
hunting the Russkies like they're a latter-day Moby Dick.
     When the action sequences do finally come up, they start with a
nonsensical galley fire (no one can put it out except Hunter, who--get
this--actually pushes a button on the wall to save the day).  Then there's
a flooding bilge bay, and on this ultra-high-tech ship, the preferred tool
for repairing a flooding sub is none other than a monkey wrench.  When the
radio breaks, the crew is fast at work soldering together enough wire and
circuit boards to control the U.S. telephone system.  All this talk about
the film making the military look bad isn't quite right; instead, it just
looks ridiculous.
     This all may be quibbling, but the pure silliness of some of the film
really detracts from the bulk of it, which is a gripping and tense thriller
with two armed factions of men trying to either launch or stop the launch
of ten of the Alabama's nuclear missiles.  The chemistry between Hackman
and Washington, while kept basically predictable, is still full of tension
and repressed anger as the characters are forced to maintain a surface
civility despite an obvious dislike underneath.  The set constructed to
recreate the USS Alabama and the sub combat scenes are incredibly realistic
and make the film worth watching all by themselves.
     Much has been made of the similarity between this film and movies like
THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER, TOP GUN (directed and produced by the same team
that did TIDE), and other genre pictures.  While the inevitable
similarities are apparent to some extent, they certainly don't overshadow
the picture, and like the flaws discussed above, they don't keep CRIMSON
TIDE from being a worthwhile film.

Title
Review for Mighty Aphrodite (1995)
     I guess it's true that you can't win 'em all.  One of my favorite
writers and directors, Woody Allen, just released his 25th film as
director.  Unfortunately, his recent streak of wildly funny films
(including HUSBANDS AND WIVES and BULLETS OVER BROADWAY), his hit a speed
bump with the unfulfilling MIGHTY APRODITE.
     It's a contemporary story about--surprise--a neurotic New Yorker
(Allen) and his dysfunctional relationships and search for happiness. 
Allen's character, Lenny, is a sports writer this time.  He's married to
Amanda (Helena Bonham Carter), with whom he rather suddenly adopts a
child.  When marriage with Amanda starts to fizzle and their new son Max
begins to shine, Lenny begins to wonder if Max's real mother might just be
the girl for him.  Come to find out, mom is really prostitute/porn actress
Linda (Mira Sorvino), and Allen's paranoia and angst really begin to
shine.
     As you can imagine, this scenario makes for some perfect comic
opportunities.  Unfortunately, the time needed to set this up is extreme,
as is the time needed to resolve everything at the end.  The result is a
few good bits of comedy right in the middle of the movie, when Lenny is
first getting to know Linda.  The rest of it, about Amanda's wandering eye
and Lenny's attempt to set Linda up with a boxer (Michael Rapaport), is
simply limp.
     The worst of all is Allen's decision to use an inexplicable "chorus,"
in the style of an old Greek tragedy, in lieu of his own narration.  So
between scenes of downtown Manhattan, we switch to an ancient stone stage,
where 20 guys in period costume wax poetic about Lenny's dilemma.  It's
cute, but it never really works.  Allen is usually skilled at pulling off
this kind of out-of-place addition (as in ALICE, THE PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO,
and others), but this time it's just too much and too silly.
     Mira Sorvino's Linda is the one to watch, pulling off the "ditzy
blonde" more memorably than anyone else has in recent years.  Allen's
acting is good, but he seems a bit tired, and most of the additional
supporting cast is solid.  Helena Bonham Carter turned out to be an
enormous casting mistake, completely lacking credibility as a New York
high society type, mainly because she keeps slipping in and out of her
naturally thick British accent.  It's almost painful to listen to her.
     The real disappointment here is that MIGHTY APRHODITE lacks the rich
subtlety of Allen's previous work.  You can watch ANNIE HALL a hundred
times and catch something new with each viewing.  MIGHTY APHRODITE beats
its messages over your head with a stick.  Like the chorus directly states
at the end:  "Isn't life ironic?"  Well, yeah.  But there are much better
ways to tell us about it.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
     At this point, I don't know what I'd say about SAVING PRIVATE RYAN,
even if I hadn't liked it.
     Undoubtedly this year's hype leader among "quality" pictures, RYAN
hasn't garnered a word of bad buzz aside from the stern and dire warnings
about its overwhelming violence content.  It's no lie: RYAN may be one of
the goriest films ever made - it will certainly be the goriest to ever win
an Oscar (which will come in droves: I predict seven).
     An excellent companion piece to SCHINDLER'S LIST, Spielberg has
obviously poured his heart into this movie.  The well-known story of a small
group's search for James Ryan (Damon), whose three brothers were killed
nearly simultaneously, is as simple and as powerful as they come.
     The battle scenes, which encompass probably 100 minutes of the circa
160-minute running time, are epic in proportion.  The idle moments in
between are also worth your attention, although, in the end and in
retrospect, they can seem a bit pithy on occasion, especially the bookend
scenes of the elderly Ryan returning to Normandy to pay his respects.  For
Speilberg, there's no such thing as going too far to get you to cry.
     Still, RYAN's easily a top contender for best film of the year, thanks
to the gut-wrenching realism that pervades every scene of the picture.  I
only hope Spielberg can come to grips with the remnants of JURASSIC PARK
that still must linger in his blood, making him take the easy-cheesy way out
(eg. the planes from above that save the day) when working through the
actual story gets a bit too hairy.
Director: Steven Spielberg
Producer: Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn, Steven Spielberg
Writer: Robert Rodat
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Matt Damon, Jeremy Davies
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Cool Crime (1999)
     Would that simple words could describe the goings-on of COOL CRIME,
an indie black comedy reminiscent of BLUE VELVET.
     In base terms, the story follows an Italian immigrant named Nino
(Ackert), who comes to America to live in L.A. with his uncle.  Sadly,
upon arrival, uncle (who turns out to be a drug dealer) is dead.  But
things get really strange when the spirit of the dead uncle comes to
visit Nino, pleading for revenge.
     That's only the beginning, and patient viewers will no doubt be
rewarded by director Cohen-Olivar's nuanced work.  I'm not that patient
a person, so COOL CRIME's more mellow moments tended to drag me down. 
But many of the Tarantino fueled scenes and outrageous characters have
their moments, even if the film, as a whole, is uneven.
     Ultimately and unfortunately, I saw the "surprise" ending coming,
but I suspect most people reading this review don't have the
hyperintelligence that I do, so you'll probably sit up in your seat. 
Suffice it to say that this is a picture that could only take place in
L.A.
Director: Jerome Cohen-Olivar
Starring: David Ackert, Ari Barak, Kelly Bovino, Robert Cicchini,
Melinda Hill
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
     Robin Williams wants -- and needs -- nothing more than to have his
own THE TRUMAN SHOW -- a Hail Mary to ward off permanent stereotyping.
Typecast as a goofy loudmouth in throwaway films ranging from MRS.
DOUBTFIRE to FATHER'S DAY to FLUBBER, you have to look back all the way
to THE FISHER KING in 1991 for his last great starring role.
     BICENTENNIAL MAN aims to turn that all around by making Williams
something we can relate to once again.  Ironically, that's not as a
human:  It's as a robot.
     As the robotic Andrew, Williams starts out his life in 2005 San
Francisco as a run-of-the-mill android with an unexplained glitch that
makes him able to experience emotions and gives him creativity.  Andrew
then embarks on a 200-year quest to discover the nature of humanity,
absorbing lessons on art, freedom, love, and ultimately mortality.  (In
other words, the same problems Williams was dealing with in "Mork &
Mindy.")
     It's an ambitious movie and it positively sprawls at close to 2 1/2
hours in length.  Audiences expecting that Robin slapstick are going to
be sorely mistaken.  As a robot, Andrew's only laughs come from his
unintentional mangling of jokes and turns of the phrase like "Swine
Lake."
     No, they're not exactly belly laughs.  And while BICENTENNIAL MAN
is indeed a thoughtful drama with excellent production values, it's
clearly lacking in a number of subtle ways.  Most annoying is the
plastic utopia that the film-world becomes, complete with (of course)
flying cars, metallic skyscrapers, and all-white hospital interiors.
San Francisco, one of the most crowded cities in the country, appears to
be an oasis -- everyone's apartment is enormous -- I wish!  In 2205, I
don't expect the world's foremost concern will be wrestling over the
question, Are robots human?
     But my main criticism of the film is that its protagonist is
obviously *not* a robot but is actually Robin Williams.  Jim Carrey
convinced us that he was Truman Burbank, and he convinced me that he was
Andy Kaufman, too.  Robin Williams does not convince you that he is
anything other than Robin Williams.  It's just a milder version of
himself.  It's DEAD POETS SOCIETY Robin.
     Despite its flaws, BICENTENNIAL MAN is imminently watchable, and on
the whole it's a good time.  Just don't expect a life-altering
experience to be had.  But do expect to see Williams back to his old
song and dance again next year.
Director: Chris Columbus
Producer: Wolfgang Petersen, Gail Katz, Laurence Mark, Neal Miller,
Chris Columbus, Mark Radliffe, Michael Barnathan
Writer: Nicholas Kazan
Starring: Robin Williams, Embeth Davidtz, Sam Neill, Oliver Platt,
Kiersten Warren, Wendy Crewson, Hallie Kate Eisebnerg, Lindze Letherman
http://movies.go.com/bicentennialman/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for 3000 Miles to Graceland (2001)
Those of you hoping to hear about a clever casino heist picture in the
style of Ocean's Eleven are in for a sore disappointment.  From this
movie's opening frames, featuring dueling CGI-animated scorpions, it's
obvious that we're in for some punk-ass director's idea of a snazzy
action film.
3000 Miles to Graceland is not the realization of that dream.
No, any sense of clever in Graceland's casino heist has to be scraped
from its ubiquitous Elvis costumes and Kurt Russell's masterful
hotwiring of an elevator.  The rest of the heist (and the movie) is
simply guns guns guns, as Russell, Kevin Costner, and a band of thugs
rob the Riviera casino in the midst of an Elvis impersonators'
convention.  Oh, the ingenuity!
Thirty minutes into the film, the heist is done, felons Costner and
Russell are off in different directions to spar over the loot, and
Courteney Cox stands between them as a poor man's femme fatale (with
child in tow).  Who'll end up with the money?  Who cares?  We've got 90
long minutes to go, and we're talking downhill.
I would normally say that trying to hang a movie on half-a-joke Elvis
kitsch would be a phenomenal letdown until I came to realize that the
Elvis bit is the only thing that Graceland has going for it at all.  For
two long hours, the film presents us with an unbearable litany of
unbelievable coincidences and awful continuity errors that would have
Elvis himself spinning in his grave.  (Case in point: It's only 1,600
miles by road from Las Vegas to Memphis, not 3,000.)
Graceland even manages to make bad action films look good.  Demian
Lichtenstein's music video-style direction wears thin after about five
minutes of slow-mo and fast-mo "special effects."  (Oddly enough,
Lichtenstein's past credits turn out to be, you guessed it, music
videos.)  But really, I have to fault Costner for the bulk of this
atrocity of a film simply for agreeing to be in it.  One hesitates to
ask not whether he read the script before signing on for the film, but
whether he can read at all.  On a side note to Lichtenstein and any
parents in the audience: Attempting to mask plot defects with loads of
violence tends to amplify them rather than conceal.
It's truer now more than ever... ladies and gentlemen, Elvis has left
the building.
Director: Demian Lichtenstein
Producer: Demian Lichtenstein, Eric Manes, Elie Samaha, Richard Spero,
Andrew Stevens
Writer: Richard Recco, Demian Lichtenstein
Starring: Kevin Costner, Kurt Russell, Christian Slater, Courteney Cox,
Howie Long, Jon Lovitz, David Arquette, Ice-T, Thomas Haden Church,
Kevin Pollack
http://3kmtg.warnerbros.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Encounter in the Thrid Dimension (1999)
     Shot using state of the art 3D motion picture technology, we've
come a long way since those red and blue glasses.  3-D MANIA! features
all-digital technology that puts up to 37 layers of images in a scene to
literally jump out of the screen and into your lap.
     However, it seems plot development hasn't kept up with
technological advances, and 3-D MANIA!'s story (oddball professor
(Stuart Pankin) tries to bring Elvira, Mistress of the Dark into 3D-land
in order for her to perform an awful song she wrote five long years ago)
is sad, to say the least.
     Still, it's safe to say that no one is going to go to a movie
called 3-D MANIA! for the story.  This is little more than a thrill ride
in an IMAX theater.
     Surprisingly, 3-D MANIA! does have some interesting moments when it
tours the audience through the historical origins and more recent
developments of 3D technology.  The learning-is-fun aspect of the movie
is far more enjoyable than the goofy and lame attempts at humor.  Even
Elvira's miniscule appearance is hardly worth getting excited over.
     As for the thrills of the 3D experience, if you're not going on a
virtual roller coaster ride, something is blowing up in your face.  At a
scant 40 minutes in length, this is still enough to make you nauseous
enough to stumble your way out of the theater afterwards.
http://www.nwave.com/largeformat/e3d/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for When Brendan Met Trudy (2000)
One of the liveliest comedies to come along in a decade, When Brendan
Met Trudy is an imported riot that messes with the romantic comedy genre
in such a way that it might never recover.  And I mean that in a good
way.
An offbeat Irish film, When Brendan Met Trudy is at its heart a simple
love story between staid schoolteacher Brendan (Peter McDonald) and the
mysterious Trudy (Flora Montgomery).  Brendan, an enthusiast for the
church choir and old movies, encounters Trudy in a pub after choir
practice one night, and soon enough an awkward and budding romance is
born.  Trudy says she is a Montessori teacher, so wouldn't they be a
natural fit?  Surprise, Trudy soon reveals that not only is she not a
Montessori teacher, she's really a professional burglar, and wouldn't
Brendan like to prove his nascent love by coming along on some jobs?
In other words, it's a story we can all relate to: Duplicity and its
place in romance.
It's always difficult to write a movie review that explains in words how
funny a comedy can be.  I won't do it justice, but When Brendan Met
Trudy is simply hilarious, full of small touches that no mere mortal
should have been able to dream up.  After one of their many spats, a
panicked Brendan pretends he's been hit by a car and flops down into a
rain-filled gutter, hoping Trudy will take pity on him.  Of course, she
doesn't.  In a moment of triumph, we freeze-frame on Brendan as he leaps
into the air to click his heels.  The freeze-frame ends, and Brendan
crashes down to the earth, a mess.  It's all so funny because it's all
so unexpected, and rarely in my moviegoing career have I been so
surprised by the direction a film has shot off to with the turn of each
scene.  (Not to mention: Trudy has the funniest "so-and-so became a
such-and-such" denouement subtitle sequences since Animal House.)
The man to thank for this brilliance is screenwriter Roddy Doyle, also
responsible for such Irish classics as The Commitments, The Snapper, and
The Van.  Doyle is working in a bit less family-friendly milieu this
time out, and clearly he's let his imagination run wild.  Virtually
unknown director Kieron J. Walsh -- and his two leads -- shine
throughout the picture.
Sadly, Trudy would certainly merit an even higher rating if it weren't
so difficult to understand the dialogue.  The accents, Montgomery's in
particular, are extremely thick -- we're talking Trainspotting thick; I
screened the film on video and was constantly rewinding to pick up what
had just been said.  In several instances, I never could figure out the
punch line -- and a few jokes had to go by the wayside.
Ultimately, that's of little matter.  It's too bad this film wasn't out
in the States in time for Valentine's Day, because you aren't going to
see a better bit of romance all year.  (Add a star if you're a native of
Ireland.)
http://216.167.20.103/main.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
     They are: SHE'S ALL THAT, 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU, and now,
NEVER BEEN KISSED.  All treading some familiar ground: high school
sucks.
     Maybe I can relate, and NEVER BEEN KISSED is certainly the best of
three, but really, if I have to sit through this story line one more
time, well, I'm liable to spike the punch the next time out, just to see
what happens.
     KISSED starts pretty incredulously: we are supposed to believe that
Drew Barrymore is a copy editor at the Chicago Sun-Times.  No, that's
not the stretch:  The jaw-dropper is that she has both an office *and*
an assistant!  If you're not in the publishing biz, let me say that
that's about as crazy as Drew Barrymore being the executive producer of
a feature film.  (Uh, wait a second.)
     So here we have a lovable, 25 year-old, copy-editing virgin named
Josie (Barrymore), who is sent--"undercover"--back to high school in
order to get the hot story about today's youth.  Sadly, Josie is a
big-ass loser whose personal freakshow is the best story going.  She's
alienated by the cool crowd, and only when her genuinely cool (but dim)
brother (Arquette) comes to the rescue, is she able to become Miss
Popular (and prom queen to boot).  Never mind also dropping 20 pounds
and getting a decent haircut and some fashion sense.
     There's also a subplot about Josie's somewhat creepy
would-be-affair with teacher Sam (Vartan), but ultimately it's KISSED's
frequent, unapologetic jokes and good-natured fun that redeem it above
its competition.  It may be the same old story, but at least it isn't
completely mindless.
Director: Raja Gosnell
Producer: Mark Silverstein, Sandy Isaac
Writer: Abby Kohn, Marc Silverstein
Starring: Drew Barrymore, David Arquette, Michael Vartan, Molly Shannon,
Leelee Sobieski
http://www.foxmovies.com/neverbeenkissed/
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Big Kahuna, The (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Max Messier.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/085ee8ec9855e55a8825688f0064f096?OpenDocument
When one thinks of a Big Kahuna, Kevin Spacey suits that title just
fine.  When he walks across a room in a scene, all eyes are drawn to his
presence.  His subtle pose and commanding smile act as a strong gravity
that draws all parties' interest.  Spacey's voice carries such
conviction that the most common of situations are made deep when he
speaks of them.  He echoes the great works of Barrymore and Grant and
carries the weight of these acting giants without even a shrug of the
shoulders.
The new film, The Big Kahuna, marks the first venture of Spacey's new
film production company in conjunction with Andrew Stevens's new
production company, Franchise Pictures.  I wonder of Mr. Stevens, a
veteran of late-night Cinemax, thought up the title all by himself.  The
only thing missing is Shannon Tweed.  I guess her acting chops weren't
up to par for Spacey.
The film revolves around the interesting and dramatic world of
industrial lubricant salesman holed up in Wichita, Kansas for one night,
looking for love.  No.no.sorry about that.  Got that mixed up with an
earlier Stevens film, Point of Seduction: Body Chemistry III.  The film
is actually about the interesting and dramatic world of industrial
lubricant salesman holed up in Wichita, Kansas for one night, trying to
`nail' (pun intended) a `Big Kahuna,' a CEO of a major industrial firm
that is looking to do business with some swinging industrial lubricant
salesmen.
The characters in the film are the strongest elements of the piece.  The
portrayal of men at different stages of their lives is brought to life
by the solid acting of Danny DeVito, Peter Facinelli, and Kevin Spacey.
These life stages are well-crafted: the naďve innocent babe with pure
thoughts and without character, the jaded middle-aged guy still fighting
the good fight with both fists, and the reserved older man with the
painful resolutions of a life spent without reward.  The use of mirrors
and dream states of introspection add depth and quality to the plight of
each man's silent and subconscious battle for identity.
The biggest surprise of the film is Peter Facinelli.  The infamous Mike
Dexter from Can't Hardly Wait, one of the best teenage/John Hughesian
films in recent years.  His portrayal of a religious man who would
rather sell Jesus than industrial lubricants is heavy and well-done.
The conflicts he creates with Spacey's character are some of the best
moments of the film and really show off its impressive writing.
The Big Kahuna is an amazing character study and can sit proudly among
any works by Mamet, Allen, Towne, or Schrader.  Anyone that enjoys
tightly woven films revolving around the examination of man's existence
in this somewhat strange thing we call the world will find satisfaction
with this piece of cinema.
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
     It bears repeating: Just because you happen to make an amazing,
perfectly-crafted, wildly funny movie (FARGO), doesn't mean you can do
whatever the hell you want in your follow-up and pass it off as art.
     THE BIG LEBOWSKI is the definitive answer to skeptics like me who
wondered if FARGO was the fluke, and ho-hum flicks like THE HUDSUCKER PROXY
and RAISING ARIZONA were more the norm for the Coen brothers.  They
undoubtedly are.  In THE BIG LEBOWSKI, the Coens had the world to play with
as a palette.  What they delivered is a wreck.
     The story, what little there is of one, follows Jeff "The Dude"
Lebowski (Bridges), a bum/amateur bowler who gets caught up in a
kidnapping-gone-wrong scheme involving a millionaire who happens to have the
same name.  Promising premise (even if it sounds familiar...), but the story
is totally blown on one-dimensional goofball characters, blind side plots
that go nowhere, and a meandering plotline that barely keeps you awake.
     Sure, with characters like Goodman's Vietnam vet/wacked-out bowling
buddy, Moore's new age "vaginal" artist, and, most memorably, John
Turturro's minuscule role as Jesus, the most flamboyant bowler alive, there
is plenty to be amused by in the film, and sometimes it's absolutely
riotous.  But the laughs are hollow... because the story just sits there
like a 7-10 split.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
     In order to see one of 2000's real treasures, most of you are going
to have to wait until January of 2001, when the masterful State and Main
comes to a theater near you.
     State and Main, written and directed by David Mamet (The Spanish
Prisoner, The Winslow Boy, House of Games), follows a Hollywood film
crew into the sleepy town of Waterford, Vermont, for the shooting of a
would-be blockbuster.  William H. Macy plays the director -- part
ballbuster, part smooth-talker -- who comes to Waterford after the
production kicked out of another lost-in-the-past New England locale.
     Waterford is perfect for the period piece, and the crew descends on
the village, upending the status quo, even turning geriatrics into movie
star wannabes.  Among the crew are David Paymer as the crazed producer
who wants to score some cash for a product placement for "Bazoomer.com"
despite the town's 1896 setting.  (Note to enterprising cybersquatters:
Mamet owns the domain already.  I checked.)  The excellent Phillip
Seymour Hoffman plays the stammering screenwriter, ironically unable to
find his own words much of the time.  Star and starlet are played by
Alec Baldwin and Sarah Jessica Parker, both in over-the-top roles that
nail the Hollywood ego trip perfectly.
     Notable townfolk include Julia Stiles as a barely pubescent
teenager infatuated with Baldwin and determined to bed him (and which
doesn't take much).  Charles Durning plays the pushover, starstruck
mayor to perfection, Patti LuPone his overbearing wife.  And Rebecca
Pidgeon -- aka Mrs. Mamet -- has a gem of a star turn as the
wise-beyond-her-years, local bookstore owner trying to organize an
amateur theater group -- who all abandon her when the film crew comes to
town.
     This story's been done before -- in fact, it's been done to death
-- but never with such flair and pulling off such a perfect skewering of
Hollywood.  (In fact, Mamet has been over roughly this same ground
recently with Wag the Dog.)  Hilarious from start to finish, State and
Main has so few lulls and so many memorable parts that it's hard not to
be hungry for more after it's over.  (Best line: "It's not a lie, it's a
gift for fiction.")
     Mamet juggles various intertwining plots (Parker doesn't want to do
a nude scene, Baldwin wrecks his car with the girl inside, etc. etc.)
with perfect aplomb.  The best story line also happens to include the
two best actors in the picture -- Hoffman and Pidgeon -- who find
themselves in the most peculiar -- and believable -- romance I think
I've ever seen on screen or off.
     State and Main also stays light thanks to Mamet's backing away from
his trademark clipped cadence, at least a little bit -- this dialogue is
so good it transcends just about anything you could do to it.  At the
same time, the movie is full of depth, nuance, and themes-within-themes,
courtesy of its movie-within-a-movie structure.
     I'm giving State and Main an early line for at least four Oscars
(including one for Hoffman's performance), not to mention my nod for
best picture of the year-to-date.  I hope this gem can get the buzz
going.  Go you Huskies!
Director: David Mamet
Producer: Sarah Green
Writer: David Mamet
Starring: Alec Baldwin, Charles Durning, Patti LuPone, William H. Macy,
Sarah Jessica Parker, David Paymer, Rebecca Pidgeon, Julia Stiles,
Phillip Seymour Hoffman
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
     INDEPENDENCE DAY marks the glorious realization of what, for me, has
been a nearly 25 year wait.  Countless prayers have gone unanswered, but on
this day, I have finally witnessed on screen what I have only dreamt of all
my life, for this film features the complete and total destruction of the
city of Houston through the use of nuclear weapons, *by the U.S.
government's own hand!*
     But watching my home town be blown away is only one of the charms of
ID4 (the film's hip moniker).  First there's the WAR OF THE WORLDS meets
STAR WARS meets THE RIGHT STUFF story, about a superior, marauding alien
force threatening to annihilate the human race (and almost succeeding).
And an all-star cast of freedom fighters (more on them later).  Director
Roland Emmerich, who redeems himself for the idiocy of STARGATE, and who
isn't afraid to kill off the good guys.  Some dazzling visuals.  Loud sound
effects.  *Plus* every "Star Trek" and "X-Files" fan in town in the
audience.  What more do you want?
     Character-wise, we are peppered with a litany of names and faces, all
of whom are surprisingly easy to keep straight, thanks to Emmerich's
jumping around in the setting.  Will Smith does his BAD BOYS "2001"
character.  Bill Pullman recalls Michael Douglas's AMERICAN PRESIDENT.
Jeff Goldblum:  see JURASSIC PARK.  Randy Quaid, Harvey Fierstein, Robert
Loggia... we pretty much know what to expect from these folks.  And while
they may seem a bit hackneyed at times, especially with their clich=E9-ridde=
n
dialogue, there's enough life left over to make everyone interesting.  (But
why does everyone seem to have a romance sub-plot going on?)
     And yes, maybe the plot/theme about how a few Americans banding
together can stop a vastly superior invading force, end racial discord, and
ensure world peace and harmony is a bit much, but *so what?*  If you can
suspend disbelief enough to accept an alien ship 1/4 the size of the moon
is attacking earth, you can accept the Give Peace a Chance bit.  Think:
the director is a German!
     Okay... some of the effects are a bit cheesy, too, which doesn't mix
well with the really good ones.  (The residue of people laughing *at* (not
with) the final scene on July 2 really hurts the power of the opening scene
on July 3 -- New York City in ruins, the Statue of Liberty laying
half-submerged on its side.)  Just let these crummy effects go.  Understand
that much better ones are on the way.
     Nitpicking?  Who, me?  Yes, but this time I had a lot of fun on the
ride.  The whole film is tasty, even the unintentional cheese.  Be warned,
the movie is 2 hours & 20 minutes long, so pack a picnic basket.  But I
promise it'll be an excellent trip.
     And remember:  in space, no one can hear a frying Houstonian scream.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for GoldenEye (1995)
     After six years in the freezer, Bond is back.  Any 007 fan worth his
salt will be aware of the fact that Timothy Dalton is out, and Pierce
Brosnan is in as the U.K.'s ultimate spy.  Out is Bond's Aston Martin.  In
is a new BMW.  Out with another actor playing "M."  In with Judi Dench,
the first female to take the role of Bond's crusty boss.
     But some things remain the same.  Desmond Llewelyn seems unstoppable
at reprising his role of "Q."  Bondian gadgets still abound.  The vodka
martinis are still served shaken, not stirred.  And what would 007 be
without a parade of girls, girls, girls!?
     It's been six years, like I said, and the producers of GOLDENEYE seem
convinced to raise the stakes yet again, having before them the daunting
tasks of proving that James Bond is not dead, that Brosnan can cut it as
an action hero (never mind the suave act, the New Bond can bludgeon a guy
to death without mussing his tux), and most importantly, that people
really still care about a hero that's been around for 33 years.
     Apparently they do...a lot.  I've received more inquiries about
GOLDENEYE over the last month than any other movie of the year. 
*Everyone* is talking about it.  Step aside WATERWORLD, Bond's buzz has
you beat.  And for the most part, it's well-deserved.
     GOLDENEYE's storyline is basically lifted from 1971's DIAMONDS ARE
FOREVER.  A super-secret Russian spy satellite that can destroy an entire
city's electronics systems is aimed at London.  Bond's old friend, the
now-renegade 006 (Sean Bean) is behind it all, and 007 is on the case. 
Along the way, he encounters Natalya (Izabella Scorupco), the best-looking
computer programmer in Russia, who helps him out when she isn't busy
diving for cover in her mini-skirt (in the Russian winter, no less). 
Working for 006 is the deliciously evil Xenia (Famke Janssen), a
masochistic killer whose favorite M.O. is squeezing people to death with
her thighs.  Really.
     You're probably groaning that this sounds ludicrous, and of course it
is (remember MOONRAKER?).  After all, it *is* a James Bond story, and you
really have to leave your logical sensibility at the door.  Otherwise,
you'll spend the whole film wondering, "How'd they get that 100-yard
diameter satellite dish buried in Cuba without anyone noticing?  Just how
did he skydive to that nose-diving plane, climb in, and not crash into a
mountain?  Why would someone keep giant vats of kerosene out in the open
in their underground bunker?  How'd he get his BMW to Cuba, anyway...and
would *you* give your car to Joe Don Baker?"  And so on.  Old Bond fans
know that thinking too hard about things like this will only lead to a
severe headache.  In making the Bond-to-top-all-Bond films, something
(namely plot) has to give.
     With that said, Brosnan is admirable (better than Roger Moore, but no
Sean Connery).  The exotic settings, fight scenes, and car chases are also
good, and the supporting cast is admirable.  With the exception of some
rotten music and a few disappointing blue screen effects, GOLDENEYE is
overall a very likable film.  Sure, you could drive the Russian tank Bond
commandeers through all the plot holes...but you know it'd be one hell of
a ride.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Two Family House (2000)
A sappy independent, Two Family House creates a romantic dramady out of
the two unlikeliest characters -- a tubby married Italian guy who lives
in Staten Island (Michael Rispoli) and a pregnant, Scottish import
(Trainspotting's Kelly Macdonald) married to a bum.
Love at first sight?  Not quite, but you can be sure writer/director
Raymond De Felitta is going to get us there in short order.
Indeed, if you buy De Felitta's rosy outlook on life, all it takes is a
pair of dreamers to make a love connection.  Buddy (Rispoli) has failed
at every entrepreneurial venture in his life; his latest scheme is to
open a bar in the house he just bought while he and the wife (Katherine
Narducci) live upstairs.  He even plans to provide the entertainment via
his celebrated crooning.  Too bad the place upstairs is occupied by a
drunk and his pregnant wife Mary (Macdonald) -- and we soon discover
she's pregnant by yet another guy when a half-black, half-white baby
pops out.  In fact -- the whole film is narrated by the newborn, even
while he's in the womb.  (Er... okay.)  Soon enough the bum is gone,
Mary is evicted, and somehow she and Buddy are in love and having an
affair.  Not one of those dirty, adulterous affairs -- one of those
nice, movie affairs.
All of this sounds sickly sweet to describe and it's even worse on
screen, where you have to contend with non-stop, mind-numbing narration
plus endless, syrupy mandolin music to remind us that Buddy is Italian. 
It all comes off like a bad episode of The King of Queens, just moved to
a different borough.
Not that it isn't without its moments.  Macdonald is cute (though
unlikable) and the same goes for Rispoli, too.  Nice house to visit --
but I wouldn't want to live there.
Director: Raymond De Felitta
Producer: Anne Harrison, Al Klingenstein
Writer: Raymond De Felitta
Starring: Michael Rispoli, Kelly Macdonald, Kathrine Narducci, Kevin
Conway, Matt Servitto, Michele Santopietro
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Fantasia/2000 (1999)
     Little known fact: When Walt Disney released FANTASIA in 1940, it
was intended to be a permanent work in progress.  Each time you saw it,
you would see something new combined with something old and familiar.
     It didn't quite happen that way.  The original FANTASIA became a
classic, although a static one.  60 years later, that's about to
change.  With the release of FANTASIA/2000 we get eight animations set
to music: seven new pieces and one classic.  Oh, and this time it's
presented on IMAX -- the first ever animated feature for the large
format.
     Already the chatter of parties, people want to know, "How does it
stack up against the original?"  Comparison is difficult, but on the
whole, I prefer the new version, mainly because the overall animation is
better fit to the music.
     FANTASIA/2000 is good, but it isn't uniformly great.  The segments
range from the abstract (Butterflies dancing to Beethoven's Fifth
Symphony) to the modern (A NYC-themed "Rhapsody in Blue") to the bizarre
("Pines of Rome" can be described in only two words: Flying whales) to
the stupid ("Carnival of the Animals" and its flamingos-with-yo-yos
animation).
     Then there's something old, the classic "Sorcerer's Apprentice"
story with Mickey Mouse and the magic brooms, plus at least two new
classics: Shostakovich's Piano Concerto No. 2 playing for a recreation
of "The Steadfast Tin Soldier" fairy tale, and the grand finale, a
gorgeous Mother Earth vs. volcano story set to "The Firebird Suite."
     FANTASIA/2000 also features interstitial narration from the likes
of James Earl Jones, Steve Martin, and Bette Midler.  This is amusing,
but in decades of moviegoing, I can say I've never seen anything so
frightening as the image of Angela Lansbury projected to a height of 80
feet.
     Like all IMAX films, FANTASIA/2000 is never short of fascinating
while making you mildly nauseous.  Like the original, it's really not a
kid's film, but it is another Disney classic for the vaults.
Director: James Algar, Gaetan Brizzi, Paul Brizzi, Hendel Butoy, Francis
Glebas, Eric Goldberg, Pixote Hunt
Producer: Donald W. Ernst
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Permanent Midnight (1998)
     Well, there's nothing like missing a fad by a few years to show
how *really* behind the curve you are.  PERMANENT MIDNIGHT, the new
film about the rise and fall... well, mostly the fall... of TV writer
Jerry Stahl should prove to be the final nail in the short-lived, and
now painful-to-watch, genre: the drug movie.
     Perhaps best known as the chief influence behind the TV show
"ALF," MIDNIGHT is a simplistic retelling of Stahl's tell-all
autobiography.  Ben Stiller, the only remotely passable part of this
film, plays Stahl with gusto, but twenty minutes of Stiller going
berserk as a strung-out junkie are more than enough.
     Sadly, that's all this movie is: a whopping 85 minutes of Stiller
on heroin.  There's precious little about his life before or after his
addiction.  It's just a few pages out of the life of a junkie.  And I
couldn't have cared less.  Plot development?  Ha!  First-time director
Veloz obviously feels it's beneath him.
     Maybe the worst part of MIDNIGHT is that it's told completely in
flashback, as Stahl reminisces to some blonde girl who picks him up at
a fast food joint.  Played by Maria Bello, this outta-nowhere
character is so devoid of, well, of *anything* that my cat could have
played her with the same conviction.  Bello had best start rethinking
that "ER" departure, *pronto*.
     I won't waste any more time droning about how bad PERMANENT
MIDNIGHT is.  But I will say one thing: at least it explains a lot
about "ALF."
http://www.permanentmidnight.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  /
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Wedding Planner, The (2001)
Ah, welcome to San Francisco, the place I call home.  It's a city of
exorbitant housing costs where we're facing two years of electricity
blackouts, and it's home to some of the most ridiculously magical
romances ever conceived.  (See also: The Bachelor.)
In what is either a sassy updating of the fable of marriage or a vicious
lambasting of its sanctity, depending on your point of view, The Wedding
Planner presents us with Jennifer Lopez and Matthew McConaughey as an
unlikely pair who somehow manage to get together -- against all odds, of
course.
Utterly absurd and hopelessly dated from its opening scenes (Bridgette
Wilson-Sampras plays a millionaire who made her fortune by selling
gourmet food on the Internet -- uh huh), The Wedding Planner borrows
heavily from My Best Friend's Wedding without getting much of its
humor.  The tired story is predictable: Lopez's Italian(!),
anal-retentive Mary (so particular that she alphabetizes the credit
cards in her wallet) runs into Steve (McConaughey) on a San Francisco
street, and soon they're whisked off to an impromptu date in Golden Gate
Park.  Oops -- l'il Stevie is about to get hitched to Fran
(Wilson-Sampras), and Mary's been hired to plan the wedding!
Sounds like fun, no?  Well, for short stretches of The Wedding Planner,
it is.  But for much longer stretches, the film is just plain stupid,
consisting of ridiculous, random setups designed to get our star-crossed
lovers intertwined, with an inevitable punch line to pay it all off. 
When Fran's family goes horseback riding (for some reason bringing Mary
along on the trip), of course her horse is going to bolt and Steve will
have to save her.  When Fran leaves town for a week and Mary and Steve
go shopping for statues(???), of course a stone penis is going to break
off and get glued to Steve's hand.  But the biggest insult has to be a
truly wretched subplot, which has Mary's father (Alex Rocco) actually
arranging a marriage for Mary with some schlub from back home.
Considering the source material, I'm not terribly surprised by any of
this.  Clearly intended as a vanity project and star vehicle for
Jennifer Lopez to continue her climb through the ranks of Hollywood, the
script is the first-produced film from writers Pamela Falk and Michael
Ellis (feuding lovers themselves, how cute!), and the first major
directorial work of Adam Shankman, best known for being a choreographer
on more than 20 films, from Mission to Mars to Weekend at Bernies II. 
The movie screams amateurism because it really is the work of amateurs. 
That said, the cinematographer does manage to get Alcatraz, the
Transamerica Pyramid, and many other S.F. landmarks in just about every
shot -- nicely done!
Anyway, never mind that arranged marriage crack -- I have to say the
biggest insult is actually that we're supposed to believe Matthew
McConaughey is really having trouble choosing between Bridgette
Wilson-Sampras and Jennifer Lopez.  Wilson-Sampras is a fading B-lister
with a pointy chin and a bad dye job who starred in Love Stinks.  On the
other hand, Lopez is a former Fly Girl and rising star with a nice chin,
a good dye job, and a flawless ass the size of two overripe watermelons.
Director: Adam Shankman
Producer: Peter Abrams, Deborah Del Prete, Jennifer Gibgot, Robert L.
Levy, Gigi Pritzker
Writer: Pamela Falk, Michael Ellis
Starring: Jennifer Lopez, Matthew McConaughey, Justin Chambers,
Bridgette Wilson-Sampras, Judy Greer, Alex Rocco, Joanna Gleason, Kevin
Pollak, Charles Kimbrough, Fred Willard, Lou Myers, Frances Bay
http://www.sony.com/theweddingplanner
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Courage Under Fire (1996)
     The so-called Gulf War is the only war in which America was involved
that, due to my age, I can personally remember.  I saw it on CNN like
everyone else, listening to the death toll of Iraqis climb into the 100,000
range, while U.S. casualties stayed around 300 -- half of whom were killed
by accidents or friendly fire.  The idea of a Gulf "War" will always be
kind of silly to me, because the word "war" implies two sides fighting each
other.  The Gulf War was the wholesale slaughter of Iraqis by U.S. troops.
     I'm not saying the Gulf War was a bad, or unjust, operation.  It's
more of a joke than anything else, and that's why when a film comes out
attempting to glamorize the war and make heroes out of fictional soldiers
and fictional events, I greet it with a bit of skepticism.  COURAGE UNDER
FIRE is the first real Gulf War movie.  It probably won't be the last.
     Keeping in mind that this is *all make-believe,* the film's story is
this.  Karen Walden (Meg Ryan) was a helicopter pilot, shot down during a
rescue attempt which turned into an ad hoc offensive.  Stranded in Iraqi
territory overnight, Karen and her crew fended off the enemy until a
morning rescue saved them all -- except her.
     Or so the story goes.  Because of her courage, Karen is being
considered for the Medal of Honor, and Serling (Denzel Washington) is on
the investigatory case.  All seems well until another side of the story
surfaces, mainly told by one Monfriez (Lou Diamond Phillips), who says
Karen was a coward and that the whole thing is a sham.  We see the events
(over and over and over and over) from about six points of view, each time
with a twist of some sort.  On top of that, Serling is fighting his own
demons due to a little incident where he blew up a friendly tank -- on
accident -- and this incident is played over and over as well.
     Where to start with the litany of things that bothered me about
COURAGE?  For one, *who cares* about this story?  The characters are not
compelling, and Karen is so obnoxious and Ryan's performance is so horrible
that I was glad she was dead.  (Don't get me started on Ryan's
faker-than-fake Southern accent:  "Peeyick 'iiiyem uhhhhp!" (Pick him up!))
Serling's subplot has very little to do with the rest of the story.  And
the whole thing is just pointless, coming off as propaganda, glamorizing
war and the military.  *Please do not believe the hype.*
     Then again, the movie is quite pretty.  The story, while poor, is
well-told at least, and Washington's performance is good, as usual.
Comparisons to RASHOMON are a bit out of place, but not out of the realm of
reason.  And I had a lot more fun looking at the local scenery and
locations (the movie was largely shot in Austin) than anything else.
     I guess the case for COURAGE UNDER FIRE is that it is exposing this
abstract "truth" of how Americans were killed by friendly fire in the Gulf
War.  Is that truth?  If so, it's one we already knew.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for French Kiss (1995)
     Redeeming the genre from last week's dismal WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING,
Meg Ryan and Kevin Kline manage to deliver hilarious and surprisingly
touching performances in FRENCH KISS.  Ryan plays Kate, a seriously
neurotic woman who takes the phrase "obsessive-compulsive" to new lows. 
Charlie (Timothy Hutton) is Kate's fiancee, an up-and-coming doctor who,
when Kate is too afraid to board the airplane, takes a week-long business
trip to Paris alone.
     And there the games begin.  Charlie unexpectedly falls for a French
"goddess" and calls off his relationship with Kate.  Stunned, our heroine
becomes understandably obsessed with getting Charlie back, and the games
begin.  On her white-knuckled flight across the Atlantic, she encounters
Luc (Kevin Kline), a smarmy French con-man trying to go straight.  The two
couldn't be less alike, but an unlikely romance begins to sprout.
     FRENCH KISS actually manages to make a decent statement about love
and happiness, bringing to light the truth of the old adage, "There is no
substitute for experience."  The film is also believable despite its
outlandish main characters, whom Ryan and Kline portray with wonderful
emotion and with an amazing flair for comic timing.  Kline's antics are
simply hilarious to the point of absurdity.
     The film's ending is pretty obvious, but how they get there is full
of surprises, and it also made me remember:  love really can come from the
unlikeliest of places.

Title
Review for Little Vampire, The (2000)
Just when you thought movies couldn't get any more ridiculous, along
comes a film that poses the question, "Did Dracula ever have a teddy
bear?"  I'm talking, of course, about The Little Vampire, a movie about
a nuclear family of vampires that feed on cows, live in Scotland, and
make friends with the little kid from Jerry Maguire.
In The Little Vampire, Jonathan Lipnicki plays Tony Thompson, recent
émigré to the Highlands.  Rather than go the traditional route for
Scottish fantasy and pick up a wooden sword and proclaim, "There can be
only one," Tony begins dreaming of vampires.  Night after night, Tony's
slumber is disturbed as he dreams of a rite being performed by a clan of
vampires.  What it means, Tony has no clue.  So Tony simply does what
any other eight-year old stereotyped by cinema does: Goes to mommy
(Pamela Gidley) and daddy (Tommy Hinkley), sleeps in their bed for the
night, and then gets ridiculed by everyone he knows for his "wild
vampire fantasies" during the day.
Lo and behold, one night a guy named Rudolf (Rollo Weeks) happens upon
Tony incanting what he heard in the dream, and before the night is
through the two have saved each other's life, fed on cows, and played on
top of a blimp.
Should I even bother telling you at this point that The Little Vampire
is kiddie fare?
As kiddie fare goes, The Little Vampire is actually one of the more
imaginative offerings in recent memory.  In a highly vapid genre, The
Little Vampire injects a quasi-sardonic imagination (and sense of humor)
into the field  There are enjoyable running gags (such as the vampiric
cows who disappear one-by-one, much to the chagrin of the forlorn
farmer) and a storyline that doesn't absolutely reek.  Sadly, the rest
of the film doesn't fare quite so well.
In fact, the rest of the film runs rather hot and cold.  One minute, the
acting is terrific, the next minute, you're wondering if this is the
players' first film.  One minute, the humor is sidesplitting, the next
it's too melodramatic to stand.  In the end, The Little Vampire is
really only a good film if you view it next to a contemporary like, say,
Pokemon.  Without that, it's just another movie to float into the mist
of mediocre cinema.
Director: Ulrich Edel
Producer: Richard Claus
Writer: Karey Kirtpatrick, Larry Wilson
Starring: Jonathan Lipnicki, Rollo Weeks, Pamela Gidley, Alice Kridge,
Richard E. Grant, Tommy Hinkley
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Say It Isn't So (2001)
Another year, another Farrelly brothers production.
This time out, we get American Pie alum Chris Klein and the saucy
Heather Graham in what is undoubtedly the crudest film we will ever
see.  That is, at least until Tom Green takes center stage in Freddy Got
Fingered later this year.
The brain-dead premise of Say It Isn't So has Klein falling in love with
the local beauty (Graham), only later to be told they're brother and
sister.  She runs off to marry another guy, and when Klein discovers
they are not really related, he makes like The Graduate to stop the
nuptials.  What follows is a sad, pathetic procession of jokes about the
"sister slammer" and the poor town of Beaver, Oregon, where much of the
action takes place.
Even some promising supporting players like Orlando Jones and Sally
Field do little but embarrass themselves on camera for an hour and a
half.  Field, who I had hoped would eventually save the movie, is even
reduced to wiping a sandwich on her armpits "for salt."
If that's your idea of funny, you'll be happy to know things degenerate
even further from there.  The movie gets worse and worse until finally
we find Klein up to his elbow in a cow's rear end.  I suppose that will
have to pass for comedy in director James B. Rogers' directorial debut. 
Sadly, he's also on tap to direct American Pie II.  So much for that
promising franchise.
If you're determined to see this movie, I don't figure this review is
going to stop you.  So when you go, you deserve what you get: Sitting
for a few hours among your steaming, seething, loud-mouthed brethren,
all honking their butts off and talking back to the screen as a
paraplegic Jones being beaten with his own fake leg.  Say it isn't so,
y'all.
Director: James B. Rogers
Producer: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly, Bradley Thomas
Writer: Peter Gaulke, Gerry Swallow
Starring: Chris Klein, Heather Graham, Orlando Jones, Sally Field,
Richard Jenkins, John Rothman, Jack Plotnick, Eddie Cibrian
http://www.sayitisntsomovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Doom Generation, The (1995)
     Good Lord, how did this film ever get made?  As Gregg Araki's fifth
feature, you'd figure he'd have learned *something* about movie making by
now.  Looks like I'm wrong again.
     THE DOOM GENERATION, hands-down one of the most horrid examples of
filmmaking I've seen in ages, is a brain-dead, post-modern love story. 
The plot (what there is of it) tells the moronic tale of Amy Blue (Rose
McGowan), her boyfriend Jordan White (James Duval), and some guy they pick
up called Xavier Red (Johnathon Schaech).  (Did you catch on to that
ultra-clever color motif?)  Altogether, these three embark on a
nonsensical spree of sex, killing/mangling people, and then eating...and
then repeating the cycle four or five times.
     Along the way, Amy uses a wider variety of vulgar insults than I'd
ever conceived of.  Jordan pretty much just stands around, with Duval
perfectly cast in the part of an idiot zombie teenager that makes you
cringe just to look at him.  I still can't figure out what Xavier's role
was supposed to be all about, but I'm guessing Araki's "666," skull &
crossbones, and Apocalypse references are supposed to indicate that
Xavier's the devil.  Oooooh, scary.  If that was supposed to be a social
or cultural statement, please pinch me.
     Araki should, however, be thanked for the one distraction that keeps
you from having to think too hard about the garbage on the screen:  cameos
galore!  From Margaret Cho to ex-Brady Buncher Christopher Knight to
Married With Children's Amanda Bearse to Hollywood Madam Heidi Fleiss,
there's enough washed-up stars and wannabes to dam a river with.  It's
cute, but I think Jon Waters squeezed the last ounce of life out of this
stunt years ago.
     I could go on about the poor or inappropriate lighting, cutesy
direction, horrid dialogue, and overall silly atmosphere this film
creates, but why bother?  I think I've pretty much made my opinion clear
by now.  There's absolutely no reason to see the movie, and I'd rather
watch the Weather Channel for two hours than sit through it again.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Monkeybone (2001)
Despite Fox's attempts to market this film on the coattails of director
Henry Selick's success with Tim Burton vehicle The Nightmare Before
Christmas, be thou not fooled.  Monkeybone bears none of the charm or
character of its predecessor.  The story of a cartoonist (Brendan
Fraser) who falls into a coma and enters a world where the star he
created, Monkeybone (who is -- get this -- both a monkey and a metaphor
for the cartoonist's own penis), this film lacks as much in the way of
creative inspiration as it does in taste.
It's not that the unending stream of preschoolish fart and pecker jokes
are offensive, they're just tiresome and invariably expected.  And they
persist, from the opening scene to the entirely unsurprising
conclusion.  Fortunately, though, the film has some subplots. 
Unfortunately, they're absolutely senseless.
Bridget Fonda plays the cartoonist's girlfriend, to whom he had intended
to propose before his accident.  As such, she serves sort of blandly as
his motivation to return to the world.  On the other hand, Rose McGowan
plays the purring catwoman in the fantasy world, and she's plenty of
reason to stay.  The cartoonist, however, is not tempted (though any
other male with a pulse might be), and the feline nymph assists him in
returning to the world to save his body and his girlfriend from the
treachery of the monkey.  Along the way we are treated to a
mesmerizingly lame appearance from Saturday Night Live's Chris Kattan,
who we all will someday recognize as the same sort of one trick pony
Dana Carvey (remember that wacky Church Lady?) turned out to be.
Attempting to pinpoint exactly where this flick goes awry is a tricky
thing to do.  Between the cold fish delivery of the sophomoric dialogue
and the insanely infantile butthole humor, it's really a toss-up. 
Surviving the first half of this 82-minute nightmare is easy enough. 
It's the second half that kills, as the wildly desperate "plot twists"
kick in and Stephen King turns up for his ridiculous cameo to make a
tired Cujo joke.
Chances are, if you're a die-hard Brendan Fraser fan, you'll love this
movie in the same way you love all of his idiotic work.  But, if you're
over the age of 12 and still have at least a third of your brain cells,
you'll do well to spend your seven dollars elsewhere.  Then again, Rose
McGowan....
Director: Henry Selick
Producers: Michael Barnathan, Mark Radcliffe
Writer: Sam Hamm
Starring: Brendan Fraser, Bridget Fonda, Chris Kattan, Giancarlo
Esposito, Rose McGowan, Whoopi Goldberg
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Exotica (1994)
     EXOTICA is a new dramatic thriller from Canadian director Atom
Egoyan, who brings us this fascinating glimpse into the life of Francis
Brown (Bruce Greenwood), a Canadian tax auditor whose life intertwines
with a his brother and niece, an exotic animal smuggler, and, most
importantly, the denizens of a strip joint called Exotica.
     The action in EXOTICA jumps from one character to another, from
location to location, and back into Brown's past occasionally, teasing
the viewer with bits of information about how these people's lives are
eventually going to gel into a cohesive story.  As the story
progresses, there are plenty of blanks left for the viewer to fill in
as the action springs around.  The seamless editing makes this seem
natural, albeit a bit overdone at times, but eventually it all comes
together to make perfect sense in the end.
     Thematically, EXOTICA is a dense study of human nature, obsession,
and the difficulties of reconciling our perceptions with reality.
Egoyan's careful braiding of plotlines and characters makes this
reconciliation all the more difficult, but that's the point.  In the
end, the film gives us about five different viewpoints on a single
situation, an admirable effort that not many filmmakers could pull
off.
     EXOTICA is a beautiful sensory feast, studded with lush
cinematography and haunted by an outstanding score.  The sets are
excellent as well, particularly the seductive Exotica club itself.  The
performances are dead-on, especially Greenwood's slightly twisted
accountant and Mia Kirshner as Kristina, the stripper with whom Francis
is obsessed.  The convoluted plot line and rather mature subject matter
may make the film too esoteric for some, but you won't be able to get
EXOTICA out of your mind for days.

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
     As narrator Jimmy Breslin (as himself) puts it, there's 8 million
stories in the naked city, and this is one of them.  I just wish it
didn't have to be so long.
     Spike Lee's latest joint, like much of his recent work, is an epic
exercise in tedium.  While it's punctuated by moments of greatness  and
sometimes, even genius -- those moments come too few and too far between
to make SUMMER OF SAM a truly great film.  Sure, the tale of New York
City in 1977, when David Berkowitz, a.k.a. Son of Sam, was marauding
Brooklyn with a .44 revolver, is a great place to start.  But clocking
in at almost 2 1/2 hours, you're likely to wish Son of Sam had taken you
out at the halfway point.
     Again, Lee has plenty of raw material to work with: Leguizamo,
Sorvino, and Brody are all great actors (I'm blocking THE PEST from my
mind, forgive me), and the clever, neo-16mm look Lee has put on the film
really drops you into the late 1970s lock, stock, and mirrorball.  With
the disco/punk clash going on, a record heat wave, and Reggie Jackson
taking the Yankees to the World Series, the mis en scene is certainly
set.  Spike knows New York cold.
     But what about this script, which wanders aimlessly among Leguizamo
and Sorvino's marital troubles, Brody and his infatuation with the punk
scene and his need to do gay porn to earn cash, the mob society of
Brooklyn, and, of course, the Son of Sam and the dog which tells him to
kill Kill KILL!  These are actually four of those stories in the naked
city, and it's hard to care about all of them together.  A dozen
meandering side plots don't help matters either.
     However, Spike does excellent work putting you dead center in this
turmoil, and that I can respect.  But please, somebody bring me the head
of the editor on a silver platter.  (Of course, there were actually two
of them working on this picture... sigh.)
Director: Spike Lee
Producer: Spike Lee, John Kilik
Writer: Spike Lee, Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli
Starring: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito
http://movies.go.com/summerofsam/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Se7en (1995)
     Would somebody turn on the lights already?  Geez ... in the
nameless city that is the setting of SEVEN, it seems you can only get a
ten-watt bulb, and that's when the power works at all.  I liked the
film, but with the constant thunderclouds, rain, and shadows, it's
terribly difficult to tell what's going on.
     The title refers to the Seven Deadly Sins--and a serial killer who
is planning to knock off one "evil person" for each vice.  The first to
go is "gluttony," an obese man whom the killer force-feeds until he
pops.  And trust me, after that, it only gets worse.
     On the case is veteran detective Somerset (Morgan Freeman) and
new-to-town Mills (Brad Pitt).  After 30 minutes of wry chit-chat, the
pair finally get down to business, as two more victims are found.
After that, it's a perfectly choreographed game of cat and mouse,
culminating in a horrific finale that will have you on the edge of your
seat.  I won't reveal the identity of the killer, but I will say he's
very well cast.
     The story (written by schlock horror veteran Andrew Kevin Walker)
is excellent.  Some unfortunate problems get in the way, especially the
constant lack of light and the use of quick-image shock photography,
which make things all the harder to follow.  But I suppose with Pitt
sleepwalking through the opening of the film, at least that gives you
something to watch instead of his droll acting.  I guess when he breaks
his hand (both the character and Pitt himself) during the movie's
dynamic foot chase, the adrenaline finally starts to flow, and Pitt
appears much more alive.
     Also, while the "suspense" is great, watch out for the
touchy-feely family scenes with Mrs. Mills (Gwyneth Paltrow) and the
occasional soliloquies the characters get into about the nightmares of
city life and the evils of the world.  None of this is very well done,
but it is rather important to the film, and thankfully, there's always
another gruesome murder around the corner to distract us.
     Despite its faults, SEVEN remains a worthwhile and very watchable
film, but don't look for a lot of deep social commentary.  Lean back,
peer into the darkness, oh, and hold on to your popcorn and your date
exceptionally tight when they get to "sloth."
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter & Novelist
-Contributing Editor, Mike's FEEDBACK  /  Film Critic, Texas Business Weekly
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for BookWars (2000)
     There are a million stories in the naked city, and a new
documentary from Jason Rosette does a remarkable job at ferreting out
one of them -- and where you'd least expect it.
     BookWars examines the strange and unexpectedly intense world of
street booksellers in Manhattan -- specifically, a little stretch of 4th
Street near NYU, where otherwise unemployed types set up an 8-foot
table, covered with treasures of the printed word.
     Rosette tells the story from the inside, having spent three years
on 4th, selling precious volumes of Dostoyevsky, Kerouac, and
Kierkegaard.  We meet his colleagues, who range from surprisingly well
adjusted to almost completely insane.  And we discover the origins of
the books -- estate sales, libraries, the trash, and even other street
sellers when they inevitably wash out.
     But Rosette's tale is especially remarkable from several
perspectives.  First, the streetwise merchandising tactics you learn in
BookWars' 79 minutes teach you more about business than any MBA
program.  Second, the socio-political microscope the booksellers find
themselves under when Giuliani's "Quality of Life" program is introduced
(thus attempting to whisk them off the sidewalks) makes a powerful
statement about who programs like these are really helping out.
Corporate America and academia are the understated targets as the
independent street booksellers are gradually given less and less
"official" space in which to operate.
     While Rosette's over-earnest narration can get thick at times and
the finale feels a tad dismissive, his story is never short of
enthralling.  Altogether, it's a fresh break from more sanitized
documentary filmmaking, giving us a unique look into a part of life I've
always wondered about.

Title
Review for Ed's Next Move (1996)
     This year's low-budget success story and darling of the festival
circuit, ED'S NEXT MOVE is one of a handful of recent pictures that is
truly deserving of its praise.
     The Manhattan-based indie traces a few weeks in the life of urban
greenhorn Eddie (Matt Ross), whose titular move is from the wide-open,
cheesy state of Wisconsin to the dog-eat-dog world of New York City. 
Eddie, a genetics researcher and rice breeder, faces the world alone --
a stranger in a strange land.  He lives in a cheap motel while he tries
to find a non-psychotic roommate, can't get a simple hamburger at a
restaurant, and finds his Midwestern sensibilities out of place in the
big city.
     It's here that Eddie meets Lee (Callie Thorne), a brassy hipster
trying to cut it as a musician.  Eddie, in fine romantic comedy style,
becomes smitten with Lee and tries to win her affections.
     The result is a fine comedy from newcomer John Walsh, who directs
his own script.  In fact, just about everyone associated with the film
is a newcomer, which works to the benefit of the picture by keeping
everything fresh.  Ross and Thorne are excellent actors, and because
we've never seen them before, it's easy to suspend disbelief enough to
buy them in their parts.  (Also good is Kevin Carroll as Eddie's
antithesis and roommate Ray.)
     With funny and fresh dialogue, a heap of production values
considering the low budget, and a wide-appeal story that neither
condescends to the audience nor enters the saccharine world of
big-budget romantic comedies, ED'S NEXT MOVE is a winner for just about
anyone's taste.  (This critic laughed his proverbial butt off, that's
for sure.)  Be sure to watch for "the mice scene" -- the only comparable
fall-down laughing sequence equivalent to last year's "banana scene"
from THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN.
     ED'S NEXT MOVE remains one of the better offerings of the year, by
giving us a romantic comedy about people who could feasibly be friends
of ours -- or could even be ourselves.  My only hope is that Walsh can
keep it up with his next picture.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Bedazzled (2000)
     There truly is nothing quite like a Brendan Fraser movie, is
there?  Encino Man, Dudley Do-Right, Mrs. Winterbourne... these are the
films that a generation uses to mark the passage of time.
     It's nigh time we added another sparkling gem to the 30-picture
oeuvre that is The Brendan Fraser Experience... and that gem is
Bedazzled, a limp remake of a 1967 Dudley Moore vehicle -- a Dudley
Moore vehicle which was also co-written by Dudley Moore.  Just so you
know we're working with some stellar raw material here.
     The high concept of Bedazzled gives us Elizabeth Hurley as the
devil (Peter Cook played him in the original), who gives Fraser's
über-nerd Elliot seven wishes in exchange for his soul.  Hurley makes a
surprisingly believable Satan.  Up close, her angular features and
hollow gaze make her as frightening as she is gorgeous, not to mention
the annoying bouncy walk that makes you dizzy to watch and a wardrobe
change factor that clocks in at once every six minutes.
     Elliot dreams up every wish he can think of to try to make his
office crush Allison (Frances O'Connor) fall for him.  Soon he's a
Columbian drug lord, then a basketball star, then an effete socialite. 
But naturally, that darned devil somehow makes it all go wrong!  Elliot
needs to watch more episodes of Bewitched! to learn the dangers of
wishing improperly.
     As each wish turns out worse than the last, we are offered the
chance to laugh at the wacky antics on display before us.  Look, Elliot
can suddenly speak Spanish!  Look, Elliot suddenly speaks like a moron! 
Look, Elliot is suddenly very smart!  Of course, you may choose not to
laugh at many of these scenes if you wish.  I know I didn't.
     Bedazzled drags its one-joke scenes through far too many
poorly-timed comic moments, with each of its hokey-jokey sequences going
on for far longer than is humanly funny (notably one scene about Elliot
having been given a small willy becomes truly painful).  Of course, I
guess this is unavoidable if you're simply trying to pad out 90 minutes
of screen time with something.
     To try and spice things up, director Harold Ramis inserts the
supporting cast of Elliot's co-workers into each vignette, where they
reappear as new characters.  Wow, inventive!  Then there are numerous
and utterly bizarre "comedy" moments, complete non-sequiturs to the
film, which are used as interludes between each "wish" sequence.  Mostly
this consists of Hurley's devil causing traffic accidents, etc.  You
know, just for kicks.
     And what's with Frances O'Connor as the romantic lead?  O'Connor,
best known (okay, solely known) for starring in the recent Mansfield
Park, with her jutting forehead and wallflower stage presence, makes for
a love interest about as exciting as a wet brick.  Jeez, why not have
Hurley and Fraser get it on?  I guess we'd bust through PG-13 with
something like that.
     Aside from a few juvenile giggles, there's not much in Bedazzled
worth mentioning.  The movie is so limp it is all but forgotten on the
ride home.  So what was I saying?
Director: Harold Ramis
Producer: Trevor Albert, Harold Ramis
Writer: Larry Gelbart, Harold Ramis, Peter Tolan
Starring: Brendan Fraser, Elizabeth Hurley, Frances O'Connor, Gabriel
Casseus, Orlando Jones, Rudolf Martin
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
     At last, a movie with no likable characters that is nothing short
of a joy to watch.  Let's see if AMERICAN PSYCHO can top that!
     AMERICAN BEAUTY chronicles the last year in the life of 42 year-old
hack magazine writer Lester Burnham (Spacey), a suburban loser that has
just about had it with his humdrum life and decides to make a few
changes to regain control, for better or for worse.  Those changes
include quitting his job and blackmailing his employers, buying a
vintage Firebird, taking a new job at the local fast food joint, buying
thousands of dollars worth of pot, and plotting to sleep with his
daughter's best friend (Suvari, the good girl from AMERICAN PIE, playing
the bad girl here).
     If you think he's gone over the edge, wait until you get a load of
his Realtor wife (Bening, playing an evil Martha Stewart  okay, a
*more* evil Martha Stewart).  Or the daughter (Birch), a zoned-out
basket of angst.  Or their neighbors, headed by a stern ex-Marine
(Cooper) and his pleasant but quietly psychotic drug-dealer son
(Bentley).  Everyone here is a creep, and it's delicious to watch them
play off one another  think of it as an updating of THE ICE STORM to
1999.
     The joy of BEAUTY lies in its brilliantly drawn characters, great
dialogue, flawless acting by all the players, and a clever voice-over by
Spacey that, for once, adds quite a bit to the picture.  For example,
we're told at the beginning that Lester is going to die.  While the
black comedy unfolds for two hours, we struggle to figure out exactly
how he's going to go.  Obviously, someone is going to kill him.  But
who, and how?  The genius of the script is that it could be anyone who
does it.
     Oscar nominations are deserved universally for the cast and crew,
and I hope AMERICAN BEAUTY is neither forgotten at Awards time nor at
the box office.  This is a rare and outstanding film that deserves
attention and will challenge some heady competition for a place as the
best film of the year.
Director: Sam Mendes
Producer: Bruce Cohen, Dan Jinks
Writer: Alan Ball
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Annette Beining, Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, Mena
Suvari, Chris Cooper, Peter Gallagher, Allison Janney, Scott Bakula, Sam
Robards
http://www.amazon.com/americanbeauty
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Eraser (1996)
     Is it just me, or is Arnold Schwarzenegger's accent getting worse?  I
think it is, as is his acting ability, as well as his choice of films to
star in.  This time it's ERASER, a big-budget, small-plot, fair-to-middling
feature that continues the testosterone-infused series that Arnie's been
working on since PUMPING IRON.
     It's the cheeseball role to end all cheeseball roles:  John Kruger
(Arnie) works for the Witness Relocation Program as an "identity eraser,"
and he answers to no one (sorta).  His charge is Lee Cullen (Vanessa
Williams), an executive with "Cyrez," who discovers that her company is
selling next generation weapons to Russkie terrorists.  The FBI uses her
just to get the goods on Cyrez, and it's up to Arnie to save her hide from
the bad guys, which includes turncoat fellow eraser Robert Deguerin (James
Caan).
     Meanwhile, Arnie does about every stupid thing possible in order to
(a) inadvertently lead the bad guys to Lee, (b) get in lots of fights, (c)
blow up stuff, and (d) crack jokes.  All of this works with varying
success.  In the film, Arnold comes off as a complete idiot who couldn't
protect his lunch money without blurting out where it is.  It's a good
thing he's so tough, otherwise it'd be a short film indeed.  Even Arnold's
jokes here are of the lowest quality yet, sadly.
     It's sad, really, because everyone *but* the star is pretty good.
Williams proves herself as capable of holding her own against the big guy,
and Robert Pastorelli's Mafioso-in-protection all but steals the show.
We're also treated to some bad-ass special effects (ILM's faker-than-fake
digital crocodiles not withstanding), courtesy of some of the most wicked
weapons on screen.  (Actually, the best effect is the replacement of all
mention/viewing of the word "Cyrex" with "Cyrez" to avoid big lawsuits from
the similarly-named chip manufacturer.)
     Overall, the film delves into complete and utter ridiculousness in the
plot arena, and at the same time is totally predictable -- in fact, large
chunks of it are lifted right out of TRUE LIES.  Throw on a dumb ending...
and the rest you can just erase.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Mulholland Falls (1996)
     Just so you know, there are no waterfalls in Los Angeles.  The titular
MULHOLLAND FALLS refers to the smarmy practice of taking a criminal to the
high point of the mountainous Mulholland Drive and booting him off, only to
catch up with him sometime later at the bottom.
     MULHOLLAND FALLS is the preferred method of ridding 1950s L.A. of
unwanted baddies, and it is most often used by a foursome of elite cops:
Nick Nolte, Chazz Palminteri, Chris Penn, and Michael Madsen.  Their newest
mission:  to find the murderer of Allison (Jennifer Connelly), a girl whose
bizarre death leads the gang to a General (John Malkovich) at the Atomic
Energy Commission and his number one thug (Treat Williams).
     Could have been interesting, but it unfortunately isn't.  The main
problem appears to be substantial meddling with what likely started out as
a good script.  Instead, there are no surprises here at all.  The plot is
formulaic and leaves nothing to the imagination, and it moves at a snail's
pace.  Also, important expository scenes have been cut out to apparently
give more screen time to the many big-name stars paraded through the film.
     The most noticeable flaw in this regard is Melanie Griffith's
character, playing Nolte's estranged wife, whose role is a complete
throwaway but is used to try (and fails) to develop sympathy for her and
her poor hubby.  Almost as bad are Andrew McCarthy, as a stereotypical
homosexual informer, and Connelly, who we see only in flashbacks.  Note:
when we do see her, we are treated to generous portions of
surgically-enhanced cheesecake.
     Still, the movie has its moments.  The quartet is mostly entertaining
when they interact among themselves, particularly Nolte and Palminteri.
There are a number of nice lines of dialogue that really imbue the film
with a sense of the macabre.  And placing us against the backdrop of
nuclear testing is somewhat thought-provoking and interesting.  As well,
director Lee Tamahori, who last did ONCE WERE WARRIORS, is as capable here
as can be expected given a lackluster script.
     The bottom line is that MULHOLLAND FALLS runs in circles pretty
slowly.  You might expect a little more from an American film, but as
Nolte's character puts it, "This isn't America; this is L.A."
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for American President, The (1995)
     Rob Reiner seems to have found his calling.  This time out, Rob has
directed THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT, a warm comedy about the difficulties of
romance in today's complex society, something of a follow-up to WHEN HARRY
MET SALLY..., a warm comedy about the difficulties of romance in today's
complex society.
     While it ultimately packs nowhere near the punch that WHEN HARRY MET
SALLY... did, THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT puts a nice spin on the romantic
fable and is a pleasant moviegoing experience.  Michael Douglas plays
President Andrew Shepherd, a widower and single father who finds himself
caught up in a dalliance with environmental lobbyist Sydney Ellen Wade
(Annette Bening).  What we get to see is a rare treat:  watching "the most
powerful man in the world" act totally awkward in his pursual of Sydney,
and seeing ultra-classy Bening become flustered at the President's
advances.  Proving himself just an average guy, Andrew flubs his lines on
the phone as if he was asking a girl to Homecoming.
     The result is an excruciatingly realistic romance, but set in the
most absurd of plotlines.  You see, Sydney is lobbying for a bill to go to
the House, and the President has made a deal with her:  if she can get 24
votes he'll send it to the floor.  Unfortunately, it soon becomes clear
that those votes will come at the expense of votes for the President's
golden child, a wishy-washy crime bill.  So Andrew has to choose what's
more important:  the country, or Sydney.  Hell, I'd choose Sydney, too.
     Okay, it isn't that simple, but it might as well have been.  The
political drama here is totally corny and makes no statement about
anything (except crime is bad and the environment is good), but the
sweetness of the love affair ultimately outweighs the plot's defects. 
We're also given a sober wake-up call about how a gossip-hungry America
looks at the personal lives of its leaders.
     The supporting cast of Michael J. Fox, Martin Sheen, and Samantha
Mathis as the President's advisors is dead-on.  Gorgeous sets (with the
notable exception of a Camp David that looks straight out of a sitcom)
make us feel like we're in the action.  All-in-all, a nice date movie,
perfect for the holidays.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Bartleby (2001)
Destined to inspire new lows in workplace slackerdom, Jonathan Parker's
Bartleby is a cryptic take on workplace politics and motivation,
courtesy of Herman Melville's short story, "Bartleby the Scrivener."
Given a weirdly futuristic spin, Jonathan Parker's interpretation of
Bartleby takes him out of a law office and into a public records
commission, subtly morphing from typist to file clerk.  More notably
than all that is Parker's balls-out casting, with the certifiably
unhinged Crispin Glover taking the role of the lowest-of-low-key peons.
Unfortunately, the bulk of innovation within Bartleby is found within
Glover's casting, and it doesn't spill over to the rest of the movie. 
>From its nauseating spinning credits sequence to a very talented but
underutilized supporting cast, Bartleby squanders as much as it gives
out.
The one-joke premise is a simple one.  Bartleby, the only applicant who
responds to David Paymer's help wanted ad, begins his filing job with
diligence, but soon inexplicably turns into an unmotivated drone,
staring at the a/c vent and responding to requests that he do the tasks
he was hired to do only with the phrase: "I would prefer not to."
This naturally perturbs both the boss and Bartleby's co-workers
(including Maury Chaykin, Glenne Headly, and Joe Piscopo!), to the point
where Paymer's character is forced to fire Bartleby.  And yet the man
still won't leave!
Things get weirder and weirder in the fashion of Brazil or The
Metamorphosis, until, well, until things just stop making sense.  Much
of Bartleby is lacking in the appropriate context, with random oddities
(notably vignettes featuring Piscopo and Chaykin) peppering the
production (for obvious padding time) but never going anywhere.  Despite
its 83 minute running time, the film quickly becomes tedious, Bartleby's
mantra degenerating into a monotonous whine instead of the working-class
battle cry it ought to be.
That said, Bartleby has its moments, and it's those aforementioned
disjointed bits that are ironically the movie's most memorable.  The
story of Bartleby himself, I fear, is one that will soon be forgotten.
Screened at the movie's world premiere at the 2001 SXSW film festival.
Director: Jonathan Parker
Producer: Jonathan Parker
Writer: Jonathan Parker, Catherine DiNapoli
Starring: Seymour Cassel, Maury Chaykin, Crispin Glover, Glenne Headly,
David Paymer, Joe Piscopo, Carrie Snodgress
http://www.bartlebythemovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
     Would that I had listened to my gut instead of LOST IN SPACE's flashy
trailer, one of the best promos for a bad movie (see also: ALIEN
RESURRECTION, CLIFFHANGER) to come along in some time.
     Where to start with my complaints about this movie?  Is it Akiva
Goldsman's ridiculous script that attempts to jam as many
fall-down-howlingly-bad lines into two hours as possible?  Actors who
obviously realize its qualities and spend the time mumbling them beneath
their breath?  A ridiculous little creature called Blorp (or Gleep, or
whatever) that's sole purpose seems to be to sell toys?  The time travel
plot that takes over half-way through the film and makes you long for the
oh-so-logical days of THE TERMINATOR and BACK TO THE FUTURE?  Hell, "The
Jetsons" paints a more realistic view of the future...
     LOST IN SPACE may ultimately be an insult to your intelligence, but it
is an insult with good special effects.  But with a big-screen TV, you can
wait for that HBO premiere instead of shelling out cash for this loser.
Director: Stephen Hopkins
Producer: Carla Fry, Akiva Goldsman, Stephen Hopkins, Mark W. Koch
Writer: Akiva Goldsman
Starring: Mimi Rogers, William Hurt, Lacey Chabert, Heather Graham, Gary
Oldman, Matt LeBlanc
http://dangerwillrobinson.lycos.com/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
     Okay, let's get thing straight, right up front.  If you have been
led to believe from the trailers that THE STORY OF US is a romantic
comedy, you are in for a huge shock.  This is a mean, bad, melodramatic
horror story about two bickering people.  There is little comedy to be
had in the entire thing.
     Which is a surprise.  This is the man who brought us the masterful
comedy WHEN HARRY MET SALLY.  And here we are, with people on couches,
talking to the camera about their relationship.  Same premise, right?
Ohhhhhhh noooooo.  THE STORY OF US can be summed up quite simply:  Bruce
Willis and Michelle Pfeiffer *hate* each other.  They spend two hours
yelling, cursing, crying, and pouting.  Then maybe they get back
together.  The end.
     Great film?  Uh, no.  Proof that people like Rob Reiner have too
much power.  When you find yourself spending the whole film trying to
read the wine labels in the scenes, you know you're watching something
that's going to be remembered as one of the worst films of the year.
Even the music is annoying  the same acoustic guitar-based Eric Clapton
song is played at least six times.
     Aside from a (very) few chuckles, this film is completely without
merit.  It's mean-spirited and just plain offensive.
     As usual, I saw this movie with my wife.  If our marriage can
survive THE STORY OF US, well, it can survive anything.
Director: Rob Reiner
Producer: Rob Reiner, Alan Zweibel, Jessie Nelson
Writer: Alan Zweibel, Jessie Nelson
Starring: Bruce Willis, Michelle Pfeiffer, Julie Hagerty, Red Buttons,
Rob Reiner, Paul Reiser, Betty White, Rita Wilson
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for American Pie 2 (2001)
The gang from American Pie is back in American Pie 2, or, I Still Know
What You Screwed Last Summer.  The immortal pie, of course, is gone, but
there are plenty of foreign objects and luscious ladies to occupy the
genitalia of the entire cast for a full hour and a half.
After reinventing the sex comedy in 1999's American Pie, AP2 had a high
bar to live up to, and miraculously, it has done so.  It actually
outdoes the original (by a mile) when it comes to juvenile and crude
humor.  And the sex gags... jeez, the dick jokes come rapid fire, one
every minute.  It ain't Woody Allen, but damn if it isn't utterly
hysterical.
Where Freddy Got Fingered failed, American Pie 2 succeeds admirably. 
It's silly and largely immature, but it's also original, clever, cheeky,
and has enough borderline sophistication to maintain plenty of appeal
for the adults in the audience.  (And parents, if I haven't made this
clear, this is a very adult movie, wholly unsuitable for any child you
don't want to end up as the town slut, male or female.)
Never mind the plot, which is an awkward construct of a bunch of
returning characters in search of a story.  And apparently they didn't
find one, so they just remade American Pie, only set one year later. 
This time out, the characters are coming home from their first year at
college, facing the same disillusionment they bore in high school.  To
find the meaning in all of it, the stars decide to rent a lakefront
beach house so opulent it might as well be the set for The Real World:
Michigan.
Aside from minor details, the rest of the plot is largely the same.  AP2
starts with another party at Stifler's, and it ends at another big
blowout bash.  Couples are formed and couples are broken.  Stifler's mom
makes the requisite appearance.  Jim's dad causes havoc.
Thanks to his tension-busting charisma, Seann William Scott's Stifler
has a greatly increased presence in the sequel, but all the girls except
for Alyson Hannigan's flute-toter have been practically cut out of the
film.  Tara Reid and Mena Suvari have arguably become the biggest
breakout stars from the original; they were obviously the busiest during
shooting and had to be disposed of conveniently for the sequel (Suvari's
character is shipped overseas for the summer in an awkward,
sitcom-feeling device).  No worry -- Reid and Suvari aren't funny
anyway.
The only thing that really interferes with the enjoyment of the movie is
that all of its stars have made so many bad knock-offs of American Pie
in the last two years that they've lost any sense of identity with the
characters that made them so original and endearing.  Chris Klein has
become a jokey caricature of himself -- from Say It Isn't So to Here on
Earth to Election (a great film, but basically the same character
again).  Ditto Jason Biggs, who played a wishy-washy loser in Loser and
Saving Silverman.  And Seann William Scott has turned into a generic
bozo in Evolution and Dude, Where's My Car?  Oddly, though, the biggest
stretch, which surprised me, is seeing Mena Suvari again playing an
innocent girl next door.  After films like American Beauty, she's broken
her own mold pretty permanently.
Of course, there's no hope searching for any kind of meaning in American
Pie 2.  Relying on the older brother of Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) to
once again show the kids the way, our heroes are just interested in
movin' on with their lives, because now that they're 19 years old, you
know, shouldn't there be some meaning in all of it?  And in full Pie
style, the answer is found... by throwing a beach party.
Director: James B. Rogers
Producer: Chris Moore, Craig Perry, Warren Zide
Writer: Adam Herz
Starring: Jason Biggs, Jennifer Coolidge, Shannon Elizabeth, Chris
Klein, Alyson Hannigan, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Eugene Levy, Natasha
Lyonne, Chris Owen, Tara Reid, Seann William Scott, Mena Suvari, Eddie
Kaye Thomas
http://www.americanpiemovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Love & Human Remains (1993)
     There's a little bit for everybody in LOVE AND HUMAN REMAINS, but as
a whole, most people are likely to find this film somewhat daunting.  This
study of modern relationships is billed as a "dark comedy"--and I'm still
trying to determine whether the designation fits.
     Following the interactions of seven side-wardly mobile Canadians,
LOVE AND HUMAN REMAINS explores questions of love, misery, loneliness,
confusion, and the strange truth that all seem to be inexplicably present
at the same time.  The reality of this has been the subject of numerous
romantic comedies and the like, but I'm not sure I've ever seen the topic
handled quite this way.
     For one thing, these aren't your garden-variety characters.  David
(Thomas Gibson) is an ex-child actor turned waiter, recently accepting
that he's gay.  Candy (Ruth Marshall) is his roommate and ex-girlfriend, a
book reviewer struggling with her own emotional needs.  Benita (Mia
Kirshner) is a psychic dominatrix friend of David's who earns a living by
acting out the twisted fantasies of others.  And it gets stranger than
that--a lot stranger, in fact--to the point of tying in a subplot (the
"human remains" part) about a serial killer who takes an earring from each
of his victims.
     The fragmented storytelling style used in the film make for some
difficult to follow transitions, often a series of broken images which are
hard to relate to on a deeper level than the surface.  It ends up feeling
more like an underground theatrical piece than a movie (the film is
actually based on the screenwriter's (Brad Fraser) own play called
"Unidentified Human Remains and the True Nature of Love").  Fraser says
the film is based on actual events from his mid-20's.  Scary.
     Most of the acting is fair, and some of the comedy is good.  Thomas
Gibson has all the best lines, dryly expressing his cynicism better than I
could ever hope to do.  I'm still working on figuring out "the moral of
the story" in the film, a question to which I may never find an answer. 
Then again, maybe that's the moral.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Underneath (1995)
     THE UNDERNEATH opens with a surreally bizarre, green-tinted shot of
Michael (Peter Gallagher), driving along the Austin, Texas backroads in an
armored car.  The coloration and the look of dread on his face are enough
to make you sick to your stomach.  These are also the perfect introduction
to a film noir where you just *know* nothing is going to turn out right.
     Michael is an ex-compulsive gambler, returned to his Austin hometown
ostensibly to turn his life around and get a real job, but in reality
having some less savory motives.  His ex-wife, Rachel (Allison Elliott),
is in town and attached to a local, small-time hood.  When Michael tries
to patch things up with Rachel, a plot suddenly (and quite inexplicably)
develops between the three to rob the armored car that Michael drives. 
The plan is hatched, and the fun begins.
     THE UNDERNEATH is director Steven Soderbergh's update of the 1949
noir CRISS CROSS.  Tracking the story along three different timelines,
it's a little difficult to get into, but once the action picks up, the
film is fairly engrossing.  As with any Soderbergh film, the camerawork is
exemplary, especially in the use of color as a symbol for the pervading
mood.
     The major problem here is that Elliott doesn't have "the look" to
pull off a Linda Fiorentino-style villain.  Instead, she looks and acts
more like a co-ed from the University down the street.  The writers have
also thrown in a few red herrings to keep you from figuring out the finale
too soon--not that you could, because the movie has a tacked-on, inane
ending that almost blows the whole film.
     Fortunately, it doesn't.  The movie's strong points (including some
nice work by Gallagher) manage to outweigh the negatives.  In the end, THE
UNDERNEATH succeeds more on the virtue of its good production values than
through a compelling or well-thought-out story.

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
     Kitschy seventies comedy does battle with some painful dramatics in Ang
Lee's highly-regarded THE ICE STORM, but the question of which of these wins
is still in the air.
     It's 1973, and the sexual revolution is in full bloom.  So are the thick
shag carpets, glass-bead necklaces, Watergate hearings, and teen angst.  And
its an Arctic Thanksgiving weekend in Connecticut where these things all come
together, at the home of a small and highly dysfunctional family.
     Kline and Allen are the hapless parents of Maguire and Ricci, and
everyone's up to no good in the sex department.  Dad is having an affair with
the next door neighbor (Weaver), and the kids are ripe for all manner of
trouble with show-and-tell games, experimental drugs, et. al.  Oh, and Mom is
pretty pissed about all of this.
     Taken the wrong way, all of this can be pretty hilarious, and for the
first hour, it is, as reminiscing over the maroon tux I wore to my cousin's
wedding wins out over the drama behind the non-stop 70's jokes.  But after
that, the film takes a somber, almost melodramatic tone, and it ceases poking
fun and starts asking questions -- questions which, ultimately, are never
answered to any degree of satisfaction.
     The tragic ending is expected and simply doesn't leave you at peace. 
While I'm not the type of moviegoer who needs everything neatly spelled out, I
do appreciate some sense of closure.  In the end, this film is an enjoyable
one, but it may be a little too hip for its own good.
D: Ang Lee
P: Ted Hope, Ang Lee, James Schamus
W: James Schamus
S: Kevin Kline, Joan Allen, Courtney Peldon, Henry Czerny, Tobey Maguire,
Christina Ricci, Elijah Wood, Sigourney Weaver
http://www.foxsearchlight.com/ice/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Más que amor, frenesí (1996)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Robert Strohmeyer.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/d3a0f34301178a48882568c0001d9721?OpenDocument
Apparently there comes a time in an urban twenty-something's life when
the mere sight of men dressed up in drag, singing in campy falsettos, is
enough to strike up the rebel spirit. If it's that time for you, don't
hesitate to drop seven bucks on Not Love Just Frenzy.
Películas Frenéticas, the collective pseudonym for the three directors
(Alfonso Albacete, Miguel Bardem and David Menkes) responsible for this
picture, bring us a frantic, Chasing Amy-esque tale of seven young
hipsters rampaging through Madrid on a coke-charged humping spree.
There's Max (Nancho Novo) the possibly homicidal gigolo, Monica
(Cayetana Guillen Cuervo) the nymphomaniac bartender-come-actress, Yeye
(Ingrid Rubio) the innocent idealist, Maria (Beatriz Santiago) the
lonely hepcat, Alberto (Gustavo Salmeron) the artistic and adventuresome
homosexual-whose-mother-doesn't-know, Alex (Javier Albala) the ambiguous
bisexual who complicates Alberto's life, David (Liberto Rabal) the
straight cokehead Alberto lusts after, Luis (Javier Manrique) the cop on
Max's six, and three drag queens thrown in for street cred. If this all
sounds complex, it isn't.
Once in play, these characters are about as predictable as they are
emotionally crude. Lest we forget the motivation of any given character
at any point in the film, each one explicitly states his or her
ambitions at every opportunity. Perhaps some subtlety is lost in
translation (many of the English subtitles are misspelled), but the
dialog of this flick holds about as much nuance as professional
wrestling commentary. Fortunately, the characters themselves are so
incomprehensibly flat as to eliminate the need for rich dialog. The one
exception here is Ingrid Rubio's portrayal of the sensitive and
wholesome Yeye, around whom most of the picture revolves. Though all of
the characters are presumed to have some kind of emotional depth, only
Yeye comes off as sincere-and this she does beautifully. Rubio's
charisma goes a long way toward compensating for the rest of the cast.
The film does have some redeeming moments, though, raising some fairly
interesting questions about what lies at the center of all this crazed
behavior and whether it's possible for scenesters like these to find any
meaning in their relationships. The suggested answer, unfortunately, is
probably not. Though the cinematography is mediocre at best, the good
looks of the cast make for tolerable viewing and the soundtrack is great
if you like house music.
This is a great movie if you're looking for a way to show off your
international panache to your whiny, sarcastic Goth friends, or if you
just want to watch people screw. Otherwise, stay home.
Director: Películas Frenéticas (Alfonso Albacete, Miguel Bardem, David
Menkes)
Producer: Fernando Colomo, Beatriz de la Gandara
Writer: Películas Frenéticas (Alfonso Albacete, Miguel Bardem, David
Menkes)
Starring: Nancho Novo, Cayetana Guillen Cuervo, Ingrid Rubio, Beatriz
Santiago, Gustavo Salmeron, Javier Manrique, Javier Albala, Liberto
Rabal
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
     Eighty bucks.  That's about how much money I've lost playing poker
since I saw ROUNDERS.  Not that this statistic is an inherently bad sign for
the movie or anything.  In fact, the fact that I was so motivated by the
movie to put all that money on the table speaks positively of the picture.
     ROUNDERS (the name is short-hand for people who make their living
playing poker) stars Matt Damon and Edward Norton as poker playing buddies
going in different directions.  Damon, after losing a VERY big money hand,
has given up his cardsharping ways for law school and a career as a lawyer. 
Norton, on the other hand, just out of prison, is eager to build a new
bankroll at the tables.  As you might expect, for a number of reasons, Damon
cannot stay away from the table forever, and consequently his budding law
career and relationship with newcomer Gretchen Mol are both put in peril. 
The trouble Norton's character (not so subtly nicknamed Worm) gets into does
nothing to make Damon's life easier.
     Director John Dahl (THE LAST SEDUCTION) and the film's writers
glamorize the world of professional poker playing from the outset, so be
wqrned.  If you don't feel that you can sympathize with trials and
tribulations of professional gamblers, this film is probably not for you. 
If on the other hand, you are like me, and not only revere the strategy,
psychology and probability of gambling, but also dabble in it from time to
time, you will probably be drawn in and (hopefully not) inspired by this
film.  (You'll still probably need to reference the poker glossary on the
film site's webpage.)  Just don't let it make you think you are a better
poker player for having seen the film.  Trust me, you're not.
Director: John Dahl
Producers: Ted Demme, Joel Stillerman
Writers: David Levien, Brian Koppelman
Starring: Matt Damon, Edward Norton, Gretchen Mol, John Turturro, John
Malcovich, Martin Landau, Famke Janssen
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Don Juan DeMarco (1995)
     Don Juan, the world's greatest lover is ... Johnny Depp?  I can
believe it, after seeing DON JUAN DEMARCO, a new film by first-time
director Jeremy Leven.  With excellent flare, Leven brings us this
beguiling tale of a young man who may or may not be the legendary
seducer of over one thousand women.
     When a distraught Don Juan is about to commit suicide because of
the loss of his (most recent) love, psychiatrist Jack Mickler (Marlon
Brando) is brought in to bring him back to reality.  This proves to be
a major undertaking, as Mickler slowly begins to realize that the
"delusional" Don Juan may actually be who he says he is.  As his last
case before retirement, Mickler is given ten days to determine whether
or not to institutionalize Don Juan, and there, the journey into the
man's past begins.
     What the doctor finds is a perfect blend of comedy and romance, a
serious questioning of our perceptions of reality, and a serious
analysis of our beliefs about love.  Depp's convincing portrayal of the
great lover keeps us constantly guessing as to his true identity, and
Brando pulls off his role as a comic foil perfectly.  Faye Dunaway has
a few good scenes as Brando's wife, with whom he rediscovers their
cooled passion as a result of his conversations with Don Juan.
     This romantic fable is the type of story that is generally labeled
as "cute," but its exquisite performances and comic sensibility prevent
the film from taking itself too seriously and becoming a trite sitcom.
Instead, the film manages to be touching and convincing.  Despite the
highly contrived plot and the silly ending, DON JUAN DEMARCO is a
memorable update of an ancient tale.

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
     Good Will Hunting goes to space in Titan A.E., an ill-conceived and
overambitious animation blowout (courtesy of 20th Century Fox) that
makes recent Disney fare look like thinking men's movies.
     Matt Damon's voice stars as Cale, an eager-beaver twentysomething
in the year 3028 who would be just like any other next-millennium Gen
made of pure energy, natch -- have blown up the earth.
     Talk about a bummer!  Cale's scientist father has vanished along
with his mysterious "Titan" spaceship project, and Cale seems doomed to
life on a crummy salvage station.  But in walks renegade space dude
Korso (Bill Pullman) to rescue Cale from his life of welding, convincing
the lad to go on a quest to find the Titan before the Drej do... and
thus save all of humanity!
     A bit of Independence Day and a lot of Star Trek 2: The Wrath of
Khan, Titan A.E. owes so much of its plot to other movies that I'll be
surprised if a copyright infringement lawsuit isn't slapped down any day
now.  Not that an "homage" can't be fun, even good from time to time,
but unfortunately, Titan is so unoriginal and lackluster in its script
and plotting that it really drags you down.
     With animated fare, really crack visuals tend to outweigh asinine
plots (though they didn't in Disney's recent Dinosaur nor in Fox's last
big animation attempt, Anastasia).  While Titan's spacescapes are often
out of this world (no pun intended), the character animation slapped on
top of them is wretched; an old-style, Scooby Doo-looking bunch of
people slapped atop the background of a dystopian future is just not a
good idea.
     But while the animated people are only so-so, it's the cast of
animated creatures that really look pathetic.  As this is a Don Bluth
production, one expects there to be a talking menagerie.  In Titan, this
means talking space hyenas, talking space turtles, and a horribly
ill-conceived talking space kangaroo/vulture inexplicably and
embarrassingly voiced by Janeane Garofalo.  Altogether, precious few of
the other voices in this movie match their characters.  While Damon and
Cale are clearly doppelgangers, the whiny Pullman as the
rough-and-tumble Korso is laughable, and Drew Barrymore as the vaguely
Asian Akima is simply perplexing.
     In fact, everything about Titan is just plain strange, from the
80s-ish hard rock/power ballad soundtrack that thumps through the whole
movie to the fact that the characters can move around in zero-gravity by
"swimming" through the air.  Rock on, Will.
Director: Don Bluth, Gary Goldman
Producer: Don Bluth, Gary Goldman, David Kirschner
Writer: Ben Edlund, Randall McCormick, Joss Whedon
Starring: Matt Damon, Drew Barrymore, Bill Pullman, Nathan Lane, Tone
Loc, Jim Breuer, Janeane Garofalo, John Leguizamo, Ron Perlman, Alex D.
Linz
http://www.afterearth.com/home.html
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
     I'd been looking forward to GATTACA since its clever promotions began
several months ago, promising a story of a future-gone-wrong, a time when
ethnic prejudice has given way to something even more frightening:  genetic
discrimination.  It's in this setting that the genetically-inferior Vincent
(played by Ethan Hawke) tries to advance his station by assuming the identity
of Jerome (played by the creepy Jude Law), and putting the moves on the
also-flawed Irene (Uma Thurman).
     Everything goes well for awhile, and just as Vincent is about to realize
his dream of going up as part of a space mission, the web starts to untangle. 
Here's where the problems of GATTACA start:  you see, as a mystery, it really
isn't much of one.  The investigation into the murder of the mission director
who may have known Vincent's secret is never very focused, and Alan Arkin's
"Columbo"-type flatfoot seems to uncannily know where to go at every turn.  By
the time the investigation is over, the whole thing has felt like a put-on to
waste an hour of screen time.
     On the other hand, GATTACA succeeds quite well at making us feel like
this could really happen.  Director Andrew Niccol has put beaucous work into
the set and costume designs, and the yellowish lighting makes GATTACA a real
creep-out.  As a cautionary tale about not messing with Mother Nature, GATTACA
is similarly successful, if obvious about it.
     This movie is great if you're looking for more of 1984 than STAR TREK for
your brand of future-shock... and if you're willing to believe that Ethan
Hawke and Uma Thurman are flawed in any way, GATTACA's definitely your cup of tea.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)
     That's right.  Just talkin' 'bout Shaft.  The remake.  Er, the
sequel that is -- in what might very well be the first and only time a
sequel has been given the same title as the original.  And believe me,
that's just where the stupidity of Shaft begins.
     Samuel L. Jackson is obvious casting for the role of John Shaft,
the nephew of that other John Shaft (Richard Roundtree), the man who
popularized New York's baddest cop in three films during the early
1970s.  While John Shaft is certainly a piece of pop culture, it's also
important to remember that the Shaft films were little more than classic
examples of blaxploitation.  And the Shaft of today does embarrassingly
little to change his image.
     It's a pity, because the update could have been a lot of fun -- a
modern-day John Shaft as tragic hero in a corrupt and oppressive NYPD.
Alas, no, the movie degenerates after 10 minutes of foot-tapping to
Isaac Hayes' classic "Theme from Shaft," with the audience left merely
to wonder: How long it will be until Roundtree makes his obligatory
cameo? (Answer: about 30 minutes.)
    The plot, what there is of one, is an utter throwaway.  Involving a
rich yuppie psycho (American Psycho's Christian Bale, now making a
living playing rich yuppie psychos) who bludgeons a black man to death
-- and the hush scheme to silence the only witness (Toni Collette) --
Shaft is so derivative as to be laughable, if only it didn't take itself
so seriously.  With Shaft's ridiculous beard trim, a joke-busting
sidekick (fittingly played by Busta Rhymes, the only real treat in the
film), and a whole army of bad guys, none of whom can shoot worth a damn
(though Shaft never misses), Shaft is a parody of itself but doesn't
even realize it.  Ultimately, the story serves simply to usher Shaft
from fight to gun battle to car chase, over and over and over again.  If
it wasn't called Shaft, no one would see this film.
     I tell you what.  Let Spike Lee direct Shaft instead of blood-happy
John Singleton.  Hell, let Spike Lee direct and star!  Now that'd be a
movie.  But what am I saying?  Shut yo mouth!
Director: John Singleton
Producer: Scott Rudin, John Singleton
Writer: Richard Price
Starring: Samuel L. Jackson, Vanessa L. Williams, Jeffrey Wright,
Christian Bale, Dan Hedaya, Busta Rhymes, Toni Collette, Richard
Roundtree
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Too Much Sleep (1997)
Indie filmmakers who want to make their own version of After Hours
better damn well know what they're doing.  In his first feature, David
Maquiling appears to have a grasp of the basics, but his film falls
short of its goal.
At its heart, Too Much Sleep is an extremely simple story about a young
man named Jack (Marc Palmieri), a lazy security guard who finds his
father's handgun stolen during a bus ride daydream.  His quest to
retrieve the gun sends him on the kind of wacky misadventures seen only
in the movies.  With his friend's uncle Eddie (Pasquale Gaeta,
apparently channeling Bruno Kirby in The Freshman here), Jack visits
male strip clubs, foreign parties, and even a Chinese restaurant in
order to track down the mysterious Kate (Nicol Zanzarella), whom he
suspects of conspiring to steal the weapon.  Naturally, we expect Jack
will also find himself along the way.
Sure enough, Jack falls for Kate en route to a whiffle bat beating of
the ultimate crook, but unfortunately, writer/director Maquiling muddles
his metaphors to the point where the audience becomes ambivalent toward
all his characters.  Palmieri's Jack is such a sorry deadpan fool we
hardly care whether he'll retrieve his (illegally owned) gun.  Kate has
so little screen time we don't really feel their relationship is a wise
choice for either character.  Only Gaeta's Eddie comes across as likable
(despite the fact that he's a dishonest lech); his Mafioso-wannabe is
simply too deliriously acted to be seen as anything but innocuous.
Sure enough, Too Much Sleep comes across as exactly that: innocuous and
sleepy, an overly dry shot at creating something quirky that misfires as
often as it hits due to a misconfigured sense of comic timing. 
Filipino-American Maquiling describes his film as an homage to the
timeless "folk story," presumably something passed down orally from
generations to generations.  My kids will have to be content with
digging up the videotape somewhere decades from know.
Director: David Maquiling
Producer: Jason Kliot, Joana Vicente
Writer: David Maquiling
Starring: Marc Palmieri, Pasquale Gaeta, Nicol Zanzarella, Philip
Galinsky, Judy Sabo Podinker, Mary Ann Riel
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Rich Man's Wife, The (1996)
     There are a couple of rules inherent to the thriller that any
filmmaker should be aware of.  First, you have to keep the pace moving
so fast that the audience doesn't have time to think about whodunit. 
And second, if you kill off most of the cast, whoever's left alive at
the end of the movie is the one who did the killing.
     THE RICH MAN'S WIFE blindly ignores both of these rules, but still
manages to float, thanks to a united effort by an exceptional cast and
exquisite production values.  Amy Holden Jones directs her own
screenplay here, a modern-day reworking of Hitchcock's masterful
STRANGERS ON A TRAIN.
     Hitch's story revolved around a man who took a joke too far -- an
offer to kill the other's wife.  This time, it's wife Josie (Halle
Berry) kills ultra-rich husband Tony (Christopher McDonald) with the aid
of friendly sociopath Cole (Peter Greene).  Jones also throws in some
interesting twists about Josie's forlorn lover Jake (Clive Owen) and his
ex-wife Nora (Clea Lewis from TV's "Ellen") -- the latter who all but
steals the show.
     But the main problem is that despite a tight 100 minute running
time, Jones's pacing is slower than a Yugo headed uphill, primarily
because there's not a lot of story filler off the main path of the film
(this isn't necessarily a bad thing, it just doesn't work right here). 
The other problem is that none of the characters in the film are very
good at being criminals; leaving mile-wide trails for the cops.  (Then
again, this may or may not have been intentional.  Whatever the case,
they're really slow about it.)  This lethargy left me restless during
much of the movie, but it works to great effect when Jones finally revs
into action phase...
     Any time a gun comes out on screen, watch it, because sparks are
about to fly.  The confrontation between Tony and Cole is a powerhouse
of a cat & mouse sequence which almost makes the film worth seeing on
its own.  Jones also uses the mixed-race marriage of Josie and Tony to
explore (on a very limited scale) some of the racial dynamics of their
situation and of society in general.
     The bottom line is that everyone in the film could have stood a
shot of adrenaline, but by the time it's over, the thriller will have
captured the minds of most of its audience.  After all, patience is a
virtue, right?
     P.S. My biggest complaint -- while you find out *who* did it, you
never really find out *how*.  If any of my readers figure it out, please
drop me a line and let me hear your theory.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
An out-and-out blatant chick flick from the first frame on, MY BEST
FRIEND'S WEDDING will be as enjoyable to its female patrons as it is
frustrating to its male ones.  Yes, Julia Roberts is back, and in fine
form -- playing Julianne, the bad girl, against Cameron Diaz's
squeaky-clean bride-to-be (Kim).  The best friend in question is Michael
(Dermot Mulroney), Roberts's long-time confidant.  When Michael reveals
his imminent marriage, Julianne develops a jealousy to be reckoned with,
and makes it her life's work to break up the couple.
In addition to its problems with alienating male viewers, the real flaw
in WEDDING is the lack of chemistry between the Mulroney and Roberts. 
While I'd probably be a little shy smooching on Julia, hey, that's no
excuse for a seasoned pro.  Then there's also the minor detail that the
trailer tells the story better than the film -- leaving some gaping plot
holes -- but who's quibbling?  Roberts is the one to watch here, along
with Rupert Everett as her gay editor and co-conspirator in this mess.
It's really these two that make this picture fun -- and funny.  And it's
in WEDDING's fall-down funny moments that the picture really shines.
Maybe the most annoying piece of the film is Diaz and her penchant for
bawling in every scene.  But then again, who's watching her?  I always
liked the redheads best, anyway.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
     Sure it's ridiculous.  Sure it's in generally poor taste.  So what? 
That's what makes THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY so good.
     If you've seen the trailer, you know the story: Ted (Stiller) finally
gets to go out with Mary (Diaz) to the prom and is stymied by a freak zipper
accident, sending him into years of therapy to wonder what-coulda-been. 
Thirteen years later, we find that he's not the only one fixated on Mary...
as no fewer than five suitors appear to win her heart.
     Done one way, this could've been a Disney movie.  Done the Farrelly
brothers (DUMB AND DUMBER) way, it's anything but.
     Frankly, I prefer the Farrelly brothers way, because it's just so damn
hilarious.  Most of the funny bits have unfortunately be spoiled by the
trailer, but it's no matter; MARY's still got plenty of juice in her.
     (Note to potential filmgoers: The overly sensitive need not apply.)
Director: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Producer: Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Bradley Thomas, Charles B.
Wessler
Writer: Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Starring: W. Earl Brown, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Chris Elliott, Brett
Favre, Ben Stiller
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Wood, The (1999)
     Another week, another coming of age story.  Turns out timing can be
everything, and THE WOOD's unfortunate release one week after the
somewhat similar (but much better) AMERICAN PIE will leave viewers
drawing unfavorable comparisons between the two.
     The story behind THE WOOD, as in Inglewood, California, follows
three best friends on the day when one is set to be married.  Of course,
he's having the jitters, so they reminisce about their childhood growing
up together and chasing girls, which, basically, is what they all still
want to be doing.
     Told in half-present, half-flashback, THE WOOD alternates between
time periods, launching into those `Hey, remember that time when...'
vignettes, overlaid with music by Luther Vandross and other 1980's soul
legends.
     Unfortunately, the MTV-production side of THE WOOD comes out far
too often, with long, drawn-out comedy scenes that run out of gas after
a couple of minutes and left me yawning or checking my watch.  These
jokes are just too tired, overused, or recycled... and THE WOOD quickly
becomes a game of Spot the Cliché.  In fact, the whole premise has been
done to death  possibly best in DINER (1982).  Maybe it's just too soon
for 1989 nostalgia, but I found myself much more interested in the
present-day than the booty-chasing youths of these guys, and
unfortunately, that's when the bulk of THE WOOD takes place.
     THE WOOD isn't horrible, but it isn't particularly memorable,
either.  Just another summer movie that will likely be lost in the
shuffle.
Director: Rick Famuyiwa
Producer: Albert Berger, David Gale, Ron Yerxa
Writer: Rick Famuyiwa
Starring: Taye Diggs, Omar Epps, Richard T. Jones, Sean Nelson
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Jumanji (1995)
     If nothing else, JUMANJI is the most unfortunately titled film of the
year.  And if you haven't turned on your television in the last month you
may still be among the few who don't know what it means.  For the
uninitiated, Jumanji is an ancient board game set in the spooky jungle. 
When the game is played, it causes supernatural things to happen,
including the creation of a horde of monkeys, earthquakes, a monsoon
(indoors), and a stampede through the suburbs of the New England town in
which JUMANJI is set.
     The story begins some 26 years earlier, when young Alan (Robin
Williams) and Sarah (Bonnie Hunt) unearth the game and start playing.  On
Alan's first move, he finds himself sucked into the game as a prisoner,
only to be released when the game is continued in 1995 by Judy (Kirsten
Dunst) and Peter (Bradley Michael Pierce).  Unfortunately, the ill effects
of the game disappear only when it is finished, so the three track down
Sarah, who, after years of therapy, has finally come to grips with the
shock of seeing Alan vanish, and they continue where they left off.
     The rest of the film unfurls the wacky effects the game has on the
players and the town, until the climactic conclusion is reached. 
Unfortunately, along the way, the film fails miserably at building up any
semblance of suspense (it's pretty obvious how this thing is going to
end), and relies on melodrama to try to make us care about the characters,
resulting in a sloppy, over-dramatic plot that doesn't really get going
for half an hour.  Even the precocious kids are basically annoying.  While
much of the film is funny and pleasant to watch, the overall result is a
middling success.
     But you don't go to a movie like this for the gripping plot, and
everyone's question is, "How are the effects?"  Well, they're not so
great.  Compared to the groundbreaking TOY STORY, JUMANJI looks downright
embarrassing.  Few of the computer-generated animals, especially the
plastic-looking monkeys, come across as even remotely realistic, although
the filmmakers really seem to have tried their best.  Apparently, the
technology just isn't ready yet.
     In the end, JUMANJI looks like it wanted to be the next ROGER
RABBIT--a semi-animated film for the whole family.  But in taking things
too seriously, the movie lacks that ingenious, eye-opening "spark" that's
absolutely critical here, and it ends up being another film that's
basically just for kids.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Broken Arrow (1996)
     BROKEN ARROW is the first really big-budget film of the year, and you
can tell right from the start that all the money went into one thing: 
blowing up helicopters.
     Classic action director John Woo, redeeming himself for making a
Jean-Claude Van Damme movie (HARD TARGET) in 1992, proves himself capable
in the Hollywood arena of big explosions with this stylish story.  BROKEN
ARROW is your (very) basic action/adventure featuring an air force pilot
gone mad (John Travolta), the sidekick (Christian Slater) who tries to
stop him from stealing two nuclear weapons (aka broken arrows) and holding
a city hostage, and the really cute park ranger (Samantha Mathis) who
teams up with him to save the world.
     Obviously, anything with a plot as far-fetched as this is going to
take a lot more than 100 minutes to completely flesh out, so screenwriter
Graham Yost has left much of the story to our imagination, relying instead
on lots of exploding helicopters, trains, jeeps, planes, buildings, and
the occasional nuclear weapon.  Oh, and guns, and even fist fights, when
there's nothing left to blow up.
     Not that this is bad.  Even though it's pretty mindless, it's
actually a lot of fun.  Yes, the dialogue is really corny (when the
movie's best line is "You da man," you know you're in trouble), the
dramatics are overdone, the humor is largely unintentional, and the plot
is driven by coincidence and lucky, wild guesses.  But what Yost has left
out in substance, Woo makes up for with style.  His signature slo-mo
fighting and gunplay are choreographed better than any Hollywood insider
could hope to achieve, and Woo can really get your heart rate going, *even
though* you know how things are going to turn out.  You really have no
choice but to cut him some slack in the story department.
     Woo also makes an interesting (and blatant) attempt to pay homage to
Sergio Leone's THE GOOD, THE BAD, AND THE UGLY, with many of that film's
touches.  Most notably, a bar of theme music is played for John Travolta
whenever he's on screen.  While kitschy, Travolta (in his third "goofy
criminal" role in two years) is *not* Clint Eastwood...and Woo isn't
Leone, for that matter.
     But all this stuff is probably just quibbling from a crusty film
critic.  While BROKEN ARROW is truly mindless eye candy, it's a whole lot
of fun for anyone who feels that more testosterone is better.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
     How do you make a Serious Movie about someone who never took
anything seriously at all?
     This Andy Kaufman biopic has been in the works and has been talked
about for so long, it's become as cultish as the man himself.  Will
Carrey get the Oscar nod he didn't get for THE TRUMAN SHOW?  My
prediction: yes.  Will viewers of the film finally come to understand
the infamous comedian?  No, and he wasn't a comedian, it turns out.
Andy Kaufman, in what may be the greatest revelation MAN ON THE MOON has
to offer, was a self-stylized `song and dance man.'
     It's hard to fathom a more difficult subject to tackle, which
explains why this picture has languished in development for such a long
time.  Kaufman, as even passing fans are aware, used elaborate pranks to
entertain the audience  and more importantly, to entertain himself.
     With co-conspirator and writing partner Bob Zmuda (see our
interview, coming soon), Kaufman wrapped his entire life in mystery.
>From his well-documented obsession with wrestling women, to made-up
lounge singer Tony Clifton, to his hatred for having to play dumb on the
TV show `Taxi,' to his funeral after struggling with lung cancer,
everything was a big joke to Kaufman.
     Or was it?  MAN ON THE MOON gives us a teeny peek inside Andy
Kaufman's skull before sealing it shut.  I can't say that I know any
more about Andy Kaufman than I did before I went into the theater.  And
while Kaufman may have been unknowable to all but his innermost circle,
I find that a failing of the film.
     But mind you, there's more to like.  Jim Carrey, as Kaufman's
doppelganger, is haunting and devastatingly accurate.  The man is
virtually indistinguishable from the real thing, and he deserves some
serious credit for his work here.
     Courtney Love, on the other hand, comes as close to ruining a
picture as she ever has.  Playing Kaufman's girlfriend, she has far less
screen time than she did in THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT (also written by
the same team that did MOON), but she just does just as much damage to
the story with her abrasive, out-of-place presence.
     `There is no real Andy,' someone says during the film.  I'm
inclined to agree.  Kaufman was a awesomely complex individual, and he
lived his life as much in front of the camera as he did behind it.  What
is there left to explore?  Movies, books, miniseries  I don't think
we'll ever know.
     Note to self:  The title of the film, taken from the R.E.M. song of
the same name, is never explained.  I'll have to ask Zmuda about this.
Director: Milos Forman
Producer: Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey Sher
Writer: Scott Alexander, Larry Karaszewski
Starring: Jim Carrey, Danny DeVito, Courtney Love, Paul Giamatti, Jerry
Lawler, Lorne Michaels
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for High Road (1996)
     The issue of whether Thomas Pallotta and Jack Meredith are twisted
sons of bitches is not up for debate.  A better point of contention is,
are they geniuses, and what happens to them next?
     After seeing their ultra-low budget production of THE HIGH ROAD, a
drug- and booze-infused trip around the state of Texas, I'm almost
unable to comment.  What might be described as EASY RIDER meets
DRUGSTORE COWBOY, the movie is certainly a success in terms of
experimental filmmaking, and it definitely has the potential of becoming
a cult classic on the midnight circuit.
     While following go-nowhere (and I *mean* it) twentysomethings on an
inspired-by-nothing journey is nothing new, Pallotta's camera direction
and eye for locations is more reminiscent of David Lynch than Dennis
Hopper.  Making the most of almost no money (how they got such a
fantastic score is beyond me), Pallotta proves that his directorial
style is a force to be reckoned with, should the Money Men come
knocking.
     Although the road movie has seen a resurgence of late, what sets
THE HIGH ROAD apart from recent klunkers like THE DOOM GENERATION is the
deadpan goofiness with which Pallotta and company have infused the
film.  Full of sex, drug, and alcohol cliches, all delivered in monotone
by the cast of amateurs, the movie is one long running joke about being
high, yet in some bizarre way manages to be as anti-drug as anything
I've ever seen.
     With production values at the low end of low-budget, much of the
film's sound is drowned out by room/car tone and tape hiss.  It's
unfortunate, even if it is expected.  The performances from the four
leads are all, oddly, exactly the same, due to what Pallotta refers to
as "the hyperrealism of the Huston/Bunuel approach."  I'm not sure if I
know what that means, and I'm not even sure if I spelled "hyperrealism"
right, either... but, as with most experiments, sometimes it works, and
sometimes it doesn't.
     Thankfully, THE HIGH ROAD works more often than not, and any fan of
the genre will definitely be entertained.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for First Wives Club, The (1996)
     The biggest crowd-pleaser of the year is upon us -- the powerhouse
trio of Goldie Hawn, Bette Midler, and Diane Keaton foisting their
womanness on us with a vengeance.  Sure to revive the debate over
whether films like this are "man hating," THE FIRST WIVES CLUB is, in
reality, a harmless big screen sitcom that actually manages to appeal to
a large audience.
     Rambling through its first 30 minutes with no real direction, THE
FIRST WIVES CLUB eventually turns into a story about three old friends
who want to exact vengeance on their wayward ex-husbands.  Elise (Hawn)
is an aging movie star, obsessed, as most aging movie stars are, about
her looks.  Brenda (Midler) is a bitter ex-housewife who loves her son
and bemoans her lack of funds to support him -- and hasn't changed her
hair since 1969.  Annie (Keaton) is basically a middle-aged version of
Annie Hall, only now she has a lesbian daughter and an intrusive mother,
and Woody Allen is nowhere to be seen.
     The most visible of the ex-husbands is Brenda's estranged hubby
Morty (Dan Hedaya), an electronics kingpin who has moved on to the
greener pastures of Shelly (Sarah Jessica Parker).  He becomes the
centerpiece of an intricate scam the women put together to basically
drive the three husbands to madness, ruin, and poverty.
     I must admit, that for all its middle-aged woman-bent humor, THE
FIRST WIVES CLUB still managed to be amusing to this 25 year-old man,
mainly due to some really fine acting, good jokes, and a fresh story. 
Keaton is the best, as usual, and Hawn also does a fine job. 
Desperately trying to steal the show (and ending up as the only wife who
I didn't really care about) is Midler.  But when was the last time
Midler played a character who *wasn't* an overbearing loudmouth?
     It's also a manipulative little film -- pulling those heart strings
about as hard as you can without jumping out of the comedy genre.  There
are loads of cameos -- the only person they forgot was Charles Nelson
Reilly.  Basically, everything works to give WIVES a sitcom feel (I
wouldn't be surprised if they adapted it next season...).  Just to seal
the issue, they even put Bronson Pinchot in a supporting role.  (Ironic
fact:  almost everyone behind the scenes of the film (including the
director, screenwriter, and producer) is male.)
     Parting words of advice:  Guys, prepare yourselves to be dragged to
the movie theater by your wife or girlfriend.  Ladies, please don't get
any bright ideas.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
     PUSHING TIN is being promoted as a funny, endearing look at the
crazy-wacky lives of air traffic controllers, with a little romance in
the mix.
     PUSHING TIN is actually a droll, relatively lifeless look at the
crazy-wacky lives of two rival air traffic controllers (Cusack and
Thornton), neither of whom you'll actually like very much nor care
about.
     Same goes for their wives (Blanchett and Jolie, respectively, who
play shades of the same white trash bimbette - one blind to the world,
the other a drunk loony).
     TIN has a few things going for it, namely some mildly interesting
scenes where said tin is pushed around (the tin being a euphemism for
planes in the air), though the movie gets awfully pedantic and obvious
in pointing out just how stressful this job can be and what an awful
toll it takes on the personal lives of these guys.  And if you thought
air travel was dangerous, well, this movie won't help matters much.
     But TIN has much more detracting from an otherwise interesting
setup: namely, that the story blows.  It's too long, it's boring, and no
character is remotely likeable.  Even John Cusack, who made a name for
himself being likeable, is not.  Same for Thornton, imitating a deaf
mute air traffic wunderkind of some sort.  And while you think it may be
fun to watch Jolie slut around as the town ho, it's not.  Even Blanchett
(last seen as Queen Elizabeth) playing streak-haired Jersey is just
plain bizarre instead of compelling.
     What else to say?  PUSHING TIN is poised to be a substantially
overhyped flick that delivers on few of its promises.
     Consider this flight delayed at best, due to bad weather.
http://www.foxmovies.com/pushingtin/
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
     "What I learned while watching THE SPANISH PRISONER," by Christopher
Null.
     2. If you develop a secret formula for the company you work at,
*especially* don't trust nobody.
     4. David Mamet's still got it, even though HOUSE OF GAMES will remain
his masterpiece.
     5. When a girl says she knows an FBI agent, don't call the number on
the card!  Look them up in the phone book and make sure she ain't lying
through her teeth.
     7. Ed O'Neill will never appear in a better film, however briefly.
Director: David Mamet
Producer: Jean Doumanian
Writer: David Mamet
Starring: Campbell Scott, Rebecca Pidgeon, Steve Martin, Ricky Jay, Ben
Gazzara, Felicity Huffman, Ed O'Neill
http://www.spe.sony.com/Pictures/SonyClassics/spanishprisoner/index.html

Title
Review for Fly Away Home (1996)
     Anna Paquin's first starring role after stealing an Oscar for THE
PIANO is the harmless family movie FLY AWAY HOME.  Following in the
footsteps of countless family movies before it, FLY AWAY HOME tries too
hard to appeal to both children and their parents and ultimately loses
much of its appeal to everybody.
     In case you missed the movie's trailer, which provides a nice plot
synopsis, FLY AWAY HOME is about a teenage girl (Paquin) from New
Zealand who moves in with her Canadian father (Jeff Daniels) after her
mother dies.  The young girl is utterly bored and lonely until she finds
a family of young goose eggs (eventually geese) to take care of.  After
she becomes the geese's mother, she finds happiness, and the whole
family bands together to figure out how to take care of the geese.  This
ultimately leads to the decision to have young Anna fly the geese down
south for the winter.
     The first problem with this film comes in trying to understand why
Anna's mother packed her up and moved to New Zealand of all places.  The
answer is of course that the studio execs wanted Anna in this picture,
and everyone knows Anna Paquin is from New Zealand.  Hence, the rewrite.
     The second problem comes with trying to understand how important
the death of Anna's mother actually is.  Presumably since the filmmakers
show us the whole car crash in the first scene, the mother's death is
important, but after this scene she is not really discussed again for
the next hour.  Because of this, Anna's moping and whining for the first
half of the film seems to have little motivation and Anna's character
comes off as basically obnoxious.  This is just about the kiss of death
for a family movie, when the child star begins to become unlikable.
     The rest of the characters, however, fit very well into the
stereotypes they are trying to fill (and because they do, they help
Anna's character fit into hers):  Jeff Daniels plays the caring father
trying to get through to his depressed child, Dana Delany is the
terribly nice father's girlfriend who has an even harder time trying to
make friends with Anna, and supporting characters fill out the various
other good guy and bad guy roles.  The character arches also fit nicely
into the stereotypical family movie fare.  Those being that as the story
goes on, the bad guys get worse, forcing Anna to turn to the good guys
for help, where she finds it.  Of course, the story's development is not
quite this simple, but it might as well be.
     As I mentioned at the outset, FLY AWAY HOME is a family movie. 
This being the case, the filmmakers have thrown in plenty of cute things
(baby geese) and silly things (Anna making funny faces) to keep the kids
occupied.  What hurts it though is that they have also tried to build
rounded characters and a complex plot.  In trying so hard to do both
however, they have accomplished neither.  The film jumps continuously
from cute scene to mature scene resulting in 1) an emotional film that
never quite lives up to its potential and 2) a lot of distracted
children.  FLY AWAY HOME is an on-and-off movie founded on the
philosophy that it is better to please all of the people some of the
time, which doesn't really work with children.
-Bradley Null is a filmmaker, guest critic, and brother of Christopher
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Walking and Talking (1996)
     Well, a lot more talking than walking....  And not to be confused with
last year's KICKING AND SCREAMING.
     And not at all a bad movie, and the most aptly titled film out right
now.  WALKING AND TALKING is basically just that, focusing on best friends
Laura (Anne Heche) and Amelia (Catherine Keener) and their comedic
struggles with life and love at the dawn of the big 3-0.
     Laura is about to marry Frank (Todd Field) and is having the jitters.
Amelia is a confirmed, miserable bachelorette, and she dallies with the
local video store clerk (Kevin Corrigan), aka "The Ugly Guy," and
ex-boyfriend Andrew (Liev Schreiber).
     And essentially, they all just talk.  A lot.  And it's pretty funny,
with topics of conversation running the gamut from cat vomit to therapy to
schlock horror flicks.  The characters themselves have also been taken to
the hilt.  Frank isn't just a jewelry designer -- he designs only the
really tacky stuff you'd see in a Montgomery Wards catalog.  Schreiber, the
funniest of the lot, reprises his phone sex-obsessed character from DENISE
CALLS UP, and has an addiction to porn videos.  Then there's headliners
Amelia and Laura, whose collective litany of neuroses makes me look like a
sane person.
     So yes, it's funny, but at some point I kept wondering, do people
really talk like this?  The conversations tend to get a bit extreme and
explicit -- running into candid sexual discussions and descriptions of
bodily functions that would put off Madonna.  Humorous?  Sure.  Realistic?
I don't think so.
     That's unfortunate, because this reliance on over-the-top dialogue is
the only thing that really detracts from the picture, which is otherwise a
frank and funny depiction of urban life in the 90's.  (And I was a little
disappointed by the lack of a real ending, too.)
     So no ending on this review, either, but you get a parting fun fact:
watch for people's kitchens -- everyone has the same toaster oven.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Dogme 1 - Festen (1998)
     Does anything come out of Denmark that's not disturbing?
     A grand experiment that is a smashing success, THE CELEBRATION
adheres to the principles of "Dogme 95," a collective of filmmakers who
swear to adhere to certain rules in filmmaking: no studio shooting,
location sound only, no music, hand-held camera only, natural light
only, etc.  The full manifesto has ten rules, *none* of which are
commonly adhered to in Hollywood.  It's a real surprise to see how
magnificent these rules can be when put into the context of a good
script and good acting.
     But enough about the method.  The story is one of a family
unraveling during the celebration of the father's 60th birthday.  As it
turns out, dear old dad's done some pretty unspeakable things, and today
is payback.
     I won't spoil the rest for you, but THE CELEBRATION remains the
best (okay, the only) foreign film I've seen this year.  If you're a fan
of cinema that keeps you up late and doesn't have a bunch of teen
screamers... this one's for you.
Director: Thomas Vinterberg
Producer: Birgitte Hald
Writer: Thomas Vinterberg
Starring: Ulrich Thomsen, Henning Moritzen, Thomas Bo Larsen, Paprika
Steen, Birthe Neumann, Trine Dyrholm
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
     I'll admit to watching the early 1980's `Inspector Gadget' cartoon,
and probably far too late in life.
     Looks like now I'm waaaaay too old for this kind of thing, but
judging by the mute stares of the many children in our advance screening
audience, maybe they are too.
     INSPECTOR GADGET  the live-action version starring Matthew
Broderick in a thankless slapstick role  tries so hard to be funny,
aiming alternately at kids and their parents, that it misses on all
counts.  In one scene, Gadget will grab some guy's crotch until he
squeals.  In the next, the evil Dr. Claw (Everett) will pontificate on
how his moniker is `One word, like Madonna.'  Do kids get the subtlety
of the joke, considering Everett is openly gay?  Do adults think it's
funny?
     Nix on both counts, and the super-streamlined plot line (John Brown
is injured and becomes superhuman crime-fighting machine) is stolen
completely from ROBOCOP.  How's that for your average kiddie movie?
     Two funny items of note earn GADGET its half-star.  First is the
Minion Recovery Group scene, which appears during the closing credits.
Second is actually up front, when a `Yahoo!' billboard crushes Claw's
limo.  Considering that Disney's Go network is now an arch-rival of
Yahoo!, the free advertising for the competition (which likely wasn't an
issue during the movie's original production) seems particularly ironic.
Director: David Kellogg
Producer: Jordan Kerner, Roger Birnbaum, Andy Heyward
Writer: Kerry Ehrin, Zak Penn
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Rupert Everett, Joely Fisher, Michelle
Trachtenberg, Andy Dick, Cheri Oteri, Dabney Coleman, Michael G. Hagerty
http://disney.go.com/DisneyPictures/gadget/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Faster Pussycat! Kill! Kill! (1965)
     In 1966, Russ Meyer's classic, FASTER, PUSSYCAT!  KILL!  KILL!,
first hit the big screen.  1995 marks the re-release of what is
considered the director's best and most accessible work: still as fun,
twisted, and hilarious as ever.
     The picture opens with an ominous voice-over, reminiscent of an
old Ed Wood picture, warning us of the dangers of a certain creature
that often "travels in packs."  Of course this creature is none other
than ... the go-go dancer, which, when released after a hard night's
work, has the tendency to wander through the desert looking for
trouble.
     FASTER, PUSSYCAT! is the story of three such creatures (Tura
Satana, Haji, and Lori Williams) who, after a particularly competitive
auto race, wind up in a plot involving murder, kidnapping, and the lust
for an old man's "stash" of money.  It's a thin plot, of course, but
the ultra-hammy acting by the three ladies is what really carries the
story from one hilarious scene to the next.
     The Ed Wood comparisons don't stop at the narration.  In many
respects, FASTER, PUSSYCAT! is so bad it's good.  Satana, Haji, and
Williams couldn't act their ways--working together--out of a paper
bag.  But surprisingly, this works.  With the heavy use of '60's
hipster-slang and a cool jazz/thriller theme music soundtrack, the
three leads are portrayed as anti-heroines of a bygone age.  So what if
they haven't memorized their lines?
     And don't be fooled, Meyer knew what he was doing.  The script is
full of self-mocking references, with Satana referring to a "scene" or
"the screenplay."  And as a true master of low-budget filmmaking, Meyer
could turn this schlock into profits.  While appearing as
half-industrial film, half-farce, the sum result is an entertaining
fringe picture that's really quite suitable for the mainstream.
     As new prints of FASTER, PUSSYCAT! travel around the country,
you'll probably hear that Meyer was "a soft-core pornographer" with
films like BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE DOLLS.  But when you see this movie
(and you really should), you may not even notice:  despite the
sensationalistic topic and scantily-clad characters, PUSSYCAT has no
nudity, due to the heavy censorship activity of the era.  Of course,
Meyer's reputation is quite the opposite.  Meyer fools us all again.

Title
Review for Body Shots (1999)
     Again, Hollywood has taken creative marketing to new heights with
BODY SHOTS.  Judging by the trailers, the ads, even the tagline (`There
are movies that define every decade!'), one would be led to believe that
BODY SHOTS is an incisive drama/comedy about twentysomething
relationships, emphasis on the comedy.
     You know it from the start, when a battered Sara (Reid) comes
careening through the streets of L.A., obviously post-rape.  Nothing
starts a movie off quite like a rape aftermath, but in flashback, the
film starts to look up.  The next half hour tells us about the night
before, when four guys and four girls go to a downtown club, all looking
to hook up for the night.
     Some of them do, and some don't.  And one of these entanglements
ends up badly.  At first, Livingston alone provides comic relief as a
semi-lovable loser who shows up in golfing regalia and can't get in the
club.  But on The Day After, BODY SHOTS quickly degenerates into a Movie
of the Week that would play better on Lifetime, with a he said/she said
legal war that is never resolved.
     While BODY SHOTS has its moments, by and large it's a poor entry
into the genre.  Its `clever' photography and self-referential nonsense
gets old, quickly.  The speeches given directly to camera are silly and
unrealistic:  No one acts like this.  Even the title doesn't make
sense.  There are no body shots in the movie.  (The title was recently
changed from the trademark-challenged JELLO SHOTS, and there is no Jello
in the movie, either.)
     Eight Very Beautiful People acting ugly?  Count me out.  Check out
SWINGERS or GO, which are far better treatments of the same theme.
Director: Michael Cristofer
Producer: Harry Colomby, Jennifer Keohane
Writer: David McKenna
Starring: Sean Patrick Flanery, Jerry O'Connell, Amanda Peet, Tara Reid,
Ron Livingston, Emily Procter, Brad Rowe, Sybil Temchen
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Double Happiness (1994)
     Mina Shum, in her writer/director's notes on DOUBLE HAPPINESS, makes
her life story sound like a modern-day Book of Job:  She's an
unappreciated Chinese-Canadian twentysomething.  She left home at 18 and
didn't have any furniture.  She worked at McDonald's.  And she made a
movie about all this.
     Well, cry me a river.  DOUBLE HAPPINESS is probably the most
blatantly self-centered film I've seen all year.  After all, when people
say, "Write what you know," they don't mean, "Write about YOU YOU YOU!" 
The idea is to take a personal story and make it accessible to the
masses.  This movie is just one big, running, inside joke.
     The story:  Jade, a Chinese-Canadian twentysomething (Sandra Oh), is
unappreciated at home.  Her father (Stephen Chang) is domineering and
wants her to be "a good Chinese girl."  Mother (Alannah Ong) is no help at
all.  In a fit of hormonal lunacy, Jade picks up Mark (Callum Rennie)--get
this--a white guy she sees vomiting outside a trendy nightclub.  Mom and
Dad do not approve; they keep trying to set Jade up with lawyers and
doctors.  Now, see if you can guess the big ending.
     The sad thing is, it could have been a good movie.  Unfortunately,
bad acting on a general level really hampers the film, especially during
the melodrama of the family struggle, where everything seems almost
farcical.  Also, the movie's supposed to be a comedy/drama (I think), but
a number of opportunities to infuse some much-needed humor are missed. 
Like they say a number of times during the film, Jade looks just like
Connie Chung--and Connie Chung does *not* do comedy.
     Thankfully, Shum's direction is assured, stylish, and innovative, and
the best moments in this film are completely visual.  (And, with music by
Shadowy Men on a Shadowy Planet, the band from "The Kids in the Hall," the
audio isn't bad, either.)  Unfortunately, this is just icing on a poorly
cooked cake.
     The sad bottom line is that DOUBLE HAPPINESS is simply unnecessary
and isn't even uplifting, as it was intended.  Save your money and get the
moral to the story here:  Life sucks, and you better just get used to it.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
     From a raw material standpoint, you can't get much better than
DANGEROUS LIAISONS.  Wisely, this 90's updating of LIAISONS, CRUEL
INTENTIONS, is quite faithful to the original.  And woe be unto those
who enter INTENTIONS thinking this is a date movie.
     The story so far: Kathryn (Gellar) and Sebastian (Phillippe) are
spoiled, ultra-rich, rival half-siblings living in posh Upper East Side
Manhattan.  How does such a child while away the day?  Well, sexual
conquests of unsuspecting lesser-thans is a damn good start.  On a whim,
Kathryn challenges Sebastian to the ultimate test: deflower puritanical
virgin Annette (Witherspoon) and he can have Kathryn as a prize.
     Numerous side plots detract Sebastian from his goal, most notably
the similar deflowering of the dim Cecile (Blair), and, of course,
Sebastian falling in genuine love with Annette, for the first time in
his life.  Do things go badly?  Well, we're talking about some very,
very mean kids here.  What do you think!?
     Aside from a slightly happified ending, INTENTIONS is an impressive
movie.  Solid dialogue, luscious characters, great comic relief, and an
admittedly classic story give it wings above the standard teen-oriented
dreck on the market.  Placing the story 200 years ahead of its origin
adds surprisingly little, though, besides an automobile, cell phones,
and a reference to e-mail.  Oh, and lest you be depressed by the film,
you can sleep well tonight, comfy in the knowledge that--in real
life--Witherspoon is pregnant with Phillippe's child.  How's that for
irony?
     A final note for people who feel CRUEL INTENTIONS may not reflect
the reality of what modern American teens are really like.  If the
chatty, giggling pre-teens (who had faked being 17 to get into the
theater and were sitting behind me) are any indication of the reality,
we should all be very, *very* afraid.
Director: Roger Kumble
Producer: Neal H. Moritz
Writer: Roger Kumble
Starring: Sarah Michelle Gellar, Ryan Phillippe, Reese Witherspoon,
Selma Blair, Christine Baranski, Joshua Jackson
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
     If you've seen the trailer, the #1 question on your mind about 2
DAYS IN THE VALLEY must be:  Is it a PULP FICTION rip-off, or is it a
*bad* PULP FICTION rip-off?
     Well, the answer is this:  Yes, it's a shameless PULP FICTION
rip-off (more like PULP FICTION meets SHORT CUTS), but it's actually
quite entertaining, in its own quirky little way.
     In fact, 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY is the best (and possibly the last
[hint, hint]) of these knockoffs to come down the interstate.  The only
problem is that writer/director John Herzfeld forgot one critical part: 
a cool soundtrack!  The main difficult with 2 DAYS is an uncommonly
lousy score that kills the suspense and the comedy with equal ability.
     But let's talk about the good parts, those mainly being the rich
characters Herzfeld has created to act out his play.  (Please pay
attention.)  It starts with Peter Horton (gets shot early on, a very big
plus) as a deadbeat husband to downhill skier/aspiring scam artist Teri
Hatcher.  James Spader (by far the most fun of the film) and newcomer
Charlize Theron as Hatcher's partners in crime.  Danny Aiello as an
aging hitman working with Spader.  NAKED's Greg Cruttwell as Aiello's
whining hostage.  Glenne Headly as Cruttwell's bookish assistant. 
Marsha Mason as Cruttwell's nurse/half-sister.  Paul Mazursky as a
suicidal Hollywood has-been who is picked up by Mason.  And Jeff Daniels
and Eric Stoltz (the only PULP veteran in the show) as hapless cops on
to all of these characters.  (Plus there are at least three good
cameos.)
     Whew!  D'you catch all that?  It's easier than it sounds, trust me
-- in fact, the fun of 2 DAYS is watching all the pieces come together
via a mixture of slapstick comedy, generally witty dialogue, and blackly
comedic gunfights, fistfights, dogfights, catfights, and any other kind
of fight you can think of.  All the while, Herzfeld manages to weave in
unexpectedly powerful themes of bygone happiness, greed, and
desperation... and The Valley.  And Herzfeld manages to pack all of this
into a very tight 105 minutes.  There's very little wasted footage on
the screen, which is hard to say about many directors today.
     It winds up as a solid picture that is probably accessible to a
wider audience than PULP FICTION was -- there were plenty of squeamish
girly types in the crowd, and no one walked out.  And I was actually
expecting a bad movie!  Go figure.
     [Food for thought:  When was the last time you could get gas in Los
Angeles for $1.07, as is seen in the film?  Talk amongst yourselves.]
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Roozi khe zan shodam (2000)
A movie called The Day I Became a Woman can only be about one of two
things.  Either it's going to star a young girl who is coming of age or
a guy who's getting a sex change operation.
Surprise, on this Day we get three (genuine) women all going through
various life experiences.  They can be nearly meaningless -- a nine year
old girl is given one hour to play on the morning of her birthday.  They
can mean the end of life as you know it -- a married woman is verbally
divorced by her husband when she refuses to stop riding her beloved
bicycle.  And they can be perplexingly final -- a very old lady spends
her life savings on all new appliances, sets them up on a beach, and
then puts them all on rafts as she sets sail for a boat that doesn't
exist.
Needless to say, we don't normally see stuff like this coming out of
Hollywood; The Day I Became a Woman is an Iranian film directed by
Marzieh Meshkini, 74 slight minutes told in three miniscule vignettes.
Now, most of us (myself included) typically stow the phrases "Iranian
cinema" and "rollicking good time" in totally different parts of our
brains.  Personally, the plodding pace and overblown self-importance of
Middle Eastern films (see also A Time for Drunken Horses) typically numb
me into a depressed coma.  But The Day I Became a Woman stands out as a
reasonably intriguing film -- enlightening us about the life of the
modern Iranian while not pretending to be so significant that the very
earth will shake thanks to its creation.  Along with A Taste of Cherry,
another recent Iranian import, there appears to be some filmic promise
coming out of this war-torn country after all.  Not that Michael Bay has
anything to worry about.
Director: Marzieh Meshkini
Producer: Mohsen Makhmalbaf
Writer: Mohsen Makhmalbaf, Marzieh Meshkini
Starring: Fatemeh Cherag Akhar, Shabnam Toloui, Azizeh Sedighi, Hassan
Nebhan, Sirous Kahvarinegad, Badr Iravani
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
     The very idea behind Pay It Forward -- that when someone does an
enormous good deed for you should pay it "forward" to three other,
unsuspecting persons -- requires what is described in the film as "an
extreme act of faith in the goodness of people."
     It's safe to say that your enjoyment of the film is bound by this
same rule.  Dyed-in-the-wool film critics like myself have been down
this road once or twice before, and the enormous leap of faith it takes
to convince oneself that, deep down, even "bad" people are good makes me
want to reach for my DVD of A Clockwork Orange.
     In a nutshell, Pay It Forward essentially gives us a new spin on
the age-old pyramid scheme, this time with an altruistic streak.  The
brainchild of young Trevor McKinney (The Sixth Sense's Haley Joel
Osment), the PIF scheme is hatched when his 7th grade Social Studies
teacher Eugene Simonet (Kevin Spacey) challenges the class to come up
with a plan "to change the world."  While it might have been a good idea
to start by trying to fix up his alcoholic, working-two-jobs,
not-quite-a-hussie-but-almost mom (Helen Hunt), Trevor figures he really
can change the world with his plan.
     Trevor launches Pay It Forward with gusto, helping out a homeless
junkie (James Cavaziel), some kid who keeps getting beat up at school,
and even branching into matchmaking as he tries to set up the
burn-scarred and embittered Mr. Simonet with Trevor's trollop of a
mother.
     It's at this point that we begin to wonder: Is Pay It Forward meant
to be a love story?  Well, no.  Actually, it's a full-blown soap opera,
complete with rank alcoholism, spousal and child abuse, drug addiction,
suicide, homelessness, and everything else you get in the genre except a
murderous evil twin.  As you might expect, the picture is positively
drowning in sentiment, to the point where it gets almost sickening.
     The real driver for all this mushiness is that the film is
extremely talky and, for lack of a better word, preachy.  Moments of
greatness are punctuated by one soliloquy after another.  Sadly, this is
a truly excellent story that is told with exceptionally poor ability. 
Set in Vegas, Pay It Forward could easily have had the power of a film
like its brother-in-setting, Leaving Las Vegas, which utilized the harsh
dichotomy between bright, glitzy lights and the baseness of the human
condition perpetually on display there to drive its message home.  But
it doesn't.  Pay It Forward takes the PG-13 way out and muddles itself
as a film for the entire family to watch, to bond over, and to learn a
thing or two about life.
     To its credit, we do learn that thing or two about life from the
strong moral backbone of Pay It Forward, notably the importance of
taking action instead of just talking about doing something good.  As a
message movie, the film is competent, and indeed it probably will play
well to teen audiences if they can sit through all the blah-blah-blah
chattiness.  But really, is it the best idea to give us the one-two
acting punch of both Jon Bon Jovi and Angie Dickenson to drive the point
home?  Even Spacey and Hunt feel like they're trying karmically to
redeem themselves for the misanthropy on display in (the far superior)
American Beauty and As Good As It Gets.  (For which, of course, each won
an Academy Award, respectively.)
     Ultimately, Pay It Forward will be 2000's take on Forrest Gump. 
Like Gump, Forward is utterly manipulative, a
feel-so-good-you-have-to-cry movie that will divide audiences into two
camps: one that is swept away by the earnestness and emotion of the
story, and one that simply can't stand the sappiness.
Director: Mimi Leder
Producer: Peter Abrams, Robert Levy, Steven Reuther
Writer: Leslie Dixon
Starring: Kevin Spacey, Helen Hunt, Haley Joel Osment, Jay Mohr, James
Caviezel, Jon Bon Jovi, Angie Dickenson
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Loss of Sexual Innocence, The (1999)
     Mike Figgis, the genius behind LEAVING LAS VEGAS, has put together
one dense piece of celluloid here, his first outing since ONE NIGHT
STAND tanked last year.
     What's it about?  With roughly 300 words of dialogue in the entire
film, that's hard to say.  Julian Sands, a Figgis standby, plays Nic, a
troubled filmmaker (I think), who may be married to a blonde woman, with
whom he has a child.  He may also be having an affair with a character
played by Burrows, billed only as "Twins," who just so happens to have a
twin sister (also Burrows) that looks different.
     Nic sees his life in frequent flashback at ages 5, 12, and 16
(where he has a fling with MacDonald), and his hair goes from blonde to
brown to blonde again.
     And then there's this whole Adam & Eve and the
getting-kicked-outta-the-Garden of Eden bit, which is some kind of
allegory for Nic's life.
     It explains the title, but not the movie.  I left thoroughly
confused, though Figgis obviously put some work into crafting a luscious
film a la Antonioni (I don't understand his films either), and since I
recognize Figgis's brilliance I'm willing to give him the benefit of the
doubt here.  The ending actually makes sense, despite all this
runaround, but it's not exactly a feel-good movie, if you catch my
drift.
     Anyway, next time, Mike, try a little more dialogue.  Voices are
good.  You'll either love this movie or hate it - I put it right about
here:
Check our 1996 interview with Mike Figgis at:
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/95a45e26914c25ff862562bb006a85f2/0009f1e62e4a8c80862562d5000dd4d5?OpenDocument
Director: Mike Figgis
Producer: Mike Figgis, Annie Stewart
Writer: Mike Figgis
Starring: Julian Sands, Saffron Burrows, Stefano Dionisi, Kelly
MacDonald, Gina McKee, Jonathan Rhys-Meyers
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com - Buy my
book!
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom/002-2549101-0837427

Title
Review for Went to Coney Island on a Mission From God... Be Back by Five (1998)
     Who would have thought that the life of Jon Cryer -- actor in such
memorable films as Hiding Out and Morgan Stewart's Coming Home -- would
be such fertile ground for based-on-a-true-story filmmaking?
     Based on a script co-written by Cryer himself, Went to Coney
Island... is a movie about exactly that.  Daniel (Cryer) and Stan (Rick
Stear) head to the New York landmark in the dead of winter, based on a
rumor they've heard about their childhood friend Richie.  The
long-missing Richie, it seems, has taken up residence under the
boardwalk, joining ranks with the insane and otherwise homeless Coney
Island-dwellers.  It's Daniel and Stan to the rescue.
     Why has Richie gone nuts?  Will Stan come to terms with his
alcoholism and gambling issues?  Will Daniel loosen up a little?  All
these questions will be answered in the 90 minutes that Coney Island
runs -- and these are some of the bleakest moments on film.
     Washed out to the point of near monochrome, Coney Island is a hard
film to watch because the anguish onscreen is unrelenting.  Cryer and
his compatriot Richard Schenkman have obviously poured a lot of soul
into this picture, so much so that the film feels insular to the cast
and crew -- and off-putting to the audience.  Fortunately, a number of
lighter moments (and a memorable by Frank Whaley as a Skee-Ball
attendant) make the film quite watchable, not to mention keeping you, as
a viewer, from slitting your wrists thanks to all the melancholy.
     Ultimately, Coney Island tries to be a mini-Magnolia with its tales
of intersecting pasts and presents, and in some aspects it is
successful.  But Coney Island could steal a thing or two from Magnolia
about how a depressing story can resonate with an audience by tricking
the viewer into caring deeply about its subjects.  The Wonder Wheel may
not spin fast enough for that.
Director: Richard Schenkman
Producer: Jon Cryer, Richard Schenkman
Writer: Jon Cryer, Richard Schenkman
Starring: Jon Cryer, Rick Stear, Rafael Báez, Ione Skye, Frank Whaley,
Peter Gerety
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Lovemaster, The (1997)
     Comedian Craig Shoemaker says pretty early on in his new film THE
LOVEMASTER, "My life is my act!"
     He's not joking, and if you've ever heard any of Shoemaker's
stand-up material, you know what you're in for with his feature film,
where Shoemaker blends his multiple stage personalities with stories
about growing up, the mysteries of women, and 1970's television, the
result being a campy goulash of howlingly-funny comedy.
     Most of the film is cut together from an Arizona stand-up
performance, where Shoemaker's real forte shines.  That forte is the
characters that he plays on stage, from a much-too-realistic Barney
Fife, to "vagina man" (don't ask), to the end-all, be-all of human lust
-- The Lovemaster, a guy so sexy he makes Barry White look like a wuss. 
Shoemaker slips in and out of these characters like a schizophrenic
without his Prozac, getting more and more twisted until finally,
safe-&-sane Craig inevitably pops out, trying to undo all he's done with
a fey cry, "Erase! Erase! Erase!"
     While the 82-minute picture is mostly stand-up, it also includes
some flashback vignettes outside the club, mainly to expound upon jokes
Shoemaker has going on inside.  These mainly involve Craig and his
therapist (George Wendt), wife (Harley Jane Kozak), platonic friend
(Courtney Thorne-Smith), and dream date (Farrah Fawcett).  And while
these bits are supposed to show you how his life *is* his act, the act
itself is usually a lot funnier.  (Austinites will also enjoy cameos
from the city's KLBJ morning radio personalities -- Dale Dudley, Bob
Fonseca, and Debra Cole.)
     Of course, making a movie in the environs of a comedy club
certainly has its limitations, and Shoemaker does his best to overcome
them, mainly by toying with audience members, and succeeds as well as
can be expected.  Still, there's something lacking in the production
values of the whole thing.  And while the jokes don't really get going
until the halfway point, THE LOVEMASTER still remains a fine example of
the stand-up genre.
     [Watch for an interview with The Lovemaster himself, coming soon!]
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit The Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 (2000)
     The cinematic event of 1999 desperately wants you to make it the
cinematic event of 2000, as the (first) sequel to The Blair Witch
Project is rushed into theaters just in time for Halloween.  Alas, it's
not to be, and soon the original will become regarded as a one-hit
wonder and a footnote in the annals of independent film.
     Book of Shadows: Blair Witch 2 is clearly Made In Hollywood, but
it's still trying to pretend to be a documentary.  The story this time? 
In Book of Shadows, the original Blair Witch was "just a movie," but
this time it's for real -- this is what happened after all those
tourists descended upon Burkittsville, MD, believing the woods to be
genuinely haunted.
     Of course, as the film points out, that was all phony.  Um, but now
the woods really are haunted.  So the original wasn't phony after all. 
I think.  Uh-huh.  Who's going to buy it this time?
     Book of Shadows is so self-referential, The Blair Witch Project is
invoked at least once every five minutes.  The film even opens with a
montage of news clips and movie reviews (Hello, Ebert!) all talking
about that Blair Witch phenomenon.  You know, in case you hadn't heard
about it.
     All of this would be forgivable if the sequel was any good.  All
the fuss turns out to be for naught, a vain attempt at making a
Hollywood snuff film full of disjointed fright gags.  Book of Shadows
has the same nauseating camerawork as the original and takes place in a
forest, but that's where the similarities end.
     This time around, half-crazed Blair Witch fans decide to venture
into the Black Hills in search of the truth behind the legend.  Within
hours, it turns out the "myth" of the Blair Witch is anything but, and
our unlikely heroes (including a once-psychotic tour guide, a Goth
chick, a self-professed Wiccan, and a book-writing couple) find
themselves waking up in their now-trashed camp with no memory of the
last several hours.  Then it's back to the tour guide's house (a spooky,
converted factory deep in the woods, natch) as the quintet tries to
figure out what happened to the missing time.  And then the body count
clock starts to tick.
     I wasn't a rabid fanatic of the original Witch, but at least the
original had a consistent mythology that, despite being cryptic, was
relatively sensical.  Book of Shadows is all over the map and completely
random, jumping from scene to scene (as well as forward and backward in
time) without much care for structure or logic.  Frankly, the film just
doesn't make a lot of sense, and it's not compelling enough to make it
worth the effort to try and figure out.
     Much of the blame should fall in the lap of director Joe Berlinger,
best known for his fabulous (and real) documentaries, Brother's Keeper
and Paradise Lost, who is way out of his element in this world of MTV
jump cuts and a throbbing heavy metal soundtrack.  The cliché-driven
characters aren't much help, either, but fundamentally you have to
expect that this is just what happens when Hollywood tries to glom on to
an indie phenomenon (see also She's the One attempt at rekindling The
Brothers McMullen).
     Of course, the biggest question most are wondering about is, Is it
scary?  No.  It's creepy, but the spine-tingling power of the final
scene of Blair Witch is nowhere to be found here.
     And as for this titular "Book of Shadows," that's one little detail
that seems to have been excised from the film altogether.  I guess we're
just going to have to wait for Blair Witch 3 to figure that out.
Director: Joe Berlinger
Producer: Bill Carraro, Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sánchez
Writer: Joe Berlinger, Dick Beebe
Starring: Kim Director, Jeffrey Donovan, Erica Leerhsen, Tristine
Skyler, Stephen Barker Turner
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
     Albert Brooks, who last gave us a wryly cynical meditation on
mother-and-son relationships with MOTHER, turns now to a wryly cynical
meditation on Hollywood and inspiration with the aptly titled THE MUSE.
     Brooks plays Steven Phillips, a moderately successful Hollywood
screenwriter who suddenly finds he's lost `his edge.'  In desperation he
turns to friend Jack (Bridges), who introduces him to a girl named Sarah
(Stone), whom Jack claims is a muse.  Or rather, one of The Muses, a
source of divine inspiration.
     And Sarah seems to be the real thing inspiring greatness in
Bridges' character (he wins an Oscar) and a dozen really big celebrities
who make cameos throughout the picture (which becomes half the fun, so I
won't spoil their identities).
     Steven's wife (MacDowell) even gets in on the action, as Sarah
inspires her to bake cookies and eventually open a bakery.
     Of course, Brooks is typically hilarious here with humor that is at
once dry and at the same time over the top.  But he lost with me with
the end product that Sarah helps him create  an idiotic comedy script
that sounds like a cross between ACE VENTURA and `The Beverly
Hillbillies.'  It is even designed to star Jim Carrey.  I should hope
that if I get a muse, she brings me a better script than that.
     Any Albert Brooks fan will enjoy his latest.  It's not the home run
that say, DEFENDING YOUR LIFE, is, but it's a classy film in an era of
low-class projects.
     Let me add the ironic footnote that Brooks himself ended up
distributing this picture through teeny outlet October Films, just as
his character is nearly forced to do in the movie.  You see, in the real
Hollywood, the greater your artistry, the lower on the totem pole you
have to go to find work.  That's how it really works.
Director: Albert Brooks
Producer: Herb Nanas
Writer: Albert Brooks, Monica Johnson
Starring: Albert Brooks, Sharon Stone, Andie MacDowell, Jeff Bridges
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Othello (1995)
     Seldomly have I been so outright disappointed by a film.  OTHELLO's
problems are numerous, and given the outstanding cast put together for the
film (and an admitted masterpiece to work with), it's amazing that this
film comes off as being so downright bad.
     The story's been around for 400 years.  Othello (Lawrence Fishburne)
is a Moorish general in the Italian army, and he is the victim of constant
prejudice.  Desdemona (Irene Jacob) is his Italian lover, and when the
pair secretly marry, Othello finds himself the victim of a fiendish plot
by his servant Iago (Kenneth Branagh).  Iago's motives are also magnified
by the presence of young Cassio (Nathaniel Parker), who serves as
Othello's right-hand man despite Iago's longer term of service.
     And as with any Shakespearean tragedy, there are a number of
misunderstandings and, as a result, *everybody* dies.
     The prime difficulty with OTHELLO is the language.  Dripping with
archaic English, anyone unfamiliar with Shakespeare's original play is
going to have a really tough time following the barest facts of the
story.  The truly sad thing is that the archaisms are largely not
Shakespeare's.  Rather, first-time writer/director Oliver Parker changed
70 percent of the play during his adaptation, in order to, I guess, make
it much more confusing than it really is.
     Other problems abound.  Iago's motivation (in the film) is never
clear at all, Branagh's acting here is pathetic, the very French actress
Jacob is woefully miscast as an Italian speaking in English, and while the
last 20 minutes of the film are pretty good, they don't make up for the
first 100, which are just dreadfully boring.  By the time the end finally
rolls around, I was *hoping* they'd all die, and soon.
     The few good points?  OTHELLO's thinly-veiled message about racism is
worthwhile, if a bit obvious, and Fishburne does turn in a great Moor.  If
he'd had more to work with here, we'd probably have the definitive version
of the play.  As it is now, it's just a lot of death in Venice.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Brothers McMullen, The (1995)
     THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN are three of the most engaging characters
you're likely to come across in American cinema this year.  A family of
Irish Catholics living in New York, their stories explore living a morally
upright life in the 90's, dealing with failed romances, and the timeless
question of how to commit.
     Jack (Jack Mulcahy), the only married brother, is tempted by another
woman.  Patrick (Mike McGlone) is torn between committing to his long-time
girlfriend and striking out for something new.  Barry (Edward Burns, who
also wrote and directed), is the classic slacker, unable to even conceive
of commitment and an unbeliever in the very notion of true love.
     After the funeral of their abusive father, the trio's mother moves
back to Ireland to be with her lover of 35 years ago.  She leaves Barry
with a singular warning, "Don't make the same mistake I did."  That's all
the encouragement he needs, as Barry becomes the devil on the shoulder of
his brothers, trying with all his might to keep them away from the evils
of commitment.  For Patrick, a devout Catholic and complete neurotic,
marriage is a necessity in living the good life, and Barry is no help at
all.  Jack's infidelity is another problem altogether.  And as the
brothers explore their own problems in the game of love and
self-discovery, each eventually finds the answers.
     This lighthearted romance masks the serious issues it addresses with
heavy doses of nonstop humor in some of the funniest and most genuine
dialogue to ever hit the screen.  The perfect blend of seriousness and
laughter, it's truly that perfect date movie you've been looking for.
     While the film is very skewed toward Irish Catholic culture, we've
all had these feelings, and newcomer Burns establishes himself as a true
creative genius in American film.  There's no slapstick here, just some
excellent conversations about the meaning of life and happiness.  You
*will not* be able to stop laughing.
     It's rare that a film has as profound an emotional impact as THE
BROTHERS MCMULLEN, especially a comedy.  But Burns has crafted such an
incredible picture, that even the most crusty viewer will come out
smiling.  Highly recommended.
-Christopher Null, Mike's FEEDBACK Magazine / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
     Now I understand why Argentineans wanted Madonna to go home during
the filming of EVITA!
     What the fuss is all about, I have no idea, because EVITA is just
another bad movie starring one of our worst actresses, Madonna.  The
catch is, this time she gets to sing sing sing for 2 1/2 hours -- sing
until she can sing no more -- sing until your ears bleed.
     EVITA has had a long and sordid past as a motion picture project,
and it's easy to see why.  The fact that EVITA makes a mockery of
Argentina's most beloved personage *and* the filmmakers wanted to shoot
there is almost beside the point.  There's the problem that movie
musicals have tended to be huge flops over the last 40 years; the
problem of Madonna's inability to act; the problem that Eva Peron was
basically an egomaniac that died 40 years ago and that no one in America
really cares about anymore.  And when co-screenwriter Oliver Stone gets
involved... yikes!  They might as well have made a musical called
OSWALD!
     But they didn't.  Instead, EVITA rumbles through the plot points in
Eva Peron's life like a freight train.  From stargazing child to slutty
gold-digger to talentless actress to the wife of the President, it's no
wonder why Madonna fought so hard for this part -- it's straight out of
her life (except for the President part... so far)!  No acting
required!  *And* she gets to sing the whole time!
     And what's with all this singing, anyway?  Yes, I know it's from
Andrew Lloyd Webber (who, after seeing "Cats," I believe is seriously
disturbed), and as a traditional musical, EVITA might have had a
prayer.  But electric guitars and synthesizers?  Discordant,
headache-inducing chants?  A capella, sing-song dialogue between
characters?  Sheesh, EVITA is more like THE WHO'S TOMMY than SINGIN' IN
THE RAIN.  (It's no surprise that director Alan Parker also created PINK
FLOYD'S THE WALL.)  I half-expected Madonna to start rolling around in
baked beans a la Ann-Margret!
     No such luck.  Instead we have to listen to the likes of Antonio
Banderas's singing narrator, which sounds a lot like he has his cajones
in a vise.  Or the very British Jonathan Pryce as Juan Peron (!),
singing about how he ran the British out of Argentina.  The hilarity of
these two performing is *almost* as much fun as the real treat of
EVITA:  trying to see how many ways Madonna can cover up her blossoming
pregnancy.  How many arms, hats, and flower bouquets can she hold across
her waist?  A lot.
     In all fairness, Banderas is a diamond in the rough here, in a part
of comic relief that is desperately needed among the Very Serious
performances.  Also, a few of the songs are tolerable, even memorable,
even if they rarely make sense.  But, in the end, I have to pan EVITA,
if for no other reason than it's just plain goofy.  And some parting
words for Madonna, in a lyrical fashion she may be able to finally
understand:
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
     THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT has the bizarre distinction of being the
first horror film ever to give me nightmares *before* having seen it.
The nightmares will probably continue for awhile, even though BLAIR
WITCH is not, contrary to the reports I've heard, the scariest movie
ever made.
     Not even close.  The conceit of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is this:
Three eager filmmakers go into the woods of Maryland in search of
material for a project about `The Blair Witch,' a supposed woman who was
exiled from the town of Blair during the witch trial era.
     And today, the Blair Witch continues to ply her trade, as
interviews at the film's beginning make clear  stories of massacred
children and haunted houses have left a lasting impression on the
residents of Burkittsville (formerly Blair, MD).  All of this sets the
stage for us, plus a textual prologue telling us that these filmmakers
vanished, and what we are watching is the footage they shot, discovered
in the woods a year later.
     So we know up front that something evil is afoot, and in the 90
minutes of `discovered footage' we get to see plenty of it.  The trouble
starts when the trio gets lost, and their turmoil gets worse every day
(as they seem to be hiking in circles) and every night, when ...
something begins playing cruel tricks on them.
     Captured on videotape, black and white 16mm, and (I think) color
8mm, BLAIR WITCH is compelling as a faux documentary.  (And yes, *none*
of this is true, although most of the people in line and sitting around
us weren't aware of that.)
     But is this movie scary?  In a word, and on the whole, no.
Possibly a victim of its own hype, like STAR WARS, BLAIR WITCH has
plenty of atmosphere and creepy scenes (mostly unseen voices in the
woods), but it isn't that frightening.  My wife is a big wimp, and she
only grabbed my arm twice.  Not until the grand finale does the WITCH
trot out the Big Guns, and I will admit that the final images on screen
are some of the scariest I've ever seen.
     Still, two minutes of footage does not a stellar movie make.  The
other 88 are okay, and often funny, but it ain't horror.  However, for
the horror buff or indie film fan, this is a great example of something,
well, off the beaten path.
Director: Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sánchez
Producer: Robin Cowie, Gregg Hale
Writer: Daniel Myrick, Eduardo Sánchez
Starring: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Preston Tylk (2000)
Despite an atrocious title, I actually held out hope for the
direct-to-video Bad Seed's intriguing premise.
The film opens as man (Luke Wilson) confronts by his wife (Mili Avital),
who screams in admission that she is having an affair.  Enraged, he
storms out of the house.  When he returns, she is dead, and her now
estranged boyfriend (Norman Reedus) is suspect.  So our hero takes
matters into his own hands, finds the boyfriend, and kills him.
That should be the ending of the movie, right?  Wrong.  That's ten
minutes into the film, and Bad Seed quickly plummets off a cliff right
there and lands in direct-to-VHS hell.  The problem?  There's just no
story left after the intro.  What develops is instead a dumbass cat and
mouse game between Reedus and Wilson, with a sentimental P.I. (Dennis
Farina) along for the ride.  Entire plotlines are resolved, and then new
ones arise, having nothing to do with what you've just seen (presumably
to pad the film beyond sitcom length).  Eventually, the whole ordeal
becomes so contrived you don't know who the titular Bad Seed even is. 
After three or so false endings, you cease to care.
Shot in Seattle's melancholy, permanent rain, Bad Seed successfully
evokes feelings of the tragedy it wants to be.  Too bad the rest of the
movie is not so successful.
Director: Jon Bokenkamp
Producer: James Frey, Dan Glasser, Roni Eguia
Writer: Jon Bokenkamp
Starring: Luke Wilson, Norman Reedus, Dennis Farina, Mili Avital
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
     Hype?  Sheesh, like no other.  This side of TITANIC, GOOD WILL HUNTING
has enjoyed some of the most baffling, gushing praise of the year.  Does
either film deserve it?  Not really.
     Let's look at the facts: You have Matt Damon as Will Hunting --
apparently the smartest man on the face of the earth who can also kick
anyone's ass over breakfast, and has a history of run-ins with the law.  Oh
no!  Affleck is his down-to-earth best bud.  Driver, the hoity-toity love
interest.  Williams and Skarsgĺrd as Hunting's mentors, the guys that rescue
him from a prison sentence for assaulting a police officer.  And it is made
abundantly clear that the film is also about the class stuggle in Boston.
     Now that I've typed it out, it sounds ridiculous, and the more I think
about it, the more it really *is*.  The plot and theme of GOOD WILL HUNTING
hinge upon the idea that it's tough for the smartest man in the world to make
the move from crumb-bum to respectable member of society.  Why?  Because (a)
"just because he has a gift he doesn't have to use it!" and (b) he had a
troubled childhood.  Well, boo hoo!
     The more I write, the more it sounds like a topic on "Jenny Jones": Boy
Geniuses on the Wrong Side of the Tracks.  Right.  If any believable character
had this guy's abilities, this movie would have been much different... and
probably much shorter, too.
     I realize I'm ranting here, but the pop psychology of HUNTING reaches
such a high level of annoyance so that when Williams tearfully confronts Damon
with the film's signature line of -- I kid you not -- "It's not your fault,"
it just gets silly.  And it lost me.
     The script, written by Damon and Affleck, is otherwise humorous and keeps
you entertained.  Van Sant's direction is inexplicably amateurish and features
some lousy voice dubbing.  Williams is pretty good in his role, and for what
it's worth, so is Damon, even though the character is ludicrous.  All told,
the film has plenty of enjoyable moments, but it's just not the deep
experience the filmmakers want you to believe it is.
     And neither was TITANIC.  That ought to guarantee me plenty of hate mail
for the next few weeks.  Fire away.
Director: Gus Van Sant Jr.
Producer: Lawrence Bender
Writer: Matt Damon, Ben Affleck
Starring: Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver, Stellan Skarsgĺrd
http://www.miramax.com:8888/mm_front/owa/mp.entryPoint?action=1&midStr=497
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
     I've been a fan of Whit Stillman since his first film, METROPOLITAN, in
1990.  It was therefore with no small amount of anticipation that I
journeyed to see his third film, THE LAST DAYS OF DISCO.
     Of course, when I get worked up over a movie, I'm always disappointed. 
Sadly, DISCO was no exception.
     Once again, Stillman focuses his story on the minutiae of the daily
lives of yuppies (and yuppie wannabes) who are generally unlikable.  This
worked quite well in METROPOLITAN and BARCELONA, mainly because in each of
those pictures there was a central character who defied his surroundings and
managed to break free of the mold, or at least put up a good fight.
     In DISCO there is not.  In fact, in Stillman's third picture, there's
not much holding the characters together at all, outside of a love for disco
music.  Even the most promising characters turn out to be shallow and often
hateful, their stories meander interminably, and there's not even much in
the way of overall plot development, except for the final end of that funky
disco music.
     A lot of DISCO, just like its namesake, is played for the kitsch
factor, and maybe I'm just too young to reminisce about 1980.  The film also
suffers without Stillman-regular Taylor Nichols to save the day (although
Nichols appears, along with a dozen other alumni, in a cameo).
     This isn't to say that the film doesn't have its moments of comedic or
thought-provoking power.  The brightest spot, a deconstructionist look at
LADY AND THE TRAMP (remember THE GRADUATE story in BARCELONA?), is almost
worth the $7.50 it cost to see the film.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Bully (2001)
Larry Clark -- who wrote and directed his first film, Kids, at the
tender age of 52 and in the process, broke the mold about what we should
expect from a movie about teenagers -- returns to familiar ground in
Bully, a striking and harrowing follow-up.
A slam-dunk natural subject for Clark, Bully follows the
based-on-reality story of Marty Puccio (Brad Renfro), who along with his
girlfriend Lisa (Rachel Miner) decides to brutally slay his "best
friend" Bobby (Nick Stahl) as payback for a lifetime of abuse.  Set in
the ultra-trashy nether regions of southern Florida -- and I mean
seriously, beyond-WWF trashy -- there's little to do but drive your car,
play video games, have sex, and beat the crap out of your friends.
Bobby's brutalities extend to everyone who crosses his path -- he
punches Marty in the face for driving poorly, he rapes Marty's
girlfriend Lisa, he rapes Lisa's friend Ali (Bijou Phillips), he pimps
Marty for cash at an amateur strip night, and he even interferes with
Marty's plan when he scams on chicks at the mini-mall.  Obsessed with
gay porn, Bobby is portrayed as deeply confused and probably a closet
homosexual, a psychotic without hope of recovery.  Even Bobby's clueless
father is oblivious to his son's actions; in fact, all the parents in
the film are ignorant to the actions of their children.  So of course,
as it is decided in a moment of almost careless discusssion, Bobby must
be killed.
Masterminded by Lisa, Bobby is driven out to the Everglades by seven
conspirators, stabbed repeatedly, and left as food for the crabs and
gators.  By the time we reach the inevitable aftermath, Clark's picture
has devastated us with its deft dissection of a tormented and hollow New
American Youth.
Laden with a striking amount of graphic, sweaty, and frequently brutal
teen sex, its stars covered with a disturbing number of scars and
bruises, Bully is as difficult to watch as Kids, and it is equally as
assured.  While the script is exquisite, its actors deserve the highest
lauding.  Renfro is extremely brave and confident in his role as the
confused whipping boy.  Miner (you may know her as the former Mrs.
Macauley Culkin) is equally valiant in a character that requires her to
be completely naked in alternating scenes.  But it is Clark's
uncompromised skewering of white bread Americana that makes Bully so
compelling.  Clark pulls no punches and never panders to the Moral
Majority; he simply makes his point, over and over again: This is what
your children think is acceptable behavior.  And he's right, because it
really happened.
Still, Clark will always be more a writer than a director in my eyes. 
His hand is often unsteady as he can't decide how to frame a scene; as a
result, some bits of Bully look rushed, others amateurish.  Most notably
this occurs with a long and dizzying spinning-camera shot that adds
nothing to the picture except, well, dizziness.
Regardless of the directing foibles, Bully gets my flat recommendation. 
It probably goes without saying, but this is one summer teen movie
that's probably not for the kids.
Director: Larry Clark
Producer: Chris Hanley, Don Murphy, Fernando Sulichin
Writer: Zachary Long, Roger Pullis
Starring: Brad Renfro, Nick Stahl, Rachel Miner, Bijou Phillips, Michael
Pitt, Kelli Garner, Leo Fitzpatrick
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Lotto Land (1996)
     There's a whole lotto lovin' goin' on in LOTTO LAND, an odd little
feature from writer/director John Rubino, which explores relationships
among young and old folks in Brooklyn, particularly Lotto players.
     Hank (Larry Gilliard, Jr.) and Joy (Barbara Gonzalez) are about to
embark on prom night.  Hank's father Milt (blues legend Wendell Holmes)
rediscovers long-extinguished passion with Joy's guardian Nini (Suzanne
Costallos).  Oh, and Joy's drunken, roller-skating, drug-dealing father
just may have won $27 million in the New York Lottery.  Trust me, it's not
as complicated as it sounds...or as interesting.
     Basically just a talky drama, LOTTO LAND has a heart of gold but is
as lifeless as overcooked spaghetti.  Yawns were much more common than any
laughs at the screening.  The acting is workmanlike, and the plot is
predictable, but the movie's intentions--to tell a story of purity,
romance, redemption, and modern-day chivalry--are so noble you can't help
but smile and say, "How cute...."
     Cute--that's the sum of it.  The film never gets off the ground at
all, and it seems Rubino is more intent on getting playing time for the
blues musicians (including Holmes) on his soundtrack.  (To be fair, the
tunes are pretty good.)  As a result, the movie just meanders in the
undeveloped storyline and finishes up with an appropriate yet totally
unfulfilling conclusion.  Ho hum, no jackpot this time.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
     It will probably be honored as a triumph of filmmaking (and indeed
has already one the National Board of Review's Best Picture award), but
while GODS AND MONSTERS is a good film, it's really more of a curiosity
than a legitimate masterpiece.
     The adaptation of a fictionalized account of the final days of
director Frank Whale (best known for directing the first two
FRANKENSTEIN movies), director Condon's story is really a simple one,
about Whale's infatuation with his gardner Clay (Fraser).  That Whale is
a not-so-in-the-closet homosexual is pretty clear up front, but for some
reason, Clay can't figure that out.
     What follows is a series of encounters between the two, the
degeneration of Whale's mind thanks to a stroke, and, most curiously,
one dream/fantasy sequence after another, wherein Whale relives his
childhood, World War I, and his years in Hollywood.
     The dream sequence, long known as the biggest crutch a screenwriter
can use, works.  At least part-way.  Because Whale's mind is going
south, we are asked to indulge his fantasies as near-reality for him. 
Like I say, this works, but only up to a point.  After two hours, the
device has grown stale and predictable.
     Still, GODS is a truly good film with a great cast (McKellan and
especially Redgrave, playing Whale's maid, both deserve serious praise),
and what must have been a tricky adaptation of the novel on which it was
based is also a feat unto itself.
Director: Bill Condon
Producer: Paul Colichman, Gregg Fienberg, Mark R. Harris
Writer: Bill Condon
Starring: Ian McKellan, Brendan Fraser, Lynn Redgrave
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Portrait of a Lady, The (1996)
     Jesus, I didn't realize when I went to the movies this morning I
was going to have to *think*!
     But seriously, that's what you're going to be doing if you see THE
PORTRAIT OF A LADY -- Jane Campion's follow-up to THE PIANO, based on
Henry James's "classic" novel that you've probably never read.  Now, I'm
wishing that I had, though, because PORTRAIT is a fantastic movie to
watch, exquisitely crafted and painstakingly detailed, gorgeously
photographed and full of style -- but it is just plain impossible to
follow.
     I mean *impossible* to follow -- I'm guessing that's why I get
copies of the production notes and why you get to read reviews like
this:  to explain the plot.  So here goes:  Isabel (Nicole Kidman) is a
woman in 1872 Europe who eschews the traditional life of the time (i.e.
marry a rich guy) and has the world's first afro (check out the
publicity stills).  She's a rare free spirit in an age of repression. 
Turning down suitors played by Viggo Mortensen, Richard E. Grant, and
AMATEUR's Martin Donovan, Isabel turns out to be pretty gullible, too,
and gets suckered into marrying the manipulative Osmond (John
Malkovich), thanks to the duplicity of Osmond's evil friend Madame Merle
(a nearly unrecognizable Barbara Hershey).  (Yes, it does sound very
DANGEROUS LIAISONS-ish.)  Isabel soon finds her life pretty miserable,
and then 124 years later they make a movie about it.  That's *way*
simplified.
     You're probably saying that PORTRAIT is probably not the best movie
material out there, and I agree, but if anyone was going to have the
ability to pull this off, it was Campion, and I've got to give her
credit for trying.  Unfortunately, unlike THE PIANO, PORTRAIT is
incredibly hard to get at, a dense and mostly inaccessible try at making
something into art.
     There's so much good about the film, though, that it's hard not to
recommend -- the performances are top-notch, especially Donovan as
Isabel's cousin, who really deserves notice for this production.  Kidman
is really coming into her own as a true talent, as well, and the
remaining cast are all great.  Again, beautiful art direction,
cinematography, direction by Campion, and interesting editing all work
to the film's advantage.  The only problem I had:  what's with the black
& white inserts, slow-motion, askew angles, and singing beans(!?) that
show up now and then?  We do *not* need another ERASERHEAD.
     Oh well... you should still see it, if for no other reason than it
will give you plenty of conversation material for a *long* time.  And
you'll get some interesting hairstyling ideas.
     [Be sure to listen for the best inside-joke line:  "I would have
given my little finger..."]
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
     DOUBLE JEOPARDY does not take place during the latter half of a
game show.  However, it has a similar amount of credibility.
     There's an old adage in screenwriting:  You can make something up,
and it doesn't have to *be* real.  It just has to be believable.  In
other words, you can make up the lines for a priest to read at a
wedding, as long as they sound plausible.  No one's going to know if you
miss a few `Amens.'  However, this liberty does not extend to making up
laws on which to base the premise of your film.
     DOUBLE JEOPARDY has the bizarre distinction of probably being the
first movie to completely rest its fortunes on the fact that you'll buy
make-believe legislation.  And if you believe the filmmakers, you simply
can't be tried for the same crime twice.  So if your husband (Greenwood)
fakes his death and frames you (Judd) for it, and then you get
convicted, and then six years later you stalk him down to kill him, then
you can't be found guilty of murder, because you were already tried (and
convicted) for that.
     Right?  Wrong.  Very wrong.  Wrong to the point that it's scary to
think that maybe the filmmakers maybe didn't realize it at any point
during the production.
     The plot of DOUBLE JEOPARDY is very plain and obvious (Tommy Lee
Jones chases vengeance-obsessed Judd for an hour while she tracks down
hubby, just like in THE FUGITIVE).  And while the thriller is pedestrian
and straightforward and otherwise dull, the theater erupts in laughter
every time that `double jeopardy' clause is trotted out.  You keep
expecting for *someone* on screen to explain to Judd how the law works,
but they never do, and Jones's character is an ex-law professor!
     Not that I should feel surprised.  Bruce Beresford hasn't made a
good movie since 1989 (DRIVING MISS DAISY).  While Jones is campy and
fun to watch, and I could be entertained watching Ashley Judd make toast
for two hours, the film does not redeem itself with these minimal,
guilty pleasures (see also: ENTRAPMENT).  This isn't Double Jeopardy.
It's a $100 warm-up question.
Director: Bruce Beresford
Producer: Leonard Goldberg
Writer: David Weisberg, Douglas Cook
Starring: Tommy Lee Jones, Ashley Judd, Annabeth Gish, Bruce Greenwood
http://www.doublejeopardymovie.com/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Die Hard (1988)
If I were teaching a film class at a college (a shuddering prospect, I
know), Die Hard would be studied the way Citizen Kane and Potemkin are. 
It's a perfect action movie in every detail, the kind of movie that
makes your summer memorable.
Unfortunately, star Bruce Willis, director John McTiernan and company
couldn't duplicate the heart-pulling thrill of the first one with two
increasingly mediocre sequels.  Die Hard 2 and Die Hard With a Vengeance
suffered because of stuffing thrills and spills in every crevice, to the
point where I expected the Road Runner to make a cameo.  Everyone
involved seemed to forget that simplicity made the original so
riveting.  There's one flawed New York City detective trapped in a
skyscraper with only his wits and some firearms to stop a band of
talented international terrorists.
That cop is John McClane (Willis), who visits Los Angeles at Christmas
time to see his kids and hopefully make amends with his estranged wife,
Holly (Bonnie Bedelia).  When McClane drops in to visit Holly at work,
they get into an argument.
As Holly and McClane make like the Bickersons, the aforementioned group
of kick-ass terrorists led by the ruthless Hans Gruber (Alan Rickman in
a career-making performance) take over the skyscraper.  Gruber's
request:  The building's namesake, Takagi (James Shigata), must hand
over millions of dollars in bonds he has stashed away.
Everyone is accounted for and locked in, except for McClane, who is the
only hope to save his wife and her co-workers.  The phone lines are
dead, terrorists abound like gossipy secretaries, and McClane is
barefoot and alone.
Screenwriters Jeb Stuart (The Fugitive) and Steven E. De Souza
(Commando, one of my favorite Schwarzenegger movies) do a masterful job
in detailing the McClane character, so he doesn't come across as some
robotic one-man wrecking crew.  He crawls through the building's air
conditioning system.  He grabs whatever weapons he can (including a bag
of explosives) and he bleeds. We can root for him.  Minus the killer abs
and the extensive police experience, this guy could be any one of us.
Stuart and DeSouza make McClane additionally human by supplying him with
some of the funniest dialogue in action movie history (Emergency radio
operator:  "Attention, whoever you are, this line is reserved for
emergencies only." McClane:  "No fucking shit, lady?  Do I sound like
I'm ordering a pizza!").  And Willis helps his own cause by giving a
performance that blends comedy, heroism and pathos without preening or
overacting.
And the supporting characters are amazing:  Reginald VelJohnson (before
doing a lengthy stint in TV purgatory with Family Matters) shines as the
L.A. cop who counsels McClane via radio as he plots his next move. 
Rickman is so good here -- he has the perfect combination of charisma
and malice -- that the other main villains in the two sequels (William
Sadler and Jeremy Irons, both good actors) were about as vicious and
threatening as my grandmother.
In all this talk about performance and cinematic theories, you might
think I'm reviewing a Woody Allen film.  But part of Die Hard's appeal
is in its awesome action scenes:  McClane running barefoot through
shattered class, an overly eager terrorist trapping our hero under a
conference room table, McClane jumping from the fiery skyscraper roof,
tethered by a fire hose.
I have a feeling I'll be watching Die Hard sometime again in the near
future, as this summer's crop of action movies don't appear at all
engaging.  They don't seem to offer something for everyone the way Die
Hard does, which gives me all the more reason to start organizing that
film class.
Director: John McTiernan
Producers: Joel Silver, Lawrence Bender
Writers: Steven E. De Souza, Jeb Stuart
Starring: Bruce Willis, Alan Rickman, Reginald VelJohnson, Bonnie
Bedelia, Alexander Godunov, Paul Gleason, Hart Bochner, De'voreaux
White, William Atherton
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Memento (2000)
Amnesia and a murder mystery?  Isn't this usually the kind of thing that
hackneyed thrillers are made of -- stuff like Unforgettable, so bad you
had to scrape it off your shoe the minute you left the theater?
Usually it is.  But Memento proves that a skilled director, writer, and
cast can take even the most tired of formulas -- the man with the lost
memory -- and spin it into something so refreshingly different and new
that I don't hesitate to call it one of the best films I've ever seen.
As the picture opens, we are presented with the face of Leonard (L.A.
Confidential's Guy Pearce in a daring yet comfortable performance), a
tormented man on an unexplained quest of vengeance.  And he's got it: In
the first scene he is pulling the trigger to blow open the head of a guy
named Teddy (Joe Pantoliano).  Soon the facts rise to the surface: 
Leonard was searching for the man who killed his wife, and Teddy was the
prime suspect.  Only there's a twist:  Due to a head injury, Leonard has
no short-term memory and cannot create any new ones -- his mind is stuck
on the day his wife was killed.
To deal with this, Leonard has generated an intricate replacement for
his mind.  For immediate needs, he snaps Polaroids of people and places,
jotting notes on the back.  For long-term goals, he has messages to
himself tattooed on his body (for example: "Find him and kill him").
Heavy stuff.  Leonard's problem is so unfathomable and complex it is a
constant struggle for him just to get through daily life -- much less if
you're thigh-deep in a revenge scheme.  All of a sudden -- pop -- here's
Leonard, on the run through a trailer park.  But is he chasing that guy,
or is that guy chasing him?  It's deliciously complicated and so
circular that it's fun.
But wait, there's more!  Soon enough we find that the whole film is
presented in reverse (not backwards -- the scenes are reordered from end
to beginning).  While the movie begins with the death of Teddy, it
traces back through time as we learn how we arrived at that point. 
Think Betrayal meets The Fugitive.
In other words, we know how the movie ends, but not how it begins.  And
thanks to Leonard's condition, the audience knows what's happening
(well, sort of), but his character doesn't.  Eventually it becomes clear
that Leonard is an unwitting patsy being used at the hands of those even
more nefarious than himself.
It's deeper than you can make a gimmick like this sound -- and to be
honest, it is just a gimmick -- but it's a gimmick that works.  The
movie, written and directed by Christopher Nolan (and based on his
brother's short story) is vibrant and harrowing, unpredictable despite
an ending long since given away.  Unfathomably, the film gets
progressively better as it goes along, and I found myself inching closer
and closer to the edge of my seat throughout the movie.
It's difficult to put Memento's staggering festival raves out of mind,
but this is the genuine article, I assure you.  Those niggling questions
-- Would the movie work if it wasn't told in reverse?  If Leonard can't
remember anything since his accident, how does he know he has the
condition at all? -- only serve to make the story that much more twisty,
and I mean that in the best possible way.
Ultimately, Memento stands on its own as a thriller, but it also works
as a profound tragedy, stunning in its portrayal of a man teetering on
the edge, though he doesn't even know it.  It asks some serious
questions about how we know what to believe, since our senses and our
memory all lie to us.
And in the end, Memento gives us our answer:  We simply believe what we
choose to.
Director: Christopher Nolan
Producer: Jennifer Todd, Suzanne Todd
Writer: Christopher Nolan
Starring: Guy Pearce, Carrie-Anne Moss, Joe Pantoliano, Mark Boone
Junior, Stephen Tobolowsky, Harriet Sansom Harris, Callum Keith Rennie
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Die Hard: With a Vengeance (1995)
     To make the long and extremely silly plotline of DIE HARD WITH A
VENGEANCE short, it breaks down like this.  John McClane (Bruce Willis) is
back in New York City where he's separated from his wife.  The brother of
Hans Gruber, from the original DIE HARD, is out to get McClane and make
some cash for himself in the process, bringing a pack of East German
stooges with him to cause trouble.  Add to this the character Zeus (Samuel
L. Jackson), a Harlem shop owner, who becomes McClane's unlikely sidekick,
and a whole lotta bombs exploding all over the city, and what do you get?
Well, I still haven't figured that out.
     I was a big fan of the original DIE HARD and had high expectations for
this third entry into the series.  Unfortunately, the only real similarity
to the former (besides the main character and a bunch of explosions) are
the jokes, which the creators felt were so good the first time around that
they'd go ahead and use them again.  Even worse, they borrow material from
PULP FICTION when the original jokes have run out.  I guess it was supposed
to be clever, but it reeks of unoriginality.
     The point of an action thriller like this is that it's supposed to be
exciting and keep you on the edge of your seat.  DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE
does neither.  Most of the time it's boring because the story is almost
pure nonsense.  Seriously, is no one going to catch on that Jeremy Irons
(as Simon Gruber) and his thugs are *not* from around here?  And what's
with Simon's fetish for ancient brain teasers to keep McClane running
around, searching for bombs?  Unfortunately, I don't have the answers to
these questions, and the bottom line is that the plot just doesn't gel.
Wait until you see how ridiculous it is when they find the bad guys'
hideout at the end.
     Not to be completely scathing, there are a few good points.  Jackson
is excellent in his role, and he is solely responsible for redeeming this
film from the one-star basement.  (Surprisingly, every other character is
completely one-dimensional, and even Willis looks tired.)  Oh, and the
explosions are pretty cool.  The time goes by fairly quickly, so you never
feel stuck in one of those endless movies, but all in all, by the time you
leave, you certainly won't be screaming for DIE HARDER WITH A VENGEANCE.

Title
Review for Pearl Harbor (2001)
There's a point in Pearl Harbor when Cuba Gooding Jr. leaps into a
battleship's gun turret and starts shooting down Japanese planes while
hell rages around him.  It's a dramatic moment... until you realize that
it's that "Show me the money!" guy from Jerry Maguire, shooting CGI
bullets at a CGI plane... and you are reminded once again just how phony
everything you've seen in Pearl Harbor has been.
Ironically, this incident, where ship's cook Dorie Miller took charge
and shot back during America's worst hour on December 7, 1941, is just
about the only true event to be found in the entire, oppressive
three-hour film.  (And our producers are quick to remind us of just how
ripped-from-history this little vignette is.  Never mind that Gooding
has a pitiful excuse for a role with maybe five minutes of screen time.)
After more than a year of hype, Pearl Harbor finally hits theater
screens this Memorial Day weekend, anxious to repeat that Titanic
experience, by throwing us a love story set in the most inhospitable of
locations.  In Titanic, of course, it was a sinking ship.  Here, it's in
the middle of a military base while the bombs are dropping around the
smoochie lovebirds.
The trailers have been coy with the plot, and I'll do my best to keep
the various twists secret (except for that whole Japanese invasion
bit... sorry).  Pretty boy Rafe (Ben Affleck) and his scruffy best
friend Danny (Josh Hartnett) grow up on a farm, dreaming of taking to
the skies in the Air Force.  They get their wish when they enlist in
1940, and as Rafe prepares to ship out, he falls madly in love with
Evelyn (Kate Beckinsale), half nurse, half pin-up girl.
Rafe, "a slow reader" but damn if he doesn't look good in uniform,
volunteers to serve in the British air force, surprising Evelyn and
Danny, who head for the sunny, peaceful shores of Hawaii's Pearl Harbor
naval base to "sit out" the war in Europe.  While Rafe fights the Nazis,
our other pals soak up some rays.
After much gnashing of teeth, we're thigh-deep in a love triangle.  But
wouldn't you know it?  Just as the Titanic began to sink halfway through
the film, the first bomb is dropped on Pearl Harbor at 1 hour, 30
minutes into Pearl Harbor.  35 minutes later, the siege is over, and we
are left to contend with an iffy dénouement (which takes another 55
minutes to get resolved, as the U.S. plans its lame, first
counterstrike).
Plot excepted, Pearl Harbor is a good-looking film.  When the planes
whoosh by we can almost feel the wind.  When the bombs drop, we feel the
shudder.  And when lovable supporting characters get blown to bits, it's
hard to suppress the waterworks.
However, anyone expecting a think piece on the war in the Pacific is
going to be sorely disappointed.  Unlike, say, Tora! Tora! Tora!,
history gets short shrift in Pearl Harbor, as director Michael Bay's
WWII for Dummies gives us laughably simplistic details about why the war
with Japan was entered into.  Bizarrely, yet in a blatant attempt to
garner an international audience that is not offended in any way by the
movie, the film virtually absolves Japan of any wrongdoing, excusing the
sneak attack as their regrettable only option.
Thank God, at least, that we are mercifully spared the Saving Private
Ryan and Titanic flash-forwards to a melodramatic, length-padding
present.  With a lame and drippy score courtesy of Hans Zimmer, there's
plenty of sap already, thank you very much.  As well, the film's few
attempt at lightening things up garner few laughs, if ever.
Critics (myself included) are going to endlessly compare Pearl Harbor to
Titanic, and for good reason.  However, aside from the length and the
love story, these are radically different pictures.  Ultimately, Pearl
Harbor is not a film made by a man fascinated with history (a la James
Cameron), but rather a studio-manufactured tearjerker, with nothing left
to chance.
Titanic was so opulent and obsessed with period detail it almost made
you forget that Billy Zane can't act.  Pearl Harbor is clearly the work
of hundreds of computer experts dueling it out to see who can make the
biggest explosion.  Been there, done that, folks.
Titanic was a big risk that took guts to make.  Pearl Harbor is just
another step toward the Disneyfication of our collective memories,
trying unsuccessfully to prey upon a resurgence of patriotism.
Titanic was epic, and it made you forget about the passage of time. 
Pearl Harbor is soulless and desperate in its cheesy attempt to appeal
to women, running at three hours long mainly because it's all done in
slow motion.
Which is funny, because the actual invasion in 1941 only lasted for less
than two.
Director: Michael Bay
Producer: Michael Bay, Jerry Bruckheimer
Writer: Randall Wallace
Starring: Ben Affleck, Josh Hartnett, Kate Beckinsale, William Lee
Scott, Greg Zola, Ewen Bremner, Alec Baldwin, James King, Catherine
Kellner, Jennifer Garner, Michael Shannon, Jon Voight, Cuba Gooding Jr.,
Matthew Davis, Mako
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Jade (1995)
     A few short weeks ago I posed the question, "What is Joe Eszterhas
going to do next (after SHOWGIRLS)?"  Well, this is it:  JADE, a horrid
little thriller about a whole bunch of obsessive-compulsive crazies,
some of whom may be murderers.
     Actually, I wish it was that simple.  Perennial bad-girl Linda
Fiorentino plays Trina Gavin, a sultry psychologist with a questionable
past.  Chazz Palminteri is her sicko attorney husband Matt, and David
Caruso plays assistant D.A. David Corelli, who is assigned to look into
the murder of a wealthy art collector to whom everyone seems to be
linked ... especially Trina.
     What follows is a convoluted delving into a prostitution ring, one
backstabbing after another, some raunchy sex, and a whole slew of sick
obsessions, each of which seems to outdo the last one.  You realize
pretty quickly that no one is innocent in JADE, and it soon becomes
clear that the identity of the real killer is unimportant--*all* of
these people should be locked up.
     A bunch of annoying characters combined with a bad script conspire
to give us a thriller that isn't particularly thrilling.  Except for
one awesome car chase through the hilly streets of San Francisco and
through a parade in Chinatown, there's very little to redeem this
feature.  Director William Friedkin previously won a slew of awards for
directing THE FRENCH CONNECTION, and seems to have found his calling in
car chases.  Unfortunately, CONNECTION was made in 1971, and while
Friedkin's direction still has style, it ain't what it used to be.
     It's really a shame that a cast of genuinely great actors would
get together and star in such a poor film.  Palminteri looks simply
ragged in JADE, obviously not happy to be there.  Even supermodel Angie
Everhart, in her motion picture debut, is wasted--spending her entire
screen time being chased and beaten up.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Emma (1996)
     O!  The plight of wealthy twentysomethings in England at the beginning
of the 19th century.
     Such is the rather large pill you are supposed to swallow if you truly
want to enjoy EMMA, the latest in the incessant parade of increasingly bad
adaptations of so-called "classic" novels.
     EMMA is the second time in about a year that Jane Austen's book of the
same name has been adapted.  The last time was the clueless CLUELESS, and
it'd be hard for me to decide which one is worse.  At least CLUELESS was
supposed to be a joke.  EMMA has all the misplaced seriousness of a
documentary on genital warts.
     Emma (Gwyneth Paltrow) is a flighty little matchmaker, never seeking
her own marital happiness, but delighting in that of others.  The first
half hour of EMMA shows us her matchmaking attempts with friend Miss Smith
(Toni Collette).  As no other plot lines are developed in 30 minutes, I
thought it safe to assume this was what the movie was going to be about.
No such luck, because in the second half hour, a parade of 15 or 20 or 8
billion supporting characters waltzes through the scenes.  Each is called
Mister or Miss or Mrs. Something, and each of them looks and acts *exactly*
the same (obnoxious).  (I defy you to tell the difference at all between
Polly Walker's character and Greta Scacchi's.)  It's a shame that great
acting talents like the above, Ewan McGregor, Alan Cummings, Jeremy
Northam, and Juliet Stevenson are all pretty much wasted.
     Anyway, Emma finds herself in quite the predicament when she finds her
matchmaking blowing up in her face and realizes she herself is falling for
various supporting characters.  (Oh, my!)  The problem with all of this is
that, to a one, all of the characters are loathsome.  Combined with the
overacting that generally comes along with period flicks like this, you
come up with a long-as-sin, pointless film.
     Then again, EMMA has a couple of charms, notably some nice scenery,
upon which are placed hordes of actresses in those horrid Coke
bottle-shaped dresses that made fashion victims out of a generation of
Britons.  And the credits aren't too bad.
     Final note:  Why is it called EMMA when everyone refers to her as Miss
Woodhouse?  Discuss amongst yourselves.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Wing Commander (1999)
     Wrong-o.  I've never played the game aside from a 30-minute tour,
and now I wish I hadn't seen the movie, either.
     Come now, you say, it can't be that bad!  Wasn't WING COMMANDER a
highly-lauded, critically-acclaimed video game?  Maybe the STAR WARS of
the PC?  Sure.  But when you rid yourself of everything but the title
and the setting (redux: Humans at war with Kilrathi, an evil alien race
that look like walking walnuts with beards), you'll find you're high and
dry.
     How bad is WING COMMANDER?  Bad.  *Really* bad.  Throughout most of
the film, my advance-screening theater was filled with the merry sounds
of laughter.  Alas, there are no (intentional) jokes on film. 
(Disclaimer: Said laughter does not count those who had fallen asleep.) 
Not only does the plot stink, but WING COMMANDER has some of the worst
dialogue this side of SHOWGIRLS.
     The marketing ploy behind WING COMMANDER is obvious, and I'll
outline the sad history for you so you can get a sense for it....  20th
Century Fox nabs rights to successful video game for crossover hit
(MORTAL KOMBAT, the movie, was hugely successful)-maybe even a
franchise!  But isn't Mark Hamill getting old?  Replace him with some
young, unknown studs and draw the teen crowd!  It'll be cheap!  Uh-oh...
movie's done and it *is* cheap... in every way imaginable.  Shelve the
movie.  Fast-forward a few years... uh-oh again! - Prinze and Lillard
are, surprise, big stars!  Release movie with big ad campaign, touting
the newly idolized heroes.  Teens go nuts!  Score!
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Species (1995)
     On the surface, SPECIES is something like a new version of ALIEN
taking place on Earth.  Once you look *really* closely, though, you
realize it's a movie about one woman getting naked.
     The woman is newcomer Natasha Henstridge, who spends most of the
film in her birthday suit--or her alternative alien suit when the need
arises.  In case you haven't seen the previews, my friend pretty much
summed up his impression of Henstridge by asking me during the film,
"Did you write down 'babe-a-licious?'"  My response:  "One 's' or two?"
     SPECIES starts out with an interesting idea:  that an alien
civilization would radio us a plan to genetically engineer a new (and
far superior) race, which would inevitably destroy us all.  Henstridge
is "Sil," the code name of the first of these creatures, which escapes
from captivity much too easily and begins marauding Los Angeles in an
attempt to mate.  Sil is a femme fatale in the purest sense of the
word.  Believe me, when she says "no," she *means* it, as one guy who
tries to take advantage of her quickly finds out.
     The first half of the film is pretty good.  Here, Sil is unsure of
her identity, and she struggles with her half-human, half-lizard,
half-cockroach existence, metamorphosing from one form to another when
duty calls.  Sil is on the run, but she doesn't know why; as a youth,
her instinct hasn't yet kicked in, and because she's had no
"upbringing," she survives on the street with only raw emotion.  When
the inevitable band of four scientists and hunter Michael Madsen come
after her, Sil panics and must kill kill kill.
     Needless to say, a somewhat thoughtful film was not what I was
expecting out of SPECIES, and sure enough, by the time the second hour
rolls around, the film degenerates into a formulaic search and destroy
movie.  It's never scary.  Even the [insert favorite non-threatening
creature] suddenly jumping at one of the good guys doesn't cause much
of a stir in the crowd.
     The Giger-designed creature is okay, but it's just like the one in
ALIEN.  The main effects problem is the ending, where crummy digital
animation is used in place of models and makeup, effectively negating
any suspense, and making the finale look kind of funny.  Even Marg
Helgenberger, as Madsen's love interest, starts off as pretty cool, but
she ends up as goofy as her compatriots (including
much-better-than-this-film actors Ben Kingsley and Forest Whitaker) by
getting stuck between some rocks.
     Of course, Henstridge steals the show and makes the film nearly
watchable.  She looks almost inhuman as it is ... and some of her
transformation sequences are almost too real.  In fact, I once dated a
girl who ... well, but that's another story.

Title
Review for Desperado (1995)
     Quentin Tarantino and Robert Rodriguez seem to have two things in
common: an affection for old surfer-style tunes, and an unconditional
love of blood.  Both play heavy parts in Rodriguez's eye-popping new
flick, DESPERADO, the $8 million sequel to his $7,000 first feature, EL
MARIACHI, which lives up to the hype surrounding it.
     In DESPERADO, Antonio Banderas takes the role of the mariachi with
no name who leads a charmed life while everything around him dies.
This sequel is the story of his quest for revenge against the men who
killed the woman he loved and shot him in the hand.  El Mariachi
travels from town to town with a guitar case full of ultra-powerful
weapons, in search for tough guy Bucho, leader of the thugs.  As he
closes in, things get bloodier and bloodier until the final showdown
where everything is revealed.  Along the way, he encounters Carolina
(Salma Hayek), his newfound love interest, who saves his life more than
once through some impromptu surgeries.
     Banderas is simply incredible in his role as the man of few words
and many bullets.  Steve Buscemi, Cheech Marin, and Tarantino all have
solid supporting parts, mainly for much-needed comic relief, and Hayek
is passable in her role, although her romance with Banderas seems a
little forced.  (I suspect meddling from the studio gave birth to the
steamier scenes).
     While the black comedy of DESPERADO is good, Rodriguez is still a
better director/editor than writer, and the wickedly cool gunplay
sequences are clearly the prime reason to see the film.  Although not
for the faint of heart, the seriously gory fights that El Mariachi gets
into are spectacularly arranged and innovatively photographed, and they
bring new life to the action movie genre.  Unfortunately for other
action filmmakers, Rodriguez has raised the stakes and is clearly now
"the one to beat."  He even manages to work in an anti-drug message for
the kids in the audience.
     DESPERADO is faithful to the backstory of EL MARIACHI, and even
Carlos Gallardo, the original man in black, returns as Banderas's right
hand man.  The only thing missing is the best "character" from the
original: the dog, who rode off into the sunset with Gallardo at the
end of EL MARIACHI.  I guess you can't have everything.
     For raw entertainment value, DESPERADO is one of the best bets to
come along in months.  Be warned, though: there's enough blood here to
fill a swimming pool.  And on the big screen, you'll feel like you're
swimming in it.
-Christopher Null / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Trees Lounge (1996)
     Get this tagline for TREES LOUNGE:  "A story about one man's
search... for who knows what."  That could describe quite well
writer/director/star Steve Buscemi during his creation of this film, a
quirky and melodramatic tragicomedy about... who knows what.
     Buscemi plays Tommy, a regular guy in Long Island whose life is
basically a series of alcoholic binges, sprinkled with failed love
affairs, cheap drugs, and terminal unemployment.  A parade of supporting
characters (all played by Buscemi's personal friends) run in and out of
his life, and everyone tries to make some sense of it all.
     The Trees Lounge is the unfortunately-named bar where Tommy spends
virtually all of his time.  It's the kind of joint where a guy can walk
into one night and come back out 20 years later, wondering where his
life went.  It's the kind of place you can almost smell -- or maybe that
was just the movie theater's goo-encrusted floor.
     I get the feeling that TREES LOUNGE is the movie that all
filmmakers are secretly dying to make -- a personal portrait of simple
life, nothing but depression all the way.  The reason this kind of movie
doesn't get made more often is because (1) no studio in their right mind
would let someone do such a thing [case in point: TREES LOUNGE is being
released by the only-recently-out-of-bankruptcy Orion Pictures], and (2)
when you get down to brass tacks, not many people *really* want to make
a movie about someone that's more pathetic than they are.
     Still, I've got to admire Buscemi for doing it anyway.  Buscemi has
complained in interviews about having trouble writing the script for
TREES LOUNGE, and it shows, but at least he doesn't let the self-pity
get too thick, applying liberal doses of comedy to counter the tragic
underscore of the film.  Overall, he ends up with a picture that isn't
half bad, but which just doesn't make for a light matinee and
*certainly* isn't "fun for the whole family."
     As a director, Buscemi isn't awful, but he isn't great.  As far as
his casting choices, they're fine, except for his breaking of the
cardinal rule that Daniel Baldwin should never be allowed to be in a
movie.  Chloe Sevigny (KIDS) is a fun Lolita, and minor roles like
Bronson Dudley's eternal barfly are a scream, and they really show
Buscemi's knack for comedy.  Let's hope he explores this a little more
in his next offering.
     P.S.  Be sure to watch for the cameo by the faux-Reservoir Dogs
(it's in the first five minutes).
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit The Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Nine Months (1995)
     NINE MONTHS has all the makings of an incredible disaster.  First,
its star (Hugh Grant) is arrested for lewd conduct.  Second, it's a
remake of a French film (NEUF MOIS), always a huge negative.  Finally,
it's a comedy decidedly for adults which is directed by the infantile
Chris Columbus, the man who brought us the HOME ALONE franchise and
MRS. DOUBTFIRE.
     Imagine my shock; NINE MONTHS is pretty good.  The success of the
film is due *entirely* to the radiant presence of Julianne Moore as
Rebecca, a woman who finds herself unintentionally pregnant and with no
clue as to what to do.  Grant plays Samuel, the world's most neurotic
boyfriend, who has to "grow up" and come to grips with the fact that
his convertible has no room for a baby seat.
     Rounding out the cast are Tom Arnold and Joan Cusack, a pair of
obnoxious breeders that serve as foils for the cathartic Samuel.  Robin
Williams plays a bumbling, Russian obstetrician who seems to be
learning about pregnancy at the same time as Rebecca.  You don't have
to look far beyond the last three actors' names to figure out what goes
on when they're on the screen:  raw, unfiltered, and often
unnecessarily vulgar, comedy.
     NINE MONTHS hits the metaphor pretty hard ... never missing a moment
to tell us just how great the pregnancy-childbirth experience is, and
Samuel is constantly rebuked for his beliefs that the world is
overpopulated and (more importantly) that he will be incapable of being
a good father.  The result is a pretty heavy-handed "message" movie
that will not stop beating its theme into the viewer.
     It drags a bit at times, and the film never becomes really
engrossing, but whenever Moore is on screen, none of that seems to
matter.  The emotion and power she puts into her performance make every
second of the film worth watching, if only to get to Julianne's next
scene.  It might not be the best way to make a film work, but in this
day and age I'll take just about anything.
     NINE MONTHS is a film with a huge identity crisis.  Columbus
obviously couldn't give up slapstick (i.e., HOME ALONE), filling what
could have been a touching romance with antics that are entirely out of
place here.  Again, this is *not* a kids' movie, as the mother of the
child who sat behind me at the screening can attest to (when he asked
what a particularly explicit piece of anatomy was).
     Incidentally, I had the fortune to see this film with a woman who
happens to be currently pregnant.  She loved the film ("double thumbs
up") and was pretty impressed with the realism given to Rebecca's
experience.  As she put it, only the constant puking was missing.

Title
Review for Fan, The (1996)
     My my my, what a mess to wade through in writing a review about THE
FAN, Robert De Niro and Wesley Snipes' hotly awaited new thriller set in
the obsession-filled world of baseball.
     The film is essentially one long study of dysfunction.  Knife
salesman(!) Gil (De Niro) is divorced, is on the verge of losing his
job, doesn't know how to relate to his kid, shouts obscenities at his
clients -- your every day run-of-the-mill psycho -- and is *obsessed*
with the San Francisco Giants.
     Bobby Rayburn (Snipes) is a $40 million golden boy outfielder,
newly traded to the Giants, and is not earning his keep.  He's batting
in the .100's, is being upstaged by rival Juan Primo (Benicio Del Toro),
can't get his traditional number 11 jersey, and has his own family
problems.  Nonetheless, he's still an egocentric jerk driven by greed,
groupies, and fame.
     When these two cross paths, it can only be trouble -- sure to make
you reevaluate the phrase, "I want you to hit a home run for me."
     There's plenty good and plenty bad in THE FAN, and as I've said,
trying to figure out where to start is a problem.  Directed with Tony
Scott's (CRIMSON TIDE) well-crafted style, THE FAN is often a fun and
thrilling ride.  The most fun to watch are De Niro and Snipes, who turn
in very believable performances en route to the film's big finish.
     But there's this problem that gnaws at the viewer the whole film --
that none of the characters are remotely likable.  At all.  Not even the
supporting characters (Del Toro, John Leguizamo as Snipes's personal
manager, Ellen Barkin as a sportscaster) are warm and fuzzy.  Instead,
everyone falls into the me-first trap that plagues the leads.  The
result alienates the audience into not really caring who wins this
battle of nerves, much to the film's detriment.
     Combined with sketchily-developed characters, some annoying
dialogue, horrible editing that is used to intentionally trick the
viewer, some glaring technical gaffes associated with the game of
baseball, and a wholly inappropriate soundtrack (which somehow features
almost every Rolling Stones song ever recorded), THE FAN is a jumbled
mess of good and bad.  Thank God it has some fun.
     Near the climax of THE FAN, Wesley Snipes's character hits a deep
fly ball.  Everyone in the stadium waits in anticipation to see it clear
the fence.  The outfielder goes back back *back* -- no soup for you! 
That pretty much sums up the whole film.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
     Jim Carrey's finest hour?  I don't know... I guess if you go for this
sort of thing.
     It's been four years since Tom Hanks played Everyman in FORREST GUMP,
so I suppose the world was ripe for a repeat.  You really can't go wrong
with these Man-against-the-world/triumph-in-the-face-of-overwhelming-odds
films, and done right they can have incredible appeal.
     Thankfully, THE TRUMAN SHOW is done right, mostly.  In case you live
under a rock, you know that this is the story of a man (Carrey) who slowly
discovers his life is a sham, a cradle-to-grave story that's been televised
to the world for 30 years.
     The melodrama factor is high, both on the show and behind the scenes. 
>From Truman's saccharine wife (Linney) to the overbearing director of the
show, Christof (Harris), everyone in the film is a walking cliché.  Part of
this is by design--these are actors playing actors playing real people--but
part of it is a crutch that, in the end, weakens the film.  *Every one* of
the supporting characters is wasted to some degree--it's especially visible
with McElhone's character, an extra that Truman falls in love with against
Christof's master plan.
     It's scenarios like this that give THE TRUMAN SHOW its real weight: The
"what would happen if..." developments that, of course, culminates with,
"What would happen if Truman tried to escape?"  That's where the drama is,
and that's what makes THE TRUMAN SHOW compelling.
     For what it's worth, Carrey's in fine form, but if you're looking for
LIAR, LIAR antics you will be sorely disappointed.  Director Weir has
obviously kept him on a short leash, and while Carrey's improvised scenes
can be spotted here and there, the broad comedy is kept to a bare minimum.
     I can't help but think that with a little more thought to the
supporting characters, THE TRUMAN SHOW would have been a classic.  As it
stands, it's still good, but it just doesn't live up to its own hype.
Director: Peter Weir
Producer: Edward S. Feldman, Andrew Niccol, Scott Rudin, Adam Schroeder
Writer: Andrew Niccol
Starring: Jim Carrey, Laura Linney, Noah Emmerich, Natascha McElhone, Ed
Harris
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Breakfast of Champions (1999)
     The word `unfilmable' is often bandied about over cult classic
books.  That never stops people from filming them.
     Witness THE ENGLISH PATIENT, which turned out to be filmable after
all.  And then there was FEAR AND LOATHING IN LAS VEGAS, which wasn't.
But maybe unfilmable is the wrong word.  BREAKFAST OF CHAMPIONS might
have proved filmable, but it sure isn't watchable.
     This, of course, saddens me greatly.  Kurt Vonnegut is my favorite
author ever, and BREAKFAST OF CHAMPIONS was his first book that I read.
It made enough of an impression for me to track down his entire oeuvre,
which I have devoured.  This film just shouldn't have been made, sadly.
Take CAT'S CRADLE (his second-best work) next time  that ought to make
a great film.
     Why is this BREAKFAST so bad?  Because the book is about
craziness.  Dwayne Hoover (Willis) is a crazy auto salesman, married to
a crazy wife (Hershey), and he becomes obsessed with a crazy sci-fi
writer named Kilgore Trout (Finney).  Trout's sales manager (Nolte) is
also a crazy guy that likes to dress in women's lingerie, and his
secretary (Headley) isn't all together.  Oh, and Trout's son (Haas)
wants to be a lounge singer named Bunny.
     What made the book so good is that you can go inside these
characters, heads, plus Vonnegut's writing style is so nutty that it all
actually works.  Director Rudolph tries to do this, too, with wacky
camera angles, digital effects, and other tricks, but none of this
works.  In fact, it's just annoying and is barely entertaining for even
a minute.  A couple of wisecracks aside, this BREAKFAST is unedible.
Director: Alan Rudolph
Producer: David Blocker, David Willis
Writer: Alan Rudolph
Starring: Bruce Willis, Albert Finney, Nick Nolte, Barbara Hershey,
Glenne Headley, Lukas Haas, Omar Epps, Buck Henry
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
     I'll be the first to admit I don't really remember the details of
Washington Irving's `The Legend of Sleepy Hollow.'  But what I do
remember, well, it didn't go like this.
     In typical Tim Burton fashion, a fairy tale gets an update (and the
film's color gets drained out in the process).  The guts of `Legend' are
still there: In 1799, evil headless horseman marauds a tiny village in
upstate New York.  Ichabod Crane (Depp) is sent to investigate.
     Of course, something wicked this way comes, and a plot is uncovered
-- the details of which I'm still trying to get right in my head -- but
which involve just about every inbred member of this little town, most
of whom are beheaded during the picture.
     Depp nearly reprises his role as EDWARD SCISSORHANDS as a quiet
wallflower (sans scissors), and whiter-than-white Christina Ricci (as
the magic-obsessed love interest) sticks out among the drab fogies in
their powdered wigs like Bill Gates at the Playboy Mansion.  The
supporting cast is uniformly bland, just like the scenery (though the
latter is intentional).  The sole exception is Walken, who plays the
horseman (when he has his head, at least) with typical aplomb.
     So what's the sum of the parts?  What should have been a Halloween
treat is instead a late-November humdrum flick worthy of a glance but
little more.  The story is obtuse yet unsurprising.  The humor is sparse
and occasionally funny.  And while Burton's signature is all over the
film, his typical wit is not.
     How will the film fare at the box office?  I can't rightly say, but
I do know that a legion of junior high students is going to be
disappointed, missing a whole lot of questions on their English Lit
exams because of this movie.
Director: Tim Burton
Producer: Scott Rudin, Adam Schroeder
Writer: Andrew Kevin Walker
Starring: Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, Casper Van Dien, Miranda
Richardson, Michael Gambon, Christopher Walken
http://www2.sleepyhollowmovie.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for Speaking in Strings (1999)
Sometimes it can be fun an interesting to watch a documentary about
someone you've never heard of.  Of course, now I feel embarrassed --
apparently this Nadja Salerno-Sonnenberg is a virtuoso violinist that
everyone knows.  They even did a piece on 60 Minutes about her.
Well color me a fool.  Described by music critics as "frightening" and
"posessed" while she played, the story of the borderline-crazy Nadja
reminds one of another virtuoso: David Helfgott, immortalized in SHINE.
Through present-day interviews plus archival footage of her practices
and concerts, we get to see what those music critics were talking about:
Nadja is a nutbar when she's playing the fiddle.  And she's good, too.
All of this would be humorous were it not for her accidentally lopping
off part of her pinky and later attempting suicide (the gun jammed).
And two weeks after the suicide attempt, she played Carnegie Hall.
I'm not sure what lessons we can learn from Nadja's life, but her story
(a breezy 73 minutes at that) is an interesting one.
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for When Night Is Falling (1995)
     You know right from the start that WHEN NIGHT IS FALLING isn't going
to be the uplifting tale that you might have thought it would be, as it
cuts quickly from a bizarre underwater dream to a scene in which the main
character, Camille (Pascale Bussičres), discovers her dog has died.
     Patricia Rozema's odd melodrama tells Camille's story.  A Calvinist
professor at a Christian college, she is on the fast track to a position
as co-Chaplain of the university along with her conservative boyfriend
Martin (Henry Czerny).  Suddenly, circus performance artist Petra (Rachael
Crawford) comes into her life, and everything changes.  Petra is almost
obsessively infatuated with Camille, and the once-traditionalist Camille
very quickly finds herself developing an inexplicable attraction for
Petra.
     Unfortunately, this obsession and inexplicability together create a
situation which is difficult to empathize with, largely because Camille's
motivation is a complete mystery to us.  The movie is thankfully
well-constructed technically, with nicely-crafted cinematography, tight
editing, and an interesting variety of settings and costumes.  Of course,
this can't overcome a very weak story, but it does give the film a
worthwhile aspect to balance the plot.
     By the end of WHEN NIGHT IS FALLING, we're not really sure if
Camille's metamorphosis was a spur of the moment infatuation or if she
really harbored these emotions deep inside.  The producers are obviously
hoping you'll go for the latter, but I don't think we'll ever know.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)
     Maybe as another Matthew Perry star vehicle where he doesn't come
off as particularly funny?  Maybe as another Neve Campbell movie where
she sounds whiny and unlikable?  Or perhaps it will be as a borderline
offensive straight-guy-mistaken-as-gay movie, heavy on the cliches and
light on the laughs.
     Of course, THREE TO TANGO is all of these things.  It's one of the
flattest romantic comedies this year, a variation on the mistaken
identity theme that already feels old, despite its watery `fresh twist'
on the love triangle genre.
     The story: McDermott is a billionaire tycoon who's looking to build
a philanthropic museum.  Platt and Perry are a team of architects on the
short list to do the work.  Will they get the job?  Well, McDermott
thinks Perry is gay, so he enlists him to `watch over' his mistress,
Campbell, who is attracting many a wandering eye.  Uh oh!  Perry falls
for Campbell, who also thinks he's gay.  What's a girl to do!?
     Let me stop right there.  Exactly what you think is going to
happen, happens.  There's scarcely a moment of surprise in the entire
picture, with the exception of a few minor characters who provide comic
relief.  Platt, as the genuine homosexual, is also a riot when he's
allowed to stretch, but that's not very often.  Everything else, from
Perry's attempts to tell Mom and Dad he's not really gay, to his Big
Speech in Public where he reveals the truth, is utterly predictable.
And neither romantic nor comedic.  Pass on this one.
Director: Damon Santostefano
Producer: Jeffrey Silver, Bettina Sofia Viviano
Writer: Rodney Vaccaro, Aline Brosh McKenna
Starring: Matthew Perry, Neve Campbell, Dylan McDermott, Oliver Platt
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Casino (1995)
     The way I see it, Martin Scorcese has one problem: He's in love with
the sound of his own voice, as it comes out through the dialogue of films
like GOODFELLAS and now, CASINO.  Clocking in at three *long* hours,
CASINO is an entertaining and engrossing film, but just drags a simple
story into a sprawling, epic tale that desperately needs a little
trimming.
     Based on a true story, CASINO is the tale of Sam Rothstein (Robert
DeNiro), the best of the old bookmakers, who is hand-picked by his mob
bosses "Back Home" to go to Las Vegas to run the Tangiers Casino.  Sam has
to contend with managing the bosses' skim going out the back door, cheats
at the tables, the law breathing down his neck, and strung-out hustler
Ginger (Sharon Stone), whom Sam falls for, and, despite his better
judgment, eventually marries.  Add to the mix Nicky Santoro (Joe Pesci),
who basically reprises his role from GOODFELLAS as a "problem solver" with
a temper from hell, and it's pure chaos in the high-glamour world of 1973
Las Vegas.
     Scorcese directs with his characteristic style, creating a film that
is at once surreal and full of gritty realism, particularly when the
violent Nicky plies his trade.  The film ranges from glued-to-the-screen
sequences, the best of which is when Sam and his crew bust a couple of
blackjack cheats, to a number of dull scenes, mainly about Sam fighting to
get his gaming license.  If Scorcese had kept the best two hours of the
film, it would have been one of the best of the year.  As it stands now,
CASINO is still good, but just doesn't cut it as a long-term classic.
     I also fault Scorcese for the overuse of voice-over coupled with
rapid-fire visuals.  Especially in the opening scenes, when the characters
and setting are being introduced, it's a nonstop deluge of sensory
information--too much to process, too quickly.  But hey, who am I to tell
Martin Scorcese how to make a film?
     The best part of CASINO is smart acting by the three principals as
well as the supporting characters (including Don Rickles, of all people,
in a memorable role).  DeNiro evokes real sympathy for Sam, and Stone's
Ginger is the consummate Bad Girl.  You get a bad taste in your mouth just
watching her and Pesci on screen.  Also watch for a smarmy James Woods as
Ginger's old pimp.  The other saving grace is CASINO's unexpected and
frequent comic relief, which is played up beautifully to ease the film's
tension.
     Scorcese has improved on the flaws of GOODFELLAS, making a cozy
little epic that's worth seeing.  Just remember to bring provisions for
the experience.  You're going to be there for awhile.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for 24 7: Twenty Four Seven (1997)
The first thing that hit me about "TwentyFourSeven" was the starkness of the
black and white film and the bareness of the sets. That combined with the
film's slow pacing and simple plot make the first half of the film feel very
long.
     At the center of "TwentyFourSeven" is Bob Hoskins as Darcy, a
middle-aged man from a relatively rural area in England. Although not an
obvious leader, Darcy finds the motivation within himself to open a boxing
club for the local youth. It is his impression that this club, like the one
he had as a teen, will restore camaraderie and pride to the troubled lads.
     With its simple no-budget look, the film seems to have little going for
it on first glance. The often documentary-type camera movements,
intermittent jump cuts, and sometimes peculiar shooting angles could
contribute to an impression that first time feature film director Shane
Meadows is not quite ready for such a large scale project.       Around the
middle of the film though, we begin to see what Meadows is trying to show
us. His film is not an epic.  It is a character study of a small town and
how one man in that town tries to deal with its problems.
     With little plot to concern him, Meadows prefers to dwell on character
development and how the relationships between Darcy and the lads develop.
The lack of production values, the slow pacing, and the leisurely plot allow
Meadows to dwell exclusively on these relationships without distracting the
audience.
     Ironically, the film's major flaw may be that it spends too much time
chronicling the rise and fall of Hoskins' Darcy, and not enough time letting
us get to know the other characters. The plot is inconsequential. The power
of the movie comes in how it paints for us a scene of a society and a people
we have never met, yet after 100 minutes come to feel intimately familiar
with.
     "TwentyFourSeven" is a strong character picture, and could not have
succeeded without excellent performances by Hoskins, in his most complex
role yet, and a strong supporting cast of relative newcomers led by Danny
Nussbaum as Tim.
     Meadows substitutes passion and energy for his lack of experience in
making this film.  In the end, he gives us a telling view of his own youth.
Director: Shane Meadows
Producer: Imogen West
Writer: Paul Fraser, Shane Meadows
Starring: Bob Hoskins, Danny Nussbaum, James Hooton, Darren O. Campbell
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Me Myself I (1999)
     What is it about foreigners and alternate reality comedy/dramas? 
On the heels of Sliding Doors, Twice Upon a Yesterday, and who knows
what other indies comes Me Myself I, starring Rachel Griffiths in the
dual role of a harried Australian woman and, well, herself.
     On her birthday, Pamela (Griffiths) wakes up to realize that her
life is a mess.  She's not thrilled with her job and eats cereal for
dinner, but more importantly, she doesn't have a man.  In fact, she
turned down a proposal some dozen years earlier, a move she now
regrets.  Surprise! when one day she is hit by a car that is driven by
none other than herself -- an unexplained alternate universe
dweller/magical leprechaun-type-of-person who accepted the
aforementioned proposal to Robert (David Roberts), and with whom she is
happily married.
     Or not so happily, as it turns out.  Single-Pamela soons discovers
numerous infidelities and three rotten kids, because Married-Pamela
quickly abandons her with her erstwhile family in a bid to swap lives. 
Single-Pamela learns the joys of dinner parties, grocery shopping for a
family of five, and potty training.
     I'm told the plot is virtually identical to The Family Man, only
with a chick instead of a dude.  You can take that for what you will,
but I for one and getting a bit tired of gimmicky stories like this. 
Griffiths is as capable as can be expected in her role, but the comedy
of Me Myself I is a bit flat, with only a few moments of ingenious
amusement to take your eyes off the advancing counter on the VCR.
     That said, the film also suffers from a horrendous sound mix, which
has its frequent musical numbers (including an atrocious title song)
blaring at four to five times the volume of the rest of the film.  I
actually had to get up and turn the volume down repeatedly, only to turn
it back up when people started talking again.  Not exactly what you want
from a romantic comedy when you're snuggling with your honey on the
couch.
Web site: http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/memyselfi/index.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
SHINE ON! -- A look at director Scott Hicks' next project - SNOW FALLING
ON CEDARS
An interview by Athan Bezaitis for Filmcritic.com Copyright Athan
Bezaitis 1999
Director Scott Hicks is uncompromising in his approach to filmmaking.
During pre-production for his first feature he insisted that Geoffrey
Rush, at the time a struggling Australian theatre actor, was the only
one who could play the role of pianist David Helfgott.  Hicks would not
be satisfied until he had the right man, and his mulishness proved to be
brilliant insight when SHINE became a resounding hit at the 1996
Sundance Film Festival.  It went on to receive seven Academy Award
nominations including the best actor award for Rush and a nomination for
Hicks as best director.
In the wake of SHINE's dazzling success, Hicks was inundated with
hundreds of screenplays and offers to direct, but nothing caught his
eye.  But he had read David Guterson's incredibly popular novel Snow
Falling On Cedars and felt compelled to tell its fascinating story, but
was disappointed to learn that the rights had already been purchased by
a major studio.  Eventually word got out about Hicks' interest, and when
the screenplay made its way to his home in Australia, he jumped at the
offer.  As both director and devout fan of the book, his vision of SNOW
FALLING CEDARS was to recreate more than just the plot of the deep and
powerful novel.  He wanted the moviegoer's experience to have the same
feel of absorption as actually reading the book.
Faced with the arduous task of adapting such a complex novel into film,
plus having to measure up to all the expectations created by his first
film, Scott Hicks has reached a crossroads in his career.  Will his
second film vault him into elite status among the finest directors, or
will it set him back, raising questions of whether or not he's a `one
hit wonder'?  Hicks confronted these daunting issues and more as I spoke
with him after a private screening.
filmcritic.com: Your debut film SHINE is almost universally loved and
accepted.  It resurrected David Helfgott's career.  It also transformed
you from documentaries to a major player in the world of full-length
feature film.  No matter how good SNOW FALLNG ON CEDARS turns out to be,
do you feel any added pressure for this film to succeed because of your
success with SHINE?
Scott Hicks: Nothing is ever going to be the same again.  SHINE was a
unique experience and very few people are ever lucky to feel that degree
of universal acceptance.  After years of really struggling to get
noticed as a filmmaker, the fact that there is anticipation and
expectation attached to this film is a huge relief.  At least I know
that people are going to pay attention.  Whether or not they'll like it
is the really important part.  What SHINE has done is ignite a career
for me.  It has given me the opportunity to make this film, which is
quite different, and hopefully will be just as successful.
filmcritic.com: What first drew you to David Guterson's novel Snow
Falling on Cedars?
Scott Hicks: Reading the novel was such an awe-inspiring experience for
me because it's so densely detailed and atmospheric.  I felt completely
immersed.  It was like entering another world with layer upon layer of
detail that just accumulates and secretes until you realize that you're
completely embedded.  Within that world you have such powerful
characters and this intense human drama.  It is essentially a love story
that is dashed against the epic events that occur which are out of the
character's control.
filmcritic.com: Because the atmosphere affected you so powerfully, is
that why you took ten months of location scouting and why you heavily
collaborated with author David Guterson to create the right setting?
Scott Hicks: I needed to immerse myself in that world and that
environment.  The locations were extremely important.  Not just for the
vistas but because I wanted it to feel like an authentic island setting,
and it was great to have David as a reality check.  I didn't want to
make some silly blunder with something that would make it appear or feel
artificial.
filmcritic.com: When did Robert Richardson (Director of Photography --
PLATOON, WAG THE DOG, and THE HORSE WHISPERER) become involved in the
project?
Scott Hicks: I knew his work from all sorts off films that I'd seen and
I was a huge admirer of his.  When you're choosing people to work with
it's kind of like casting.  It's something Frank Zappa used to do when
he was auditioning musicians.  You take it for granted that they have
the musical credentials, but you need to know whether or not they're
going to have a sense of humor.  Or whether or not you're going to be
able to get along with them?  So I meet Bob and we just hit it off right
away.  He's a very charismatic character so we really connected.  He got
involved a couple of months before shooting.  We sat down and went
through books of still photography and we shared our ideas of the
graphic design, the shape, and feel for the film.
filmcritic.com: Was there any specific photographer whose pictures you
used in collaboration?
Scott Hicks: Harry Callahan and Robert Frank both had important and
unique details in their photographs that we felt we could use because
they best represented the era of 1950's and the setting, which is a
small fictional island off the coast of Puget Sound.  In designing some
of the sets I would say, "Where's the Callahan moment we can use here?"
filmcritic.com: That amazing opening scene that appears to be shot under
one key light source, just a lantern being held up by a fisherman.  How
did you go about choosing that unique approach?
Scott Hicks: There was a lot of elaborate preparation in creating it
like that and interestingly it was the very first shot of the film,
which is quite rare.  We decided that it was a great way to suck the
audience in. That's the whole idea about wanting to immerse people.
Just like in the book.  The introduction allowed me to set the overall
tone that the movie is more about atmosphere than it is about plot.
This is not a whodunit.  The details of the trial and whose blood was on
the railing of the boat is not the point.  It's more about what is
happening between these people and how it will be resolved.  Which is
why I took the attitude that this is not a courtroom drama.  The
courtroom is simply a crucible within which, everyone is confronting his
or her memory.  That's why the film is constructed as an attempt to
simulate how one's mind works.  It constantly flashes from one thought
to the next, which is a more humanistic way of thinking for it allows us
to ponder the future, dwell in the past, or even contemplate a dream
world.
filmcritic.com: When did that structure of having the movie revolve
around memory and flashbacks come about?  Was that the plan from the
start or did it come about gradually?
Scott Hicks: What I didn't want to do was have this dry formulaic flick
where you have three stories in which you did a little bit of one and
then a bit of another.  With such a conventional approach you can lose
people, as they tend to prefer one specific part of the story.  I
decided that we had to shatter it.  When we were editing I got myself an
editor (Hank Corwin -- JFK, NIXON, and NATURAL BORN KILLERS) that was
well equipped to do it and he worked through all the material with me.
We started from the way it was scripted and shot and then we pushed it
to the limit.  I took some bold decisions with the cinematographer and
bold decisions with the editor and composer.  My attitude was, "Let's go
for it!"
filmcritic.com: SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS has quite an eclectic cast from
Sam Shepard to Max Von Sydow, who really stands out in his role as
defense attorney.  Could you explain a little more about your casting
process and how you went about getting such a wide variety of actors for
this movie?
Scott Hicks: That's such a huge part of my job.  First comes casting and
second I need to assure that the whole ensemble is acting in the same
movie! Everybody brings their own methods to the game and unless you're
very careful you'll find that they're off on wild tangents from each
other.  One of the delights with the success of SHINE was that actors
saw me as a director that would pay them a lot of attention because in
Hollywood the performer is often the last person to get any
consideration in formulating the film.
filmcritic.com: You seem to have the virtue of being able to communicate
your work so well with actors.  What kind of preparation do you do with
these actors to coax such impressive performances out of them?
Scott Hicks: A lot of it goes back to casting.  You bring an actor into
the whole process based upon what they are capable of doing and then you
develop an individual relationship with him or her.  Part of my strategy
is that I don't like to rehearse a great deal.  I like to talk through
everything with the actor.  I want to essentially learn from them a
sense of what they want to do.  It's a very delicate balance and you
have to carefully gauge when to interfere and when to stay the hell out
of it and let the carpet unfold.  I'm very much in tune with my actors.
>From elderly actors to children the most important part is to get what
you want out of them and the most successful medium usually arrives when
we both are happy.
filmcritic.com: You got a great performance from Max Von Sydow.  His
role seems to be the one that radiates most throughout the film.  How
did you approach working with him?
Scott Hicks: Max wrote me a beautiful letter after the film was
finished, which I now treasure.  When I was working with him he asked
me, "How do you get things so quiet on the set?"  Because I tend to talk
very quietly and I told my assistant that I wanted no radios, cell
phones, or megaphones.  Everybody had to be quiet because I wanted to
create an atmosphere that just lets the actors do what it is they had to
do. Normally there's a hubbub of activity leading up to every scene and
then suddenly there's silence and "action!"  All at once the actor is
forced to get out of the gate and do their thing.  I like them to feel
that there's a certain quiet atmosphere in which they can think without
distractions.  That's pretty much what I did for Max.  I created an
environment so that he could best do what he's equipped to do.  I mean
here's an actor supreme and all I did was help with subtle nuances and
made tiny suggestions.  His letter just thanked me for making the role
so perfectly suited for his strengths.
filmcritic.com: Since you've done a lot of documentary films in the
past, has that made an impact on your overall approach to narrative
film?
Scott Hicks: It's had a lot of impact.  It's made me much more confident
in relying on my instincts in capturing what I've set in motion.  You
have to create the scenario.  It really started with Geofferey Rush on
SHINE although there's no improvisation in Geoffrey's performance, every
syllable that he utters is in the script is written on the page, but the
challenge for me was to help him find the identity of the character,
create the situation, and let him go.  We would then film it as though
it was never going to happen again.  Now that's like documentary where
you don't get a second chance.  You've got to catch it and you've got to
look for the detail that you're going to piece together to tell that
story.  You can't just set a camera there and let everybody just parade
in front of it and hope that the audience is going to make sense of it.
You're still telling a story.  Everything from those "Callahan moments"
to the color of a woman's lips, to the shaking of Max Von Sydow's hands
is relevant.
filmcritic.com: Going back to when you first read the novel.  As a
filmmaker, do you envision certain actors like Ethan Hawke or Sam
Shepard in your mind as you read the story?
Scott Hicks: Not when I first started reading the book but when I got
the screenplay and began working on the script certain faces started to
come into my mind and Sam Shepard was one of those characters that could
portray Ishmael's (Ethan Hawke) father.  He's very selective in the
roles that he chooses.  He's only made eight movies in his whole career
and his film credits are staggering.  I thought that there wasn't a
chance in hell that he'd want to do this movie with me, but when I asked
he was thrilled.
filmcritic.com: This novel was so popular.  Obviously adapting novels is
not easy, but some of the greatest films ever have been adaptations from
books like LOLITA and PATH OF GLORY.  Was it a difficult adaptation
because of the complexity of the book and do you think its readers will
be happy with the movie?
Scott Hicks: I was determined that I would not betray the reader.  That
doesn't mean that I was going to be slavishly faithful to the novelist
but I felt that this book was not about plot rather than atmosphere and
emotion.  Those were the essential ingredients that I want to keep in
the same faith with the novel and where a lot of adaptations stumble is
how they boil the novel down to just the plot line and only try and tell
element of the story.  In that case, a plot is often feeble and
evaporates right in front of your eyes.  It doesn't resemble the
experience of reading the book so I wanted SNOW FALLING ON CEDARS to be
a cinematic version of reading the book.  The film is a total immersion
of sight and sound where it's all coming at you at once until that
climactic point when you see the whole fragmented film pieced together.
The greatest test for me was asking the author David Guterson himself.
When I first showed it to him I was nervous with trepidation and when he
saw it, he embraced me and said, `There's not one thing about that film
that could have been better.'  I was ecstatic.
filmcritic.com: You almost didn't become a filmmaker until you met some
longhaired philosopher who changed your life.  What was that all about?
Scott Hicks: I was going to study law at Adelaide University in
Australia and was all signed up.  I'd been enrolled and accepted and
then I went to go see a musical `VietRock" and at the end of it they
said there would be a discussion that would be chaired by a philosophy
professor from a new university that had been established a few years
earlier.  I thought it would be some boring old fart that would just
talk my ears off when all of the sudden this guy came down the aisle in
his mid fifties with long hair and denims and I thought he looked pretty
cool.  Strangely enough, he looks sort of like I do now.  I decided to
stay and watch him speak and afterwards went to visit the university.  I
found it extremely interesting and decided to enroll there but I wanted
to do English and History.  They said I couldn't mix disciplines with
major subjects so I had to choose something else.  So I decided to do
English and a much easier subject in drama, which would act as adjunct
to English.  It ended up changing my life.

Title
Review for Animal Factory (2000)
        After seeing Steve Buscemi's sophomore directorial effort, The Animal
Factory (following 1996's Trees Lounge), I nearly reconsidered choosing
film criticism as a career path.  For the first hour of this film, it
seemed the way to go was to become a convict.  (By the way, ma, they
don't call 'em inmates in the pen, they call 'em convicts.)
        Puffy faced Edward Furlong plays young Ron Decker, a new convict in the
pen.  He's small, skinny and smart -- an ideal candidate to become some
solid's girlfriend.  Fortunately, he is befriended by Earl Koper (Willem
Dafoe, sporting a clean, bald head) and his gang of old-timers.  This
more or less prevents the kid from getting raped, though Earl admits
that he wouldn't have bothered if the kid was ugly.
        Prison life seems pretty swell at first.  There are no women, but the
men all pat each other on the back, are loyal to their friends and call
each other "brother."  They get three squares a day and if they've been
inside long enough, the guards give them freebies like steak dinners,
extra packs of cigarettes, or porno magazines.  Life isn't so bad on the
inside as long as you got friends.
        I was all set to phone up my boss at filmcritic.com and hand in my
resignation when Tom Arnold showed up on the scene as a hillbilly
scumbag whose first act of malice is to suck on his own finger and shove
it up Furlong's bum.  Suddenly, prison life didn't sound so lovely
anymore.  This is before the razor action in a later sequence where one
of our main characters gets sliced up pretty good.  Violence can spring
up at any time in the joint.
        This adaptation of Edward Bunker's novel knows the prison lingo
backwards and forwards.  Bunker was in prison himself, and it shows. 
(He's now a fine, hard-boiled novelist and played Mr. Blue in Reservoir
Dogs, opposite Steve Buscemi.)  The grimy cellblocks and hallways,
filthy mattresses, and lousy food all seem to have been well researched
here, present and correct.  Buscemi fills his film with paranoia, often
inserting shots of convicts looking over their shoulder or shifting
their eyes.
        Buscemi the filmmaker trips up by turning the prison playground into a
showcase for his actors.  Dafoe and Furlong are excellent in the lead
roles, thinking their way through each scene.  Thing is, they're
surrounded by people who are sinking their teeth into their roles (and
scenery) so much that each scene plays like a vaudeville number.
        The spotlight is on Mickey Rourke as a mealy-mouthed drag queen, then
on Tom Arnold's aforementioned renegade hick, then on Seymour Cassel's
"guard who's seen it all" character.  Instead of blending into a fine
ensemble, each actor's shining presence only serves to remind us that
this is only a movie.  We're not in a jailhouse; we're in a talent show
for the best and brightest in the "Intense Character Actor" category.
        It's entertaining, sure, but it destroys the authenticity.  Suddenly, I
realize I'm not really in a prison.  I'm in an independent film directed
by Steve Buscemi.
        As though driving the nails into his own coffin, Buscemi even steals
the 360-degree pan from Reservoir Dogs in one shot.  Tarantino's film
was filled with pop cultural references, reminding us that we were
watching a movie, and it worked in that context.  But Buscemi, instead
of going for cinema verite realism, throws in this flashy camera move. 
It's pretty tactless, here.
        These blunders don't kill the movie.  The relationship between Dafoe
and Furlong is touching, drifting through a no man's land between being
father/son or lovers without sexual congress.  Dafoe schools the kid on
the prison ropes.  Furlong keeps his eyes and ears open.  While I found
it hard to believe that a boy as pretty as Eddie Furlong wouldn't wind
up as someone's dinner, I struggled to suspend my disbelief because
there are some fine, subtle glances between these guys that resemble
love.  I'm a sucker for romance, even in prison.
        This key plot point treads on the verge of sentimentality, but the
grand finale lapses into the familiar terrain of Prison Movie 101.  Of
course we have the obligatory "let's get out of prison" bit.  Buscemi
and Bunker (whose novel is terrific, by the way -- much grittier than
the film) blow their opportunity to leave well enough alone.
        The Animal Factory is rarely boring, though.  For all my qualms about
Buscemi's directorial flourishes and self-conscious moments for the
actors, he's made a movie that at least cares about developing those
characters within their environment.  At least it observes these people
in their daily routine, takes it's time to let us get to know Earl, Ron
and all the rest.  It's not as raw as it would like to be, but it's sure
got character.
Director: Steve Buscemi
Producer: Steve Buscemi, Elie Samaha, Andrew Stevens
Writer: Edward Bunker, John Steppling
Starring: Willem Dafoe, Edward Furlong, Seymour Cassel, Mickey Rourke,
Steve Buscemi, Tom Arnold, John Heard, Edward Bunker
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Belle de jour (1967)
     Martin Scorcese has done us all a great service by reviving the
little-seen classic, BELLE DE JOUR, Luis Bunuel's darkly comic and
disturbing 1967 tale of Siverine (Catherine Deneuve), a woman who lives
a double life.  By evening she is the steadfast, almost-frigid wife of
a famed French doctor (Jean Sorel).  By day, she is "Belle de
Jour"--her new "stage name" at an exclusive Parisian brothel.
     Bunuel weaves masterfully through scenes of Siverine's hum-drum
existence with her cold husband, her surreal day job as a wanton
prostitute, flashbacks to her childhood, and bizarre daydreams of her
humiliation, bondage, rape, and torture.  Deneuve is exquisite, playing
one of the most difficult roles imaginable with her characteristic
grace.  I find it incredible that this film has gone unnoticed for so
long.
     At the heart of BELLE is the question of how our selfish actions
affect those around us.  While Siverine's infidelity first seems
incomprehensible, it soon becomes a vital part of her being and,
eventually, degenerates into an inevitable nightmare which brings her
world crashing down.
     The sheer force that builds up behind the film's first scene had
me thunderstruck for its entire 100 minutes.  Deeply compelling, while
remaining tasteful and never approaching pornographic, the film is an
eerie exposi of the haunting desires that lie within us all.  You truly
have to see it for yourself.
     The only problems with the film were some poor post-production
values.  First was the difficulty of a scratchy print with some skipped
frames, especially noticeable during the imagery-filled daydream
sequences.  More troubling were the incomplete subtitles, which often
left out seemingly important snippets of dialogue.  Maybe they weren't
important after all, but it was enough to break the fragile mood.
     Regardless, BELLE DE JOUR tells a story that desperately needs to
be heard and which is even more relevant today than when it was made 28
years ago.  A true classic worthy of its highest praises, I urge you to
see it.
-Christopher Null / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
A note to filmmakers who want to make a movie about a war:  Please
understand that your film does not need to be as long as the actual war
itself.  We will not hold it against you if it's shorter.  As such, I
will try to keep this review to a length where you can read it in a few
minutes.
The Patriot gives Mel Gibson the opportunity to do something he's never
done before:  To orate at length about the evils of taxation without
representation... oh, okay... and to kill a bunch of damn redcoats!!!
Faced with the death of his wife, The Patriot offers us Gibson the
widower pacifist, playing the part of South Carolina colonialist
Benjamin Martin, unswayed by arguments that war should be initiated
against Britain.  When his son Gabriel (Heath Ledger) enlists despite
his father's forbiddance, Martin is left at home to raise his other six
kids while the war rages around him.
Circumstances arise to take the life of one of the children at the hands
of the uber-evil redcoat Colonel Tavington (Jason Isaacs), which awakens
the repressed blood lust in the former soldier Martin.  Perhaps one of
the best battle scenes ever filmed follows, with Martin and two of his
kids picking off 20 redcoats in the forest, leaving Martin covered in
gore.
The Patriot soon becomes the epic it was intended to be, with grand
colonial battles fought by lines of soldiers politely shooting at one
another until one side is dead.  But Martin (an amalgam of several real
Revolutionaries) brings dirty guerilla tactics to the war, and after
forming a militia of scrappy mercenaries, soon he's got General
Cornwallis (Tom Wilkinson) running scared.
While The Patriot will draw obvious comparisons to Braveheart, it is
actually far more reminiscent of Kevin Costner's Robin Hood sprinkled
with a bit of The Last of the Mohicans.  Martin lives in the woods and
attacks the Brits in small groups, absconding with their booty.  There's
even a holy man (Rene Auberjonois) and a foreigner (Tchéky Karyo, in a
great supporting turn as a French sympathizer) who fight alongside the
rebels.
This turns out to be a good thing, because God knows we don't need
another Braveheart.  The Patriot also turns out to be a message movie,
filled with issues regarding honor vs. survival, vengeance vs.
forgiveness, negotiation vs. war, and glory vs. sacrifice.  This isn't
just some ordinary war movie.  It's deep, with John Williams' score
driving the heart-tugging home and Roland Emmerich's direction not
getting in the way.  And I say all that in a rare moment of non-sarcasm.
Unfortunately, at close to three hours in length, The Patriot has plenty
of time to get hokey.  The bad guy is drawn as broadly as a Bond
villain, and a gaggle of subplots don't add much to the film, just
making it unnecessarily longer.  The anti-slavery motif is especially
hokey and unneeded.
But, as usual, I quibble.  The Patriot, against all expectations, is
probably the best movie I've seen this summer to date.  And where else
can a German director and an Australian star put together a movie about
the Revolutionary War.  Ah, only in America.
Director: Roland Emmerich
Producer: Dean Devlin
Writer: Robert Rodat
Starring: Mel Gibson, Heath Ledger, Joely Richardson, Jason Isaacs,
Chris Cooper, Tchéky Karyo, Rene Auberjonois, Lisa Brenner, Tom
Wilkinson, Donal Logue
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for George Washington (2000)
     What astonishes is not that George Washington is a good film, it's
that the movie can tell such a powerful and complicated story in just 89
minutes.  Its length is a telling reminder that length does not equal
gravity.  In fact, thinking over the last year or so of 2 1/2-hour-plus
epics that never got around to saying much of anything, I'm inclined to
believe that the opposite is true.
     Recalling Days of Heaven and Sling Blade, George Washington takes
us on a tour of the Deep South, centering on a preteen African-American
named George (Richardson, not Washington -- played by Donald Holden), a
boy whose skull bones have never fully developed.  With his soft head,
he wears a helmet wherever he goes and isn't allowed to go swimming, as
the water would in some way soak into his brain, causing extreme pain.
     George and his friends live the idle lives of teens on a
near-permanent summer vacation, goofing off in the woods, breaking into
abandoned buildings, stealing cars, and what have you.  One day, the
adventures get a little rough, and one of the children end up dead. 
Without really thinking about it, George and his friends simply cover it
up, staging an accident and leaving the body to rot where it won't be
found.  And they go on with their lives.
     But something changes within George, and he slowly begins assuming
the role of a superhero.  After risking his own life to save a drowning
boy, he eventually dons a cape and dog-skin cap to direct traffic
through his Podunk town.  George's life gets ever more mysterious, and
still the film's title is not explained.
     It's a slow burn and harrowing ride through what would otherwise be
a standard coming of age flick.  Partly scripted and partly improvised
following David Gordon Green's amazing direction (this is his first
film), the junkyard panoramas and organ music that punctuate the movie
belie a sophistication you wouldn't otherwise expect from a movie like
this.  George Washington will not be a film for all tastes (and a
cryptic, pedestrian title won't have 'em rushing to the theaters), but
the film is simply so urgent it's hard to ignore.  Worth looking around
for.
Director: David Gordon Green
Producer: David Gordon Green, Sacha W. Mueller, Lisa Muskat
Writer: David Gordon Green
Starring: Candace Evanofski, Donald Holden, Curtis Cotton III, Eddie
Rouse, Paul Schneider, Damian Jewan Lee, Rachael Handy, Jonathan
Davidson, Janet Taylor
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Something to Talk About (1995)
     This is one of those reviews that's going to garner plenty of
nasty mail from disgruntled readers, but I feel it's my obligation to
let *you* know exactly what you're getting into with SOMETHING TO TALK
ABOUT.
     If you are a female, preferably married, preferably Southern,
preferably jilted by your husband, and preferably interested in horses,
you'll love this film.  If not, you're screwed.  SOMETHING TO TALK
ABOUT is the story of a married, Southern, jilted female, Grace (Julia
Roberts), who works for her father (Robert Duvall) at his
horse-breeding ranch.  When she finds husband Eddie (Dennis Quaid) with
another woman, she dumps him like week-old halibut and heads off into
the land of reckless self-indulgence, revenge, and wacky hijinks with
her dysfunctional family.
     Well, it ain't quite that simple.  I was expecting a romantic
comedy, judging from the marketing campaign.  Unfortunately, this is
*not* a humor-filled film.  It's a drama with some funny bits tacked
on.  Although Kyra Sedgwick (as Grace's sister Emma Rae) is the only
comic relief and a God-sent saving grace to the picture, SOMETHING TO
TALK ABOUT does exactly what its title says:  talk ... at length ...
for what feels like hours ... mainly about what scum the men in the
female characters' lives are.
     SOMETHING TO TALK ABOUT soon becomes the movie that will not die,
which I started praying for after the first half hour.  Absolutely
nothing interesting happens to these characters.  They are almost
universally unlikable and underdeveloped--which is difficult to pull
off, considering the sheer mass of personal interactions in the
picture.  Everyone just moans a lot along the lines of "Whatever
happened to what we used to have?" and "How could you do this to me?"
The whole film comes off as a sad experiment in marketing--to see how
many women the movie could pack in the theater.  Sadly, it's a lot.
Let me tell you:  a knee to the crotch goes a long way for this crowd.
     And when it's finally over ... just when you think they aren't
going to slap on a Hollywood Ending and make a nice statement ...
*wrong!*  SOMETHING TO TALK ABOUT sells out like tickets to a Streisand
concert.  I left the theater depressed.
     SOMETHING TO TALK ABOUT is an especially painful letdown,
considering its cast and creators.  Director Lasse Hallstrom (MY LIFE
AS A DOG, WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE?) and screenwriter Callie Khouri
(THELMA AND LOUISE) have really taken a wrong turn here.  It looks like
everyone had the best of intentions, but the results were less than
stellar.
     Gentlemen reading these words, just remember to say this to your
girlfriend or wife after she drags you to the film:  "I thought it was
good!"  It'll be a lot less painful that way.  I promise.

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
Finally.  We always knew Robert Rodriguez had talent as a filmmaker.  We
were just waiting for someone to put a good script in his hands, and
Kevin Williamson has done that here.  Do not be fooled by the woefully
bad trailers, or by the fact that critics have roundly panned this
horror film.  THE FACULTY is easily the best of the genre to come along
since Williamson's breakout hit, SCREAM.  It is also the first watchable
film Rodriguez has put up since storming onto the scene with EL
MARIACHI.
Easily the biggest problem with this movie is in the marketing.  I can
only imagine how pissed off Williamson, Rodriguez, and everyone else
involved in the movie must have been to see the film marketed as just
another schlocky entry into the horror genre, which generally takes the
words aliens; teenagers; battle; suspicious; killer; small town; etc.
and jumble them up to come up with a concept (to wit, this time: 
suspicious small town teenagers battle killer aliens).  Now if you are
already a big 80's horror fan, just skip this review, because you
already saw the movie, but this review is for people who are highly
suspicious of shelling out eight bucks to see a horror flick.  The only
reason I actually saw THE FACULTY was because my little sister begged me
to.  But now I'm trying to convince you to.
Actually, THE FACULTY is just as witty as SCREAM, slightly less
original, but makes up with it by acknowledging its status as
essentially an update of Donald Siegel's 1956 classic INVASION OF THE
BODY SNATCHERS, one of the most frightening movies ever made, before
Hollywood began trying to make you jump in your seat rather than truly
fear the end of the world.  Granted, with Robert Rodriguez and his
frenetic camera involved, this update heightens the sense of urgency and
makes you hop up a time or two.  But, unlike his substance-lite
stylizations in DESPERADO and FROM DUSK TILL DAWN, Rodriguez manages to
hold onto the wit and character of Williamson's script and fashion a
film that not only gets your heart racing, but also manages enough
intelligence to force you to suspend your disbelief.
To top it all off, THE FACULTY throws in some good BREAKFAST CLUB social
commentary about high school social hierarchy, and examines the lasting
effects of a surreal experience on such an ingrained social order. 
Granted, THE FACULTY's not SCHINDLER'S LIST, but if you give it a chance
it will make you think a little bit.  Which is a good thing.
Director: Robert Rodriguez
Producer: Elizabeth Avellan, Robert Rodriguez
Writer: Kevin Williamson
Starring: Elijah Wood, Jordana Brewster, Josh Hartnett, Shawn Hatosy,
Jon Stewart
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - Writer and Script Consultant
Check out The Movie Emporium's new design at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Sister My Sister (1994)
     Now it's getting ridiculous.  This is the *third*
two-women-kill-an-old-lady movie in the last year.  While the first
two, HEAVENLY CREATURES and FUN, were both spectacular pictures, SISTER
MY SISTER is an unfortunate embarrassment.
     The aforementioned two women are Christine (Joely Richardson) and
Lea (Jodhi May), close-knit, questionably sane sisters employed as
maids for the domineering Madame Danzard (Julie Walters).  The girls
slave for low wages, and what they do earn is inevitably taken by their
greedy mother.  The theme of "All they have is each other" is truly
beaten over your head in no uncertain terms.  When things start to get
bad, the maids turn to the film's other theme for solace:  "There's no
problem a little incest can't cure."  When things get their worst, only
wholesale slaughter will do.
     The film claims to be "based on actual events" in 1932 France.
This may be true, but writer Wendy Kesselman (who somehow also wrote a
stage play for this) could have spiced things up a little bit,
especially considering the subject matter.  Instead, we're presented a
lifeless melodrama with as much fanfare as a week-old fish.  The cast
does a great job with what there is, unfortunately resulting in good
acting that is just terribly boring.  Director Nancy Meckler provides a
few nice touches, but not nearly enough to save the film from wallowing
in its pretense.
     Like most period pieces, the filmmakers obviously felt very
strongly about getting SISTER MY SISTER made without corrupting the
integrity of the story and the picture.  And like most period pieces,
this was accomplished only through a total disregard for the audience.
It's a surprising example of what not to do.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for To Die for (1995)
     Gus Van Sant's new, much-hyped farce/thriller is finally here, and
with it arrives the director's best feature and Nicole Kidman's
strongest performance.  TO DIE FOR, the tale of Suzanne Stone (Kidman),
a sexy newswoman wannabe who'll do *anything* to get on television, is
entertaining and funny, but pulls its punches by never taking the farce
of its story far enough.
     Told in half-flashback, half-mockumentary style, the film traces
the events leading up to the murder of the Suzanne's husband, Larry
(Matt Dillon).  We see Suzanne trying to get ahead in the media world,
carving out a career for herself at a low budget cable station.  We
also see large stretches of Suzanne creating a meaningless documentary
about modern teenagers, wherein three kids (including drugged-out
zombie Jimmy, played by an unwatchable Joaquin Phoenix) are interviewed
ad nauseam.  All the while, key relatives try to get to the bottom of
the mystery: who killed Larry, and why?
     Unfortunately, the answer to that question is almost painfully
obvious from the movie's first frame.  As far as the term "thriller" is
concerned, TO DIE FOR is completely off base.  On a comic level,
though, the film is worthwhile.  Buck Henry's smart script and ear for
humor is responsible for this, creating a "nice" story that usually
amuses and overcomes the one-dimensional drama.
     In the end, I was hoping for a whole lot more, given all the buzz
around the film.  With a farce like this, you really have to take the
lunacy almost to absurdity, but Suzanne never even gets out of Little
Hope (get it?), New Hampshire.  Where is Suzanne in Hollywood?  Where
is The Trial of the Century?  Well, I guess those scenes were cut out
in earlier drafts....  The result is a less than satisfying ending that
left me saying, "That's it?"
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
     Sorry, Mr. Lynch, your place at the head of the avant-garde
experimental filmmaker table has been given away.  Messrs. Jarmusch,
Toback, Korine, and Cronenberg, you'll all be eating outside.  Mike
Figgis will be taking over for all of you, and don't come back.
     Figgis, who earned a Best Director Oscar nomination for Leaving Las
Vegas in 1996, appears to have gone a little funny in the head last year
with his inexplicable and nearly dialogue-free The Loss of Sexual
Innocence.  Now he's fully gone off the deep end with what may be the
most ambitious experiment ever: Time Code.
     Now pay attention: Shooting on digital media (and thus avoiding the
limitations of holding 10 minutes of film in a cartridge - the problem
that haunted Hitchcock's Rope), Figgis took four digital cameras,
started them rolling at 3:00 in the afternoon on a November day in 1999,
scripted out a few basic plot points, and let a cast of 20 or 30 actors
do their thing for 90 minutes.  The four cameras follow around various
characters as they improvise their way through an earthquake-torn day in
Hollywood's snooty and provincial movie studio scene, often crossing
paths, and invariably creating heartbreak.  Usually lesbian heartbreak.
     The catch is that the footage from all four cameras is all
displayed at the same time: in four panes on the screen in front of
you.  Watching one Time Code is challenging enough.  Watching four is
serious work.  The reprieve from this catch is that the sound is
typically limited to one pane at a time -- and it's usually the one
where Figgis wants you to look.  As the story unfolds all around town,
the drama shifts from pane to pane so that it's relatively easy to
follow the intersecting tales.
     If Time Code weren't so unique it would be awfully easy to dismiss
the movie for its pretentiousness alone.  At one point near the end of
the film, a Euro filmmaker pitches an assembled cast of movie producers
and executives the very premise of the movie we're watching -- which is
then dismissed as being a pretentious joke!  As if acknowledging the
silliness up front somehow makes it less silly.  Figgis even plans to
attend select screenings and mix the soundtrack -- live -- for the
audience like a DJ.  Oh-kaayyyyyy....
     Despite its quirks, Time Code is actually mostly enjoyable, and you
quickly get used to the gimmick of the four panes.  The acting is good,
especially for improv work under duress, and the story is about what
you'd expect.  While I'm quite sure I'll soon be ready for good-old
single-pane films, I'm certain Time Code is something that will stick
with me for awhile.
Director: Mike Figgis
Producer: Annie Stewart
Writer: Mike Figgis
Starring: Saffron Burrows, Salma Hayek, Stellan Skarsgĺrd, Jeanne
Tripplehorn, Xander Berkeley, Golden Brooks, Viveka Davis, Richard
Edson, Aimee Graham, Andrew Heckler, Holly Houston, Holly Hunter, Danny
Huston, Juji Johnson, Daphna Kastner, Patrick Kearney, Elizabeth Low,
Kyle MacLachlan, Mía Maestro, Leslie Mann, Laurie Metcalf, Suzy
Nakamura, Alessandro Nivola, Zuleikha Robinson, Julian Sands, Steven
Weber
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/jump/f_timecode.html
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Up Close & Personal (1996)
     If nothing else, UP CLOSE AND PERSONAL will remind you just how
hideous the hairstyles of the 1980's were, especially among media
personalities.  Fortunately, the film accomplishes a lot more than that,
giving us a nice romance that isn't harmed too much by its attempts at
melodrama.
     UP CLOSE AND PERSONAL tells the loosely-based-on-reality story of
Sally (who becomes Tally) Atwater (Michelle Pfeiffer), a vain upstart girl
from Reno who wants to make it big in television.  Robert Redford costars
as Warren Justice, a Miami news director who gives her her big break and
takes her under his wing.  Under his influence, Tally is transformed from
brash loudmouth to The Next Big Thing, and of course, the two fall madly
in love along the way.
     With a smart script enhanced by some excellent comic relief, Pfeiffer
and Redford work together with a good chemistry.  And while there are a
few substantial plot gaps as the film tries to do too much in too little
time, the exciting climax set in the midst a prison riot makes up for any
holes in the movie's continuity.
     Still, this isn't NETWORK, and at times UP CLOSE AND PERSONAL really
can't decide between being romantic comedy or a tough drama.  This
unfortunately creates some unevenness and a couple of false endings with a
tacked-on tearjerker finale.  The supporting cast is also uniformly bland,
with Joe Mantegna's talents totally wasted and both Kate Nelligan and
Stockard Channing looking very scary and beyond over-the-top as cutthroat
"I'm so tough I eat men for breakfast" newswomen.
     But there I go, nitpicking again.  Altogether, UP CLOSE AND PERSONAL
mostly works and only occasionally doesn't.  It will certainly be
successful as a pleasant spring romance flick with broad appeal, but most
importantly, it's a whole lot of fun.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Fathers' Day (1997)
     What are the odds that the two would-be fathers of one woman's son
would be two of the biggest comedians of the screen today!?  Well,
they're pretty good if you see FATHERS' DAY, yet another Ivan Reitman
(BEETHOVEN, TWINS, KINDERGARTEN COP, et. al.) film that is so
disgustingly sweet you'll want to spit out your jujubes.  Billy Crystal
and Robin Williams play the titular fathers, out to rescue the missing
son they never knew they had.  (Plot Simplified: Nastassja Kinski was a
stonkingly huge slut and doesn't know who daddy is.)
     For all its saccharine heavy-handedness, FATHERS' DAY does manage
to come across as one of Reitman's better efforts in recent years, but
the by-the-Hollywood-book formula, structure, and pacing really bog down
the production.  There's plenty of missed comic opportunities, but
plenty that hit dead-on -- especially a notable, heavily-pierced cameo
(watch for it!).  And yes, the estranged son looks exactly like me.  A
1/4 star bonus for that.
     And yes, I'm sick of *writing* mediocre reviews, too.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Heat (1995)
     I hate to condone the making of 3-hour long movies, but HEAT is one
in which you're not going to fall asleep.  Comparisons to CASINO are going
to be inevitable, with both hitting the 180-minute mark and starring
Robert DeNiro as a crook, but unlike that film, HEAT manages to keep the
interest level high throughout the whole picture.
     HEAT is the instantly gripping tale of a large-scale heist leader and
die-hard loner named Neil McCauley (DeNiro).  As the film opens, he and
his team of brutal, precision thieves (including Val Kilmer and Tom
Sizemore) knock over (literally) an armored car for a stash of bearer
bonds.  On the case is Detective Vincent Hanna (Al Pacino), a troubled,
angst-ridden veteran of the LAPD.  Over the course of the film, McCauley
and Hanna develop a strange sort of kinship, even as McCauley's crimes
increasingly raise the stakes and Hanna's efforts to stop him become more
and more desperate.
     The action builds up for a solid two hours until a nearly
catastrophic "final" bank robbery results in one of the most vivid
shoot-outs ever filmed.  Writer/director Michael Mann (best known for his
work on "Miami Vice") paces the movie well, and he really puts the
audience through the ringer by getting the adrenaline pumping like an oil
well.
     But why is this film 3 hours long, you ask?  The answer lies in
Mann's multidimensional examinations of all the major characters, their
wives, their children, and any other love interests who happen along. 
Thus over the course of the picture, we discover Hanna is in his third
marriage and his wife's ex-husband is a deadbeat.  We learn at length
about McCauley's personal code:  to have nothing in his life he can't walk
away from in 30 seconds flat if "the heat" is coming.  And when the heat
does come, we see how it affects everyone...in depth.  While these
relationship subplots are mildly interesting, they seem completely out of
place in the movie and, in the end, weigh the film down.
     This aside, strong performances by the principals and some excellent
bit parts by players like Hank Azaria, Tom Noonan, Natalie Portman, and
Jon Voight make HEAT a truly memorable film.  Somewhat more difficult to
figure out is Pacino, who takes his over-the-top, in-your-face screen
presence to new heights, becoming almost cartoonish in his archetypal
portrayal of the insanely driven cop.  Altogether, the cast lends a lot of
credibility to what would otherwise be another run-of-the-mill crime
movie.  And while the sometimes hard-to-follow script often demands too
much of the viewer, this film is one that's truly worth seeing.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
     Neil LaBute, best known for his ultra-dark comedies In the Company
of Men and Your Friends and Neighbors, breaks from his traditional mold
and lightens up a tad with Nurse Betty, which -- again -- isn't going to
win any awards for sensitivity.
     For the first time, LaBute is not directing from his own script,
which might explain why, if I didn't know better, I would have sworn I
was watching a Coen brothers movie.  Who else would put a fantasy
dancing sequence on the edge of the Grand Canyon at night?
     The new Neil LaBute, that's who.  But lest you think you're getting
a kinder, gentler Neil, rest assured that Nurse Betty is really quite
gruesome in its depiction of the human soul as essentially empty. 
There's even a scalping thrown in for good measure.
     Nurse Betty, played by Renée Zellweger, is actually a small-town
Kansas waitress trapped in a loveless marriage to the local car dealer
(Aaron Eckhart).  Betty has one passion in life: The soap opera A Reason
to Love, starring George McCord (Greg Kinnear) as famous heart surgeon
Dr. David Ravell.  When Betty's husband gets mixed up in a drug deal
gone wrong, Betty witnesses his gruesome demise and mentally breaks
down.  Poof!  She's convinced David Ravell is a real person, and she is
his long-lost love.
     If this sounds like a premise from a sitcom, that's because it is
-- Brooke Shields played the Betty role against Matt LeBlanc's soap doc
in a recent episode of Friends.  But the similarities end there.  Nurse
Betty quickly becomes an epic farce, with Betty (now convinced she is a
nurse) trekking to L.A. in one of her husband's Buicks... and little
does she know there's a load of heroin in the trunk.
     Undoubtedly the best part of the film is the team of Morgan Freeman
and Chris Rock playing a father-son hit squad out to recover the drugs. 
Freeman plays the straight man to Rock's acerbic son who wants nothing
more than to get their cross-country road trip in search of Betty over
with.  All the while, Freeman owns his scenes by trying to play Columbo
and read Betty's mind while staring at a photograph of her.  These guys
are simply unstoppable when they're on the screen.
     So is Miss Zellweger, after this and My, Myself & Irene, going to
make a living out of playing half-deranged nuts?  With Bridget Jones'
Diary in the works, it certainly looks like it.  Zellweger is in fine
form here, even if Freeman and Rock steal the show.
     Nurse Betty isn't LaBute's masterpiece, but it's definitely a
solid, funny, and unique film, the likes of which you won't see again
this year.  If your tastes run to the truly eccentric, this should tide
you over until the real Coen brothers movie, O Brother, Where Art Thou?,
comes out later this year.
Director: Neil LaBute
Producer: Steve Golin, Gail Mutrux
Writer: John C. Richards, James Flamberg
Starring: Renée Zellweger, Morgan Freeman, Chris Rock, Greg Kinnear,
Aaron Eckhart, Tia Texada, Crispin Glover, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Allison
Janney
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Toy Story (1995)
     The wizards at Pixar and Disney have created a film that is unlikely
to be forgotten in the next few years.  TOY STORY, the first completely
computer-animated movie ever, is fresh and funny, and it takes the state
of animation to a heretofore undreamed-of level.
     Sheriff Woody (Tom Hanks) is the leader of a group of toys who come
alive when no one is watching.  Owned by young Andy (John Morris), they
find new toy Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen) thrown into the mix, and when
Woody's insecurity causes him to try almost anything to get Buzz out of
the picture, he almost succeeds with catastrophic effects.  Soon, both
Woody and Buzz find themselves captives in the next-door home of toy
molester Sid (Erik von Detten).  Not only must they get out of Sid's
place, but the family's moving day is nigh, and no one wants to be left
behind.
     Hanks brings the apprehensive Woody alive better than most live
characters are done.  And a gaggle of supporting toys round out the cast,
including Don Rickles as a sarcastic Mr. Potato Head, Wallace Shawn as a
pacifist Tyrannosaurus Rex, and Annie Potts as Woody's love interest Bo
Peep, all of whom add another twist to comic happenings.  Even questions
of identity are brought up without being too silly, as Buzz doesn't
understand he's not a real spaceman.  Not only is TOY STORY visually
spectacular, but it's downright hilarious.
     Nice touches make the film a true delight to watch, with details like
water droplets on windows, the detailed underbelly of the moving van, and
reflections of the family in Christmas tree ornaments.  I'd wager
something new could be found every time the movie is seen.
     The only problems I had were the corny songs and the fact that the
animation, while it works spectacularly well for the stiffly mechanical
toys, doesn't translate so easily to human movement.  While people aren't
the ultimate subject of the piece, it is a bit of a distraction when
they're in the focus.
     Nonetheless, TOY STORY is a visual feast, perfect for the holidays. 
Director John Lasseter ups the stakes with every scene, the best of which
is a nightmarish sequence in Sid's room, whose toy experimentations look
straight out of Tim Burton's brain.  Highly recommended "for kids of all
ages."
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Snatch. (2000)
     Madonna's new husband, Guy Ritchie, couldn't have timed his recent
marriage any better.  Intentional or not, it came a mere week before the
opening of his new film Snatch, the follow-up to his Lock, Stock & Two
Smoking Barrels.  With Madonna as a willing shill, you couldn't ask for
better publicity.
     Turns out you didn't need it, Guy.  Snatch is a film that stands
perfectly on its own merits while it shoots bullet holes in everything
in sight.
     A more violent film you aren't likely to see this year (and yes, I
realize it's only January).  In the vein of Pulp Fiction, Trainspotting,
and Fight Club, Snatch is a gritty dance with the criminal element,
revolving around a stolen 86-karat diamond that any good crook would
give his right arm for.  (And in one case, I mean that literally.)
     After a boggling series of double-crosses, triple-crosses, and
multi-crosses, Snatch becomes a game of who will end up with the gem --
and how will they get it?  Ritchie keeps us guessing at every turn, with
Russians hiring mercenary crooks to steal the jewel, hit men sent to
kill the mercenaries, mobsters trying to outwit the hit men, Jewish
jewelers scheming to undermine the mobsters, a crazed bare-knuckled
boxer looking for his payday despite the chaos, and one dog who's lost
his bark.
     It's Ritchie's incredible, perfectly matched cast that makes the
film work so well.  It's hard to say who is best: Alan Ford's menacing
Brick Top, who feeds his victims to his pigs when they cross him; Vinnie
Jones (Gone in 60 Seconds) as Bullet Tooth Tony, a hunter/assassin who
chills his prey with deadly stares; Benicio Del Toro's
caught-in-the-middle robber/gambling addict; Dennis Farina's Anglophobe
jeweler; or any of two dozen other apt actors who fully own their
roles.  In the end, though, you have to give a hand to Brad Pitt, still
buff from Fight Club, as a mush-mouthed Gypsy boxer who always manages
to get one step ahead of the crowd.
     Cut these guys together with a zippy story (that doesn't always
feel like it makes sense, but no matter) and a jazzy-techno soundtrack
(plus Mrs. Ritchie's "Lucky Star"), and there's nothing to dislike
here.  Even Ritchie's over-aggressive filmmaking never gets that
tiresome, though he runs through the entire pantheon of MTV camera
tricks: slow motion, fast motion, stop motion, reverse motion, low
angles, high angles, upside down camerawork, and more.
     Of course, Snatch does not secretly harbor a touching tale of
redemption, a theme of crooks who go straight, or any other sort of guts
that might make us think differently about the world when we leave the
movie theater.  In fact, it's not really about anything.  Unlike
contemporaries like Pulp Fiction and Trainspotting, with their messages
hidden away amongst all the action, Snatch is just a good time.  That's
not a bad thing, just don't try telling me that Snatch is deep.
Director: Guy Ritchie
Producer: Matthew Vaughn
Writer: Guy Ritchie
Starring: Benicio Del Toro, Dennis Farina, Vinnie Jones, Brad Pitt, Rade
Serbedzija, Jason Statham, Alan Ford, Robbie Gee, Lennie James, Ewen
Bremner, Jason Flemyng, Ade, William Beck, Andy Beckwith, Jason Buckham,
Mickey Cantwell, Nikki Collins, Teena Collins, Charles Cork, Sorcha
Cusack, Sam Douglas, Adam Fogerty, Goldie, Stephen Graham, Sid Hoare,
Ronald Isaac, Jason Ninh Cao, Paul O'Boyle, Yuri Stepanov, Tony Tang
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/snatch/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Legend of Bagger Vance, The (2000)
Robert Redford's singular devotion to American mythology continues in
The Legend of Bagger Vance, the story of a golfer who's lost his swing
and the caddy who brings it back to him.  "Inside each and every one of
us," says Vance (Smith), "is our one true, authentic swing."  It's a
metaphor intended to apply to all walks of life, on the fairway or
otherwise.  If oversweet metaphors like this are your bag, then you're
really going to like Bagger Vance.
The story opens in the present with an aged Hardy Greaves (Jack Lemmon)
suffering a heart attack on a golf course.  As he lies quietly smiling
to himself, he muses on the frequency of his cardiovascular failures and
his love of the game of golf, which meanders into a quixotic narration
on the career of Rannulph Junuh (Damon).  Soon the narrative fades to
the past and we see Junuh at the height of his career, in the company of
the enchanting Adele Invergordon (played by Charlize Theron of The
Devil's Advocate fame; who, by the way, happens to represent the purest
embodiment of good, wholesome sex that the film industry has to offer).
Junuh is the greatest golfer in Savannah, Georgia, Miss Invergordon is
his true love, and they are about as privileged as anyone in the South
until Junuh ships off to serve his country in World War I, whereupon his
entire platoon is slaughtered in the grand history of Saving Private
Ryan.  Returning home he finds himself a mere shell of his former self
and--tragedy of tragedies--he has lost his golf swing.  This is about
the dumbest point in the entire film, the point at which I nearly wrote
the whole thing off.  There is absolutely nothing convincing about
Junuh's wartime horrors.  Damon's portrayal of shock at the sight of his
slain comrades is not unlike his appearance of dismay at losing his MIT
girlfriend in Good Will Hunting.  Fortunately, like any good
professional, I persevered.
Skipping ahead a few years, to the Great Depression, Miss Invergordon
has inherited her father's golf course and, determined to fend off
bankruptcy, throws a high profile golf tournament.  How exactly this is
going to work is not quite explained and, presumably, no one in town can
afford to pay admission, and she's giving away ten grand to the winner,
but anyway....  The two greatest golfers of the day are coming to play
and Savannah will be represented by none other than the washed up and
unshaven Rannulph Junuh.
Enter Bagger Vance.  Will Smith is predictably likable and witty as the
colloquially wise vagabond shaman who saves the day--and the story--from
otherwise certain grief.  The Bagger Vance character is not a new
archetype for Hollywood, but Smith's delivery of Vance's black Southern
dialect manages to convey an element often missed in such film
portrayals.  Where other stereotyped victims of segregation appear
merely ignorant or uneducated, we find a wit and, more importantly, a
will in Bagger's voice.  It's a subversion of language intrinsic to
African American culture, born of wisdom and cunning in the face of
adversity.  Will Smith's ability to carry this to the surface lends
wondrously to our imagination of his character, and forges a heightened
standard for future actors. Something in Smith's delivery is so
conducive to the suspension of disbelief as to render all things
permissible, and it took only a few scenes to reel this critic in.
In the end, Bagger Vance is a strong, memorable film, filled with rich
dialogue and vital camera work.  Though Redford seems to have fallen
back too heavily upon his overused and rambling A River Runs Through It
narrative style, the strength of the underlying story carries it off. 
Better directorial focus might have made for a hole-in-one, but as it
stands, this movie's a solid birdie.
Director: Robert Redford
Producer: Robert Redford
Screenwriter: Jeremy Leven
Stars: Will Smith, Matt Damon, Charlize Theron, J. Michael Moncrief,
Bruce McGill, Joel Gretsch, Lane Smith, Jack Lemmon
http://www.amazon.com/baggervance
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Bound (1996)
     Does anyone else out there have a terrible time taking Jennifer
Tilly seriously, no matter what role she plays?  Well, I do, and her
performance in BOUND is no exception to the rule.
     Here, Tilly plays Violet, a mobster's wife with a plan to make off
with $2 million of the Mafia's money.  Enlisting the aid of Corky
(SHOWGIRLS's Gina Gershon), your everyday laborer/lesbian-next-door, the
two ladies play a game of double-cross with the mob, with Violet's
husband Caesar (RISKY BUSINESS's Joe Pantoliano) set to take the fall.
     As you might expect, it doesn't quite go according to plan, and as
the bodies stack up, the stakes get higher and higher.  If this sounds
familiar, you're probably recalling FARGO, which is structured almost
identically, but which is realized to a level of near-perfection that
BOUND is sorely lacking.
     BOUND is a stylish thriller, emphasis on style. 
Writers-directors-brothers Andy and Larry Wachowski use an avant-garde
and downright bizarre photographic motif of the extreme close-up
variety.  On the one hand this is interesting, and on the other it is
quite annoying.  The Wachowskis' style is so dynamic that it literally
feels like the viewer is being pushed around, making BOUND a
participative experience, like it or not.
     And to be perfectly honest, I'd rather not.  Placing much more
energy into "looking cool," the script ends up falling a bit flat in
areas where a little more complexity could have been used.  Most notable
in this regard is a dropped-in-your-lap ending that feels as if someone
just forgot about it until the last second.
     But there's a lot of meat between the opening credits and that --
Pantoliano is a lot of fun as his now-instantly recognizable trollish
tough guy, and the noirish feel to the picture really keeps you on the
edge of your seat.  Fans of the thriller genre will probably be
moderately pleased, as I was, but will leave hungry for more.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
     It's finally time to reassess the submarine movie to see if it's
outlived its useful life.  I was skeptical enough when Crimson Tide came
out in 1995, feeling like a knockoff of The Hunt for Red October, itself
an homage to Das Boot, it something of an homage to Run Silent, Run
Deep.  They even made Down Periscope, which four years of therapy have
not helped me to forget.
     U-571 takes the Das Boot path, starring a dozen of the sweatiest
men in Hollywood (the makeup department working overtime on this one),
all led by everyone's favorite naked bongo player, Matthew McConaughey.
Loosely based on real events, U-571 involves a WWII mission to capture a
German Enigma encryption device from a sinking German submarine adrift
in the middle of the Atlantic.  Skipper Bill Paxton and his 2nd in
charge McConaughey hop to the task, dressing up their wreck of a sub to
look just like a German U-boat.  One guy on the crew speaks German, so
there shouldn't be a problem in posing as a rescue ship, right?
     The recovery goes as planned but, uh-oh, the Germans catch them in
the act and sink the American sub.  McConaughey, with his commander
dead, decides to lead the surviving skeleton crew to take over the badly
damaged U-boat and try to escape the big bad Nazis on their tail.
     Just describing the plot gets me juiced about the action in U-571.
There are plenty of real thrills and enough Navy jargon to make any
war-happy moviegoer perk up in his seat.  Truly, U-571 is a fun movie,
much like Crimson Tide.  But... there is a catch.
     The problem is that U-571 is so overwhelmingly contrived that
suspension of disbelief is nearly impossible.  It's bad enough when we
see the Nazis shoot up a rowboat full of survivors because of "orders
from Der Fuhrer," just so we know it's okay to kill the Germans later in
the film.  But what of the later hushed conversation, when a grim-faced
officer proclaims that there must be no survivors if a dangerous plan
goes awry, because the Germans will torture them all without mercy?
Anything to get the audience on your side, huh?
     There's the usual "take the boat below the most remotely imaginable
depth" scene.  There's a prisoner to contend with.  There's all that
"down bubble" talk.  There are implorations to be silent.  The usual sub
clichés are all here, except they never "bottom 'er out on the ocean
floor."
     But the icing on the cake is when McConaughey and his crew are on
the run from the enormous destroyer, dropping dozens of depth charges,
shooting torpedoes, firing cannons... and nothing seems to hurt this
ship!  U-571 is apparently some kind of German superboat!  It's amazing
it was damaged in the first place!  Pretty soon, you'll probably grow
tired of watching explosion after explosion do absolutely nothing to the
sub, and then the thrills of U-571 will quickly fade.
     Sorry Hollywood, it's time to put the sub movie in dry dock.  At
least until the next World War.
Director: Jonathan Mostow
Producer: Dino De Laurentiis, Martha De Laurentiis
Writer: Jonathan Mostow, Sam Montgomery, David Ayer
Starring: Matthew McConaughey, Bill Paxton, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon Jovi,
Jake Weber, Erik Palladino, Matthew Settle, David Keith

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
     Well, as it turns out, she's *not* all that.  She's like half
that.  Maybe less.  I'd say 30 percent that.
     The way I ended up at SHE'S ALL THAT is because my wife refused to
go see 8MM, thus sticking us with this little flick, which she figured I
wouldn't mind seeing on account of the girls with large bazongas.  And
she is right: In point of fact, I do not mind seeing girls with large
bazongas, especially when they shake 'em on the dance floor.
     Said shaking is done on Prom Night, six weeks after Zach (Prinze)
is poised to win a bet in which he is tasked with turning uber-dork
Laney (Cook) into a teenage goddess.  And Zach does some damn fine
work.  You see, Laney's mom has died, and she's a bit of a nut job on
account of being the only woman in the family and having Kevin Pollack
as a dad.  Zach's got his own troubles, too: He can't choose between
attending Dartmouth, Yale, or Harvard... *or* he might wanna be a
hacky-sack performance artist!  (This is not a joke.)
     *Of course* Laney and Zach help each other through all this rabid
insanity!  But Laney finds out about the bet and - the horror - she gets
mad at Zach and goes to the prom with someone else!  Could their
blossoming relationship be doomed?  Well, you'll just have to get
yourself to the theater for that answer!
     Okay, there are a few chuckles, but I can count them all on one
hand.  That Prom Night shaking is also the best-choreographed prom I've
ever seen, and that includes all the ones on 90210.  But overall, this
movie's a loser.  As far as teen comedy/romances go... well, Molly
Ringwald is probably turning over in her grave.
Director: Robert Iscove
Producer: Peter Abrams, Richard N. Gladstein, Robert L. Levy
Writer: R. Lee Fleming Jr.
Starring: Freddie Prinze Jr., Rachael Leigh Cook, Matthew Lillard, Paul
Walker, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe, Kevin Pollack, Anna Paquin
http://www.miramax.com:8888/ows-doc/shesallthat/index.html
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Tigerland (2000)
     Joel Schumacher, director of some of the worst films in a
generation (8MM, Batman & Robin, Batman Forever), redeems himself with
his first really good flick since Falling Down in 1993.  A tale of army
recruits in their final days of training before heading to Vietnam in
1971, Tigerland is an original and modestly powerful anti-war film that
never even goes "in country."
     The film revolves around a recruit named Bozz (Colin Farrell,
Croupier) who is trying everything in his power to get out before he's
shipped out.  He refuses to participate in basic training, talks back to
his superiors, and undermines his fellow recruits' gung ho attitudes
with his sly, pacifist talk.  Notably, Bozz's closest friend Paxton
(Matthew Davis, Urban Legends: Final Cut) is looking forward to "the
experience" of serving in 'Nam, unafraid and ready for duty, and while
Paxton's resolve starts to crumble, Bozz finds his inexplicably coming
back around.
     Eschewing the theatrics of his Batman sagas, Schumacher relies on
an understated documentary style, largely using handheld cameras and
seemingly improvised scenarios.  To some extent, this works well,
putting the viewer in the action, headed to Tigerland (the very last
training stop before Vietnam) on the bus along with the platoon.  But on
another level, the whole film feels a little cheap, like Schumacher went
into the woods behind his house with a machete and a Handicam and
figured he could make a movie right there as a weekend project.  As a
result, the picture doesn't look or feel overwhelmingly authentic, and
the connection with the viewer is broken.  (In the end, it's apparent
the film has been shot the way it was simply for budget considerations,
which was reportedly less than $10 million.)
     Farrell in particular is a standout among the virtually all-male
cast, though he doesn't shine bright enough to outdo some of 2000's
virtuoso performances like Tom Hanks in Cast Away.  The ensemble as a
whole is smashing, and the story as written by Ross Klavan and Michael
McGruther is a standout among this year's lackluster scripts.  Too bad
the film couldn't have kept the energy level on an even keel throughout
the production, but hey, wars -- and movies -- are hell.
Director: Joel Schumacher
Producer: Beau Flynn, Steven Haft, Ted Kurdyla
Writer: Ross Klavan, Michael McGruther
Starring: Colin Farrell, Matthew Davis, Clifton Collins Jr., Tom Guiry,
Shea Whigham, Russell Richardson, Nick Searcy, Afemo Omilami, James
MacDonald, Keith Ewell, Matt Gerald, Stephen Fulton, Tyler Cravens,
Michael Edmiston, Arian Waring Ash, Haven Gaston, Michael Shannon, Roger
Floyd, Ronnie Schafer, Frances Taylor, Matt White, Christy McKee, James
Lessick Jr., Daniel Martin, Marc Macaulay, Cole Hauser
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Little Odessa (1994)
     LITTLE ODESSA refers to an old Russian Jewish neighborhood in
Brooklyn, New York, along the lines of Little Italy or Chinatown.  There,
everyone speaks Russian, wanders through bleak snow-covered streets,
drinks vodka, wears heavy wool coats ... and most carry guns.  This is the
age of the "organizatsya," the Russian mafia, for whom Joshua (Tim Roth)
is employed as a hit man.
     Joshua, a long-time Little Odessa expatriate, is called back to the
neighborhood to perform a hit on a big shot resident.  When he arrives, he
encounters his worshipful brother Reuben (Edward Furlong), former lover
Alla (Moira Kelly), hateful father Arkady (Maximilian Schell), and dying
mother Irina (Vanessa Redgrave).  Together, the cast creates a highly
dysfunctional family the likes of which you've probably never seen before.
     As Joshua closes in on his target, relations with his father become
more and more strained, as Joshua tries to return home to visit his mother
before she dies.  While Reuben and Alla grow closer to Joshua, so do the
thugs who are out to avenge the man Joshua has murdered.  Ultimately, the
film culminates in a tragic shoot-out that Quentin Tarantino could have
scripted.
     Tarantino is not the man behind this film, however.  LITTLE ODESSA is
the surprising first feature of James Gray, who wrote and directed it. 
Gray is obviously good at scripting action sequences like the finale, but
when it comes to old-fashioned storytelling, he still hasn't arrived.  The
film's opening and long expository sequences set the tone well, but many
scenes don't serve any real purpose, dragging the narrative out instead of
moving the picture forward.  A huge problem for me was that a number of
characters look, dress, and sound the same, making it often impossible to
figure out what's going on and who's involved.
     Thankfully, most of this remedies itself by the end.  The
multi-layered story ties up neatly, and the net result is a generally
satisfying yet heartbreaking finale.  However, the acting is what makes
LITTLE ODESSA watchable.  Roth is perfect as the dark and disturbed hitman
who still loves his mother.  Redgrave as Mom is truly jaw-dropping:  the
veteran actress playing a cancer-ridden matriarch with frightening
realism.  Even Furlong shines, proving he has something left after PET
SEMATARY 2.
     A more polished script would have carried LITTLE ODESSA a lot
farther.  The film's intentions were honorable, and the cast and crew
obviously genuinely wanted the film to succeed.  It unfortunately isn't
the masterpiece they were hoping for, but it is enough to make you
consider vacation spots other than the real Little Odessa.

Title
Review for Anywhere But Here (1999)
     ANYWHERE BUT HERE?  A more apt title you will not find on a motion
picture this decade.
     After a witty lead like that, at this point in the movie review, I
usually launch into a brief plot synopsis.  So here goes: A
down-to-earth teenage girl hates her crazy mother.
     If you're waiting for more, you can stop holding your breath.  In a
nutshell, that's it.  Sure, there are some details (the two move from
Wisconsin to Beverly Hills)  okay, there is *a* detail  but someone
really tried to make a movie out of this *shocking* premise.
     So maybe you think there's something to be salvaged by the two
big-name actresses headlining the picture.  Well, there's Sarandon as
the nutty and irresponsible mom, played in one full dimension and with
Sarandon looking indistinguishable from Leslie Ann Warren.  Or there's
the pouty Portman, in what will go down as the most forgettable role
she's ever played.
     But the worst failing of ANYWHERE BUT HERE is the utter lack of any
sort of plot.  For two hours, we drag through one boring and random
tragedy after another.  The characters never change, the film never
matures.  It's excruciating to watch.
     I mean, what is this movie supposed to be about?  An aging woman's
midlife crisis?  The struggle of a teenager who finds herself playing
parent to the real mother?  Outcasts in Beverly Hills?  All of this has
been done, and occasionally it's been done well.  But ANYWHERE BUT HERE
takes these three movies and runs them straight into the ground.
     ANYWHERE BUT HERE is so bad that if I wasn't a film critic, I would
have left the theater in the first 45 minutes.  But as a professional, I
knew I would have had to see the last half sometime.  The prospect of
that, well, the mind reels, the stomach turns, and the ass revolts.
http://www.foxmovies.com/anywherebuthere/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Goya (1999)
I'll admit, I have fit all my knowledge of Spanish painter Francisco
Goya into the sentence you're reading right now.  What's a Spanish
painter doing in Bordeaux, France?  I don't know, and after watching
this film, I still don't know.  I had to read a synopsis on the movie's
web site to find out he had been exiled there.  I'm still not sure why.
To be certain, Goya in Bordeaux assumes the audience is deeply intimate
with his Goya's work, his life, and his politics.  It's a love letter
written to the man by writer/director Carlos Saura, who clearly
idealizes everything about the artist.  Unless you are like Saura, this
will undoubtedly be seen as a not good thing.
The story, as it is, gives us an ancient and fat Goya (Francisco Rabal),
in aforementioned exile, recounting his life to the impossibly young
daughter of who-knows-how-many love affairs.  A great lover in his
younger days (played by José Coronado) during the late 1700's -- and
aren't all Spanish men in film great lovers? -- he hung with the
powdered wig set as his dark paintings brought the ire of Spanish
"absolutists."  Going deaf at the age of 46, Goya soon turned into a
bitter man, his work taking on ever more morose and disturbing themes,
eventually driving him to near insanity.  And France.
Goya's work is generously on display in the film, unlike most entries
into the genre which do not get permission to show the works and end up
having to fake it (see garbage like Surviving Picasso and Love is the
Devil for examples of how bad this is).  Through his deathbed
hallucinations, we even get to see Goya's most famous works reenacted
and come to life -- with zombies coming out of the walls to attack our
slumbering hero.  These sequences reminded me of everything from 2001 to
Vertigo, and Saura's lighting trickery and flair with the scenes rescue
Goya from entering a canon of truly atrocious painter-biopics.
Too bad the rest of the movie is nowhere near as successful.  Coronado
is a dashing leading man, but his portrayal of Goya is so perplexing due
to its lack of exposition, one wonders if he is being true to his
character or even his surroundings.  The political context of Spain in
1780 isn't something many moviegoers or I are going to have at the top
of their minds, and the film does nothing to help you through it.
Then again, this is a Spanish film about a Spanish national treasure.  I
don't remember Mel Gibson going out of his way to explain the
revolutionary background of The Patriot, either.
Director: Carlos Saura
Producer: Andrés Vicente Gómez
Writer: Carlos Saura
Starring: Francisco Rabal, José Coronado, Daphne Fernández, Maribel
Verdú, Eulalia Ramón, Joaquín Climent
http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/goyainbordeaux/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Spy Hard (1996)
     Ugh.  This is one of those reviews where I don't really know how to
begin.  Suffice it to say that I should have listened to all the friends of
mine who refused to go see SPY HARD with me, saying that it wasn't their
style, that star Leslie Nielsen had lost his comedic sense, or that the
movie just plain looked bad.
     SPY HARD is the most recent in Nielsen's franchise of spoof films,
parodying the Bond genre and about a dozen other movies along the way,
including IN THE LINE OF FIRE, CLIFFHANGER, SPEED, TRUE LIES, PULP FICTION,
and even SISTER ACT and HOME ALONE.  I won't bother recounting the
negligible plotline, except to say that it involves two good guys (Nielsen
as Dick Steele, "Agent WD-40," and Nicollette Sheridan as Veronique
Ukrinsky, "Agent 3.14") and one bad guy (a masterfully cast Andy Griffith).
     Here is what's funny about SPY HARD:  "Weird Al" Yankovic's opening
credit sequence and Andy Griffith's presence during his eight or so lines
of dialogue.
     Basically because the writers (and there were four of them) chose to
play for cheap laughs instead of extended humor value, the film fails like
a linebacker in a calculus exam.  Director Rick Friedberg has absolutely no
sense of comedic timing, and even the editing works against the film to
lessen the impact of the jokes.  It's almost an exercise in how to do
everything wrong.
     The best spy spoof out there is TOP SECRET!, Val Kilmer's homage to
the war/Elvis movie and true laugh-a-minute material.  Trust me, it's a lot
cheaper to rent that film than to see SPY HARD.  And much better for you.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Craft, The (1996)
     A coven of outcast, teenage witches wreaks havoc at a high school.
     Rarely have I been able to totally boil down the plot of a film so
succinctly, but with THE CRAFT, it's a piece of cake.  What, no intricate
subplots, you ask?  No involved character development?  No story
progression from one act to the next?
     Not really.  In fact, the witch stuff is just about it, and let me
tell you, that isn't nearly enough to carry a film for 105 minutes.
Rather, this film is much more concerned with jamming in 20 or 30 of your
favorite pop songs.
     The young witches are:  Sarah (Robin Tunney), the newcomer to school.
Nancy (Fairuza Balk), the white trash slut.  Bonnie (Neve Campbell), the
burn-scarred introvert.  And Rochelle (Rachel True), the token minority.
(They all represent one of the elements too, but I could never keep that
straight.)  The four girls form a coven of witches, find themselves outcast
from the rest of the school, and use their growing powers to get revenge on
everyone in their way.  One of these victims is played by Christine Taylor,
who played Marcia in THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE, and who causes lots of
laughter-for-the-wrong-reasons when she's on screen.  Another one is Chris
(Skeet Ulrich), on whom Sarah inexplicably casts a love spell.
     So what's the verdict on THE CRAFT?  Well, Balk looks even scarier
than normal, and it looks like she's forever doomed to play these wacko
roles.  A lot of the movie is just plain gross.  The jokes are largely not
funny.  The characters don't garner a lot of sympathy, as they're pretty
much just as evil as their victims.  While the leads can all act, the
script doesn't let them do too much of that.  The movie feels twice as long
as it really is.  And...the big daddy of all mistakes...THE CRAFT makes the
fatal error of trying to be *serious* instead of campy like it should have
been.  (Reread the first line of this review if you don't believe me.)
     On the plus side is very little of consequence.  Some of the effects
are pretty cool, but it's tough to make a big deal out of "magic" on a
movie screen when it's clearly just digital manipulation or parlor tricks.
Star-getter numero uno?  The leads are all very cute, especially Tunney.
     I still don't know what the intention of THE CRAFT was.  Was it
supposed to be a comedy?  A thriller?  A horror flick?  More like a music
video, if you ask me.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Visit, The (2000/I)
     Earnest, heartfelt, and soul-searching.  These are qualities that
are great to see in a film.  It's too bad that those qualities don't
necessarily mean the film will be any good.
     The Visit is a prime example of a movie that has clearly been
agonized over and loved, but to virtually no ultimate effect;
writer/director/producer Jordan Walker Pearlman is so obviously enamored
with the material he can't see the forest for the trees.  Adapted from a
play, The Visit still has that boxed-in feeling, with virtually all of
the action taking place in the visiting room of the prison where Alex
(Hill Harper) is incarcerated.  Wrongly so, we are led to believe.
     A tragically sad tale of woe, The Visit is so overwrought it's hard
to know where to start explaining it.  Not only is Alex in prison for a
rape he claims he didn't commit, he's abused by the inmates, his father
(Billy Dee Williams) hates him, and the parole board won't hear his
pleas.  And he's got AIDS.  The only one who'll visit besides his
parents and brother (Obba Babatundé) is an old childhood friend (Rae
Dawn Chong), a recovering crack addict/whore/incest survivor who wants
to help Alex put his life together again.  And she has a crippled son.
     Folks, it doesn't get much sadder than this, and faster than you
can say "Can I get an amen!?" (no, seriously, that's in the movie),
Pearlman has us begging for the message of hope that must be found
somewhere among all this melancholy.  If it's there, I never found it,
unless presenting a dying prison inmate to your son as some kind of
surrogate father is a hopeful message.  But that's not a memory I'd
exactly cherish from my youth -- and sure enough, The Visit lost my
attention after 40 minutes.
     Sadly, The Visit isn't even much fun to watch.  Pearlman clearly
has a lot to learn about directing movies.  The production is
alternately rough and pedestrian, yanking you in and out of the action
through tired fades, dream sequences, and music cues.  Also of note is
the jazz and soul soundtrack, which sounds really good -- but simply
doesn't fit what's going on in the film.  You know, I love Rae Dawn and
Billy Dee as much as the next guy, but I don't want to wade through two
hours of badly made melodrama just to get a peek at 'em.
Director: Jordan Walker Pearlman
Producer: Jordan Walker Pearlman
Writer: Jordan Walker Pearlman
Starring: Hill Harper, Obba Babatundé, Rae Dawn Chong, Marla Gibbs,
Phylicia Rashad, Billy Dee Williams, Talia Shire, David Clennon
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
     Another fall, another movie from the Woodman.
     Shot in black and white and filled with about 30 big-name stars,
CELEBRITY is a welcome return to old-school Allen, his first really good
film since 1994's BULLETS OVER BROADWAY.
     It's about time.  Without the stupid camera tricks/dream sequences
(DECONSTRUCTING HARRY), singing cast members (EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU),
and Greek choruses (MIGHTY APHRODITE), it's easy to rediscover everyone
- and myself - likes Woody so much.
     Here's a bright, witty, funny, and topical story that could happen
to anyone (unlike the aforementioned pictures).  While Allen is
noticeably absent from the cast, Kenneth Branagh does a surprisingly
authentic imitation as a reporter assigned to the celebrity beat for a
travel magazine.  Branagh quickly finds himself caught up in the
mystique and romanticism of the celebrity lifestyle and does his best to
worm his way in.  Meanwhile, his frumpy, schoolteacher wife (Judy Davis)
is cast along the wayside.
     That neither of them ends up getting what they bargained for is a
given, but how Allen pulls it off is sheer mastery.  In some ways this
is an updating of both MANHATTAN and CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS, and its
cautionary message about what's wrong with society is curiously
appropriate for a millenium audience.
     Still, trademark Allen problems like questionable editing and jerky
camerawork make this film a bit less than perfect.  The cinematic layout
of the scenes is not up to Allen's usual perfectionism, either.  Worst
of all, many jokes fall flat, and others just miss on their timing.
     No matter, because on the whole, CELEBRITY is quite funny and is
simply an amazing send-up of the stars it frames.
Director: Woody Allen
Producer: Jean Doumanian
Writer: Woody Allen
Starring: Hank Azaria, Kenneth Branagh, Judy Davis, Leonardo DiCaprio,
Melanie Griffith, Nicole Oliver, Famke Janssen, Michael Lerner, Joe
Mantegna, Bebe Neuwirth, Winona Ryder, Charlize Theron
http://www.miramax.com:8888/ows-doc/celebrity/index.html
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  /
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for "Dekalog" (1987) (mini)
Survive 10 hours of THE DECALOGUE and you may find yourself a changed
person.
Polish master Krzysztof Kieslowski found inspiration in the 10
Commandments, and for Polish TV he made a series of one-hour films
exploring each one.  Naturally, this is some heavy stuff.  In some
cases, it's really heavy stuff.
Kieslowski is a bit of a minimalist, which means don't expect lavish
sets or much in the way of music.  In fact, most of these characters all
live in the same, nondescript, high-rise apartment complexes in a
Warsaw, Poland.  The stories regularly intersect, though not to the
degree that they did in Kieslowski's other major epic of BLUE, WHITE,
and RED.
Unfortunately, many of the episodes of THE DECALOGUE feel unfinished,
and on the whole the series is hit and miss, not the masterpiece some
would claim, though it's definitely one of the most ambitious film
projects ever undertaken.  While it's imperfect, I have to say I feel a
deep sense of achievement having finished the series.  I don't know if
it's made me a better man or not, but time will have its say in that.
Each episode deserves its own examination.
Decalogue 1 - "Thou shalt have no other gods before me" - A jaded man
trusts the computer over all.  His hubris leads him to trust its
calculations in all matters, which proves to be devastating.  One of the
most powerful of the series, featuring a haunting performance by
Wojciech Klata as the man's trusting son.  ****1/2
Decalogue 2 - "Thou shalt not take the Lord's name in vain" - A woman
forces a doctor to make a harrowing choice: If her husband lives, she'll
get an abortion of the child she's carrying from another man.  Somewhat
roundabout on the whole.  ***1/2
Decalogue 3 - "Thou shalt remember the Sabbath and keep it holy" - Crazy
woman forces the married man with who she's had an affair 3 years
earlier to help her search for her missing lover on Christmas Eve.
Why?  She's determined if she can keep the guy out until 7 a.m. she'll
be sane again.  Or not.  Almost completely nonsensical.  **1/2
Decalogue 4 - "Thou shalt honor thy father and mother" - Girl's mother
died right after childbirth, leaving only a cryptic letter to her
father.  Father seals letter in a second envelope, "Not to be opened
until my death."  Child opens the letter and realizes dad isn't dad.  A
rather silly ending poisons a coulda-been story.  Again, not terribly
great.  ***
Decalogue 5 - "Thou shalt not kill" - A street punk murders a cab driver
in cold blood, then faces the death penalty for his crime.  A lot less
interesting than it sounds, mainly because that's the entire gist of the
story.  The only "surprise" comes from the lawyer defending the punk's
life, and even he adds little to the capital punishment debate.  Notable
only for the gruesome and cold murder sequence.  ***1/2
Decalogue 6 - "Thou shalt not commit adultery" - A return to fine form
for Kieslowski, with a curious tale of a 19-year-old kid who peeps on
(and later stalks) his exotic, married neighbor.  Eventually, they meet,
with tragic consequences and a clever twist of an ending.  Slow, yet
fascinating.  ****
Decalogue 7 - "Thou shalt not steal" - This very slow entry has a
child's mother kidnapping her from the child's grandmother, whom the kid
thinks is her real mom.  Got it?  Mom wants to escape to Canada with her
somewhat estranged daughter, but events turn against her.   Awfully
confusing for such a simple story and not particularly successful in the
end.  Far too similar to episode 4.  ***
Decalogue 8 - "Thou shalt not bear false witness" - Kieslowski invokes
the Holocaust, with the tale of an American woman who returns to Poland
to face a famed lecturer, only to reveal that as a young girl, the
lecturer turned her away from a hiding place from the Nazis during
WWII.  Sounds very powerful, but the female bonding and chatty trips
through the past make this episode far too weepy and sentimental.
***1/2
Decalogue 9 - "Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife" - A tragedy in
the style of ROMEO & JULIET.  An unfaithful man finds he is now
impotent, and he encourages his wife to take a lover.  Jealousy
immediately ensues, as does heartbreak from all sides.  Very sad and
deeply compelling.  ****
Decalogue 10 - "Though shalt not covet thy neighbor's goods" - A
personal favorite of the series, featuring two hapless brothers who
suddenly inherit the most valuable stamp collection in Poland when their
father dies.  Though they desperately need money, they both quickly
become obsessed with expanding the collection, which, as you can well
imagine, does not turn out well.  The only black comedy in the series,
and probably the best of the bunch. ****1/2
The series averages out to a 3.6 rating, which I'll round up to 4 stars.
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
     What can I say about THE FIFTH ELEMENT that you haven't probably
heard already?  Not much, but I will say that THE FIFTH ELEMENT is a
mess -- a mess of grand proportions, full of dazzling colors, lights,
explosions, outfits, and... hairstyles.  Designer John-Paul Gaultier's
involvement with Luc Besson's creation (the most expensive French
production ever) is well-known, as is Milla Jovovich's role as Leeloo,
supposedly the most perfect being (but I wouldn't have pegged her as
being so flaky).
     The plot, what there is of one, is your basic "cab driver saves the
world from a big flying ball of evil using magic rocks" story, with
Bruce Willis as the cabbie in question and Gary Oldman as the corporate
tycoon who wants the rocks for himself.  And while lots of things blow
up, most of the film is just plain boring and idiotic -- especially
Chris Tucker's performance as Ruby, an indecipherable, intergalactic
Dennis Rodman-meets-Rosie O'Donnell talk show host.  Plus there's the
blatant rip offs from BLADE RUNNER and BRAZIL that I won't even get
started on.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Kids in the Hall: Brain Candy (1996)
     Well, what have we here?  Let me say first-off that I'm a *huge* Kids
in the Hall fan.  This review is necessarily going to be tainted by the
fact that I've probably seen 300 hours of Kids in the Hall on TV...and by
my impression going into the film that, hey, another 1 1/2 hours wouldn't
kill me.
     If you aren't familiar with the comedy troupe, the Kids are five guys
(Bruce McCulloch, Kevin McDonald, Mark McKinney, Scott Thompson, and Dave
Foley) who have appeared in 110 episodes of some of the funniest sketch
comedy television has offered up in recent years.  After ending the series
in July 1994, talk of a movie immediately began.  Two years later, the end
result is here.
     What the Kids have brought us with BRAIN CANDY is a 90 minute skit
about a drug company and its hapless employees who invent the penultimate
"happy pill," GleeMonex.  The only problem, they later discover, is that
those that take the pill commonly become comatose due to the ecstasy
caused by it...which isn't such a happy result after all.
     Plotline aside, the real question on everyone's mind is, "Is it any
good?"  Well...yes and no.  The Kids have brought back some 40 of our
favorite characters from the show (and some new ones), and their
performances as Canada's most ridiculous citizens are perfectly done.  The
problem, and it's quite a big one, is that the GleeMonex storyline gets
old--fast, although it has a certain charm and does serve to tie the whole
movie together.  In the end, the plot is little more than an arbitrary way
of getting to the funny bits of the script, which rarely have anything to
do with the BRAIN CANDY in question.
     Good characters in a crummy story don't make for particularly good
time, but there are plenty of laughs to be had by all scattered throughout
the film.  You're probably better off just watching three episodes of the
TV show at home, but for die-hard fans, the movie will probably carry at
least some appeal.  Just don't take any pills from strangers.
     (Special note:  *Yes!*  Paul Bellini (the guy in the towel) does
appear in one scene.)
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Lost Souls (2000)
     It looks like Winona Ryder gets two strikes in a row in 2000, as
the long-delayed Lost Souls emerges as one of the worst duds of the
year.  How bad can it be?  Well, the only moments of terror in this
ostensible horror flick are brought about by the appearance of the words
"Producer: Meg Ryan," giving you chills in a way that only those words
can.
     Hopefully the last in a line of man vs. devil movies let loose by
Y2K hysteria coupled with the success of The Sixth Sense (which wisely
steered clear of religious metaphors altogether), Lost Souls actually
ranks below End of Days and just about ties the pitiful Bless the Child
for sheer badness.
     The story slowly (and I mean slowly) unfolds, revealing the
following plotline.  Winona Ryder's Maya is the survivor of a demonic
possession during childhood, and she was one of the lucky ones that had
Satan exorcised right out of her body.  Through some strange pact with
renegade clergyman Father Lareaux (John Hurt, beneath his station in
this junk), she is a kind of part-time assistant on other exorcisms when
they arise in the greater New York metropolitan area, a city in which,
according to Lost Souls, it is always raining.
     Through some clever codebreaking during one such exorcism, Maya
stumbles upon the fact that the antichrist will rise up in a matter of
days to inhabit the body of writer Peter Kelson (Ben Chaplin of The
Truth About Cats and Dogs).  And although Maya and her exorcist crew
have no idea how to stop it, they go out of their way to scare the pants
off of Peter, telling him it's pretty much inevitable that he's going to
turn into the devil.
     What follows is mostly drawn-out self-discovery as Peter wrestles
with his nonexistent faith, while Maya is haunted by demons -- real and
imaginary -- that lead us to believe that possession by the devil isn't
just something you get rid of with a shot of penicillin.  It's something
that stays with you for life!
     And that's about the long and short of it.  The moody lighting and
underexposed camerawork lead me to believe Lost Souls once aspired to be
great art, but it's ultimately another plot-to-foil-Satan movie with few
thrills aside from Maya's stylish hallucinations.  Simply put, the story
is utter nonsense.  Frankly, if the devil is stupid enough to choose
some lowly writer to be the vessel for earthly destruction, well, he
deserves what's coming to him.
     If you're determined enough to see Lost Souls, I challenge you to
stay awake.  But if Friday the 13th really has you itching to see a
devil movie, then I urge you, just go see the re-release of The
Exorcist.
Director: Janusz Kaminski
Producer: Meg Ryan, Nina R. Sadowsky
Writer: Pierce Gardner
Starring: Winona Ryder, Ben Chaplin, John Hurt, Elias Koteas, Sarah
Wynter, Philip Baker Hall
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
     It's been a few years since a good shark movie, and while LAKE
PLACID played games with the monster movie genre, DEEP BLUE SEA aims to
please with an old-fashioned thriller where, once again, the beasts are
much smarter than the prey (the people).
     The story is familiar  genetic tampering makes sharks brilliantly
intelligent  and they want nothing more than to eat people.  Along the
food chain are Samuel Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, and Michael
Rapaport.  But most notable is rapper LL Cool J as a cook/preacher who
provides much-needed comic relief to the proceedings.
     Burrows and Jackson are also fun (with Burrows redeeming herself
for the debacle of WING COMMANDER earlier this year), and a mostly
clever and zippy script keeps the film alive.  Director Renny Harlin
seems to be back in decent form, too.  And the CGI sharks are awfully
well-done, with some of the best biting-a-person-in-half sequences ever
put on film, he said, only slightly sarcastically.
     Ultimately, DEEP BLUE SEA lands somewhere between THE ABYSS and
LEVIATHAN in the pantheon of underwater monster thrillers.  It's not
great and it doesn't suck, but it'll get your date to jump into your
lap, and that's really what a movie like this is all about, right?
Director: Renny Harlin
Producer: Akiva Goldsman, Robert Kosberg, Tony Ludwig, Alan Riche
Writer: Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers, Donna Powers
Starring: Samuel L. Jackson, Saffron Burrows, Thomas Jane, Stellan
Skarsgard, LL Cool J, Michael Rapaport
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Killer (1994)
     The suave hitman Mick creeps out of a closet to finish off "the
guy that got away."  As Mick flexes his leather sap in preparation to
beat the mark to death, the poppy strains of The Troggs' "Love Is All
Around" pervade the atmosphere, RESERVOIR DOGS-style.  We know we're in
for something out of the ordinary.
     Such is the opening of BULLETPROOF HEART, a feature finally making
it to Austin after months in release.  The film (originally screened as
KILLER) stars Anthony LaPaglia as Mick, a hitman that can't make up his
mind whether or not he wants out of his smarmy profession.  Tonight's
target:  Fiona (Mimi Rogers), a classy lady who crossed the wrong
people once too often.  The movie really gets interesting when Mick is
sent to finish her off, Fiona seduces him, and the two develop a
profoundly strange and twisted relationship.
     What results is a solid entry of the noir vein.  Mick falls for
the woman and can't bring himself to finish the job, but for some
reason (revealed later), Fiona *wants* to die.  Matt Craven plays
Archie, Mick's bumbling assistant who botched the last job, and who
wants to make amends with Mick by passing a self-created test of faith
and courage.
     BULLETPROOF HEART is a strange film.  Many nice touches abound:
clever photography, good attention to detail, particularly in costuming
and Rogers's makeup, and hauntingly believable acting.  The only real
problem with the film is the talkiness.  The action scenes, when
they're on, are scorching, full of gritty, stomach-lurching suspense.
Unfortunately, 90 percent of the film is nothing but the principals
chatting--vital to the characterizations, but often lifeless and just
not engaging.  Still, it's interesting as a character study, but it
doesn't *quite* make it as a real noir.
     BULLETPROOF HEART is ultimately a solid film (although the use of
title cards between sequences is very annoying).  In the end, I thought
the most intriguing part of the film was its title.  BULLETPROOF HEART
is supposed to refer to Mick, as a lead-hearted character who can't be
swayed from doing his job by anything as blas as a conscience.  But I
feel it could refer to Fiona just as well, as a woman who can't seem to
get herself killed despite all her efforts.  The dichotomy between
these two characters makes for some interesting investigation.  I know
I'll be talking about them for awhile.

Title
Review for My Life So Far (1999)
     I guess you're either one of those people who loves 1930's Scottish
coming-of-age stories, or you're not.
     Narrated by the precocious Fraser (Norman), we tour the life of a
wee Scottish lad who seems brilliant beyond his years.  Fraser's life is
dominated by his large family, which runs a sphagnum moss plantation 
the only one in Europe, we're told (many times).  There's dad (Firth), a
Beethoven freak and spare-time inventor; mom (Mastrantonio in a bad
Scottish accent), the wallflower; Gamma (Harris), the gamma; crusty
Uncle Morris (McDowell  wasted in this role); and his child
fiancée/bride Eloise (Jacob).
     What a fine, dysfunctional family they make, what with dad's
inventions going awry, and both father and son making goo-goo eyes for
Eloise.  And when Fraser finds grandpa's old stash of Victorian-era
pornography stashed away in the attic, boy, look out!
     All of this tries to be very quaint and sweet, but turns out to be
perverse and disturbing, to say the least.  Dad is nothing short of a
lech, and in fact, all the adults in this picture are sorry role
models.  (No small wonder that the epilogue states that Fraser grew up
to be `a successful television executive.'  Fitting indeed.)
     MY LIFE SO FAR wants to be a hybrid of UNSTRUNG HEROES and COLD
COMFORT FARM, but lacks the charm of either of them.  Instead, it's just
a twisted little art movie that will probably get steamrollered on
release.
     The opening credits warn you that this `Based on a True Story.'
Why they picked *this* story to turn into a movie is beyond me.
Director: Hugh Hudson
Producer: Steve Norris, David Puttnam
Writer: Simon Donald
Starring: Colin Firth, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Irene Jacob, Malcolm
McDowell, Rosemary Harris, Tcheky Karyo, Robert Norman
http://miramax.com/mm_front/owa/mp.entryPoint?action=0&midStr=566
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Kicking and Screaming (1995)
     Opening night of the Austin Film Festival and Screenwriters'
Conference brought me this little gem, a story of five guys who just
got out of college, the three women that float amongst them, and the
question that haunts them all, "What the hell am I going to do with my
life?"
     I wouldn't look to KICKING AND SCREAMING for the answer.  Rather,
the movie is a hilarious example of what not to do when you graduate.
The guys, Chet (Eric Stoltz), Grover (Josh Hamilton), Max (Chris
Eigeman), Skippy (Jason Wiles), and the show-stealing Otis (Carlos
Jacott), can't seem to give up the college life.  They hang out at
college bars, woo freshmen, and sneak back into classes.  Otis can't
even seem to get out of his pajamas.
     Women are only half the problem.  Jane (Olivia d'Abo) is Grover's
lover, but she jets off for Prague after graduation, leaving Grover in
despair.  Miami (Parker Posey) is Skippy's trouble-prone, flighty
girlfriend.  And Kate (Cara Buono) is Max's latest attachment, a
cafeteria worker he picks up while haggling over an extra potato.
     The plot basically follows the series of perpetual indecisions
that plague the friends, an ironic reality that most of us seem to face
at some point in our lives.  The so-called "touching" moments are
unfortunately pretty drab, and the mushy flashbacks where Jane and
Grover's fledgling romance is built up are real snoozers.  The film is
rightfully a study of misery.  This happiness stuff just gets in the
way.
     The acting and direction by Noah Baumbach (who also wrote the
script) are perfectly dead-on.  Carlos Jacott should gain a lot of
notice (and at least one of the various movie awards) for his
outrageously droll part as Otis.  If the script had avoided the
over-sentimentality, the film would have been even better.  And oddly,
a real ending seems to be mysteriously lacking.
     KICKING AND SCREAMING pokes fun at the pretense and phoniness of
virtually every college clique imaginable.  If you're one of those
sensitive types, you'll probably be offended at some point along the
way.  But hey, look on the bright side, at least you'll have it better
than these guys.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
     Everyone knows that writers are drunks.  I mean, I'm drunk right
now.  I'm surprised I can type, you know, since my hands are shaking so
bad and my vision is so blurry.
     If you're ready to buy in to the writer-as-alcoholic cliché, you
should just love 28 Days, which pulls out every stereotype in the book.
Sandra Bullock stars as Gwen, the aforementioned drunk writer (living,
naturally, in New York City), who ruins her sister's wedding by
insulting her during the toast, falling on the cake, and wrecking the
"just married" car by crashing it into a house!  Off to rehab for her,
where she meets a cast of characters drawn so broadly they could
populate a sitcom on UPN.
     Those also trying to sober up include heroin addict Andrea (TV's
Azura Skye), sex fiend Oliver (TV's Michael O'Malley), and drunk
ex-doctor Daniel (TV's Reni Santoni).  There's the requisite love
interest, drunk baseball pitcher Eddie (Viggo Mortensen), plus the devil
on poor Gwennie's shoulder, boyfriend Jasper (Dominic West), whom she's
left back at home to carouse through the big city while she sobers up.
     Gwen and co. are put through their 12 steps in short order,
hugging, chanting, cleaning, climbing, singing, taking classes, and
bonding with one another over this horrible, horrible disease they all
must learn to deal with.  See Gwen try to charm a horse.  See Gwen's
sister (Elizabeth Perkins) confront her.  See Gwen sob over mother (also
an alky), who died when she was a kid, safely laying the blame off on
someone else.  See audience roll eyes.  Wow, these 28 days really only
feel like 19!
     The whole movie walks a tightrope between farce and melodrama, but
falls liberally into both.  In fact, the only saving graces of the film
come from the caricatures of supporting characters: Steve Buscemi as
Gwen's fallen angel counselor; Alan Tudyk stealing the show as a
flamboyantly gay, vaguely Teutonic basket case.
     Regular readers of filmcritic.com will know that I've never been a
fan of Miss Bullock's work (see also The Net), and her "Golly, I hope I
get an Oscar" performance here doesn't do much to change my opinion.
Director Betty Thomas (The Brady Bunch Movie) is also completely out of
her element.  She even shot six episodes of the faux soap opera "Santa
Cruz" featured as a running gag in the film -- time that might have been
better spent teaching Sandra how to do drama.
     But what am I saying?  I'm just a drunk writer whose only worry is
where his next martini is coming from.  Don't listen to me.  Hey,
bartender!
Director: Betty Thomas
Producer: Jenno Topping
Writer: Susannah Grant
Starring: Sandra Bullock, Viggo Mortensen, Dominic West, Diane Ladd,
Elizabeth Perkins, Steve Buscemi, Azura Skye, Alan Tudyk, Michael
O'Malley
http://www.soapcity.com/28days//
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Braveheart (1995)
     Mel Gibson deserves a lot more credit than I've been giving him.  A
few years ago, no one could have conceived that the action star could pull
off the lead role in a dazzling, epic, historical
adventure-thriller-romance, let alone direct it.  But he does, making
BRAVEHEART a vastly entertaining and powerful film.
     Gibson plays Scottish hero William Wallace, a Scotsman with simple
roots who finds himself thrust into a role as leader of the Scottish revolt
against England in the late 13th century.  After the despicable King Edward
the Longshanks (Edward I) decrees that English nobles will have the right
to sexual relations with all newly-wed Scottish women, the revolution is
set in motion.  Wallace takes up the cause, only to find himself facing
incredible odds against a superior English army and fighting Scottish
nobles who want to negotiate peace instead of fight.  In fact, it's the
nobles who turn out to be the bigger obstacle.
     The film is exquisite in its melding of romance, political intrigue,
and some of the most effective (and gory) battle scenes I've ever watched.
At the forefront is the surprisingly capable portrayal of Wallace by
Gibson, who comes off as such an awesome Everyman hero that he makes Rob
Roy look like a wuss.  Also, the film is so effective at making the English
seem so overwhelmingly evil--*really* evil--that the audience is nearly
ready to rush the screen.  Patrick McGoohan, who plays the embodiment of
this evil in King Edward, deserves an early nod as Best Supporting Actor
for his staggering portrayal.
     The only real problem with the film is that it is *way* too long.
Clocking in at three hours, Gibson spends far too much time on certain
sequences, like the half-hour of Wallace as a child.  While entertaining,
they add little to the picture as a whole, and the long panning shots of
the Scottish highlands, while beautiful, get old after awhile.
     Thematically, BRAVEHEART explores the definitions of honor and
nobility, reinforcing what we've always known:  that true nobility is not
the result of your birthright, but that it arises from the way you live
your life.  It's an excellent reminder that stays with you long after the
film is over, and that is all too rare in Hollywood these days.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
     Little more than an expensive, flashy, and painfully drawn-out season
finale, THE X FILES: FIGHT THE FUTURE has little chance to draw any new fans
to the TV show, if this is the best that can be done.
     The movie opens with Agents Mulder (Duchovny) and Scully (Anderson)
finding themselves on a new assignment after the closing of the X-files.  Of
course, through a bizarre coincidence, their very first assignment leads
them to uncover a conspiracy involving the hiding of bodies of some would-be
aliens.  The plot turns alternately confusing and ridiculous after that.
     It's surprising that a TV show which leaves so much to the imagination
does so little for it in feature film version.  At two hours, X FILES is
really pretty boring.  I found myself falling asleep in the especially dull
first half, only to be revived later by one thing after another that *JUST
DIDN'T MAKE ANY SENSE!*
     For example, if the bad guys went to so much trouble to *blow up a
building* in order to hide four bodies, why were the bodies recovered in
perfect condition?  Why does the road the agents follow on gut instinct
alone lead directly to the bad guys?  Why did a bee wait 24 hours in
Scully's coat before stinging her?  Why does the Syndicate want to destroy
the world - and if it has the power (imminently displayed in the film), then
why don't they just do it!?  Then again, if a vaccine to this destruction
exists (again, displayed in the film), then why don't the good guys just
release *that* into the world?
     Well, you won't find any answers to questions like these in the film. 
In fact, the movie goes a long way toward undoing the mysteries that the TV
show has built up over the last five years.  If this is a portent for the
way things are going to go next season, I'm not sure I'm interested.
     Still, I am a fan, and there's enough juice to sustain a fan's interest
for awhile.  It ain't much, but watching Scully and Mulder inch closer
romantically, and seeing some cool special effects is worth the price of
admission.
     (Recommended only for fans of the show; casual viewers needn't bother.)
Director: Rob Bowman
Producer: Chris Carter, Daniel Sackheim
Writer: Chris Carter
Starring: David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, Blythe Danner,
Armin Meuller-Stahl
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Gossip (2000/I)
     I have quickly found myself tiring of the peculiar tedium of the
gritty twentysomething whodunit.  While I'll fess up to having liked
Cruel Intentions, recent films like Body Shots and The Skulls have left
a sour taste in my mouth.
     While it's hard to pinpoint why Gossip is so uncompelling, the
fault lies mainly in a script that wants to be a thriller but is
structured like a thrills-free 80's romance/drama.  The premise itself
isn't awful: Three cliquish college students (Norman Reedus, James
Marsden, and Lena Headey) get their rocks off by making up rumors about
their classmates.  "Oops!" when one of these gossipy snickerings gets
out of hand, finding Beau (Joshua Jackson) arrested for the rape of his
girlfriend Naomi (Kate Hudson) -- a crime he didn't commit!  (Gasp!)
     After being twist-free for 30 minutes, we're thrown for a loop
involving a past relationship between Derrick (Marsden) and Naomi, with
James (Headey) playing amateur detective.  None of this goes very far...
in fact, the long stretches of confrontation among the principals (that
make up the bulk of the film) start out as silly and end up as just
boring.  The acting is fine; it's the script that stinks.
     The lack of attention to detail in Gossip is astonishing, as well.
Most annoying is: Why does Lena Headey speak with a thick French accent
despite her character's firm insistence that she's a working-class girl
from Plymouth?  Where does Sharon Lawrence's investigator disappear to
halfway into the movie?  And what's up with Eric Bogosian???
     The answer may lie in the credit "Executive Producer: Joel
Schumacher," but Gossip simply feels like a rush job that never should
have been made with the script in hand.  Four stars for a decent idea;
one for execution.  And minus another star for a Web site that claims
you need to download 20MB worth of files just to enter.  Skip the
site... and the movie.
Director: Davis Guggenheim
Producer: Robert F. Newmyer, Jeffrey Silver
Writer: Gregory Poirier, Theresa Rebeck
Starring: Eric Bogosian, Marisa Coughlan, Lena Headey, Kate Hudson,
Joshua Jackson, Sharon Lawrence, James Marsden, Edward James Olmos,
Norman Reedus

Title
Review for Restoration (1995)
     Robert Downey's schizophrenic personality has finally found a home in
RESTORATION.  This sweeping film, set in 1660 England during the reign of
the flamboyant Charles II (Sam Neill), tells the story of Merivel
(Downey), who rides a rollercoaster from volunteer surgeon to King's
veterinarian, to his fall from grace and his eventual rebirth.
     Merivel, the kind of guy who pawns his medical instruments to buy
time with prostitutes, starts out as a pretty loathsome chap.  However,
he's also a pretty talented (and daring) physician, and after healing the
King's beloved spaniel, he is brought into the fold of nobility.  But the
story then takes an inexplicable turn as Merivel is given a knighthood and
coerced to marry the King's mistress, Celia (Polly Walker), and then
promptly falls in love with her.
     And just when you get used to this, he is discovered and cast out,
penniless.  Merivel returns to caring for the poor with his old friend
Pearce (David Thewlis), and falls in love with one of his insane patients,
Katherine (Meg Ryan, cast as an Irish mental patient, if you can imagine
that).  And then there's the plague and the big fire that burned down
London, and Merivel somehow comes out of this a hero and a changed man to
boot.
     A downright silly script is the fundamental flaw in RESTORATION. 
What starts out as a funny, genuine character-driven drama quickly
degenerates into a couple of bland love stories that don't even fit
together.  There's a lot of good acting here (with the notable exception
of Ryan), but the parts don't give the stars a lot of room to work. 
Neill's King Charles is a true standout, pulling off the dichotomy between
royal grace and bawdy humor with ease.
     RESTORATION is also one of the most exquisitely rendered period
pieces I've ever seen, replete with fully-laden palaces and disgustingly
realistic plague victims.  But details do not a movie make, and
all-in-all, RESTORATION comes across as a film in which the sum of the
parts is much greater than the picture as a whole.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Big Momma's House (2000)
     Oh, to have been a fly on the wall when Big Momma's House was
cooked up....  Dress funnyman Martin Lawrence up as a 350-pound Georgia
grandmother, spin him around, and let him do his thang.  Beat Eddie
Murphy at his own game (The Nutty Professor II hits theaters later this
year), shoot it for cheap with no other real stars, and grab some good
grosses.
     Sure enough, Big Momma's House is a comic crowd-pleaser that should
score well with audiences that refuse to tire of incessant fat jokes,
slapstick, and, well, more fat jokes.
     So, how do we get Martin to dress up as a fat woman?  Naturally,
he's not just a crack FBI agent, he's also a master of disguise.  Ethan
Hunt, look out!  When a case involving a prison escapee and a few
million dollars of missing booty (er, no pun intended) comes around,
it's up to intrepid Martin to go deep undercover as "Big Momma," the
grandmother of our convict's estranged girlfriend (Nia Long) who may or
may not be hiding the cash.  Yikes!
     Naturally, this "plot" is pure throwaway, mainly serving to break
up the scenes in which Martin-as-Big Momma tries to cook soul food,
plays basketball, "testifies" in church, and nuzzles up to his/her
erstwhile granddaughter.  Will the convict show up just as the real Big
Momma returns home from a trip?  Will Martin get the girl?  I'd love to
say that Big Momma's House is full of surprises, but I think you're
getting the picture by now.  The mental flashbacks of Mrs. Doubtfire
don't help matters, either.
     Now there's nothing wrong with physical comedy.  Seeing Martin's
faux boob appear on his shoulder is awfully funny, until about 45
minutes of the same joke being repeated ad nauseam.  Paul Giamatti adds
a curious levity to the picture, and Long's femme fatale is at least
good for eye candy.  But the producers messed up one tiny detail when
they put this picture together:  Whoever decided to put Bad Boy Martin
Lawrence in a PG-13 neo-family production ought to be forced to watch
the end result over and over again until they figure out that Lawrence's
strengths are not in his fat ass, but in his big mouth.
Director: Raja Gosnell
Producer: David T. Friendly, Michael Green
Writer: Darryl Quarles, Don Rhymer
Starring: Martin Lawrence, Nia Long, Paul Giamatti, Terrence Dashon
Howard
http://www.bigmommashousemovie.com/
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
     Sadly, URBAN LEGEND will be another forgotten entry into the teen
horror revival fad of the late 1990's, and with good reason.
     Despite putting together one of the better ensembles of young actors
(basically, it's all the leftovers from hip TV shows that haven't yet been
slaughtered on camera, including "My So-Called Life"'s Jared Leto), a really
dumb script and lifeless direction causes URBAN LEGEND to fail the singular,
critical test of horror films:  It's not scary.
     Even the "hip jokes" are not hip, and they're not funny....  In fact,
it's only the self-referential humor (a rumor about "that girl in that
Noxzema commercial," referring to Gayheart; a blip of Paula Cole's signature
tune when Jackson(of TV's "Dawson's Creek") flips on the radio) that keeps
URBAN LEGEND above a total disaster.
     The plot is something about a serial killer reenacting a bunch of urban
legends (guy with axe in back seat, killer calling on a phone inside the
house, et al.), but it's barely memorable.  It isn't scary in any case.
     Of course, the *only* reason I even bothered to see this film is
because it stars the radiant Alicia Witt, who I could watch for two hours
doing the laundry.  In fact, I think I would have *preferred* the movie be
completely about Witt doing her laundry....  I'll have to pitch that to a
studio someday.  But I digress.
Director: Jamie Blanks
Producer: Gina Matthews, Michael McDonnell, Neil H. Moritz
Writer: Sylvio Horta, Don Roos
Starring: Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Jared Leto, Joshua Jackson
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/jump/urbanlegend.html
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Skulls, The (2000)
     A secret society so powerful it can get away with murder.  A secret
society so exclusive it firebrands everyone who joins with its mark.  A
secret society so secret... it has a big logo up on top of the
building!?
     You know something is rotten with THE SKULLS right from the
get-go.  I mean, what self-respecting prep school-Ivy League snob would
join an organization with a name as stupid as "The Skulls"?  Well, Luke
(Joshua Jackson) would be, for one.  Only he's no preppie.  He's a
"townie" with no money, but even though he's of the Lower Classes, since
he's such a good rower (yes, "the skulls," I get it), he's a shoo-in for
the secret society.  A mysterious invitation arrives, and Luke is
whisked into a world of power and money, where men in red robes usher in
beautiful women for the taking at tuxedoed parties.  Before you can
utter "Fidelio," Luke has become One of Them.
     Luke is soon partnered with a "soul mate" (not making that up),
Caleb Mandrake (MEET THE DEEDLES' Paul Walker) with whom he is supposed
to keep no secrets.  But uh-oh! when Luke's roommate gets jealous and
threatens to expose the entire society when he steals Caleb's key to the
secret chambers (remember, that big skull on the roof points the way
in).
     A cover-up ensues and Luke romances "Popular" star Leslie Bibb, and
then come a grand series of plot twists so asinine you'll want to join
in with the laughter and mockery of the audience if only doing so didn't
make this movie even worse.  Its desperate earnestness makes it even
more laughable (with none other than Craig T. "Coach" Nelson lording
over it all), and by the time 45 minutes are up, you'll probably be
ready to leave.  I know I was.
     Unfortunately, teens don't read movie reviews, so this critique
will likely be lost on anyone who cares.  Would that they would put
their collective foot down.  The last thing we need is another bad movie
that simply serves as an excuse to sell a soundtrack.
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Ben-Hur (1959)
Scratch that. Ben-Hur is no stupid gladiator movie.  As the title
sequence tells us, this is "A tale of our Christ," an unabashed
religious fable, albeit one that only shows its hero from the back.
Of course, Jesus is not the real subject of this tale, it's Judah
Ben-Hur, a Jewish prince living in Judea, played by the incomparable
Charlton Heston.  Ben-Hur lives high on the hog, here in the year 26, as
we're told.  And he's a good guy, nice to his slaves and everything. 
But woe be unto Judah when the Romans step up their military presence in
his territory.  Despite their being led by his old friend Massala
(Stephen Boyd, who never starred in another big hit after Ben-Hur),
tensions run high, and when some tiles accidentally fall from Ben-Hur's
roof, nearly hitting the new Governor of Judea, Judah is quickly
sentenced without trial to hard labor, rowing in the galleys of the
Roman navy.
>From prince to slave he goes, and because of his endless compassion,
Ben-Hur finds himself legally adopted by a Roman nobleman whose life he
has saved years later.  He practices his charioteering, and soon enough
he is at liberty to avenge not only his imprisonment, but that of his
mother and sister as well.  That vengeance, as any moviegoer knows,
takes place on the chariot course in a sequence so famous, dramatic, and
long it consumes 10 chapters of the film's 61-chapter DVD release.
At 3 1/2 full hours of running time, you aren't likely to find another
G-rated film that kids will hate more than Ben-Hur.  Even as an
(ostensible) adult, I'm torn on the film.  It's not particularly
well-written.  The music is heavy-handed and grates on the ears.  The
story is far-fetched and lacks proper editing.  And it's 3 1/2 hours
long.
But don't mind me.  Nominated for 12 Oscars, Ben-Hur won 11, a record. 
Shot on 65mm super-widescreen film, it is one of the most resplendent
films you'll ever see (check out the new DVD release if you don't
believe me -- it also includes a documentary about the making of the
film and a commentary track by Heston).  And Heston is unforgettable
(the rest of the cast is another story).  Moviegoers agreed, when
Ben-Hur's grosses saved MGM from bankruptcy.  (Warner Brothers has the
rights now.)
All told, I'm content to let the overly dramatic theatrics of Ben-Hur
fall by the wayside (case in point: after four years in prison,
Ben-Hur's sister and mother develop leprosy -- and who do we know that
can cure leprosy, hmmmmm).  Instead, I'll sit back and take my place in
the stands for that thundering chariot race.  Hell, that's better than a
cruddy, overrated gladiator picture any day.
Director: William Wyler
Producer: Sam Zimbalist
Writer: Karl Tunberg
Starring: Charlton Heston, Jack Hawkins, Haya Harareet, Stephen Boyd,
Hugh Griffith, Martha Scott, Cathy O'Donnell, Sam Jaffe, Finlay Currie
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
A note to filmmakers who want to make a movie about a war:  Please
understand that your film does not need to be as long as the actual war
itself.  We will not hold it against you if it's shorter.  As such, I
will try to keep this review to a length where you can read it in a few
minutes.
The Patriot gives Mel Gibson the opportunity to do something he's never
done before:  To orate at length about the evils of taxation without
representation... oh, okay... and to kill a bunch of damn redcoats!!!
Faced with the death of his wife, The Patriot offers us Gibson the
widower pacifist, playing the part of South Carolina colonialist
Benjamin Martin, unswayed by arguments that war should be initiated
against Britain.  When his son Gabriel (Heath Ledger) enlists despite
his father's forbiddance, Martin is left at home to raise his other six
kids while the war rages around him.
Circumstances arise to take the life of one of the children at the hands
of the uber-evil redcoat Colonel Tavington (Jason Isaacs), which awakens
the repressed blood lust in the former soldier Martin.  Perhaps one of
the best battle scenes ever filmed follows, with Martin and two of his
kids picking off 20 redcoats in the forest, leaving Martin covered in
gore.
The Patriot soon becomes the epic it was intended to be, with grand
colonial battles fought by lines of soldiers politely shooting at one
another until one side is dead.  But Martin (an amalgam of several real
Revolutionaries) brings dirty guerilla tactics to the war, and after
forming a militia of scrappy mercenaries, soon he's got General
Cornwallis (Tom Wilkinson) running scared.
While The Patriot will draw obvious comparisons to Braveheart, it is
actually far more reminiscent of Kevin Costner's Robin Hood sprinkled
with a bit of The Last of the Mohicans.  Martin lives in the woods and
attacks the Brits in small groups, absconding with their booty.  There's
even a holy man (Rene Auberjonois) and a foreigner (Tchéky Karyo, in a
great supporting turn as a French sympathizer) who fight alongside the
rebels.
This turns out to be a good thing, because God knows we don't need
another Braveheart.  The Patriot also turns out to be a message movie,
filled with issues regarding honor vs. survival, vengeance vs.
forgiveness, negotiation vs. war, and glory vs. sacrifice.  This isn't
just some ordinary war movie.  It's deep, with John Williams' score
driving the heart-tugging home and Roland Emmerich's direction not
getting in the way.  And I say all that in a rare moment of non-sarcasm.
Unfortunately, at close to three hours in length, The Patriot has plenty
of time to get hokey.  The bad guy is drawn as broadly as a Bond
villain, and a gaggle of subplots don't add much to the film, just
making it unnecessarily longer.  The anti-slavery motif is especially
hokey and unneeded.
But, as usual, I quibble.  The Patriot, against all expectations, is
probably the best movie I've seen this summer to date.  And where else
can a German director and an Australian star put together a movie about
the Revolutionary War.  Ah, only in America.
Director: Roland Emmerich
Producer: Dean Devlin
Writer: Robert Rodat
Starring: Mel Gibson, Heath Ledger, Joely Richardson, Jason Isaacs,
Chris Cooper, Tchéky Karyo, Rene Auberjonois, Lisa Brenner, Tom
Wilkinson, Donal Logue
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Georgia (1995)
     It may be a movie about family rivalry in the music world, but this
ain't The Judds.  With the amount of dysfunctionality in GEORGIA, The
Jackson Five is a little more like it.
     GEORGIA (Mare Winningham) is the older of two singing sisters, one of
those talented ultra-folky types with a huge following and who sings songs
with choruses like "No more haaaaaard tiiiiiiimes."  Sadie (Jennifer Jason
Leigh) is the pariah of the family (and is much more interesting)--a
strung-out heroin addict with a voice more reminiscent of Johnny Rotten
than Joan Baez and who has a penchant for hacking up cover songs.  As
Sadie puts it, "I sing."  Well, sort of.
     Sadie can't keep a steady gig (not even the local bowling alley), so
she grudgingly turns to sister Georgia for help.  As the perennial black
sheep of the family, Sadie makes a mess of everything--from crashing her
sister's performances to impulsively marrying her sole groupie (Max
Perlich)--and finally ends up in a much-needed detox center.
     While GEORGIA starts strong, hinting at what could have been a
cathartic showdown between the two sisters, the film whimpers off into
lifeless boredom after about half an hour.  The melodramatics here are
shameful, not because they're over-emotional, but because they're just
dull.  In fact, during the big sob story confessionals and soliloquies the
sisters repeatedly engage in, I just quit listening.
     Pieces of the movie are fun and/or funny, and, while I'm probably
disturbed in thinking this, when Sadie spoils Georgia's shows, it's a lot
better than watching another boring old folk singer croon.  Sadie's big
finish is an 8 1/2-minute (note to director: *bad* idea) rendition of Van
Morrison's "Take Me Back" in front of 2000 listeners.  This is supposed to
show us the bared and tortured soul of Sadie, but instead it reveals
merely that those movie theater seats are damn uncomfortable.
     So unless you're just dying to hear Velvet Underground tunes played
(badly) at bar mitzvahs, I'd recommend keeping this GEORGIA off your mind.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Art of Amália, The (1999)
     I don't know Fado from Fabian, but I do know what makes a good
documentary.  Regardless of how flattering your opinion is of legendary
Portuguese singer Amália Rodrigues, you owe it to yourself to separate
her talents from the movie that documents them, because the film clearly
doesn't do her justice.
     The Art of Amália starts with promise, with ex-Talking Head David
Byrne waxing earnestly about when he first heard Rodrigues's music.  But
the film abruptly detours after that one minute, becoming a strictly
linear monologue telling the story her life.  The picture is more boring
than a history textbook.  Why?  Because little in Amália's life was or
is extraordinary.  We wander, year by year, from her early days as a
nightclub singer to her career in cinema to more singing to the many
awards she's won and finally... to more singing.  And poof, the story is
over.  Ready for The Madonna Story, anyone?
     If you think I'm just a naysayer, consider a film like Theremin: An
Electronic Odyssey, which documented the life of a musician but did it
with style, despite the fact that the audience had never heard of the
man.  Amália was never kidnapped in her sleep.  Amália was not in the
KGB.  Nothing much happened in her life that's film-worthy at all. 
Amália sang and she sang a lot.  And while she was very good at it, that
doesn't mean it makes a great film.
     Then again, neither do slow zooms on newspaper clippings,
advertisements bearing her name, and still photographs, plus interviews
with some of the most poorly-spoken people ever to grace the screen. 
The production values are nonexistent.  The narration is banal and
obvious.
     Ultimately, even big fans of Amália are going to be disappointed
with The Art of Amália, the sole bright spot being her Fado music, which
is heartfelt and tears at the soul.  Some 60 songs are rendered by her,
in whole or in part, throughout the 90-minute film, and they're
certainly pleasing to the ears... provided you're tuning out the rest of
the picture.
http://www.arcofilms.com/amalia/index.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Extreme Measures (1996)
     It's an old question of what's right and what's wrong:  if you
could cure a disease by killing one person, would you do it?  That's
basically the premise which starts up EXTREME MEASURES, an ultra-creepy
little medical thriller by prolific filmmaker Michael Apted.
     If you can deal with the notion of Hugh Grant as a doctor, you've
probably suspended disbelief enough to buy the whole production.  Dr.
Guy Luthan (Grant) finds a mystery patient in his trauma room at
Gramercy Hospital.  When the patient dies from a bizarre collection of
symptoms, no one seems to care except for the dashing British doc.
     Guy's investigation leads him into a conspiratorial cover-up in the
hospital system, an underground dwelling of human moles, and a cryptic
research lab where groundbreaking medicine is practiced -- on human
subjects.  What's more is that the head of the research lab is none
other than Dr. Lawrence Myrick (Gene Hackman), one of the country's most
respected physicians.
     Blending the right amount of "medical" with just enough "thriller,"
EXTREME MEASURES succeeds in giving the audience the willies from its
opening scenes.  Danny Elfman's creepiest score to date does a lot to
help out, too, and Hackman is always good at getting you squirming in
your seat.  Lots of blood, surgical scars, and seizures are even more
effective, giving cause to wonder, where was David Lynch when this movie
was being made?
     Performances are fair to good, with the exception of supporting
player Sarah Jessica Parker, who really isn't at home playing an
unglamorous nurse.  The 2-hour film moves along quite well, too, never
getting too caught up in boring exposition while keeping the viewer
informed with just enough backstory.  On the other hand, there's not a
whole lot of "thrill" to the picture, just background discomfort that's
scarier than any horror flick.
     Overall an above average movie, but EXTREME MEASURES gets bonus
points for exposing the harsh truth about physicians and confirming my
worst fears:  they really are all evil.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Get Shorty (1995)
     The cryptic title of GET SHORTY should forewarn you of the confusion
to come when the film actually starts.  To be honest, I *still* don't
really know what it's supposed to mean.  Initially, I was pretty excited
about the prospects for GET SHORTY:  it's John Travolta's much-anticipated
follow-up to PULP FICTION; great actors Gene Hackman and Rene Russo both
star; the well-regarded Elmore Leonard penned the novel that the movie is
based on.  What a disappointment!
     The story goes:  Travolta is Chili Palmer, a small time Miami hood, a
"shylock" whose job is essentially coercing money out of people.  His boss
sends Chili on a chase for some questionably-raised funds; in Vegas,
another contact sends him to L.A. to track down an entirely unrelated
debtor, Harry Zimm (Hackman).  And there are a few drug dealers who have
their payoff stuck in a locker at LAX.
     With all this money lying around, someone has the bright idea to
produce a movie.  Actually, *everyone* has the bright idea to produce a
movie--Chili, Zimm, Zimm's leading lady (Russo), the drug dealers, you
name it.  Somehow Danny DeVito gets wrapped up in all this, and of course,
it's nothing but wacky hijinks until we get to the tidy ending!
     While it's fun to watch Chili get caught up in the Hollywood scene
and continually pitch this oddly familiar movie (it's a movie about a
shylock's trip to L.A. to track down some absconded cash), it's not so
much fun to watch 80 different plotlines convolute around what should have
been, at its heart, an innovative and simple story.  The sheer volume of
information presented in GET SHORTY is just way too much to absorb in 2
hours, and it results in a talky, sanitized, often boring, tragicomedy
that begins to fade from memory as soon as you leave the theater.
     There are a few plusses to GET SHORTY.  The direction is good and the
acting is solid for the most part, and while I genuinely like Travolta,
he's beginning to become a caricature of himself, a la Jim Carrey.  Will
Vinnie Barbarino ever die?  By the looks of it, certainly not anytime
soon.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Associate, The (1996)
     There's a few legendary scripts among screenwriting circles --
scripts that people would *love* to rip off, if they could figure out
how:  WITNESS, CHINATOWN, NETWORK.  And then there's TOOTSIE, the queen
mother of comedy scripts, that gets ripped off all the time.
     THE ASSOCIATE is boilerplate TOOTSIE, lifting the entire plot
structure from Dorothy's television world and dropping it on Wall
Street, where Whoopi Goldberg finds herself forced to impersonate a man
(named Cutty after Cutty Sark scotch) in order to be taken seriously.
     If you want to know all about it, just rent TOOTSIE, and you'll
meet the principals of THE ASSOCIATE -- the confident (Dianne Wiest),
the would-be-if-I-weren't-the-same-sex lover (Bebe Neuwirth), the rival
(Tim Daly), and the wacky gang who fall for the trick.  And you'll see
familiar scenes -- Cutty is almost exposed, Cutty evades woman on the
prowl, Cutty's big finish.
     Whatever.  If THE ASSOCIATE were a *lot* funnier this might be
forgivable, accent on might.  As it is, THE ASSOCIATE is a relatively
juvenile hit-and-miss affair that makes sexism look like it's just wacky
hijinks.  And more demerits for using stupid, not-remotely-realistic
technology as a plot device.
     Thank God the cast is good, with the exception of a miscast Daly
(as a cutthroat Wall Street guy?).  Dianne Wiest is awfully appealing in
a Mrs. Claus sort-of way, and let me say right now that I see Bebe
Neuwirth (you know, Frasier Crane's stodgy ex-wife) in a *completely*
different light.  And Goldberg... is Goldberg.  If you like her, in
general, you'll probably like her here, too.
     Well, this is already more ink than this film deserves.  Three
stars on its merits; docked a half for blatant shamelessness.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Forget Paris (1995)
     It's a shame that so many romantic comedies are in current release,
because inevitably, something good is going to be overlooked due to the
cinematic glut of warm fuzzies.  As the third of its type in about as many
weeks, FORGET PARIS is one of the strongest entries of the genre.
     Billy Crystal directs and stars in this Baby Boomer romantic fable
about a pair of star-crossed lovers (Crystal, as Mickey, and Debra Winger,
as Ellen) who can't seem to get their relationship right.  Going through a
dozen iterations of "boy meets girl, boy loses girl," the couple's story
is told through a narrative from their friends over dinner.
     Mickey is a tempestuous basketball referee (and some of the film's
funniest moments are with him on the courts with the
players--unfortunately, they have been overplayed ad nauseum in the film's
trailers).  Ellen is the newly found love of his life, an American
expatriate working in Paris for an airline which loses Mickey's dead
father, who is being flown to France for his burial.
     What follows is Woody Allen-esque hilarity.  The couple really click
and finally get together.  Ellen leaves Paris to be with Mickey.  Mickey
quits his traveling ref job to be with Ellen.  Ellen's father moves in. 
No one is happy, and one thing after another conspires against our tragic
couple to keep things from getting better.  The bulk of the film is their
various attempts at working things out, none of which seem to work.
     Crystal and Winger (cast against type and pulling it off well) have
some great chemistry, and they play off each other perfectly with
characteristic sarcasm.  Using the friends as a narrative plot device is
weak, but it is understated enough not to distract you from the rest of
the picture.
     As a romance, FORGET PARIS is hauntingly realistic and downright
hilarious, and although it gets a bit silly in places (as is expected when
Crystal is around), it doesn't flinch in showing you the unglamorous flip
side to the Hollywood Ending.  I'd wager that most of the audience will
leave the theater with a "been there, done that" sentiment that balances
the comedy perfectly.  Don't miss it.

Title
Review for Zamani barayé masti asbha (2000)
     On the Iranian side of the Kurdish border with Iraq, a young boy
names Ayoub (Ayoub Ahmadi) -- along with three brothers and two sisters
-- toil away as day-laboring book smugglers while their father (also a
smuggler) is gone at work.  Tragedy strikes when they learn that
littlest brother, three-year old Madi (Mehdi Ekhtiar-Dini) will die in a
month from an unknown illness, and that only an immediate operation will
extend his life, a few extra months, at that.
     Ayoub's sister Ameneh (Ameneh Ekhtiar-Dini) agrees to marry an
Iraqi if the groom's family pays for Madi's operation.  A deal is
struck, but the mother-in-law backs out as she wants nothing to do with
the dying kid, so she gives the family a mule instead.  It's up to Ayoub
to get Madi and the mule over the frozen mountains to Iraq, where he can
sell the animal to raise money for the operation.
     I'm sure life really is like this for the Kurds, but I'm really not
sure I care to watch a movie about it.  In case you haven't figured it
out from the rather morose plot summary, A Time for Drunken Horses is
one of the most boring and utterly uninspired films ever put to
celluloid, redeemed only by its zippy 77-minute running time and the few
scenes where the smugglers' horses are getting drunk -- hence the title
-- in order to be coerced into walking through the snow.  Seriously,
there is not even an ending to rally around.  There's not even an ending
at all.  The movie just stops, like they ran out of money.
     As for Bahman Ghobadi's filmmaking, there's a lot left to be
desired, too.  While no one in front of or behind the camera has much
obvious talent (though Ghobadi's direction is at least competent), the
biggest razz is earned by the subtitles, which give you the distinct
impression you're missing an awful lot.  Worse than a dubbed Kung Fu
movie, we probably get to read a subtitle for one line out of every four
spoken.  Then again, maybe additional titles weren't required since
nothing much was happening.  Or maybe the translator just didn't
understand Kurdish.
     Now, I'm sure if my life were pathetic enough that I had to
inebriate a horse to raise money for my kid brother's operation or I had
to hear other kids shrug and say things like, "No, my dad and his mule
were blown up by a mine," this movie might have contained some appeal. 
But as it stands, very few viewers are going to be inspired to wake up
long enough to feel empathy for these poor characters, brave though they
might be.
     Maybe Ghobadi could go back to the drawing board and make a movie
just about drunken horses.  Now that would be something to sit up for.
http://film.sgfilmseries.com/drunken.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
     There's nothing more annoying than a music geek.  You know, the
kind of guy who hangs out in record stores reminiscing about Camper Van
Beethoven, Stereolab, and the roots of Green Day.
     As such, a movie full of music geeks may seem a little unbearable,
and in a lot of ways, HIGH FIDELITY is.  That it manages to often redeem
itself is the biggest surprise in the movie, and not for the reasons you
might think.
     Let's start out with what doesn't work.  For starters, purist fans
of Nick Hornby's novel will be disappointed to find their favorite
record store moved from England to Chicago.  John Cusack's Rob is, of
course, not British -- he's a typical Yank with a perpetually broken
heart.  Rob spends much (or all) of the film narrating to the screen, as
if the moviegoer is in the room with him, wherever he goes.  This gets
old, awfully fast, quickly losing its charm and becoming obvious as a
crutch used to mask lazy, sloppy writing.
     Rob is also as shallow as they come.  He lives his life like a
Billboard chart.  Everything is a "top five," and the movie centers
around his current girlfriend Laura (the fittingly unknown Iben Hjejle
-- her real name!) leaving him, thus entering the charts as his #5
Heartbreaker.
     The problem isn't really Rob's shallowness; it's that Laura turns
out to be pretty worthless as well.  Hjejle clearly has no chemistry
with Cusack, and her character has no redeeming qualities either except
that "she smells good."  (And you have to take Cusack's word on that.)
On the road to getting Laura back, Rob visits the rest of the top 5
heartbreakers -- including Catherine Zeta-Jones and Lili Taylor, but
nothing really comes of this.  The song of Rob's life remains utterly
the same.  (There's even an inexplicable fling with Lisa Bonet of "The
Cosby Show" fame, particularly ironic since the 80's standard is mocked
elsewhere in the film.)
     Fortunately, throw Jack Black (best known as Matthew Broderick's
friend in THE CABLE GUY) into any of the above scenes and it becomes a
laugh riot.  You will forget about the rest of the movie (think EMPIRE
RECORDS grown up) when Black struts his stuff.  The man should kill Adam
Sandler and takeover his life as a real comedian.  Demure newcomer Todd
Louiso, like Black an employee in Rob's record store, provides excellent
counterpoint to Black's over-the-top character.  Literally, the scenes
in Rob's store are so funny they make you forget about the rest of the
film.
     A hilarious supporting role by a pony-tailed Tim Robbins
notwithstanding, that "rest of the film" is pretty much a drag.  It's
uniformly shallow and vapid, and the reliance on Hjejle (imagine Mia
Farrow with a bad haircut and a language barrier) to carry a lead role
was a fatal error for HIGH FIDELITY's producers.  All the talk of
avant-garde bands may make you envious of the boundless musical
knowledge these guys possess.  Or, like me, you may just want to skip to
the tracks you like.
Director: Stephen Frears
Producer: Tim Bevan, Rudd Simmons
Writer: D.V. DeVincentis, Steve Pink, John Cusack, Scott Michael
Rosenberg
Starring: John Cusack, Jack Black, Lisa Bonet, Joelle Carter, Joan
Cusack, Sara Gilbert, Iben Hjejle, Todd Louiso, Lili Taylor, Natasha
Wagner, Chris Rehmann, Tim Robbins, Catherine Zeta-Jones
http://studio.go.com/movies/highfidelity/index.html
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
     Ah, the perils of being a billionaire these days.  Million dollar
mergers, on-site tailors, gourmet meals every night... and the thrill of
stealing priceless works of art just to see if you can get away with it.
     If you can relate to this heady premise, you'll love THE THOMAS
CROWN AFFAIR.  A loose remake of the 1968 THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR, this
version pits Pierce Brosnan and Rene Russo against each other in a game
of cat-and-cat.  Brosnan is Thomas Crown, an uber-wealthy NYC tycoon
with an art fetish.  Russo is Catherine Banning, a semi-rogue insurance
investigator who instantly pegs Crown as the thief when the local Monet
goes missing.
     Crown and Catherine then begin the dance of
you-like-me-don't-you-I-thought-so that the too too rich obviously play
every night.  I don't think it's giving away too much to say there's a
scene in which Russo writhes naked while being doused in gin.
     While Brosnan carries this picture entirely on his shoulders (in
fact, I've never seen Brosnan in anything that wasn't fairly good at
least), it's Russo that weighs down this AFFAIR to an extreme.  From the
get-go, it's obvious that Crown has all the cards over Catherine, and
Brosnan's prowess as an actor similarly leaves Russo in the dust.  And
while Russo's hairstyles have obviously been the subject of much
forethought, she always has on too much makeup and just doesn't look the
part of the femme fatale with her enormous, square jaw.  That the entire
movie is shot in extreme close-up doesn't help matters.
     Russo and a tacky Hollywood ending aside, THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR
is a fun and lively thriller with hardly an explosion to wow you.  And
while the asinine ENTRAPMENT visited this exact same premise earlier
this year, and I mean the *exact* same premise, discerning viewers are
bound to appreciate the intelligence with which this film has been
crafted.
Director: John McTiernan
Producer: Pierce Brosnan, Beau St. Clair
Writer: Leslie Dixon, Kurt Wimmer
Starring: Pierce Brosnan, Rene Russo, Denis Leary, Ben Gazzara, Frankie
Faison, Faye Dunaway
http://www.mgm.com/thethomascrownaffair/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Summer Catch (2001)
Kids today, they don't just want to see heartthrob and master thespian
Freddie Prinze Jr. loving on the ladies.  No, they want to see him doing
something that takes a little more in the acting department: namely,
playing baseball.
Through a series of drippy voiceovers, we are informed that there's no
better proving ground for Major League Baseball than the Cape Cod summer
baseball leagues, where college also-rans and hopeful dropouts go to
play in the hopes of attracting big league attention.  Our man Freddie
has landed a spot as a pitcher on the prestigious Chatham A's, where he
is hoping for his big break.
It's only after he is given ample time to show off his abs and scamper
about in a woman's thong (don't ask) that we learn what the real story
of Summer Catch will be: That Prinze is a poor townie named Ryan Dunne,
struggling to make a name for himself; that neither his father (Fred
Ward) nor brother (Jason Gedrick) pulled themselves out of their blue
collar jobs and resent anyone who tries; and that the local beauty
Tenley -- Tenley! (Jessica Biel) -- is so far out of his league that he
probably shouldn't even bother... but of course he makes a play for her.
Summer Catch also makes an abortive stab at another half a dozen
subplots -- the jealousy of fellow townie and brazen slut Dee Dee
(Brittany Murphy), the alienation felt by Ryan's non-baseball playing
best friend (Gabriel Mann), or the fat chick fetish of fellow player
Miles (Marc Blucas).  Worst of these is a ludicrous bit involving That
'70s Show's Wilmer Valderrama and Beverly D'Angelo, both of whom appear
in the film simply to provide a nutty Mrs. Robinson-like substory and to
remind you of how much better done that was in Bull Durham.
In fact, virtually all of Summer Catch feels like it's been done better
somewhere else.  For starters, the film has a major question of
identity.  It's definitely not a sports movie, and it fails pretty
miserably at being a romance.  The worst part is the amateurish script
(co-written by an Arli$$ writing alumnus and a guy that starred in
Leprechaun 3), chock-full of phony emotion.  By the end, it all becomes
a platform for each character to deliver a soliloquy to Ryan that he
must take to heart.  Dad is on hand to give fatherly yet drunken
advice.  Coach (Brian Dennehy, just loving the fact that he's got some
work on the big screen) is on hand to give the curmudgeonly
counterpoint.  Ryan's catcher (Matthew Lillard, playing himself again)
is on hand to tell Ryan to "play catch" with him and make fun of the fat
fetish guy.  Ryan's stoner best friend is on hand to give the
go-get-'em-tiger-we're-behind-you talk.  And the girlfriend is on hand
to give heartwarming-nuzzly-follow-your-dreams counsel.  Before long,
you start to wonder: Is Freddy Prinze Jr. is capable of having a thought
of his own?
The only real joy in the film is found in Biel's character, and not just
because of the skimpy outfits, which are also usually wet.  She's the
only one in the movie that is able to do much with her role, taking the
rebelling-against-daddy character to at least a passing grade.  When
she's on screen, the time flies by.  When she's not, you realize that
for some ungodly reason this movie is almost two hours long.  For a
PG-13 teen romance (despite near-constant sexual innuendo), one has to
ask Warner Brothers: what were you thinking???
For her part, Biel has fallen so far from her 7th Heaven roots that she
has almost become Denise Richards.  Hollywood is either about to eat her
alive... or vice versa.  Either way, good luck, Jessica.  As for
Freddie, if he keeps pumping teen romances out at the rate of two a
year, Prinze's next "summer catch" is liable to be a venereal disease.
Director: Michael Tollin
Producer: Brian Robbins, Michael Tollin, Sam Weisman
Writer: Kevin Falls, John Gatins
Starring: Freddie Prinze Jr., Jessica Biel, Matthew Lillard, Fred Ward,
Jason Gedrick, Brittany Murphy, Gabriel Mann, Bruce Davison, Brian
Dennehy
http://summercatch.warnerbros.com
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Plein soleil (1960)
     Thirty-six years after its release, PURPLE NOON is back as part of
Martin Scorsese's revival of underseen foreign classics.
     This time out it's Rene Clement's mystery-drama about wealthy jerk
Phillippe, his adoring (but poor) best friend Tom (Alain Delon), and the
redhead (Marge) they both adore (Marie Laforet).  Caught up in the greed
and envy that comes along with wealth like Phillippe's, Tom hatches a plot
to rid the world of Phillippe and take over his life.  Fine, well, the only
suprising thing about this is how quickly he succeeds at the plan (after
about 30 minutes) -- at which point, the movie becomes one of Tom hatching
part 2 of the plan... and the movie starts to get interesting.
     Tom soon finds his plan to be not quite as well-laid as previously
thought, and it becomes trickier and trickier for him to evade discovery.
Carrying on two lives (Phillippe's and his own), is not for the weak-willed.
     While PURPLE NOON lacks the edge-of-your-seat suspense that modern
thrillers have, it still packs a wallop into its spare story.  But more
importantly, the film is such an oddball example of the genre, we find
ourselves wanting Tom to get away with the crime, despite its heinous
nature.  Very odd indeed.
     My main problems with PURPLE NOON are its tedious narrative and lack
of production values.  Its 1960's sensibilities, crummy music, poor film
stock, and aquatic settings make the film look more like a lost episode of
"Hawaii Five-O" than a great thriller.  Also, the sheer number of "false
endings" (at least three), reek of amateurism.  The subtitles could also
use some work.
     Overall, I enjoyed the film, although it tends to drag in places and
lacks the force of something like BELLE DE JOUR, which Scorsese re-released
in 1995.  Delon and Laforet are/were both fine actors, and Clement's
direction is passable.  Then again, considering the state of the medium 36
years ago, I'm sure he was doing an excellent job.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
     I scarcely know where to start writing about APOLLO 13, the
long-awaited story of the catastrophic 13th mission of the Apollo space
program.  I went in expecting a whole lot from Howard and his
star-studded cast (Tom Hanks, Gary Sinise, Ed Harris, Kevin Bacon, and
Bill Paxton), and they delivered in full, the star being Hanks as
usual, who brings his usual strength and subtle forcefulness to the
role of Jim Lovell, the 4-time space shot veteran who never managed to
set foot on the moon.
     The story of APOLLO 13 is simple and well-known to many
Americans:  on April 11, 1970, at 13:13 military time, the
Apollo-Saturn 13 spacecraft was launched, carrying a crew of three men,
bound for America's third landing on the moon.  A third moon landing
was by then rather blase to the American public--so dull and common as
to not even warrant broadcast on television.  On the way to their
destination, however, on April 13, an oxygen tank exploded, making a
moon landing impossible and the return flight home one of the most
grueling experiences imaginable.
     The meat of APOLLO 13 concerns this return trip:  cutting off all
the systems to save power and almost freezing to death in an unheated
space module, struggling to improvise a carbon dioxide filter to keep
from asphyxiating, almost guessing at course corrections thanks to an
unusable computer, the newfound media interest that comes along with
any tragedy, and the pain that comes with come getting so close to
something you just can't have.
     Hanks is a latter-day master of expressing this emotion.  As they
fly by, unable to land, we see Hanks gaze longingly out over the lunar
surface he so desperately wants to walk upon.  The pain is clearly
visible:  so near yet so far.  The rest of the cast is also superbly
matched to their roles (with the notable exception of Kathleen Quinlan
as Lovell's wife, who sleepwalks through the film).  Harris is terrific
as seething flight director Gene Krantz, determined to keep the men
alive when everyone else has given up, and Paxton turns in a
surprisingly emotional role as Fred Haise, who becomes ill on the
mission but pulls through anyway.
     Overall, APOLLO 13 is one of the best films of the year, right
after SHALLOW GRAVE.  Howard's seamless use of special effects (none of
the film is stock footage) blends perfectly with the 1970 kitsch of
tie-dyes, metallic gold cars, and Dick Cavett.  What he finally
delivers is something he's been shooting for during his entire career
as a director:  a painstakingly detailed, in-depth look at the mission
and the people in it, never trivializing their struggle, while
generally avoiding sensationalism as well.  All the while, Howard
manages to entertain.
     APOLLO 13 gets my blanket recommendation.  You know, I was never
overly superstitious about the number 13 in the past.  If nothing else,
this movie has certainly changed that.

Title
Review for Circle of Friends (1995)
     CIRCLE OF FRIENDS is the story of three Irish teenage girls, Eve,
Nan, and Benny, and their respective quests for love.  In 1957 Dublin and
nearby Knockglen, we return to a time before the world lost its innocence,
before our uncontrollable obsession with physical beauty took hold, and
before we had any idea about how a relationship was supposed to work.
     As the story opens, the three characters are entering their freshmen
year at a Dublin college.  Eve (Geraldine O'Rawe) is an orphan, living
with the nuns in a convent.  Nan (Saffron Burrows) is a gorgeous and
wicked socialite with ulterior motives.  And Benny (Minnie Driver) is a
Plain Jane heroine, plagued by overbearing parents and a trollish suitor
(Colin Firth), and is still trying to overcome her adolescent
awkwardness.  Chris O'Donnell plays Jack, "the cutest boy in school" who
becomes the eventual point of contention in the story, developing a deep
love for Benny, but perpetually confused and torn between those competing
for his affections and attempts to control his future.
     Overflowing with sexual tension and overtones, CIRCLE OF FRIENDS pits
against each other the issues of religion and personal freedom, family and
love, wealth and happiness.  Predictably, it lands on the more modern and
liberated viewpoints regarding these issues, and in the end, everything
neatly ties up into a rather typical coming-of-age story that we've seen
countless times before.  I was expecting something a little more original
like DEAD POETS SOCIETY, but ended up getting another reworking of an old
story.
     Excellent acting by all the players and the film's unique change of
setting make CIRCLE OF FRIENDS a worthwhile picture, but it suffers from a
painfully slow pace and no real originality in its message.  If you go,
bring a date and a box of tissues.

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
     This is certainly the year for comedy, with SOUTH PARK, AUSTIN
POWERS 2, and now AMERICAN PIE making the last month alone nothing short
of a gut buster.
     With all the sophistication of PORKY'S 2, AMERICAN PIE is a teen
sex comedy (and was originally titled as such) that leaves taste and
sophistication at the door and goes straight for the comedic jugular.
The highest-of-concepts plot is simple:  Four high school virgins vow to
lose their virginity by the end of school, and the prom is only three
weeks away.  Plots and schemes are hatched out the yin-yang.
     What these guys will do for sex is... well, is what any guy will do
for sex, of course.  But these guys are really funny about it.  Antics
include paying off a girl to spread rumors of one's endowment.  A secret
book of advanced technique.  Joining the choir to meet chicks.  Hooking
up a net-cam to catch the exchange student undressing.  And of course, a
practice session with the titular pie.
     AMERICAN PIE isn't so shocking as SOUTH PARK, which has mercilessly
stolen its thunder, but it's got moments of such sheer hilarity you
can't help but feel drained (from laughter) after leaving this pic.
Sure, it isn't going to appeal to everyone, but if you've grown tired of
the histrionics on shows like `Dawson's Creek,' this movie is a breath
of fresh air.
Director: Paul Weitz
Producer: Chris Moore, Craig Perry, Chris Weitz, Warren Zide
Writer: Adam Herz
Starring: Jason Biggs, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Eddie Kaye Thomas, Chris
Klein, Seann William Scott, Jennifer Coolidge, Alyson Hannigan, Shannon
Elizabeth, Natasha Lyonne, Eugene Levy, Tara Reid
http://www.universalpictures.com/americanpie/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Party Girl (1995/I)
     This pretty much sums up the early attitude of the title character
in PARTY GIRL, a new film by Daisy von Scherler Mayer, about the
misadventures of a New York City diva who finds her life suddenly
falling apart.  Parker Posey plays Mary, the Party Girl in question,
whose flair and style are matched only by her inability to do anything
productive with her life.
     Mary is an old-style slacker of the first degree.  The picture
opens with Mary hosting a party to cover this month's rent, only to get
busted by the cops and having to call her librarian godmother (Sasha
von Scherler) to bail her out.  Godmother takes pity and gives Mary a
job as a library clerk, which seems to suit the carefree socialite like
a designer muumuu.  Interspersed with Mary's quest to find her place in
the fascinating world of library science, she frequents party after
party, always in search of the hippest hangout and the ultimate cool
time.
     PARTY GIRL is something of an allegory to the existentialist
literature it refers to: Mary is in search of life's meaning in a
world which appears to have none.  This New York is completely surreal,
full of ultra-hip people and places that are usually too cute for their
own good.  In the end, Mary can't find a shred of meaning in this
world, so she turns to...the Dewey Decimal System.  And it gets weirder
than that, perhaps the most bizarre part of the film being an
inexplicable romance Mary has with a street falafel vendor (Omar
Townsend).
     PARTY GIRL ends up being a mostly-entertaining movie.  It isn't
the raucous comedy it's billed as, but the funny bits are worth the
price of admission.  Posey is electric, a consummate professional (and
the only one in the cast who nails her lines every time).  It's
incredible how she makes the most mundane thing look cool; the most
enjoyable part of PARTY GIRL just might be seeing what Posey is wearing
in the next scene, and managing to outdo what she had on previously.
     The film takes quite awhile to really get rolling, and that's
largely due to the relatively inexperienced supporting cast and the low
low budget which allowed for only two takes of any scene.  As a result,
much of the movie's dialogue is stilted and just doesn't flow smoothly
enough to convey the sarcastic wit all of these characters are supposed
to be imbued with.  The budget has also burdened PARTY GIRL with some
damaging sound problems.
     Also, while Mary's parties are to die for, her search for a career
is uninspired.  What begins as a comedic Mary vs. The World ends up
being an overdramatic Mary vs. The Dewey Decimal System--not what I was
expecting, and probably not what the audience wants to watch.  I wish
the filmmakers had taken Mary's own advice here:  "Lighten up!  It's a
party!"

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
     Avant-garde director Terry Gilliam, absent from the screen since
1991's THE FISHER KING, has at last returned.  The turn of 1996 brings us
12 MONKEYS, Gilliam's holocaust/time travel picture about a man, his
psychiatrist, and a fiendish plot to decimate the human race...I *think*. 
Gilliam is a visual mastermind, but as far as putting together a cohesive,
accessible film, he's coming up a little short.
     Over the 130-minute running time, a few facts about the plot emerge. 
You're advised to enter the theater as well-armed with information as
possible.  He's the lowdown:  Bruce Willis is James Cole, a prisoner in
the year 2035, when 99 percent of humankind has been eradicated thanks to
a virus propagated in 1997.  Neo-urban myth traces this virus to a radical
group known as the Army of the 12 Monkeys.
     Living underground to escape the deadly surface air, science has
somehow progressed to make time travel a possibility, just not a very
accurate one.  Cole is "volunteered" to be a guinea pig, and after
scouting the frozen surface in that clear bubble suit you've seen on TV,
he is sent back to 1996 to find a non-mutated sample of the virus from
which a cure can be made in 2035.
     That's the plan, anyway.  Turns out, the scientists miss, sending
Cole to 1990, when he is quickly captured and put in a mental hospital,
hooking up with the maniac Jeffrey Goines (Brad Pitt) and psychiatrist
Kathryn Railly (Madeleine Stowe).  At first, Goines appears to be a
harmless wacko, but his involvement in the 12 Monkeys soon becomes
suspect.  Railly, of course, patiently dismisses Cole's stories as
delusion, only to find the evidence continually mounting on his side.
     Cole bounces through no fewer than three time jumps plus a recurring
flashback to his youth, interspersed with several trips back home to
2035.  If you can follow all of this, you're doing well.  Actually putting
the pieces together takes a lot more work, and to really be satisfied with
this film you're expected to do it.
     Many people will probably leave 12 MONKEYS perplexed, but Gilliam
devotees won't want to miss this movie, nor will fans of any of the
principal actors.  Pitt also deserves special recognition (and has already
garnered a Golden Globe nod) for his enigmatic prophet of doom.
     And despite my beef with the interminable convolutions of 12 MONKEYS,
the film has one major thing going for it:  put simply, it's very, very
cool.  Gilliam's nightmarish underground world is comparable in grandeur
to the one he created in his masterpiece, BRAZIL, and it also reminds us
of screenwriter David Peoples's BLADE RUNNER.  The time travel element
updates these classics, mainly through showing us the constructs of the
present--mental hospitals, tenements, crack houses--and soberly reminding
us that "the distant future" may not be too far off.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
     Terrence Malick's long-awaited and severely overhyped LINE is
plenty red, but it isn't thin at all.  In fact, it's damn thick and
dense, and it meanders about like a lazy river.
     At almost three hours, THE THIN RED LINE burns long and slow, and
fully a third of the movie is completely wasted on surrealistic, bizarre
voice-overs that do little but confuse what is an otherwise running
theme in the film: War blows.
     But Malick is a hermitic auteur, and as such, he must be allowed to
do as he pleases.  So, for example, instead of seeing the film-and the
war-only through the eyes of its central character, Jack Witt
(Cavaziel), we are treated to behind-the-brain looks at a half-dozen
other characters, too.  And they all pretty much agree that WWII is a
real pisser, for some reason or another.
     Not that LINE is without its strengths, the middle third is a juicy
look at the horrors of the war in the Pacific and the power plays of
military officers.  But, sadly, much of LINE is a simple vanity project,
not just for Malick but also for the dozens of name-brand stars
involved.  Witness John Travolta and George Clooney in blatant
I-flew-in-for-the-afternoon one-scene appearances.  Such star quality
and behind-the-scenes hype will do a lot to woo critics and Oscar
voters... at the expense of truly good filmmaking.
     The movie's camerawork and performances by Cavaziel, Chaplin, Penn,
Koteas, and Cusack should not be overlooked, and Nolte's put-upon Lt.
Colonel is a memorable piece of work.  But as for the silly metaphysical
script that invents more English language constructs than it adheres
to... well, let's just say that the importance of a good story editor
can't be stressed heavily enough.
Director: Terrence Malick
Producer: Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill, John Roberdeau
Writer: Terrence Malick
Starring: Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, George
Clooney, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, Elias Koteas, Jared Leto, Nick
Nolte
http://www.foxmovies.com/thinredline/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for 100% Arabica (1997)
     There must be something about Muslim-French-Algerian immigrant
culture that gets lost in translation to white-boy-from-Texas culture. 
Reportedly a comedy, 100% Arabica is so steeped in the obscure
subculture of French-Muslim tradition and Algerian Rai music that
westerners are going to have a hard time relating to the movie.
     To make any sense of it, you have to think of 100% Arabica as a
French-Algerian version of The Full Monty.  In a neighborhood on the
outskirts of Paris, a group of dirt-poor Algerian immigrant musicians
want nothing more than to infuse their traditional Algerian Rai music
with western rap sounds and play to packed houses in the 'hood. 
Unfortunately, an evil and corrupt mosque-running mafia zealot named
Slimane wants to stomp the music out, and the groups clash.
     From what I could gather (okay, so I read it in the press notes),
there's a mayor running for reelection who sides with Slimane... and,
well, I kind of got lost after that.  If 100% Arabica was a better-made
movie I would have watched it again, but as it stands, it's really just
a haphazard collection of scenes of the "Rap 'n Rai" musicians
performing followed by scenes of Slimane threatening people.  And
something with a pork truck.  The film abruptly ends 82 minutes after
beginning, leaving you thoroughly confused.
     I will give it one thing, that Rai music is certainly something
else.  And that pork truck is a trip.
Director: Mahmoud Zemmouri
Producer: Mahmoud Zemmouri
Writer: Marie-Laurence Attias, Mahmoud Zemmouri
Starring: Khaled, Cheb Mami, Mouss, Najim Laouriga, Farid Fedjer,
Youssef Diawara, Patrice Thibaud, Mohamed Camara, Nedjma, Medhi Bougima
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Mulholland Drive (2001)
Twin Peaks stands as one of my favorite television series ever made. 
But if you slapped the first three episodes together and called it a
movie, I doubt I'd feel the same way.  Mulholland Drive was originally
intended as David Lynch's return to TV.  Rumored to be a creepy and
atmospheric drama, I had anticipated another Peaks -- and prayed for
something better than Lynch's disastrous "sitcom" On The Air.
Trouble began when ABC abruptly pulled the plug on Mulholland, but
Lynch, ever the trooper, decided to take the footage he'd shot so far
and turn it into a movie.  Of course, a few things would have to be
added -- namely a lot of nudity and oozing sexuality and, well, an
ending -- so it was back to the set for extra shooting.  The result is
archetypical Lynch -- creepy, uncomfortable, erotic, and devoid of all
logic whatsoever.
The story, as much as there is one to describe, is told much like any TV
pilot would do.  Characters are fed to us slowly -- remember, this was
supposed to carry us over 13 hours or so -- and plot details are drawn
with a large brush.  We witness a Hollywood car crash and meet its
amnesiac victim (Laura Harring), we see a farm girl/aspiring starlet
(Naomi Watts) take her in and befriend her, and we sit in on a series of
strange meetings surrounding the making of an artsy, difficult
director's (Justin Theroux) Big Movie.  And somewhere among the
apartment buildings, the dingy diner, the studio lot, and Mulholland
Drive itself, these stories will intersect.
Whether those stories will be comprehensible (and whether that's an
important quality for a film to have) are something else entirely, and
as with any Lynch movie, it's pretty much up to the viewer to decide all
that on his own.  Personally, I think that story does matter, and I'd
also so that Mulholland Drive simply doesn't make sense when looked at
with a critical eye.  You can make up your own mind, but between the
mystical matter-transference box and its triangular key, a pair of
giggling seniors, a yeti that lives in a parking lot, and a good dozen
character identity changes a la the boneheaded Lost Highway, even the
most patient moviegoer will be utterly lost starting right at the fade
in.
I realize that faulting Lynch for not making sense is a bit like being
mad at the dog for digging in the garbage.  It's in his nature to be
random.  But Twin Peaks and movies like Blue Velvet are masterworks
because they managed to be cryptic think-pieces and still satisfy you in
the end, backwards-talking dwarfs or no.  To be certain, Mulholland
Drive is gutsy and has moments of greatness: Watts' virtuoso audition
with a far-too-tanned leading man shows how truly magnificent the movie
could have been.  Other vignettes are just as memorable -- like when a
perfectly ordinary event like coming home from work suddenly turns into
a nightmare -- but they end up being islands in an ocean of overly
pregnant pauses and wild tangents.
But again, I have to harp on this: Far, far too much of the film
(clocking in at almost 2 1/2 hours long) is nonsense.  Most notably,
near the hurried finale, Harring drags Watts to a way-after-hours
performance wherein musicians don't play their instruments.  Watts ends
up shaking violently until a magic box appears in her lap.  Um,
okaaaaayyyyy....  It all sounds like some silly dream Lynch once had and
scribbled down during the middle of the night.  Who knows, maybe that
was the point.
Technically, the film is assured and reasonably memorable.  The actors'
performances (virtually all unknowns) are good but hardly career-making
-- with the dual exceptions of Watts and Lafayette Montgomery's
miniscule yet thunderous role as a cowboy somehow pulling all the
strings.  The camerawork is typical of Lynch but his use of out-of-focus
shots -- presumably meant to make us question our perspective -- ends up
being distracting more than anything else.  The music, by longtime Lynch
collaborator Angelo Badalamenti and Lynch himself, is appropriately
creepy when it needs to be and fun when levity is needed.
To his credit, Lynch at least tried to wrap everything up in the last 20
minutes.  It all involves that damn magic box, but still, he does pay
lip service to the notion of plot structure.  It's no "Who killed Laura
Palmer?", but it's something to chew on.  It's just too bad that trying
to make heads or tails of the dozen last-minute plot twists is a bit
like trying to analyze jazz -- the more you think about it, the less
sensical it becomes.  Let the movie go, and you'll find it far more
enjoyable.
Director: David Lynch
Producer: Neal Edelstein, Joyce Eliason, Tony Krantz, Michael Polaire,
Alain Sarde, Mary Sweeney
Writer: David Lynch
Starring: Justin Theroux, Naomi Watts, Laura Harring, Ann Miller, Dan
Hedaya, Mark Pellegrino, Brian Beacock, Robert Forster
http://www.bacfilms.com/mulholland/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Isn't She Great (2000)
     I'll start by saying up front that I really don't admire Bette
Midler.  I find her loud, hammy, a bit trashy, and generally obnoxious
in every way.  Oddly, this instantly qualifies her to play novelist
Jacqueline Susann, who was loud, hammy, a bit trashy, and generally
obnoxious in every way.
     If the name Susann doesn't ring a bell, it's because you're too
young.  "Jackie" was a washed-up actress and radio star when she penned
her first novel, The Valley of the Dolls, which went on to become, at
its time, the biggest selling novel ever.  Why?  In the late 60's the
tale of drugs and lurid sex against the backdrop of Hollywood was
shocking.  Now, it's quite tepid, and so is this film, exploring
Susann's rise to fame.
     And fame is what our Jackie was after.  She was what you might even
call a fame whore.  She prays to a tree for fame.  After getting cancer,
she bargains with God for ten more years of life so she can have more
fame.  Kids, this is not a role model.
     With the movie's tagline "Talent isn't everything," our heroes hope
to inspire the wretches of the earth to greatness, by showing that even
a loud, hammy, trashy, and generally obnoxious in every way person can
become a star with a little luck and grunt work.  But Susann/Midler is
so gratingly awful, not only when it comes to talent, but also as a
person, it's impossible to relate to the character.
     Oh, and this is a comedy.  You might think a comedy would really
blow if the lead is dying of cancer.  Oh, and how it blows.  I smiled
maybe once during this film, and what with jokes like "Table for three:
two adults and one Gentile," how can you blame me?  Everything from the
opening credits to Burt Bacharach's tinny score is just plain bad.  That
said, I was stunned to hear the laughter of our baby boomer-heavy
audience throughout this film.
     Maybe it worked for them, but boy did it fail for me.  Frankly I
would have preferred to go BEYOND The Valley of the Dolls.
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
     Soon after we walked into the theater on opening night of "The Newton
Boys," I feared we had made a mistake. It seemed that the Leonardo's fan
club had gotten lost, and instead of marching like lemmings into another
screening of "Titanic," these pre-ten girls had packed themselves into our
cozy theater. The cries of "Oh baby" as soon as Matthew McConaughey appeared
on screen, however, made me realize that they were simply looking for
another cute young guy (or four) to gawk at.
     The four young guys that our lovable preteens came to gawk at are
McConaughey, Ethan Hawke, Skeet Ulrich, and Vincent D'Onofrio as Willis,
Jess, Joe, and Dock Newton respectively. The Newton boys are you're
stereotypical cowboys turned bank robbers who have decided that a home on
the range isn't enough for them.
     Willis leads his brothers into the outlaw business when he can't seem
to find enough respect or success in society after he gets out of a
penitentiary serving time for a crime he apparently did not commit. This
thin excuse for turning to a life of crime also convinces Willis's brothers
to follow him into the business.
     If this setup sounds like you have seen it before, that is probably
because you have. From the opening credits, modeled after title cards from
early silent films and antique portraits, the film smells distinctly of
"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid." In fact, at times Linklater seems to
be shamelessly ripping off "Butch Cassidy" right down to the fiddle and
banjo ridden score.
     Although the movie sets itself up as just another 90's remake, with the
Hollywood philosophy that every generation needs to remake classic films
almost as good as the originals, it ultimately turns into something more.
Unlike its prototype that ends with a freeze-frame on the impending early
demise of Butch and Sundance, the last half of "The Newton Boys" dwells on
the almost unheard of troubles of outlaws trying to get out of the game
(although we have seen it in many Mafia films.)
     It is at this point that we realize this film is a true story.  (This
is reaffirmed during the credits where we see interview footage of Willis
and Joe Newton describing much of the movie we just saw.)  
     The fact that this story contains very little that we haven't already
seen on the screen is of little consequence when we realize that this
biographical picture imitating a similar biography from 30 years past is
infinitely more interesting than the average cookbook action picture
imitating whatever made money the year before. Come to think of it, I don't
mind the banjos as long as they're not ripping off the soundtrack from
"Titanic", or should I say "Braveheart"?
     "The Newton Boys" is the latest from Richard Linklater, acclaimed
independent director of "Slacker" and "Dazed and Confused."  This outing is
a big step up for Linklater though, with a $27 million budget which exceeds
total expenditures on his first four films combined.  But don't sweat for
Linklater, Leonardo's fan club seems willing to fork over the price of a
ticket for any movie with the word "boys" in the title.
Director: Richard Linklater
Producer: Anne Walker-McBay
Writer: Richard Linklater, Claude Stanush, Clark Walker
Starring: Matthew McConaughey, Skeet Ulrich, Ethan Hawke, Vincent D'Onofrio,
Julianna Margulies, Dwight Yoakam
http://www.filmzone.com/foxmovies/thenewtonboys/
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
     Here it is, November of 1999, and I thought we weren't going to get
a good end-of-the-world, Satan-conquers-all apocalypse movie (DOGMA
doesn't count).  Whew!  END OF DAYS arrives just in time (no pun
intended) to quench that Linda Blair thirst.
     If you know the basic plot of END OF DAYS (`Satan visits New York
in search of a bride') the question you'll be asking isn't, `Is this a
bad movie?'  Rather, it will probably be, `How bad can it be?'
     Pretty bad.  But for camp value, you aren't going to find a better
bang for the buck than END OF DAYS.  Imagine audiences rolling in the
aisles, talking back to the screen, cracking jokes:  You aren't far from
reality.
     Arnold Schwarzenegger, whose last bad movie was BATMAN & ROBIN,
really tries to show off his recent acting lessons as a deeply troubled
security guard (inexplicably hired to guard the invulnerable devil
himself).  Sidekick Pollack serves up the comic relief, and Robin Tunney
is proving herself to be a solid Designated Emotionally Scarred Damsel
in Distress in all manner of films, working here as the bride-to-be of
good old Lucifer.
     Gabriel Byrne makes as bad (and by that, I mean good -- I think) a
Satan as you're likely to see on film, but it's the groaner of a story
line that will really grab you.  To wit: Arnold's ex-cop does some
offhanded detective work that would put Sherlock Holmes to shame.  His
hunches are so uncanny... it's almost like... *he's working from a
script!*  The religious backstory, featuring Rod Steiger as a Catholic
priest, is so hokey you'll get dizzy from rolling your eyes.  The Y2K
stuff is predictable and, of course, played to the hilt.
     I'm not predicting any Oscars, but I have to say this is one bad
movie that's at least worth one of its two hours on comedic value
alone.  Just remember to say your prayers, kids.
Director: Peter Hyams
Producer: Armyan Bernstein, Bill Borden
Writer: Andrew W. Marlowe
Starring: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin
Pollak, Renee Olstead, Matt Gallini, Linda Pine, Rod Steiger, Miriam
Margolyes
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out G-Rex.com Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for Bittersweet Motel (2000)
Much as all the cheerleaders wrote to tell me how horrible I was for not
liking Bring It On, I am prepared for the onslaught of Phish fans
telling me how naďve I am for not falling in love with Bittersweet
Motel, a documentary about Phish's music and, presumably, its soul.
A spare 82-minute flick about the unimaginably popular band, this
folkumentary is long on concert footage and short on any real insight
into the group.  There are plenty of songs about pumpkins, circuses, and
big black furry creatures from Mars, but the offstage footage is
typically composed of de rigueur diatribes about critics, heartfelt
discussions about "the energy, man" and the typical shenanigans expected
of any touring musical group (that is: late nights fueled by drugs).
Is there any insight into Phish provided?  Not really.  The fans can't
explain their love for the "higher level of musical appreciation" Phish
exudes, and the band can't explain why it was chosen to follow in the
footsteps of the Grateful Dead.  In candid moments, the band even comes
off as rude and juvenile, so flippant toward the fans that made it the
huge success it is that the roadies conspire to cut off their heads
whenever someone is gauche enough to ask for a photo of themselves with
the group.  It's just plain rude, and it makes you like the band (and
the movie) less and less.
The film is capably made, with fluid concert footage and three audio
differently-mastered tracks to choose from on the DVD.  Phish fans (and
let's face it: if you're watching this movie, you're a Phish fan) will
also enjoy the 35 minutes of outtakes provided on the disk as bonus
material.
Light up and drop out, folks.  But you'll be hungry in about an hour.
Director: Todd Phillips
Producer: Todd Phillips
Starring: Trey Anastasio, Jon Fishman, Mike Gordon, Page McConnell
http://www.bittersweetmotel.com/bittersweetmotel/index.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Mr. Holland's Opus (1995)
     Out-and-out begging for an Oscar might have been more dignified than
the brazen performance by Richard Dreyfuss in the title role of MR.
HOLLAND'S OPUS.  Here, Dreyfuss makes his bid for Oscar number two (he won
in 1977 for THE GOODBYE GIRL), and given the fare Hollywood has seen fit
to throw us this year, I'll be surprised if he doesn't win.
     Mr. Holland is, of all things, a lowly high school band teacher, and
the film follows 30 years of his life, from 1965 to the present.  Mr.
Holland, in his first year of teaching, finds himself turning into that
very thing which he detests, a dry and boring instructor who isn't getting
through to the kids, so he decides to make a few changes in his teaching
style to get the students involved and interested.  Using all manner of
unorthodox teaching methods, Mr. Holland eventually breaks through and
becomes the darling of John F. Kennedy High School, and we see the
profound effect he really does have on a number of his students.
     The film is something akin to a series of vignettes, each profiling
Mr. Holland's relationship with one student or another, most notably the
driven yet apparently talentless Gertrude (Alicia Witt, who appears all
too briefly) and vocal ingenue Rowena.  All the while, Mr. Holland's own
life seems to play second chair to his teaching.  His own symphony goes
virtually ignored, as does his family:  his wife, Iris (Glenne Headly),
and his deaf son, Cole.
     MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS treats us to the transformation of the students
without relying too much on the corny antics that similar films tend
toward.  Rather, the movie is filled with genuine, tearjerking emotion
despite its often rambling 2 1/2 hour length, and we are constantly
entertained by a number of moving performances of classic tunes and modern
ones.  The one over-the-top element of the picture is, of course,
Dreyfuss, whose performance culminates in the singing of a heartfelt yet
nearly unbearable rendition of John Lennon's "Beautiful Boy," dedicated to
his estranged son.  But you've gotta give him points for trying.
     The integration of political messages and stock footage into the film
is a bit distracting, as it is used to set the time frame and little
more.  But if you can get past this and let yourself slip into the web
that Dreyfuss manages to weave, you'll find a heart of sincerity in this
lazy, free-flowing, and only sometimes obvious picture.  Be sure to bring
a hanky.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
     It's Rednecks 1, Yuppies 0!  At least it is for most of BREAKDOWN,
a film that pits hapless Massachusettsans against wily Arizonans in a
battle of automotive might on America's highways.  If you've seen THE
VANISHING (either one), you've essentially seen BREAKDOWN.  In this
incarnation, Kurt Russell finds his wife (my nemesis Kathleen Quinlan)
abducted by the brilliantly evil J.T. Walsh and gang, and a cruel
conspiracy is revealed that is designed to separate the happy couple
from the fortunes that -- it turns out -- they don't really have.  The
film has a few interesting twists (that I won't spoil), but the movie's
main flaws are its over-reliance on wild coincidences to advance the
plot and a pace that is overwhelmingly slow until the very end.  With
that said, BREAKDOWN gets a big so-so... but if I were driving, I
would've just left Quinlan at the truck stop.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
     If Spike Lee weren't so self-absorbed, he would probably be one of the
best filmmakers around today.  Instead, he gets caught up in camera tricks,
mood lighting, and abrupt editing in an apparent attempt to keep any
audience so confused trying to figure out what he is doing that they cannot
become emotionally involved in his films.
     HE GOT GAME, the latest Spike Lee joint features NBAer Ray Allen as
Jesus Shuttlesworth, the top high school basketball player in the country. 
As he is pondering his future after graduation, he is surrounded by friends
and family trying to help him with his decision without really looking out
for his own best interest.  Among those trying to help is his father, Jake,
played by Denzel Washington, who has been temporarily released from the
state penitentiary under orders to get Jesus to sign with the governor's
alma mater.
     Unlike most movies that star pro athletes, HE GOT GAME does not fail
because of Allen's acting shortcomings.  He, and the other pro basketball
players featured in the film, are surprisingly solid.  Instead, the film
comes up short primarily because Lee does not allow the audience to get
involved with the characters until the last half-hour of the film.  Lee's
obsession with technical gadgetry in this film represents a disturbing trend
in his work.  Where in earlier films like DO THE RIGHT THING and MALCOLM X,
his unconventional camera moves and effects only seemed to come in when we
least expected them to heighten the emotion, in more recent films like
CLOCKERS and HE GOT GAME, Lee's effects serve to keep us at arms length.
     Despite this apparent formalism through the majority of the film, HE
GOT GAME still contains a strong emotional power near the climax, when Lee
finally lets up on the effects.  Spike Lee is definitely a talented
filmmaker, but if his next project is going to continue this trend toward
formalism, I hope it's a music video.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Groove (2000)
     According to Groove, the economics of throwing a rave:  Charge $2 a
head for some 200 people to inhabit an abandoned warehouse for one
night.  Provide free food, water, massages, and of course, music from a
parade of 5 or 6 DJs.  Sounds like a losing proposition to me.
     In fact, the last time I went to a rave (in 1991, when the scene
was already on its way out), it cost $8.  Today, it's like $20.
Groove's $2 rave sounds a little phony, a little dated.
     While Groove was the talk of Sundance (and for an entire year the
talk of San Francisco -- where it was shot and where I live), it seems
hopelessly unable to live up to its hype, a la The Blair Witch Project.
Counting conservatively, it's the fourth movie set in the rave scene to
hit theaters in the last year.  And by my account, it does the least
with the throbbing rave lifestyle of all of them.
     Why?  Because Groove, while ostensibly about "one night in the San
Francisco rave scene" is really about one night in the lives of a bunch
of Bay Area twentysomethings.  Mostly, they're Berkeley
twentysomethings, best known for their ability to whine about just about
anything.
     Berkeley twentysomethings like to talk a lot, and in Groove, that's
what they do.  One minute they get out on the dance floor, then they
retire to a back room or the basement to chit-chat, then a new DJ comes
out, and the cycle repeats.  Through this conceit, we are introduced to
people like Leyla (Lola Glaudini), a New York transplant looking to hook
up with the scene in SF, and David (Hamish Linklater), a Midwestern rave
newcomer.  Then there's David's brother Colin (Denny Kirkwood) and his
girlfriend Harmony (Mackenzie Firgens), to whom Colin intends to
propose... only later we find him making out with some guy.  Later, the
moral of the entire tale is spat out by Rachel True's character near the
end: "Eat dinner before you take drugs."  Huh?  This story is right out
of 90210.  No, it's worse than 90210.
     While Groove - the story is pretty limp, Groove - the slice of life
examining today's counterculture is far better realized.  Watching the
DJs (all real-life rave disc jockeys) interact with the (teensy) crowd
is probably the most fun there is to have in the movie.  Considering its
small budget, the set design and production values are uniformly high.
Groove looks more like Go than any indie flick.  That's impressive.
     Again, it's the pedestal that the crowd of Groove (and its
filmmakers) put DJs upon that makes the film so intriguing.  Who knew
that people with names like Polywog and Digweed (a really famous DJ)
would become recognizable on sight to rave aficionados, as famous as any
cut-rate film critic?  It's enough to make you want to learn how to
spin.
Director: Greg Harrison
Producer: Greg Harrison, Danielle Renfrew
Writer: Greg Harrison
Starring: Lola Glaudini, Hamish Linklater, Denny Kirkwood, Mackenzie
Firgens, Rachel True, Steve Van Wormer, Nick Offerman, Ari Gold, Dmitri
Ponce, John Digweed
http://groovethemovie.com/home.html
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
     Julia Roberts *is* Julia Roberts  almost  in NOTTING HILL, a
well-crafted romantic comedy from the geniuses behind FOUR WEDDINGS AND
A FUNERAL.
     The deceptively simple plot begins when uber-famous film star Anna
Scott (Roberts) winds up in William's (Grant) book shop on Notting Hill,
something of a British cross between a pre-Disney Times Square and a
Moroccan street market.  After William accidentally dumps orange juice
down Anna's front, an on-again, off-again, on-again, off-again, on-again
love affair blossoms.
     Using Anna's (and Julia's) celebrity as a catalyst, the plot is
propelled along by run-ins with the press and paparazzi, the duplicity
`required' of a big film star, secret love affairs on the side, world
travel, and buttinsky PR flacks.  It's amazing that Anna comes off as
likeable at all, but with EveryBrit Grant as her foil, it's hard not to
fall for her in the end.  Of course.
     So far, sounds like an everyday comedy  but NOTTING HILL wins its
real points in the details.  Director Michell's London is every bit is
real as a Beatles album.  And, big surprise, it's the cast of completely
unknown supporting characters that really carry the film.  Special kudos
to Rhys Ifans as Spike, William's pig of a roommate, who carries large
chunks of the film on charm (or lack thereof) alone.  I give him an
early Best Supporting Actor nod.
     If you like lighthearted romances, NOTTING HILL is for you.  The
women in our audience (who comprised about 90% of it) would seem to
agree.  I can't complain, either.  I mean, it's Julia Roberts.  How can
you not fall for her?
Director: Roger Michell
Producer: Duncan Kenworthy
Writer: Richard Curtis
Starring: Julia Roberts, Hugh Grant, Hugh Bonneville, Emma Chambers,
James Dreyfus, Rhys Ifans, Tim McInnerny, Gina McKee, Richard McCabe,
Alec Baldwin
http://www.universalpictures.com/nottinghill/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
     Give BEAVIS AND BUTTHEAD creator Mike Judge enough rope, and he may
just hang himself.  In his first live-action outing, Judge does a fair
job at making sick jokes about corporate America, he just doesn't seem
to make enough of them, ultimately leaving OFFICE SPACE a bit flat.
     Straight from SWINGERS, Ron Livingston makes a surprisingly good
Everyman as Peter, so sick of his job ("In a week, I'd say I do 15
minutes of real work.") that he goes to a hypnotherapist for relaxation
treatment.  Of course (and the trailer doesn't tell you this), the
therapist dies while Peter is under, leaving him in an ultra-relaxed
state without a care in the world.  (What's particularly funny is that
OFFICE SPACE was shot in high-tech ghetto north of my old hometown of
Austin, Texas, where the "go-getter" attitude is severely frowned-upon.)
     Anyway, after the therapy, Peter has a whole new outlook on work. 
But oddly, Peter soon goes from apathetic to outright seditious, all
while imminent downsizing is about to take place.  This culminates in a
silly subplot lifted from SUPERMAN III (they say so right in the movie!)
about stealing fractions of pennies from the company.
     That Peter gets a new girl (Aniston) in the bargain is foregone
conclusion.  That plenty of apropos, out-of-place wackiness is included,
courtesy of Judge, is also a given.
     Now I'm not a killjoy.  I've had lots of jobs that are very much
like Initech's idiocracy.  Sadly, I'm afraid that too many people are
going to genuinely take Judge's advice and try to get promoted by
sleeping in and being lazy.  While the underlying message is sound
(Don't take work too seriously:  IT'S JUST A JOB!), Judge might have
been wise to preface the film with the same message given on episodes of
B&B: "Don't try this at home."
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Fun (1994)
     I find it amazing that *two* films about teenage girls slaughtering an
older woman would be released within a year of each other.  I find it even
more amazing that both turned out to be compelling, exceptional films.
     FUN, the more recent of the two films, is the story of two American
middle-class teens, one (Renee Humphrey's Hillary) is the victim of an
abusive father, the other (Alicia Witt's Bonnie) is an ultra-hyper
compulsive liar.  The two discover an instant bond and after one fun-filled
day of adventure, they decide to end the day's games with the brutal murder
of a local grandmother whose primary preoccupation is with BINGO.  For
"fun."
     HEAVENLY CREATURES, 1994's stunner (and Oscar nominee for Best Original
Screenplay), was a very similar tale of obsession among two friends which
ends in the murder of one of the girls' mother.  HEAVENLY CREATURES was a
true story made to seem almost unreal.  FUN is fiction, and it's almost too
believable.
     Half of the film was shot in mock-documentary fashion, on grainy, black
and white Super 16mm.  This half of the movie follows the girls after their
conviction for the murder.  The other half of the picture is in vivid color,
and traces the events of the fateful day.  The two halves are beautifully
intercut together with seamless editing by Monica Lightstone.
     Director Rafael Zelinsky does a remarkable job as well, balancing the
angelic looks of two girls, who only want to have fun, with the dark and
twisted desires that apparently lurk beneath their surfaces.  Credit has to
go to Witt and Humphrey as well (both won acting awards at Sundance), who
play their parts with sublime perfection.  Humphrey is a bit mature for her
15 year-old character, but Witt is an undeniable chameleon at taking on a
persona and making it her own.
     Although the film is a bit draggy during some of the prison scenes and
has a questionable performance by Leslie Hope as the girls' crusty
counselor, there's very little to complain about.  The power of FUN is in
watching these girls embrace their crime, even as they face an eternity in
prison in painful separation from each other.  They loved the murder; they
have no remorse.  It was "nuclear."  It was "fun."  The moral implications
weigh heavy on the viewer, and it stays with you for days afterward.
Ultimately, the film serves as a serious and disturbing reminder that "fun"
can be anything but.
-Christopher Null / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Muriel's Wedding (1994)
     What is it with Australians and ABBA?  First THE ADVENTURES OF
PRISCILLA took ABBA worship to a new level.  Now, MURIEL'S WEDDING
seeks to break that boundary with a nearly non-stop ABBA soundtrack.
After nearly two hours of exposure, I'm realizing that they weren't too
bad of a band.
     MURIEL'S WEDDING uses the songs of the Swedish supergroup as a
clever link to the thoughts and feelings of Muriel, a young Australian
woman obsessed with becoming married as soon as possible.  Muriel (Toni
Colette) lives with her go-nowhere family in the town of Porpoise Spit,
where she spends most of her time in her room, listening to ABBA when
her father isn't giving her grief.
     With the rest of her family members constantly off in their own
world, Muriel decides to take off on holiday with a little "borrowed"
cash from her father in order to escape the routine of Porpoise Spit
and make a new life for herself.  She eventually settles in Sydney with
her friend, Rhonda, where she can concentrate fully on her goal of
marriage.
     MURIEL'S WEDDING is an entertaining film with a bit of an identity
crisis:  it doesn't know if it wants to be a comedy or a drama.  The
filmmakers perpetually toy with the viewers, dragging them from high
comedy to melodramatic tragedy in a heartbeat, and more than once.
This problem arises whenever the camera is not on Colette, who really
owns this picture completely.  Whenever the plastic supporting cast is
the main focus, the film falls flat.  A tacked-on, bittersweet ending
doesn't help, either.
     Don't be discouraged; MURIEL'S WEDDING is still a solid and
entertaining movie.  Just understand what you're getting in to.
There's lots of music, but this ain't no disco.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
     Some of the most memorable one-liners of the year, Jack Nicholson's best
role since CHINATOWN, Greg Kinnear's best role since... well, since ever, and
a story I think we can all relate to  what does AS GOOD AS IT GETS *not* have?
     Aside from a few quibbles, AS GOOD AS IT GETS really stands out as one of
the year's best films.  Mark Nicholson down for a well-deserved Oscar.  In
fact, just watching him do two hours of his irredeemable Melvin by himself
would be a treat.  Match him up with a fine supporting cast, and it's golden.
     The story doesn't really lend itself to explanation, but I'll try anyway.
 Melvin is a famous novelist, as eccentric and neurotic as they come. 
Obsessed with ritual, leaving the house is an ordeal.  Hell, opening the door
is an ordeal.  But when tragedy befalls his gay artist neighbor (Kinnear),
Melvin rises to the task and finds himself on a bit of a personal journey, to
risk sounding sentimental.
     Along for the ride is Helen Hunt's Carol, the waitress with whom Melvin
is quietly smitten.  And though the three seem as far off from one another as
they come, they actually have one thing in common:  they're all plain nuts. 
And it doesn't sound like it, but the way these three help each other through
bad times makes for some powerful and quite hilarious cinema.
     For what it's worth, Hunt is in fine form, redeeming herself for her
now-hateful character on TV's `Mad About You,' and maybe it was watching
Nicholson here that made her that way.  My only real complaint is that, while
it's a fun ride, the movie is a bit circuitous, and after two hours, I'm not
sure I buy the resolution.
     But it doesn't really matter.  AS GOOD AS IT GETS finally tells it like
it is:  most of us are nuts.  In fact, most of us are completely fucking nuts!
 And if you look hard enough, there really may be someone out there for all of
us, to help us make some sense of this wild ride we're on after all.
Director: James L. Brooks
Producer: James L. Brooks, Bridget Johnson, John D. Schofield, Kristi Zea
Writer: Mark Andrus, James L. Brooks
Starring: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Gg Kinnear
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/asgoodasitgets/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
     I want to start by mentioning that I actually work on the 13th
floor of a real live building in downtown San Francisco.  My business
card actually reads `13th Floor'.  Reading my business card is more
interesting than this film.
     Interesting premise: Computer geniuses build a virtual reality
machine that lets them go back in time to 1937 Los Angeles.  Only the
virtual people have feelings and emotions just like us; they don't know
they're not real.  But then they find out.
     Horrible execution: Working from a screenplay from Rusnak and
Centeno-Rodriguez  neither of whom have written anything I've ever
heard of  and under the direction of Rusnak  whose only
English-language credit is as second unit director on GODZILLA, THE
THIRTEENTH FLOOR has little to no raw talent behind it.  Rusnak
obviously couldn't put together a love scene if he was in it himself
with Cindy Crawford - the film's little tryst between Bierko and Mol
drew howls of laughter from our audience.
     On technical merits, FLOOR is an even bigger failure.  I haven't
seen a film in the last 20 years that has such bad lighting and poor
choice of film stock.  And I'd be remiss without pointing to the
hideously flawed soundtrack on our test print  or maybe it was the
theater.  (Maybe that was a blessing.)
     After two good VR flicks: THE MATRIX and EXISTENZ, I suppose we
were ripe for a failure in going for three in a row.  You know, in most
buildings, the thirteenth floor doesn't exist.
Director: Josef Rusnak
Producer: Roland Emmerich, Ute Emmerich, Marco Weber
Writer: Josef Rusnak, Ravel Centeno-Rodriguez
Starring: Craig Bierko, Gretchen Mol, Vincent D'Onofrio, Dennis
Haysbert, Armin Mueller-Stahl
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/13thfloor/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1

Title
Review for Safe (1995)
     I first heard of SAFE a good twelve months ago and was instantly
intrigued by the film, a story about a woman who becomes sick for no
medically detectable reason.  Upon seeing the movie, we discover one
possibility for her disorder:  she is "allergic to the 20th century."
Twentieth Century Disease (also known as Multiple Chemical Sensitivity)
is a very frightening, very real disability with no cure.  The disorder
is brought about by some 60,000 chemicals present in our environment,
many of which have devastating effects on MCS sufferers, even present
in tiny amounts.
     SAFE tells the tale of Carol White (Julianne Moore), an otherwise
healthy, high-society homemaker who gradually comes down with a number
of inexplicable symptoms.  It begins with headaches and a rash, and
soon spirals until she develops dizziness, nausea, and has a seizure.
And things continue to get worse.  All the while, none of her doctors
can explain a thing.  Eventually, Carol discovers the reality of MCS
and heads for the Wrenwood Colony, a "safe" zone which is free of
pollutants.  Here, she begins her inward search to find the true reason
for her illness.
     Director and writer Todd Haynes does a great job of leaving the
cause of Carol's disorder open for debate.  Is it just a latent
allergy?  Or is it psychosomatic?  The question is never answered, just
as, in Carol's life, it never will be.  "It's just for a short time,"
she says of her stay at Wrenwood.  We can feel her pain as it becomes
evident that the opposite is most certainly the case.  We even feel
sorry for her estranged husband, who can't understand Carol's malady.
     Regular readers of mine will know by now that Julianne Moore is
hands-down my favorite actress on the planet, and SAFE marks the best
role of her career.  Moore easily deserves an Oscar nod, if not the
statue, and Haynes deserves recognition for his very, very cool
direction.
     While sections of the film are weak in comparison to the picture's
truly stunning scenes, supporting cast are only fair, and the ending is
unsatisfying, SAFE still remains one of the most powerful pictures of
the year.  It should not be missed.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter & Novelist
-Contributing Editor, Mike's FEEDBACK  /  Film Critic, Texas Business Weekly
-[R]eply to be added to movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Hackers (1995)
     HACKERS is more techno-paranoia from Hollywood, instilling the
fear of rampaging computer geeks into America once again in yet another
take on 1983's WARGAMES.  Twelve years later, the game is a little
different:  the bad guys are big business types instead of the
government, the good guys have dreadlocks and multiple body piercings,
and the computers can do full motion video over a phone line.
     Okay, so some liberties have been taken with technology (an Intel
P6 chip powers an Apple PowerBook), but at least the terminology the
hackers use is essentially right.  The story may sound familiar.  Bad
corporate computer dude Eugene aka Plague (Fisher Stevens) and his
accomplice (Lorraine Bracco) team up for a little multi-million dollar
theft, when a bunch of young punks stumble upon the plan.  The gaggle
of teen-aged of hackers includes Dade aka Crash Override (Jonny Lee
Miller), Kate aka Acid Burn (Angelina Jolie), and the show-stealing
Cereal Killer (Matthew Lillard), among others.  Together, the hackers
have to foil the theft and avoid having numerous felony charges pinned
on them, plus save the world from ecological disaster thanks to a
Plague-written virus that capsizes oil tankers.
     Whatever.  The plot is pretty silly, thanks in part to the
combined efforts of the ridiculous Stevens-Bracco combination, who you
just can't stop laughing at.  And of course, the premise is absurd,
placing technology we probably won't see for another 15 years in the
hands of kids.  Every hacker worth his salt knows that it just isn't
that easy to crack systems.  At least Matthew Broderick had to resort
to a lot of research.
     But this is all beside the point, because the film is actually
worthwhile.  The real draw to HACKERS is that it is so unexpectedly
*funny.*  Really funny.  The comic scenes with the kids (and there are
lots of them) are totally hilarious.  The "serious" scenes are too,
because they are often so ridiculous.  Watching the woefully miscast
Bracco trying to pull off her role as "the sultry executive accessory
to the crime" is worth the cost of admission alone.
     In the end, seeing HACKERS is a lot like watching MTV for two
hours.  There's not a lot under the surface, the music is fast and
loud, the camera shakes around a lot, but it's really colorful and
generally fun.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter & Novelist
-Contributing Editor, Mike's FEEDBACK  /  Film Critic, Texas Business Weekly
-[R]eply to be added to movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Curse of the Jade Scorpion, The (2001)
The Curse of the Jade Scorpion takes Woody Allen to some truly
unfamiliar territory:  Manhattan!  I mean, can you believe it?  Woody
Allen in New York?  But seriously: At least this time out we're in 1940
NYC, his first real old-timey flick since 1994's Bullets Over Broadway.
It's also (thankfully) another entry in the Slapstick Woody genre (a la
Small Time Crooks), who seems to be doing a good job at keeping Serious
Woody out of the picture since the late 1980s.  Whew!
So how slapsticky are we talking?  Scorpion is the story of C.W. Briggs
(Allen), a top insurance investigator who spars with the "efficiency
expert," Betty Ann (Helen Hunt) brought in to clean up the company. 
They immediately hate one another, but it takes only a dinner theater
gag, courtesy of the great Voltan (David Ogden Stiers), to make hypnosis
subjects of them both and turn them into momentary lovebirds.
It's all in good fun, but late that night, Voltan gives C.W. a call,
re-hypnotizing him and sending him out to do his criminal bidding -- in
this case, stealing precious jewels from C.W.'s own insurance clients,
including a nutty heiress (Charlize Theron).  As the film progresses,
C.W. finds himself the understandable prime suspect in the case, with no
memory of his hypnotism and his crimes.
Of course, as with many of the Woodman's films, the movie is not much
about any of this and you aren't expected to sweat the details. 
Instead, you are invited to sit back as Woody pumps out punch line after
punch line.  Thank God, many of these lines are quite witty and
occasionally laugh-out-loud funny.  If I was brighter, I'd have written
them down so I could use some of the zingers against my more obnoxious
friends and co-workers.  Not all the lines are great, and often there's
a long gap between the juicy moments -- when C.W. and Betty Ann go at it
(verbally) -- recalling the classic Hepburn/Tracy or Hepburn/Grant or,
come to think of it, Hepburn/anyone comedies.  It's an oddity, for sure
-- stilted, but occasionally brilliant as only Allen could spin the
archetypal, mismatched, sparring couple movie.
While Scorpion is pleasant enough, it does get truly tiresome in its
third act, when the film takes up the whole ridiculous hypnotism/robbery
plot in earnest.  The Voltan thing is initially funny, but by the end
it's so distracting there's just no time for to fit in any comedy, which
is obviously the only reason Woody Allen makes any film at all.
Of course, I suspect the real reason Allen made this film is so he could
kiss Charlize Theron, a mere 40 years his younger.
Director: Woody Allen
Producer: Letty Aronson
Writer: Woody Allen
Starring: Woody Allen, Dan Aykroyd, Elizabeth Berkley, Helen Hunt, Brian
Markinson, Wallace Shawn, David Ogden Stiers, Charlize Theron
http://www.dreamworks.com/jadescorpion/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Deep End, The (2001)
Welcome to beautiful Lake Tahoe, where a boy can still get his mom to
cover up a murder and be home in time for supper.
A heavy drama, The Deep End is just such a tale.  When teenaged Beau
(Jonathan Tucker) gets mixed up with a seedy, older man (he's secretly
gay), their relationship gets a bit too intense and the lech ends up
dead.  Imagine her surprise when mom Margaret (Tilda Swinton) stumbles
upon a corpse on her idyllic beach!  Of course, she does what any mother
of an aspiring musical virtuoso would do -- sinks the body in the lake,
hides the guy's car, and pretends nothing has happened.
Before long, the body is discovered, and the film takes a turn toward a
blackmail plot, courtesy of ER nice guy Goran Visnjic.  Ultimately this
is a film about desperate measures -- a test of how far maternal
instinct can take a person.  Too bad the execution of that concept isn't
as assured.
It's a movie you never saw (and you were lucky), but Before and After
went down this road (unmemorably, I should add) a few years ago, only
there it was the father willing to cover up the crime.  That was a movie
with Meryl Streep and Liam Neeson, and even they couldn't pull this plot
off, getting oh-so-serious with the moral dilemma and forgetting that
there were people looking to the screen for entertainment.
The Deep End learns nothing from that lesson.  Moving slowly and
deliberately, the film finally comes to a boil after about 90 minutes,
but I fear much of the audience will be lost by then.  Instead of trying
to surprise or dazzle us, the film plays coy, throwing one perplexing
plot twist after another such that we are left with surprisingly little
explanation for anything we've seen along the way.
It's all vaguely unsatisfying because it's just never believable.  For
starters, we don't believe that Margaret or her son would never be
caught -- or even suspected -- for the crime.  And when Margaret finally
and tearfully tells us what really happened that night, we don't believe
it then, either.  The truth, as she tells it, doesn't even seem
possible.  Combined with the worst fake-trumpet-playing footage put to
film, the whole affair just comes off as phony, a gimmick that might
have worked on serialized radio in the 1930's but not on the big screen
today (oddly enough, the film is based on an old serialized novel called
The Blank Wall).
Fortunately, The Deep End is a lovely film to look at, well photographed
and populated with universally interesting, nuanced, and surprisingly
rich characters.  That only takes you so far, of course; it's also worth
noting that the sound design and film editing are amateurishly bad.
As its centerpiece, Swinton owns the film as she so often does, her very
spare facial features a mask upon which every emotion under the sun is
projected.  Would that those emotions made a little more sense in the
context of the plot.
Director: Scott McGehee, David Siegel
Producer: Scott McGehee, David Siegel
Writer: Scott McGehee, David Siegel
Starring: Tilda Swinton, Goran Visnjic, Jonathan Tucker, Peter Donat,
Josh Lucas, Raymond J. Barry, Tamara Hope, Jordon Dorrance
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
Maverick movie directors eventually become domesticated. Don't believe
me? The same guy who directed The Conversation also directed Jack.  The
man behind The French Connection helmed Blue Chips.
        Whether it's through common sense, clean living, or skill, Joel and
Ethan Coen have avoided a creative snag.  After some 20 years, their
movies are still original, intelligent. and funny without being aloof. 
Their latest effort, O Brother, Where Art Thou?, is no exception.  Based
on Homer's epic, The Odyssey, and set in Depression-era Mississippi, the
brothers have done the unthinkable: They've taken classic literature and
made it fun.
        The tale, which includes references to the poem throughout, has three
escaped convicts (George Clooney, John Turturro and Tim Blake Evans)
overcoming various obstacles in retrieving a load of loot Clooney has
supposedly hidden.  Of course, things go awry in classic, semi-bizarre
Coen brothers style.  There's a meeting with a one-eyed Bible salesman
(John Goodman), a chance encounter with an overly sensitive Babyface
Nelson, and a flirtation with fame when the cons become hillbilly
singers.  Oh, and I forgot to mention encounters with the Ku Klux Klan,
the excitable governor of Mississippi (a hysterical Charles Durning),
three very sexy sirens, and a load of spirituality.
        A lot is thrown at the audience here, but Joel and Ethan (no, I don't
know them) continue to be experts at molding the workings of a fevered
imagination with dramatic substance.  Look at Fargo.  Yes, it is about a
kidnapping gone brutally awry and the excessively pregnant cop who
solves the case, but the film is really a portrait of a small-town
nobody (William H. Macy's car salesman) and how unbelievably desperate
he is to be someone -- so much so that he initiates his own wife's
abduction.
        The same magnificent trick happens in Brother.  The sirens, the fame,
the power of Babyface are all brilliantly presented as part of a
supremely entertaining road movie.  But these events and people are
material obstacles the characters must overcome to achieve real
happiness and awareness, which occurs in a climax I wouldn't dare spoil.
        The performances from the three leads are a huge asset, as they avoid
becoming three Forrest Gump clones.  Nelson is especially good.  I've
never heard of him, but I'd like to see more of him.  As a yokel who's
determined to get the family farm back, he has a goofy lack of
pretension that seems genuine.  He's the anti-Pauly Shore.
        As for Turturro, is there any role the man can't play?  I've been
watching him for years, and he's never given a bad performance.  He's
played child-molesting bowlers, card sharks, meek general store clerks,
and rednecks all the same way-superbly.  Clooney is also edging up on my
list of suave and talented actors.  His laid-back, articulate cool
provides the perfect tone for the movie.  It's a joy to watch him here.
        And it's a joy to watch this movie as a whole.  The Coen brothers are
all about pushing the envelope, and then reading the surprisingly
intelligent, thoughtful letter inside.  In Brother the skill and clarity
in which they do this is astounding.
Director: Joel Coen
Producer: Ethan Coen
Writers:  Joel Coen, Ethan Coen
Starring: George Clooney, John Turturro, Tim Blake Nelson, John Goodman,
Holly Hunter, Charles Durning
Official website:
http://studio.go.com/movies/obrother/phono/html/index.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
     "You are who you eat."  So goes the tongue-in-cheek (so to speak)
tagline of RAVENOUS, the inexplicable black comedy by iffy directress
Antonia Bird.
     Set during the Mexican-American War, RAVENOUS starts with the
promising tale of a soldier named Boyd (Pearce, from L.A. CONFIDENTIAL)
who finds himself transferred to a remote Sierra Nevada outpost in the
dead of winter.  Enter Colqhoun (Carlyle), a traveller suffering from
frostbite and famine... and who turns out to be, well, a bit of a
cannibal.
     Sadly, RAVENOUS delves into the predictable and silly faster than
you can say "fava beans."  It's all very kitschy, with Colqhoun
developing a, well, ravenous streak in him for human flesh, resulting in
the steady attrition of the outpost's crew.
     Curiously humorous performances by Davies and Arquette are
welcome... until they are consumed by one character or another.  But
really, what's the point of this movie?  It's not that RAVENOUS is
offensive in the slightest.  Now that we've digested Hannibal Lecter (so
to speak), cannibalism isn't such a taboo.  Make it funny - well, *try*
to make it funny - and it's even less "shocking" and "controversial,"
both of which Bird was clearly shooting for.
     Two hours of feasting, and bah... I left the theater hungry.
http://www.foxmovies.com/ravenous/
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Coyote Ugly (2000)
     It's 1993.  Some Hollywood bigshot reads an article in GQ magazine
about a nutty bar called the Coyote Ugly in Manhattan.  They only have
women bartenders, see, and they, like, dance on the bar with fire and
stuff!  And they don't serve water.  If someone orders water they hose
down the crowd!  Holy mackerel, what a nutty place!
     And then someone says, What a nutty place... for a movie!  Cart in
a screenwriter who invents a story about, say, a puppy-eyed girl from
New Jersey who winds up working at the Ugly while trying to make it as a
songwriter.  Make up some obstacles: she has stage fright, she gets
robbed, and her dad is fat.  Pop in a troubled love interest.  Toss in a
bunch of heaving-bosomed women to dance on the bar, get Jerry
Bruckheimer to produce, spend $40 million on advertising, and the
movie's done!
     But oops, someone forgot to make the movie any good along the way. 
Cliché-infested and so utterly tired and worn out as to make itself
appear a relic of the early 1980s, Coyote Ugly is just plain bad.  It
almost seems like they decided to take a real-life place and tried to
build a movie around it.  Er, uh, wait a minute...
     Piper Perabo, one of the most frightening newcomers to hit
Hollywood in the last decade, plays our young heroine, who faces
obstacle after obstacle en route to what must ultimately become
ridiculous success beyond her wildest dreams.  Note to Piper: Let's see
if we can't dye the eyebrows to match the hair, shall we?  Perabo's role
is so badly acted it would be cause for raspberries galore were it not
for an even worse script.
     Newcomers like Adam Garcia (the love interest) and wannabes like
Maria Bello (the bar owner) do their best with lines like "I could tell
you, but I'd have to kill you," but to no avail.  Their hearts aren't in
the movie, and for good reason: No nudity.
     Er, I mean: A really awful story that feels ripped from The Bold
and the Beautiful.  Does fat dad (John Goodman) really need to be
hospitalized to build drama?  Would someone really rob poor Piper's
rodent-infested Chinatown apartment?  Would anyone really stop fighting
in an all-out bar brawl to listen to the girl sing-along with the
jukebox?  I'd say all that was missing in Coyote Ugly was a wedding, but
they squeezed one of those in there too.
     For those not following along, Bruckheimer is essentially trying to
remake his own Flashdance, which made an incredible $95 million back in
1983.  They even dump water on the bartenders, "Maniac" style.  And I
think it's safe to predict that Perabo's career will likely follow that
of her predecessor, Jennifer Beals.  In other words:  Hello, Cinemax!
     Come to think of it, that's probably where most people will end up
seeing this movie.
http://studio.go.com/movies/coyoteugly/synopsis.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for I'm Not Rappaport (1996)
     Turning a play into a movie is always a hit-or-miss process, and I
still don't know quite what to make of the latest film to take that
journey, I'M NOT RAPPAPORT.
     Based on the critically-acclaimed play of the same name, I'M NOT
RAPPAPORT as the story of two elderly men, Nat, a Jewish/socialist
radical and compulsive liar (Walter Matthau), and Midge, a black, nearly
blind apartment superintendent (Ossie Davis).  The pair has an uneasy
friendship based on the fact that they sit on the same bench in Central
Park, where Nat fills Midge's head with fabrications.  Nat's flair for
creating new personae for himself draws the pair into one minor
adventure after another, involving a young artist-in-training (Martha
Plimpton), a drug dealer (Craig T. Nelson), a mugger (Guillermo Diaz),
and threats from Nat's daughter (Amy Irving) regarding the ever-looming
old folks' home.
     The stuff of Broadway?  For sure.  The stuff of Hollywood?  I don't
think so.  The problems of compressing a heartwarming story about two
old guys who hang around Central Park into a feature film have obviously
taken their toll on I'M NOT RAPPAPORT, and what we've got is a 2-hour,
15-minute opus that features a very rocky start, some unneeded subplots,
and an overly repetitious plotline that is compelling despite its heavy
talkiness.
     Matthau and Davis are truly inspired as the leads (they worked
together before in GRUMPY OLD MEN), and it's great to see Plimpton
again, but whoever was in charge of putting Irving and Nelson in this
movie should be put in the old folks' home themselves.  Herb Gardner's
direction of his own script is as good as you can expect for a piece
like this (he changes camera angles enough to keep it interesting, and
that's about it), but nothing much else is overly inspired.
     The film is semi-entertaining and semi-interesting, but unless
you're really into this kind of tale, "semi" probably isn't going to cut
it.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Made (2001)
Practically heckled out of the ring at their boxing match, best friends
Bobby and Ricky (Jon Favreau and Vince Vaughn) are hardly your titans of
the fights.  In fact, they aren't much in the way of titans of
anything.  They're almost losers.  Whenever Bobby gets ahead, Ricky's
antics pull him back down -- never on purpose, he just doesn't know how
to behave any better.
When Bobby gets kicked off his L.A. construction job, he pleads with
minor crime boss Max (Peter Falk) to give him something better to do
than smooth concrete and fistfight his buddies.  And so the hijinks
begin... as Bobby and Ricky head for New York in an unspecified role as
heavies for some deal of Max's.
A fiercely independent production courtesy of aspiring auteur Jon
Favreau, Made is a vague follow-up to Swingers, the acclaimed comedy
written and starring Favreau and fellow Made man Vaughn.  In fact, Made
reunites several Favreau friends, including his Love & Sex costar Famke
Janssen, as his stripper girlfriend.  Never mind the celeb status: It's
a miracle that Sean "Puffy" Combs got a role here, considering he didn't
know Favreau beforehand.
Out of the picture is director Doug Liman (who did Swingers and Go),
which is something of a loss.  Favreau is better in front of the lens
and behind a typewriter instead of wielding the camera.  He runs around
with a nauseating handheld half the time, framing shots badly and
jerking the rig about as he searches for the right shot.
Favreau's script, however, is predictably great, full of droll wit and
zingers that reduce costar Vaughn from the hip daddy-o in Swingers to a
mentally defective scalawag.  His brash character is loathsome, but Made
is completely Vaughn's movie.  Ricky is that obnoxious and unfortunate
friend you got stuck with growing up, the kind of guy who screwed up
everything... and somehow talked you into going along with it.  Whether
he's insisting they buy guns for their upcoming "drop" or repeatedly
ringing his flight attendant button (in a scene that recalls Favreau's
answering machine travails in Swingers), he simply gets on your every
nerve.  And it's unilaterally hysterical.
On the other hand, a misplaced supporting character can severely mess up
a movie, and Combs (here in his first real film role) is the poster
child for exactly that.  "Puffy" is not only a joke of an actor, he's a
joke -- period.  Casting him as some kind of New York drug kingpin is
ridiculous, and while his appearance here is obviously tongue-in-cheek,
it's still a nuisance to have to watch him "act."
Never mind that, though -- he only has 10 minutes of screen time. 
Anyone enamored with the unique and hip sensibility of Swingers will
find Made almost as much fun.  It's not a sequel, mind you, and it's
lacking the nuanced and compelling supporting characters that made
Swingers so memorable, but for grown-up comedy, you won't find better
this summer.
Director: Jon Favreau
Producer: Jon Favreau
Writer: Jon Favreau
Starring: Jon Favreau, Vince Vaughn, Sean Puffy Combs, Famke Janssen,
Peter Falk, Faizon Love, David O'Hara, Vincent Pastore, Makenzie Vega
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Last Resort (2000)
It's hard to imagine a more horrific modern-day nightmare.  A young and
wide-eyed Russian lass named Tanya (Dina Korzun) flies to Britain with
her young son Artiom (Artiom Strelnikov) on the promise that her British
fiancée will pick them up from the airport and whisk them off to a new
and happy life together in the West.
When hubby-to-be doesn't show up, Tanya declares herself a refugee to
avoid being immediately sent back to Moscow, then finds herself
imprisoned in an urban gulag -- actually an abandoned seaside resort
with roller coasters and video arcades that's been converted to a
refugee camp.
Everything is difficult in the "resort."  Simply making a telephone call
involves long waits and convoluted instructions, gangs and duplicity
lurk around every corner, and the local fried fish turns out to be just
batter.  With no money and nowhere to go to earn any, Tanya gets
involved with the local pornographer (Lindsey Honey -- a real-life king
of British porn), and we feel she's pretty much scraping bottom.
Luckily, Tanya is befriended by Alfie (the very entertaining Paddy
Considine, A Room for Romeo Brass), the local arcade manager, who takes
the Russian duo under his wing.  What results is a tiny romance, held
together with a story about compassion and perseverance.
Written and directed by the Polish Pawel Pawlikowski, the film is
somewhat autobiographical and is extremely apt in its storytelling
ability.  While the resort itself is relatively benign, Pawlikowski
imbues it with a subtle horror through creepy set designs that connote a
carnival funhouse and washed-out lighting that turns everything
greenish.  Korzun lets us truly feel her struggle, emoting with a
brilliance rarely seen in Hollywood.
Altogether, Last Resort is a small movie, with simple themes and a
running time slightly longer than your typical episode of ER.  However,
it carries far more power than any old TV show -- and most other movies,
to boot.
Director: Paul Pavlikovsky
Producer: Ruth Caleb
Writer: Rowan Joffe, Paul Pavlikovsky
Starring: Dina Korzun, Artiom Strelnikov, Paddy Considine, Lindsey
Honey, Dave Bean, Perry Benson, Adrian Scarborough, Bruce Byron
http://216.167.20.103/main.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
     John Travolta is one hell of a hairy man.  More than any other movie
I've seen him in, PHENOMENON features more of Travolta's bodily fur than
anything else you're likely to come by.
     The trailers have been barraging us with this simplest of plots for
months.  George Malley (Travolta) is a simple man in a small town on the
eve of his 37th year, and on his birthday he sees a mysterious light in the
sky which knocks him down and, faster than you can say "plot device," turns
him into a supergenius.  He comes complete with telekinetic powers, limited
mind-reading ability, earthquake sensor, giant veggie-growing ability,
speed reading, cruise control, and automatic transmission.
     Because he is such an intellectual stud, he gains the love and fear of
various people in the town.  Among the lovers are Lace (Kyra Sedgwick),
buddy Nate (Forest Whitaker), and local doctor "Doc" (Robert Duvall).
Among the fearers are the type of hick yahoos that are omnipresent in
movies about simple men in small towns.
     The film absolutely reeks of being a "pleasant" picture....  Long,
drawn-out photography.  Dogs, kittens, rabbits, and flowers everywhere.
Precocious children.  Really bad pop music.  Your occasional FBI agent.
You know, cute stuff.  From the director of (vomit) WHILE YOU WERE
SLEEPING, what else would you expect?
     Not that I mean to detract from the charms of PHENOMENON, because it
isn't by any stretch a terrible film.  Instead, it's just... *there.*  It
just goes on and on and never does much of anything.  It's predictable to a
scene and not very original, but at least the movie isn't insulting.  The
performances and direction are all fine, and there are some funny moments.
Basically, it's "pleasant."
     As far as the social message of this film, I really couldn't begin to
say.  Most of the time it's a running Public Service Announcement for
reading.  The rest of the time it gives off something of a "don't be afraid
of smart people" theme.  You'd think in two hours they'd come up with
better than that.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Assassins (1995)
     Okay, I admit it.  I was expecting something horrible like JUDGE
DREDD when I sat down for ASSASSINS.  Instead, imagine my surprise to
find a nicely-crafted action thriller that does *not* feature Sylvester
Stallone making a bunch of "witty" remarks.
     ASSASSINS is essentially an updating of a well-established story
line.  Robert Rath (Stallone) is the best in the world at what he
does--killing people for money.  But he's getting tired of it all and
wants out of the business.  Unfortunately, you can't just give two
weeks notice to your faceless hit contractor; it's a bit more difficult
than that.  So it's understandable that Rath barely flinches when he
finds out Miguel Bain (Antonio Banderas), the #2 assassin, is after
him.
     When you throw into the mix the world's best actress (Julianne
Moore) as Electra, a surveillance expert and electronic thief, all hell
breaks loose.  Electra is his latest "mark," and, fed up with
everything, Rath elects not to kill her, as he was charged to do.
Instead they team together against a new, common enemy:  Bain, who
Banderas brings to life with a soul of pure evil.
     ASSASSINS starts out a little slow in setting up this tricky web,
but it pays off the first time Bain and Rath meet.  Thereafter, each
meeting grows progressively more intense--and more violent--as the two
square off like fighting lions.  These action sequences are some of the
best of the year, and together with Moore's turn as the enigmatic
Electra, ASSASSINS develops into a great entry for its genre.
     Yes, there are some cheap "dog-barks-suddenly" surprises, a few
sappy and overdramatic moments, and the story is just on the other side
of impossibility, but what the hell, it's an action movie, right?  That
it is, and it's a pretty good one to boot.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Sweet and Lowdown (1999)
     Woody Allen loves jazz.  He loves jazz so much that he regularly
skips the Oscars to play clarinet with his jazz combo.  He talks about
jazz all the time.
     I love Woody Allen, really I do.  I'm probably the only living
critic who enjoyed CELEBRITY.  I love jazz, too.  Every Wednesday for
two years, I saw a classic jazz quartet play tunes like "All of Me,"
"Rosetta," and "Old Man Time" in a dank cellar bar.
     Woody Allen loves jazz so much he made up a guy and made a
fictional documentary about him.
     Played by Sean Penn, Emmet Ray is a supposed wild jazzman of the
1930's.  He drinks hard, pimps whores in his spare time, falls for a
mute woman (Morton), has a fling with a high-society dame (Thurman), and
plays a little guitar along the way.
     Sounds exciting, but unfortunately the actual story is so boring
and uneventful that it's hard to care about any of this.  At 95 minutes,
I was sure this would be light and breezy Allen fare.  It was the
longest hour-and-a-half of my life.
     Parts of the film are great, mainly a moment near the finale, when
three different versions of a humorous incident in Ray's life are played
out.  The jazz is great, but there's surprisingly little music in the
film.  It mainly serves as a lullaby to play while you blissfully fall
asleep in your chair.
     What's worse is that the structure just plain doesn't work.
Allen's so-called "expert interviews" talking about Ray are intercut not
with faux documentary footage, but with a regular movie.  Sony is trying
to quietly position SWEET AND LOWDOWN as a "real" documentary, but this
ain't no BLAIR WITCH PROJECT.
     Instead, it's just a muddled mess, a character in search of a
story, a filmmaker in search of his muse.
Director: Woody Allen
Producer: Jean Doumanian
Writer: Woody Allen
Starring: Sean Penn, Samantha Morton, Uma Thurman, Brian Markinson,
Anthony LaPaglia, Gretchen Mol, Vincent Guastaferro, John Waters
http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/sweetandlowdown/index.html
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
     Listen up!  A movie adapted from a magazine article about the
making of a four-year old segment of a television program:  Does this
pitch have you hooked yet?  No?  Well, despite a potentially dry-as-dust
premise, THE INSIDER manages to rise above its inherent limitations and
provides a compelling look inside the politics of `60 Minutes' and the
tobacco industry.
     They say you should never see two things being made:  Sausage and
legislation.  Add journalism to that list.  I've been in this racket
long enough to know that objectivity is painfully lacking in the places
you expect to find it the most.  Backroom deals make strange bedfellows
of interest-conflicted parties (e.g. Time-Warner owns Entertainment
Weekly magazine, which reviews Warner Bros. films, etc.)  So when `60
Minutes' producer Lowell Bergman (Pacino) decided to do a story about
the hazards of cigarettes in 1996, he found himself embroiled in
controversy.
     Central to that controversy was Jeffrey Wigand (Crowe), a VP with
Brown & Williamson, the #3 tobacco company in the U.S.  Just-fired and
full of rage, Wigand `blew the whistle' on B&W, and after much
haranguing, he told a tale of the hazards of smoking  and the fact that
the tobacco companies knew about those hazards  to Mike Wallace
(Plummer) and `60 Minutes.'
     But before the segment could air, B&W threatened legal action
against all the parties, Wigand became the subject of a vicious smear
campaign, his wife left him, he basically went nuts, and Bergman started
to feel responsible for ruining Wigand's life  all with nothing to show
for it, because CBS top brass refused to air the interview.
     Add in the impending sale of CBS to Westinghouse, and you're
staring into a morass of journalistic dishonesty and a legal migraine.
     That any of this makes interesting filmmaking is a genuine
surprise, and with a running time close to 3 hours, it's even more
amazing that my attention was held throughout.  Mann, last seen
directing HEAT, is certainly unnecessarily long-winded throughout the
movie, but some stellar performances keep THE INSIDER going strong.  It
goes without saying that Pacino burns in his role, but it's Crowe who
deserves the real praise as the falling-apart Wigand.  Think Oscar
nomination; he deserves it.
     Christopher Plummer does an amazing impression of Mike Wallace, and
also of note is Bruce McGill, as a Mississippi D.A., who has about five
minutes of amazing screen time.
     The funny thing about THE INSIDER is that Wigand's story is not the
most interesting part of the film.  It is at first, but Mann (wisely)
eventually directs the story back to CBS, with focus on the wrangling
within its corporate hierarchy about whether to run the interview.
Why?  Because the `danger of smoking' is really old news.  Philip
Morris's recent admission that smoking causes cancer is a further sign
that this whole debate might be beating a dead horse.
Director: Michael Mann
Producer: Peter Jan Brugge, Michael Mann
Writer: Eric Roth
Starring: Al Pacino, Russell Crowe, Christopher Plummer, Philip Baker
Hall, Diane Venora, Gina Gershon, Rip Torn, Lindsay Crouse, Debi Mazar,
Bruce McGill
http://www.theinsider-themovie.com/
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for House of Mirth, The (2000)
     Draw near and bear witness to Gillian Anderson, a very successful
television actress (The X Files) who is still trying to find her legs on
the big screen.  Like many before her, she will try a tactic that has
made stars out of otherwise B-list actors: By taking the leading role in
an art house flick.
     Welcome then to The House of Mirth, a period piece which bears
little happiness for those within.  Or, ultimately, for those in the
audience.
     It is New York City in 1905, a town full of promise in an era of
drawing rooms in which tea is still served every afternoon.  On the
fringe of society is Miss Lily Bart (Anderson), a brazen vixen who has
yet to marry and wears red gowns to the symphony when everyone else has
dressed down.  She's a bit of a bad girl: She smokes, she skips church,
and she's "on the hunt" for a husband.  And her bad habits have spilt
over into her social life.
     She dallies with the lawyer Lawrence Selden (Eric Stoltz) in an
apparent affair, but pities him because he actually has to work.  Gus
Trenor (Dan Aykroyd, in his best role in decades) also offers his
affections, but, alas, he's married.  And then there's Sim Rosedale
(Anthony LaPaglia), a kind of Michael Milken for the Industrial Age. 
None present very good husband choices, which leads Miss Bart to take
all kinds of measures to find a mate.  Ultimately, through a falling out
with her best friend Bertha (Laura Linney) -- for reasons which I still
don't understand -- she finds her status in society plummeting, as
Bertha singlehandedly engineers her descent -- off camera.
     It's a worthy tale of blackmail and backstabbing, but unfortunately
it is told in the traditional, corseted, Masterpiece Theatre manner that
sadly leaves virtually all of this treachery (and the juiciness) behind
the scenes.  With a PG rating, there's nary a heaving bosom to behold
and only one slap to the face to get your pulse going.  One can only be
thankful the film isn't narrated a la The Age of Innocence, a film with
which The House of Mirth otherwise has much in common.  (Both are based
on Edith Wharton novels, and it's apparent the former was her better
work.)
     At the crux of the problem is director Terence Davies, who has
structured the film with an unfortunate lack of foresight.  A number of
unnecessary scenes are loaded on, but this is not counterbalanced by
much-needed explanatory scenes that have somehow gone missing.  The
ultimate effect is to make The House of Mirth a somber experience that
drags on and on at a ponderous pace that would be far too slow if you
didn't need the time to construct your own plot in its apparent absence.
     Much has already been said of Anderson's aplomb with her role, but
often the picture feels a bit like Stoltz and Anderson are reading for a
play off-Broadway or in their backyard, their lines delivered in a
manner that feels smarmy and disingenuous.  Not for a second does
Anderson look at home in period dress.  But at the same time, she has a
way of saying "delicious" that simply makes you melt.  Overall, the
decently apt cast is hardly stellar.
     Which leaves us with the theme of our tale.  As it turns out, The
House of Mirth hasn't aged all that well since it was originally
written, which would explain why it hasn't been made into a feature film
since 1918.  Put simply: Morality at the turn of the last century just
doesn't translate well to morality at the turn of this one.  Exactly how
Miss Bart gets into her predicament is unclear, as Bertha has the worst
reputation of the bunch.  Why would anyone listen to her?  Ultimately, I
just didn't buy the story.
     But in the end, Miss Bart's sad tale of woe is at least a bit
universal.  Like so many others, Miss Bart is a victim of her own
naďveté, stuck in a world where there truly are no good guys, and yet
she relies on others for aid.  (Stoltz's character is the closest we are
given to a hero, and he's hardly a stand-up chap.)  Can unsubstantiated
gossip still sink a person?  I suppose so, but who can imagine not
fighting back?
Director: Terence Davies
Producer: Olivia Stewart
Writer: Terence Davies
Starring: Gillian Anderson, Dan Aykroyd, Eleanor Bron, Terry Kinney,
Anthony LaPaglia, Laura Linney, Elizabeth McGovern, Jodhi May, Eric
Stoltz, Penny Downie, Pearce Quigley
http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/houseofmirth/index.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Gazon maudit (1995)
     The French title of this odd little film is GAZON MAUDIT, a French
euphemism meaning "dyke."  Any wonder why the title was changed for the
American audience?
     This picture, starring the radiant and naked-most-of-the-time
Victoria Abril (TIE ME UP! TIE ME DOWN! and HIGH HEELS), is a
schizophrenic tour of Loli's (Abril) life.  Her philandering husband
Laurent (Alain Chabat) walks all over her.  The kids are a constant
effort.  And when Marijo (Josiane Balasko, who co-wrote and directed as
well), a butchest-of-the-butch lesbian, shows up owing to car trouble, a
sudden bond of friendship is formed.  When Laurent's dalliances finally go
too far, Loli finds comfort in the arms...and the bed...and even the
bathtub of Marijo.
     So that's the titular "twist."  And as a premise, it's not a bad
one.  Balasko's performance is exactly what was required to make the
plausibility of the petite and erotic Abril fall for the decidedly
non-petite and non-erotic Balasko.  But after a brief (and fun) setup and
payoff, the film rambles into a roller coaster of "does she or doesn't
she" want to stay with her new lifestyle, followed by one false ending
after another.  The film finally finishes up on a sudden note that is
totally confusing, suggesting further "twists on the twist," and by this
time, the picture is so silly that any attempt at resolving this whole
thing wanders into pointlessness.
     Abril's performance is great, as usual, reminding us of her days with
director Pedro Almodovar, and as mentioned above, Balasko is a very
capable actress.  Unfortunately, it appears she had a hand in too many
things, as the script just falls apart at random places, becoming either
too busy and hard-to-follow or too boring and hard-to-stay awake. 
Balasko's use of sex jokes is unrelenting (and no one is safe from her
good-natured ribbing), but these too get old after the hundredth time.
     In the final analysis, FRENCH TWIST is extremely muddled and feels
much longer than its 107 minute running time.  Fortunately, it has a few
bright spots, including Balasko's subtle message about the cultural double
standard between men and women, that will make it worthwhile for the
viewer that is truly willing to be patient.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Krieger und die Kaiserin, Der (2000)
German auteur Tom Tykwer downshifts from the frenetic pace of Run Lola
Run, landing solidly back in first gear -- if that -- with The Princess
and the Warrior, a glorified and conceited film school project if ever
I've seen one.
Tykwer reunites with Lola star Franka Potente, casting her as Sissi (the
princess, presumably) a troubled mental ward nurse who probably ought to
be a patient herself.  After a morose 20-minute setup wherein the
players are cryptically introduced, we find Sissi lying near death under
a semi truck, run down in a city street.  To her rescue comes the
unlikely hero Bodo (the warrior?), played by the Gary Oldmanesque Benno
Fürmann (also Potente's Anatomy costar), a two-bit crook who indirectly
caused the collision in the first place.  Bodo saves Sissi's life by
giving her a homemade tracheotomy, and after a long recovery, the
already unstable Sissi soon finds herself obsessed with her savior.
What follows is a mishmash of heist flicks and David Lynch movies as
Sissi tracks Bodo down, is shunned by him, and later just-so-happens to
run into him while he and his brother are robbing the local bank.  To be
sure, it's an atmospheric, dark, and weird story as we ride the elevated
trains of Wuppertal, Germany, a picturesque small town laden with
shadowy wrong turns.
Alas, it's too bad that the story of The Princess can't keep up with the
creepiness of its setting.  With little in the way of a guiding plot,
the movie is poorly structured with confusing and random character
arcs.  Tykwer ultimately seems more obsessed with framing clever
photographs than in telling his story and as a result, he manages even
to make a bank robbery look boring.
As well, setting much of the film inside the mental hospital is a cheat,
an easy out for excusing the behavior of characters that would otherwise
go intolerated in the real world -- and wouldn't be tolerated in an
asylum, either.  The film feels more like a by-product of a bad dream
Tykwer had but can only half-remember.  Most notably this is manifest in
Sissi's sudden revelation that leads to the film's climax, a confession
that is as phony as they come.  The neo-supernatural dénouement is just
as foolish.
While Tykwer would have us believe The Princess is a meditation on
chance and destiny and the meaning of life, the whole scenario is a
contrivance and a fraud.  Tykwer is naďve in mistaking cleverness in his
use of coincidence and repeating themes for what is actually an obvious
and lazy plot device.  The result is an intensely restless audience who
were hoping for another Lola and got quite the opposite.
The biggest slap of The Princess and the Warrior comes right at the end,
when after you've suffered through 2 hours and 15 minutes of Tykwer's
histrionics, he leaves you with a long, slow helicopter shot, pulling
back from the final scene in a single take that lasts for a several
minutes.  Presumably we are left to ponder the depth of The Princess's
meaning.  Instead, we put on our jackets, check our watches, and wonder
what happened to the budding talent of a new filmmaker.
Director: Tom Tykwer
Producer: Stefan Arndt, Maria Köpf
Writer: Tom Tykwer
Starring: Franka Potente, Benno Fürmann, Joachim Król, Marita Breuer,
Lars Rudolph, Melchior Beslon, Jürgen Tarrach, Ludger Pistor, Natja
Brunckhorst
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
filmcritic.com presents TWO reviews from staff members James Brundage
and Max Messier.
You can find the reviews with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/f4f3233798557e33882568e800788faa?OpenDocument
Editor's Note: Rarely have to so divergent reviews for one movie crossed
my desk on the same day.  To wit, we present a unique experience for
filmcritic.com -- something of a "He Said, He Said" -- two looks at
Mission: Impossible 2, from two of our most vocal critics. -CN
 John Woo is back in the saddle again.  After turning out useless
Hollywood drivel from emigration up until Face/Off, enjoyable Hollywood
drivel with Face/Off, and intelligent and enjoyable Canadian drivel in
Once a Thief, John Woo has finally reestablished himself as a
grandmaster of the romantic action movie.
 I say this having just watched, for about the last 12 hours straight,
every John Woo film since Hard Boiled, plus the first Mission:
Impossible to boot.  And, having just sat through 12 hours of John Woo
material, I can say without a doubt that M: I-2 is not only proof that
John Woo is back in the saddle, it is also the best English-language
action movie he has churned out to date.
 Mission: Impossible 2 (or M:I-2 for short), probably this summer's
most-anticipated flick, is an entirely different animal from its
predecessor.  Mission: Impossible was your standard espionage flick
(better directed and told in a slightly Hitchcockian style, but still
your standard espionage flick) with a few nice capers and a very
impressive action scene thrown in.  Story-wise, everything was par for
the course.  We even had the obligatory `break into the unbreakable
place' sequence.  M: I-2, on the other hand, is a whole different
animal.
 In M:I-2, rogue agent Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott) steals all of the
cure to a superflu known as Chimera as well as a sample of the virus.
Like any modern-day bad guy, Ambrose is a capitalist and is planning to
sell the cure to the highest bidder after he has unleashed Chimera upon
the world.  And, of course, it falls upon the IMF to stop him.  Heading
up the team is Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise); joining him are agents Luther
Stickell (Ving Rhames) and Billy Baird (John Polson) and, per the
instructions given in a cameo by Anthony Hopkins, the final member of
the team must be Nyah Hall (Thandie Newton), a professional thief who
Ethan must recruit.
 M: I-2 is an action movie, an espionage flick, a terrorist flick, a
kung fu movie, and a romance all rolled into one.  But instead of
botching it by doing too many things at once), M: I-2 juggles all of its
balls in the air and never even gets close to dropping one.  This might
be because master craftsman screenwriter Robert Towne (Chinatown) wrote
the script.  Then again, it might be because John Woo is such a damn
good director.
The one thing M:I-2 is not, however, is a mystery.  You may find the
most impressive action sequences of 2000 in M:I-2¸ but you're not
getting much in the way of plot twists.  If you are in suspense, waiting
for a particular blow-your-mind plot twist, it is because you expect
M:I-2 to be even remotely like the original Mission: Impossible, which
it is not.  M: I-2 is a much more energetic film.  It is strengthened by
bringing a stylistically brilliant director as John Woo into the game.
Woo uses slow motion, fire, birds (his perennial favorite), incredible
backgrounds everything in the book to suck an audience in and keep them
holding their breath.  Even when watching an otherwise dull
conversation, Woo keeps us right on the edge of our seats, waiting for
the next big bang.  Hiring Woo over having Brian De Palma to direct is
one of the smartest moves Cruise has ever made as a producer, if only
because De Palma favors old style, more stagnant camerawork whereas Woo
uses the camera to make all of the motion in the film fluid.
 The acting may not win any Academy awards, but each actor does his job
well enough.  Hans Zimmer's impressive Latin score (a far cry from the
normal percussion-laden and instantly recognizable action flick score
that he uses on just about every Jerry Bruckheimer production) adds to
the tension, and the Limp Bizkit take on the `Mission: Impossible' theme
is more suited for the genre than the prior one.  Robert Towne serves up
snappy dialogue, a good plot, and imaginative sequences for us, and
Jeffrey Kimball handles the cameras damn near perfectly.
 So, you might ask, what is my gripe?  Well, it would have to be the
birds.  Ever since the shootout in the bird teahouse at the beginning of
Hard Boiled, Woo has loved things that fly and aren't made out of lead.
Birds make many appearances here way too many.  There are a few moments
when having birds present makes sense, but their presence in the number
of scenes that they are there (about half of the suspense scenes) makes
you feel like Woo is still grappling with his urge to be an experimental
director.
 But hey, if I go to an action movie that kicks this much ass with a
PG-13 rating, keeps me glued to my chair through 2 hours, twenty
minutes, and 32 ounces of coke, then he can put as many damn birds in as
he pleases.
Max Messier, the flabbergasted critic:
I used to love the delicacies that are offered during the summer movie
season.  We would get generous portions of turkey action films fat with
production budgets, sickly sweet comedy yams starring over-paid
television stars, comic-book adaptations tasting like stuffing from
Boston Market, and independent films that fill the belly like Momma's
honey rolls you fight your grandfather and cousins over.
Those days are over.  Since the launch of the 2000 summer movie season,
everything that the studios have put on the dinner table since the
beginning of May has stunk and made me sick to my stomach.
The biggest turkey so far has to be Mission: Impossible 2.  (Mind you, I
don't count the bloated corpse of Battlefield Earth -- that deserves its
own section of hell.)  A hodgepodge of misguided direction, pathetic
acting, grade school visual effects, unbelievable action scenes, and
Melrose Place-schooled scriptwriting, Mission: Impossible 2 would have
been passable as an action movie, only there isn't any decent action in
it.
I won't go into the pedestrian, stomach-turning plot, which James
described above.  The main problem with M:I-2 is that the writing team
of Ronald D. Moore, Brannon Braga, and Robert Towne have concocted such
an unoriginal and trite piece of storytelling.  It's a damn shame
because both Moore and Braga wrote Star Trek: First Contact and Star
Trek: Generations and Robert Towne wrote Chinatown.  Mission: Impossible
was an incredible TV show that incorporated unique story lines, amazing
character interactions, and some great villains.  It ranks up there with
The A-Team in my book. The first Mission: Impossible film was a decent
effort that just lingered too long like a teenage boy on his first date.
But M:I-2 represents a blatant rip-off of the James Bond films.  It
completely removes the element of teamwork and cohesiveness needed to
successfully complete the missions and replaces it with a loose cannon,
a brooding ladies' man who beds the female lead within ten minutes of
meeting her.  It's also a shame that Ving Rhames is reduced to playing a
monkey punching buttons on a laptop with the Mission: Impossible logo as
wallpaper.
The main question I think everyone will want to ask is: What the hell
has happened to John Woo!?  Every since he started working in America,
his films have been complete shit.  Even the opening scene of Ethan Hunt
climbing a rock face with sweeping helicopter camera shots makes me
think, Am I watching Cliffhanger 2?  Renny Harlin, get on the phone and
call your lawyer.
That said, all of your traditional Woo-isms are here: The slow-motion
shots, the children, the pigeons, religious figures, people flying
around with guns firing.  The only problem is that Woo is using the same
stuff he has used since The Killer in 1989. Nothing seems original at
all.  He is starting to remind me of the late, great Sam Peckinpah: A
good, solid director who lost his way and his ambition toward the end of
his career.  Mr. Woo, get out a piece of paper, write a good script, and
give Chow Yun-Fat a call.
M:I-2 is an utter disappointment and a delusion of a film.  Stay away --
far away.
Director: John Woo
Producer: Tom Cruise, Paula Wagner
Writer: Robert Towne
Starring: Tom Cruise, Dougray Scott, Thandie Newton, Richard Roxburgh,
John Polson, Brendan Gleeson, Rade Sherbedgia, Ving Rhames, Anthony
Hopkins
http://www.missionimpossible.com/
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
     I went into THE CIDER HOUSE RULES with a blank slate, knowing
nothing about the movie at all.
     I didn't even know how to pronounce the title.  It could've been
"The cider house-rules," meaning "This is the cider house, and these are
the rules."  Or it could've been "The cider house *rules*!" meaning
"That cider house is damn cool!"
     Wiser readers have probably already figured out that the former is
correct, and while this isn't a movie about a bunch of rules, it comes
awfully close.  Based on John Irving's novel (he also wrote the script),
CIDER HOUSE has that "adapted from the book" feeling -- like the writer
didn't want to edit out any of the chaff because it was all too
precious.
     Well, CIDER HOUSE is a sloppy mess because of it.  We start with
the 1930/1940's childhood of main character Homer (Maguire), his
adolescence in a remote Maine orphanage, his apprenticeship to the
orphanage's OB/GYN and abortionist Doctor Larch (Caine), his infatuation
with a patient who comes in for services (Theron), his decision to
become an apple picker, and... okay, are you bored yet?
     Try as I might, I can't even make it sound interesting, much less
exciting.  How this book became a film is beyond me.  Obviously
searching to recreate the magic of introspective period dramas like THE
ICE STORM and DEAD POETS SOCIETY, THE CIDER HOUSE RULES is an
exceedingly poor imitation that just doesn't work, mainly because
nothing happens in its two-plus hours.
     To enjoy the film at all, you'll need to take pleasure in the
details.  Maguire is typically excellent as the brooding Homer.  Caine,
doing his first American accent, is surprisingly effective as Homer's
counterpoint.  The supporting cast is uniformly good, excepting the
inexplicably cast musician Erykah Badu.  As a character study, CIDER
HOUSE is mild entertainment, but it's not enough to merit recommending
the film.
     THE CIDER HOUSE RULES, you'll be interested to know, represents a
13 year struggle to make it to the big screen.  Oh, how you feel that.
http://www.miramax.com/mm_front/owa/mp.entryPoint?action=0&midStr=1312
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Eastside (1999)
Another Saved by the Bell alumnus attempts to shed the goody-goody image
and make it in the big bad world of movies, as Mario López hits the
Eastside (of L.A., natch) in the hopes of rescuing a community center
from the hands of his employer, an evil crime boss (Efrain Figueroa).
Yes, the movies have been so good to Elizabeth Berkley already that we
expect her to pop up in a cameo.  Alas, it's not to be.  The story goes:
López is released from jail on his 21st birthday, whereupon he promptly
gets a job as a heavy for Figueroa's bad guy.  There's a love story,
which -- horror of horrors -- takes us for a loop when we find out the
girl he's fallen for is the daughter of a community center owner -- a
guy who López is supposed to bully out of his property!
What's a young ex-con to do?  Our man López must decide whether money or
principles are more important -- even if it costs him his life!
Shudder.  This sad imitation of Stand and Deliver is so laughable it
barely merits the time it will take to write this review.  The acting,
the direction, and the script are all so atrocious it's a miracle anyone
rented the crew a camera to work with.  Seriously, we're talking about
dialogue like (and this is a direct quote), "I fuckin' hate that fuckin'
fuck!"  And ladies and gentlemen, it just gets worse from there.
The only thing more laughable than the movie itself is the fact that on
the DVD release, they actually put a commentary track on it.  The only
thing more laughable than that has to be the content of the commentary
track, where the director and stars wax about how much they love the
film and how important it is.  Sure, I'll throw you half a star for your
community-friendly message, but that's all you get.  No stars for you!
Director: Lorena David
Producer: Ravi Chopra, Mark A. Roberts
Writer: Ravi Chopra
Starring: Mario López, Elizabeth Bogush, Mark D. Espinoza, Efrain
Figueroa, Gulshan Grover, Maurice Compte, Richard Lynch
http://www.kingsize-ent.com/Eastside/index.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Blue in the Face (1995)
     It took all of five days after wrapping the shoot of SMOKE to
create BLUE IN THE FACE, an (allegedly) all-improvised follow-up to
Wayne Wang and Paul Auster's feature centered on a tiny smoke shop in
Brooklyn.  It's a weird experiment in filmmaking, studded with cameos
by Lou Reed, Madonna, Michael J. Fox, Roseanne, Lily Tomlin, and more.
Unfortunately, you've probably seen all the funniest bits in the
movie's trailer.
     Separated into segments with titles like "Brooklyn Attitude," BLUE
IN THE FACE explores the Brooklyn mystique and the Brooklyn experience
with video interviews and impromptu sketches.  Everything "Brooklyn" is
praised, from Ebbets Field and Jackie Robinson to Belgian Waffles and
the sanctity of the local cigar store.
     A lot of this is hilarious:  Reed as the smoke shop
employee/eyeglass frame inventor who's been thinking about leaving the
city for 35 years; Jim Jarmusch as Bob, who is finally giving up his
Lucky Strikes; Fox in an insanely comical turn as a spontaneous social
analyst/psychologist; Mel Gorham as Violetta, Auggie's only partially
stable girlfriend.
     Holding the craziness together (sort of) is Auggie (Harvey Keitel)
and the Brooklyn Cigar Co. where he works.  When news that the store
has been sold arrives, Auggie does his best to change the owner's
(Victor Argo) mind, culminating in the appearance of the ghost of
Jackie Robinson, who convinces him the store should stay open.
     This is not your typical Hollywood fare.  It's not typical
*anything.*  Clocking in at about 76 minutes, BLUE IN THE FACE clearly
has the look and feel of a spontaneous collection of vignettes, some of
which work, and some of which don't.  It's worthwhile for the funny
bits, and the film isn't long enough to make you lose interest when it
drags.  I suppose it did what it was supposed to do (that is, give
everyone who wasn't in SMOKE something to do for a few afternoons).
You'll have to be the judge if that was a good idea or a bad one.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
     You are Nicolas Cage.  After clawing your way through B-movies to
an Academy Award for Leaving Las Vegas, what do you do?  You take part
after part in a progressively worsening slate of action films (pausing
only for the even worse melodrama City of Angels), bottoming out with
Snake Eyes and 8MM.  Your action career is at an obvious end.  So do you
go back to the drama you can pull off so well?
     No!  You take a role in Gone in 60 Seconds, and try to extend your
movie muscle even further!  Here's a movie that's pure, unabashed
Hollywood:  Randall "Memphis" Raines (Cage), in order to convince a mean
criminal to spare the life of his brother (Giovanni Ribisi), must BLOW
UP 50 cars in the next 72 hours!
     Er, wait a sec.  Steal.  STEAL 50 cars.  You see, Memphis is The
Best of The Best of L.A. car thieves.  Retired, of course, but a
fabulous car thief.  Naturally, kid brother follows in Memphis's
footsteps but gets himself into trouble, so Memphis has to come out of
retirement to save his butt.  It's a plot so insanely stupid it can only
mean one thing:  You are watching a Jerry Bruckheimer movie.  (See also:
Armageddon.)
     The only part of 60 Seconds less believable than Ribisi and Cage
being related is Cage and nubile vixen Angelina Jolie being former
lovers.  In the film, Jolie plays the hiply-named "Sway", a likewise
retired car "boost" whose blonde dreadlocks make her both a blaring
"Look at Me!" siren during night jobs as well as a fire hazard.
     Naturally, I expect Gone in 60 Seconds to appeal to audiences for
the one (and only) reason it appealed to me:  Because there are lots and
lots of car chases with lots and lots of cool cars.  Naturally, Memphis
and crew are not stealing 50 Hyundais.  They're stealing Hummers,
Ferraris, Porsches, Aston Martins, Corvettes, T-Birds, and a mythical
1967 Shelby Mustang GT 500 that becomes Memphis's Moby Dick.
     The cars are spun out, jumped, peeled out, jumped some more, and
accelerated to ungodly speeds.  Surprisingly, director Dominic Sena
(credited mostly with commercials) pulls this off with a remarkably low
body count, which is admirable.
     Gone in 60 Seconds is ultimately a feast for the eyes provided you
turn off your brain before you sit down to watch it.  Not to mention,
you'll be surprised how hard it is not to challenge the chump in the car
next to you to a little drag race on the ride home.
Director: Dominic Sena
Producer: Jerry Bruckheimer, Mike Stenson
Writer: Scott Michael Rosenberg
Starring: Nicolas Cage, Angelina Jolie, Giovanni Ribisi, Robert Duvall,
Delroy Lindo, Will Patton, Chi McBride, Scott Caan, James Duval,
Christopher Eccleston, Trevor Goddard, Vinnie Jones, Timothy Olyphant,
William Lee Scott
http://studio.go.com/movies/goneinsixty/index_flash.html
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Angus (1995)
     Bring together big stars George C. Scott, Rita Moreno, and Kathy
Bates to do a feature film and what do you get?  A movie about a
teenager named Angus, "the fat kid who's good at science and fair at
football" and who just wants to be accepted.  What else would you
expect?
     While not really a "kids' movie," ANGUS is a workmanlike
coming-of-age film, full of slapstick and insult trading among the
youthful cast and their parents.  Angus is played by newcomer Charlie
Talbert (who was discovered in a Wendy's restaurant).  Bates plays Mom,
and Scott is Grandpa.  With the help of his nerdy friend Troy (Chris
Owen), Angus chases after local beauty Melissa (JURASSIC PARK's Ariana
Richards) and overcomes the obstacles placed before him by the
requisite jock-bullies who are threatened by his being different.
     A heavily tested formula, to say the least.  The predictability of
ANGUS is mind-numbing, but thankfully it's pretty funny along the way,
especially Scott's crusty grandfather (note that the humor may not be
totally suitable for children).  But don't expect a lot of touching
dialogue or an even remotely believable romance between Angus and
Melissa; instead, between the jokes, just sit back and listen to 20 or
30 of your favorite pop hits, one after another.
     In the end, the movie is humdrum, marginal eye candy--made of pure
saccharine.  Take it or leave it, it's completely harmless and as
filling as a packet of Sweet N Low.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter & Novelist
-Contributing Editor, Mike's FEEDBACK  /  Film Critic, Texas Business Weekly
-[R]eply to be added to movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
     My review notes for SCREAM consist of three whole words:
     What has been billed as the first "really scary" movie in a long
time surprisingly lives up to its promise (due, in part, to the fact
that there hasn't been a really scary movie since THE EXORCIST III in
1990), with plenty of screaming on the screen and in the audience.  Wes
Craven's SCREAM is a true exercise in the horror film -- an in-depth
study of the genre that terrifies at the same time as it good-naturedly
pokes a little fun at itself.
     Anyway, Miramax is practically *begging* critics not to reveal the
plot, so I'll just give you the starting point:  an all-alone Drew
Barrymore answers a phone call from a deranged killer, and it goes
downhill from there.  Be aware that the "star" of the show is not
Barrymore, but is actually Neve Campbell (THE CRAFT).  And the *real*
stars are a couple of her character's friends, played by a now-blonde
Rose McGowan (THE DOOM GENERATION) and Matthew Lillard (HACKERS), who
totally steal the show.
     Of course, these are only two of the dozens of characters who serve
as Fresh Meat for our killer, the most notable of which is probably
Courtney Cox as a trashy tabloid TV reporter covering the story.
     Thank God Craven has imbued SCREAM with witty dialogue, fine plot
development, and an ending that actually seems remotely plausible. 
While he does let up with the terror in the final act (I won't be having
any nightmares tonight), I left pleasantly surprised and a bit shaken up
from so much jumping in my seat.  I'm sure you'll agree.  It's a...
well... a scream.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Low Down, The (2000)
I like the slacker mentality, really I do.  Nights of parties, days of
sleeping them off, not a care in the world.  The sad thing is that, with
rare exception (namely Slacker), movies about the slacker mentality come
off as if they too were made without a care in the world.
The Low Down is Exhibit A when it comes to this offense.  Lazy,
meandering, mopey, and flat, this is a cheap-looking film obsessed with
showing off a hip image it doesn't actually have.
The brainchild of UK music video director Jamie Thraves, The Low Down
ostensibly tells the story of a guy named Frank (Aiden Gillen), a
twentysomething slacker who has a crisis of sorts as he realizes he has
no life.  Enter Ruby (Kate Ashfield), a fresh-faced lass, to try and
break him out of his funk.  Will he elevate himself into a new kind of
existence?  Jesus, I can't even make this sound interesting.
Sure enough, The Low Down is boring and trite, something that might have
been passable as a film school project if only Thraves had made it a
decade ago.  But this existential wannabe can't even drop in a wry joke,
as scene after scene starts flat and ends even flatter.  By the finale,
90 minutes later, we have a dumb, ambiguous ending dropped on us --
something that theoretically would challenge us to think about Frank's
condition, but doesn't work simply because we're too bored to care what
happens to Frank at all.  Thraves comes off as simply too afraid to make
a point.
As for its production, everything about The Low Down comes off as
cheap.  Shot on Super 16 and mostly with a handheld camera, it's
supposed to look avant garde and edgy.  Instead it looks rushed and
lazy.  The sound is just as bad, muffled and often drowned out by street
noise.  Which leaves me to wonder: Where is the music?  What kind of
music video director doesn't have a kickin' soundtrack to punctuate his
"art," anyway?  Not a very good one, I guess.
Director: Jamie Thraves
Producer: Sally Llewellyn, John Stewart
Writer: Jamie Thraves
Starring: Aidan Gillen, Kate Ashfield, Dean Lennox Kelly, Tobias
Menzies, Rupert Procter, Samantha Power, Deanna Smiles, Maggie Lloyd
Williams
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
     When one sees Glenn Close portraying the vice-president, one begins
to realize just how much she looks (and can act) like Gerald Ford.
     Frankly, I was shocked to discover how much I liked AIR FORCE ONE. 
Yes, it has villainous Russians who can never see our good guy President
(Harrison Ford) when he's hiding right in front of them (much less shoot
him).  Yes, it has Secret Service guys who die at the hand of the enemy
like flies in a bug zapper.  Yes, it has the cheesiest special effects
this side of of a "Tom & Jerry" cartoon.  Yes, it features a rambling
Gary Oldman in one of his clearly improvised looney-tune
terrorist/psychopath roles.  I could go on and on...
     But I won't.  Instead, I'll tell you that AIR FORCE ONE (DIE HARD
on a plane with a President on it, thus distinguishing it from DIE HARD
II, PASSENGER 57, and EXECUTIVE DECISION) is a spellbinding film, one
that grips the viewer from the very start and doesn't let up until 140
minutes later, plot holes or no.  It also may be the funniest movie I've
seen all year -- and I still can't figure out if it was intentional or
not!
     And I don't care.  AIR FORCE ONE has great action, a good story,
and once you get past the melodramatics of his co-stars, one of Harrison
Ford's best performances, ever.  In fact, I'd be so bold as to say that
AF0 is probably the best new film of 1997 to date.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
     After just missing Oscar gold with performances in The Truman Show
and Man in the Moon, Jim Carrey returns to the dramatic form for a third
bid at the little statue with a heart-rending performance as a victim of
split-personality disorder in the soulful drama Me, Myself & Irene.
     Yeah, and Adam Sandler is a gifted thespian.  With their
long-awaited follow-up to There's Something About Mary, the Farrelly
brothers return to their specialty -- gross-out shenanigans -- in this
equally funny entry into their oeuvre of perversion.
     The story involves the naďve and lovable Charlie (Carrey), a Rhode
Island state trooper who finds himself the whipping boy of the entire
state due to his welcome-mat demeanor.  Even children tell him to stick
it to himself.  And have I mentioned his new bride births triplets with
a black midget, running off with the father to leave Charlie to care for
the boys as his own?  No doubt about it, you're in Farrelly
brothers-land now...
     The story gets jump-started when Irene (Renée Zellweger) enters the
picture, and through a series of mishaps Irene and Charlie find
themselves on the run from a crooked golf course owner(!?) throughout
the northeast U.S.  And there's one other problem: Charlie has mentally
snapped, taking on a second personality of "Hank," Charlie's utter
opposite -- lover, fighter, and smooth-talker.
     Irene relies on two things to make itself the off-the-charts comedy
it truly is:  potty humor and the ability of Carrey to do pantomime
(mainly via beating himself up a la Fight Club).  And did I mention the
potty humor?  We're not talking fart-joke-as-afterthought.  We're
talking chicken-up-a-man's-butt as critical plot point.  We're talking
clear-the-theaters gross-out stuff... stuff that the Farrelly brothers
do so well it's better than poetry.
     Zellweger plays the straight (wo)man admirably well in the shadow
of Carrey's insane slapsticker.  If only the plot had been better -- or
rather, if only there had been a plot at all -- the movie might have
become a classic.  As it is, the film makes almost no sense at all,
having something to do with the aforementioned golf course and an
unnamed scandal therein, somehow peripherally involving Irene.  Mary was
clever.  Irene is just plain dumb.
     But no matter.  Irene is so easy on the eyes and on the funny bone
it practically begs for a sequel.  (Discerning viewers: Watch for cameos
by sports stars Anna Kournakova and Cam Neely, and a eye-popper from
late-night cable queen Shannon Whirry.)
Director: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Producer: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly, Bradley Thomas
Writer: Peter Farrelly, Mike Cerrone, Bobby Farrelly
Starring: Jim Carrey, Renée Zellweger, Chris Cooper, Robert Forster,
Richard Jenkins, Michael Bowman, Ezra Buzzington, Traylor Howard
http://www.memyselfandirene.com/
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for To Wong Foo, Thanks for Everything, Julie Newmar (1995)
     "Quirky" doesn't begin to describe the new, long-awaited film TO WONG
FOO, THANKS FOR EVERYTHING, JULIE NEWMAR.  If you've seen any of the
promos for the movie, you probably know the premise:  three drag queens
(Patrick Swayze, Wesley Snipes, and John Leguizamo) start a cross-country
trek to Hollywood, carting with them their wardrobes and an autographed
picture with the title inscription.  Hardly out of New York, their car
breaks down in middle-of-nowhere Snydersville.  Here, the "ladies" give
the town a makeover, bringing it not only fashion sense, but respect for
women, racial harmony, and an end to spouse abuse.  A drag queen can do a
lot when she puts her mind to it.
     The three are as different as drag queens can be.  Vida (Swayze)
sweeps around like a Southern debutante, while Noxeema (Snipes) acts more
like a pro wrestler.  Chi Chi (Leguizamo) is the Charo-type of the bunch,
a drag queen-in-training who never realizes when she's laying it on too
thick.  Of the three, Leguizamo is the one to watch.  It's almost
frightening how well he lands his role, while Swayze and Snipes are more
like guys acting like guys in drag.  The supporting cast is uninspiring,
but watching for the numerous cameos is fun.
     Most of the time, the film is so totally unconventional that it's
riotously funny, but the one-joke premise wears a little thin and often
becomes as silly as a Jim Carrey vehicle.  And although it borrows heavily
from last year's PRISCILLA:  QUEEN OF THE DESERT, TO WONG FOO is still
quite a bit different and takes cross-dressing into realms I never knew
existed.
     When it's all said and done, TO WONG FOO tries to make some wholesome
social statements, but they seem out of place.  The film is a fun time,
and that's about all that should be expected.  It faces a dilemma just
like the one the trio faces when choosing a vehicle to purchase:  should
they go with "style" or "substance."  The choice seems obvious.
-Christopher Null / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Operator, The (2000)
     Exhibit A in why you shouldn't be rude to telemarketers, no matter
your mood.
     Indie flick THE OPERATOR is a hybrid black comedy/Hitchcock
thriller about a real cad named Gary (Michael Laurence) -- a lawyer,
quite naturally -- who "reaps what he sows" after telling off a vengeful
telephone operator.  Gary cheats on his wife (and his mistress),
gambles, spends the savings on a fancy car, and represents dirtbags at
the office.  When the stress of his life gets too much to bear, he lets
a poor Ma Ball employee we known only as Shiva (Jacqueline Kim) take the
brunt of his wrath, which she turns back upon him in spades.
     Soon enough, thanks to the apparently unchecked power of the phone
company, Gary is out of the house, his credit cards are cancelled, and
he appears to be headed for unemployment.  The bulk of the movie
consists of Gary trying to ferret out his tormenter and coming to terms
with the notion of karma.
     In this regard, THE OPERATOR has some of its best moments, and
newcomer Laurence shows some excellent dramatic range as he eventually
welcomes the pain being visited upon him.  Set in Dallas,
writer/director Jon Dichter (who introduced his film at South by
Southwest) repeatedly called THE OPERATOR a "quintessential Texas
movie."  I'm not sure it speaks to the common fears of most of Texas,
though most of the characters do sport southern accents (although "Drew
Carey" star Christa Miller's is pretty over the top).
     In the end, THE OPERATOR is a pretty good time, especially
considering its obvious budget constraints.  My only real beef is with
the whole idea.  I pray to god the phone operators can't really transfer
funds from my account, charge things to my credit cards, and get my car
repossessed.  Hell, I doubt they can balance their checkbooks.
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
     Now this is some production.  I'm lucky enough to live in one of the
"selected cities" for BOOGIE NIGHTS's limited opening (it goes wide on Oct.
31), and in all my years as a moviegoer, I think this is the first time I've
seen a mirrorball in the theater put to use during a film.  Outside of that,
BOOGIE NIGHTS may have generated the most enthusiastic audience response I've
heard in ages.
     The premise is simple and well-known.  Young "Dirk Diggler" ("Marky" Mark
Wahlberg) is a busboy discovered in a Receda nightclub by a big-time porn
flick producer (Burt Reynolds, in perhaps his best role *ever*).  Mingling
with the likes of Amber Waves (Julianne Moore, my fave actress), the innocent
Rollergirl (Heather Graham, who doesn't have nearly enough screen time), and
other bigshots of the biz, Diggler rises (so to speak) and falls as the porn
industry ruptures during the dawn of the 1980s.
     One of the more frightening portrayals of life in the 70s to hit screens
recently, BOOGIE NIGHTS is full of kitsch and sprawls over a full decade of
excess.  Writer/director Paul Thomas Anderson, who hit-and-missed with HARD
EIGHT, takes a dozen characters through 2 1/2 hours of meandering storylines,
supporting players, drug/sex binges, and more costume changes than you can
fathom.  Because he has so much to say, and because everyone's story goes in a
different direction, a lot of this film gets lost in the margins.  Too many
characters are too much alike, and most of them are too shallow to merit any
screen time at all.
     The result is a sloppy, scattered feature that, surprisingly, completely
engaged me from the opening shot.  I don't exactly know why BOOGIE NIGHTS is
so enjoyable, but it's probably because it's just so much fun to *watch*. 
Porn has never been handled with such style and irony before, and watching
Anderson serve up slice after slice of the industry's excess and self-defeat
is hysterical, despite the obvious problems with the script.  (Note that the
film's sex scenes are very inexplicit.)
     There's probably not much of a message to take away from the film (Don't
Do Drugs has been done before), but it doesn't suffer much from it.  You'll
need to swallow your preconceived notions, but I would not hesitate to
recommend the film to just about anyone.
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
     Few enough people know that THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY is based on
Patricia Highsmith's 1955 novel of the same name.  Fewer still know they
already made one movie about Mr. Ripley, a little French number called
PURPLE NOON (1960).
     If you happen to be one of a handful who has seen NOON, don't feel
like THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY is retreading old ground.  It's actually
different.  In fact, it's very different.  So much so that with the
exception of a few brief scenes and the overall theme, these two films
could be based on different source material.  What's really astonishing
is that both are excellent films.
     Tom Ripley (Damon) is introduced innocuously enough.  He's a New
York piano player/maintenance worker/bathroom attendant who, after
borrowing a Princeton-crested jacket, suddenly finds himself propelled
to Italy in search of Dickie Greenleaf (Law) at the best of Dickie's
father (Rebhorn).  Tom arrives soon enough, finding Dickie living the
slacker dream, sailing, drinking, and carousing -- when he's not
spending time with steady girl Marge (Paltrow).
     Ripley's plan to emulate Dickie is apparent from the start, but it
isn't until free spirit Dickie inevitably pushes the clingy Tom away
that Ripley figures he'll take over Dickie's life altogether.  Then the
fun really starts.
     Matt Damon plays a sociopath with uncanny -- and quite spooky --
ease.  In fact, I wouldn't be surprised to see Tom Ripley become a
recurring antihero -- like a Hannibal Lecter should be.  Highsmith wrote
five books about Mr. Ripley, so there's plenty of source material to
work from.  Sequels or no, Damon is so dead-on scary that Hollywood
likely shudders to be alone with him.
     Gwyneth Paltrow, on the other hand, is fairly useless in her role.
For starters, she vacillates between her standby British accent and her
plain-old Gwyneth voice, neither of which really fit her character.
Worse is that she has little to do in the film but often go hysterical,
which doesn't help the movie.  Before you Paltrow fans hit the "Send
Hate Mail" button, try not to forget Gwynny's performance in dogs like A
PERFECT MURDER, GREAT EXPECTATIONS, and HUSH.  It's just too bad she had
to muck up a perfectly good movie like this one.
     Jude Law and the rest of the supporting cast, particularly Hoffman
as a boorish American friend who shows up midway through the movie, are
good or great.  The music, dominated by period (1950's) jazz songs, is
also well-suited for the disturbing thematics of the movie.  And let's
not forget director Anthony Minghella (THE ENGLISH PATIENT), who
captures the beauty of Italy while coaxing some great performances from
his actors.
     On the sour side, MR. RIPLEY's homosexual themes are awkward at
best, and a few plot points (mainly Ripley setting up his alibi) seem to
have been lost to editing, despite a 2:30 run time.  As a thriller, this
may seem long, but the mood is perfect and the film rarely drags.
Altogether, it's a grand psychodrama.  Perfect, you know, for the
holidays.
Director: Anthony Minghella
Producer: William Horberg, Tom Sternberg
Writer: Anthony Minghella
Starring: Matt Damon, Gwyneth Paltrow, Jude Law, Cate Blanchett, Jack
Davenport, Caterina Deregibus, Philip Baker Hall, Philip Seymour
Hoffman, James Rebhorn, Stefania Rocca
http://www.talentedmrripley.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for From Dusk Till Dawn (1996)
     If you have the faintest idea what this movie is all about, I'd
appreciate a call.  As best I can tell, the lowdown is this:  guns,
hostages, a Winnebago, Mexico, breasts, booze, vampires, and gore...lots
and lots of gore.
     "Not for all tastes" is an extreme understatement, as FROM DUSK TILL
DAWN is the most obscenely violent and distasteful film to come along in
years.  Basically an EVIL DEAD set in Mexico, this Quentin
Tarantino-Robert Rodriguez collaboration tells the sketchy story of the
Gecko brothers (Tarantino and George Clooney, taking a rest from "ER" to
cut up people in another medium), a couple of fugitives on the run to the
border.  On the way, they pick up a family as hostages:  lapsed preacher
Jacob Fuller (Harvey Keitel), daughter Kate (Juliette Lewis), and son
Scott (Ernest Liu).  In the Fuller's RV, they make it to a Mexican strip
bar, only to discover it's run by vampires.  (Thankfully, it makes a great
place for an old-fashioned bloodletting.)  Plot is clearly incidental to
the film.
     Tarantino's typical wry humor (some is funny, some is decidedly not)
pervades the film, punctuated by Rodriguez's flair for filming violence. 
The latter gets a lot more screen time, with the frequently loud
explosions effectively muting what I expect were some good one-liners. 
These two filmmakers may be best buddies (and they are), but their styles
just don't seem to match sometimes:  Tarantino's penchant for long,
drawn-out scenes doesn't fit with Rodriguez's quick cutting style.  You
can almost hear him off-screen, chanting, "Get on with it!"
     And I was too.  I wish Tarantino would get over the fascination of
hearing his own dialogue, although I must admit he seems to have found his
perfect role as a demented pervert with a heart of coal.  By the time the
gore-fest is in full swing, it feels like a giant-screen game of "DOOM,"
complete with flowing blood and rolling heads.
     The way-over-the-top campiness is so completely ridiculous, it's
impossible to take anything in the film seriously.  And trust me, that's
not a bad thing.  The problem is, it makes rating FROM DUSK TILL DAWN
nearly impossible, so here's my best shot.  For the squeamish and/or
feminists: *.  For schlock horror fans and Tarantino freaks: *****.  A
nice average:
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Ironically, what I was most excited about seeing in PATCH ADAMS is what
eventually left me feeling cheated by it in the end.  After seeing the
trailers, I knew I was going to get Robin Williams playing that lovably
sensitive, extremely funny man, that shows people there's more to life. 
You know, the guy from DEAD POETS SOCIETY and GOOD WILL HUNTING.  I love
that guy; probably because he had truly inspired me before.  And things
were going so well for the first two-thirds of this movie too.  Until it
was over and I thought to myself, "Wait, I think I've seen this movie
before."
In the end, my impression of PATCH ADAMS is that is has some really
funny scenes, and you can't help but fall in love with the guy when he's
doing all of these great things, a lot of which you have probably seen
in the trailers.  And he has a lot to teach everyone he comes into
contact with in the film.  So throughout I'm thinking, "What a great
guy; I wish I was more like him."  Which is always a good set-up.  But
it never follows through.  The dramatic conclusion falls flat, and based
on a true story or not, the plot points are a bit cliched.  PATCH ADAMS
is a comedy, but more appropriately it would be classified as an
inspirational film.  And the hallmark of the inspirational film is that
climactic scene at the end where the inspirational character takes a
stand and is met by stiff consequences, but ultimately we realize that
he made a difference.  You see it in DEAD POETS SOCIETY in the "Oh
Captain, my captain" scene.  In PATCH ADAMS though, it never comes. 
Though Patch does take an emotional stand at the end in a scene that
tries to steal the emotion of a film like DEAD POETS SOCIETY, I don't
know that we're convinced that he truly made a difference.  He is a
great guy, yes, but maybe not great enough.
Director: Tom Shadyac
Producer: Barry Kemp, Mike Farrell, Marvin Minoff, Charles Newirth
Writer: Steve Oedekerk
Starring: Robin Williams, Monica Potter, Daniel London
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - Writer and Script Consultant
Check out The Movie Emporium's new design at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
Any time you go to see a romantic comedy with big budget stars and a
promo tagline like, "He went from the eye of the storm into the arms of
a hurricane," you have to be a little scared.  After all, for every WHEN
HARRY MET SALLY, there are a dozen WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING's, and the
worst part is that the bad ones always seem to make more money.
Surprisingly, my fears about sitting through FORCES OF NATURE were
unfounded and alleviated pretty quickly.  FORCES OF NATURE is basically
PLANES, TRAINS, AND AUTOMOBILES, except that John Candy has been
replaced with Sandra Bullock, Steve Martin is now Ben Affleck on his way
to get married, and instead of hating his travelling companion, Ben is
falling in love with her.  With a set-up like this, you have to be
especially worried, because Hollywood thrives on taking totally
unrealistic premises and turning them into trite, sentimental, and naive
romantic comedies with unrealistic happy endings.  The reason this
romantic comedy is pulled off, despite such an unrealistic premise
though, is that the plot is actually somewhat darker an more honest than
that of you typical popcorn movie.  Additionally, the more unrealistic
moments are played for laughs and not tears.
Credit the director, relative newcomer Hughes, the writer, and the
entire cast, particularly Steve Zahn as the best man, for keeping FORCES
from careening into unabashed sentimentalism.  It's the best Hollywood
text-book romantic comedy I've seen in a while, but with that said, it
is still a Hollywood text-book romantic comedy, so while you can expect
a few laughs, and a sentimental moment or two, don't expect a life
altering experience.
And one more thing, because I know that there are those of you out there
that are already eager to send me hate-mail for saying WHILE YOU WERE
SLEEPING sucked or maybe you want to claim that FORCES OF NATURE is
life-altering.  Save your time.  I personally don't mind the hate-mail,
I think it is funny, but if you think you are going to make me change my
mind or feel bad for insulting a masterpiece, you are not.  What I write
here are my opinions, and if you don't think they have any merit, don't
read my reviews.  I'm not doing this whole film review thing to feel
self-important, I'm doing it as a service, so if you don't think what I
write is worth reading, then PLEASE don't read it.
Director: Bronwyn Hughes
Producer: Susan Arnold, Donna Arkoff Roth, Ian Bryce
Writer: Marc Lawrence
Starring: Ben Affleck, Sandra Bullock, Maura Tierney, and Steve Zahn
http://www.asylum.com/forcesofnature
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
     Only a year ago, Cast Away would have been subject to unavoidable
and endless Gilligan's Island comparisons.  Now, it will never hear the
end of Survivor analogies, and that's too bad, because the film really
has no resemblance to either TV show.
     Cast Away is The Big Tom Hanks Movie of 2000, the latest in a long
line of Big Tom Hanks Movies that stretches back to include The Green
Mile, Saving Private Ryan, Apollo 13, Forrest Gump, and Philadelphia. 
However, Cast Away has the distinction of being the only Tom Hanks Movie
to star no one but Tom Hanks.
     Just about, anyway.  As you've undoubtedly heard, Cast Away largely
concerns Hanks' character Chuck Noland, stranded and forgotten on a tiny
island in the South Pacific after his plane goes down in the drink. 
Ruthless in business (living and dying "by the clock,"), yet deep down
kind enough to give you the shirt off his back, Noland is a FedEx
manager constantly jetting around the globe to fix things that go awry. 
And that means lots of plane time.
     In one of the most spectacular, realistic, and harrowing crash
sequences put to film, Noland's sudden Christmas Eve flight goes off
course and then plummets into the ocean, only hours after Noland has
handed a small, conspicuously ring-sized box to his earthbound
girlfriend Kelly (Helen Hunt).  Karma and Hollywood being what they are,
Noland survives the crash and winds up on the aforementioned island. 
And get comfy, because he's going to spend a long time there.
     Skeptics be damned, Cast Away's finest moments consist of Hanks
alone with his surroundings.  I never thought it would be any fun to
watch Mr. Gump parade around on the beach solo, but it simply is, a
testament to the man's serious acting chops.  As Noland figures out how
to survive against impossible odds -- from opening a coconut to making a
fire to collecting fresh water to drink to dealing with a toothache -- I
found immense satisfaction in viewing his daily rituals.  The actual
experience of being on that island would be unfathomable and
unbearable.  To have turned it into a very watchable movie is
unthinkable.  And yet they've done it.
     I'm not giving anything away that isn't part of the trailer by
saying that, years later, Noland escapes his gulag, whereupon he must
come to terms with a world that has cast him away (get it?). 
Unfortunately, once Hanks is back in civilization, the movie completely
bogs down with soulful soliloquies, mainly between Noland and his lost
girl Kelly, who has had to move on with her life.  None of this epilogue
offers anything in the way of surprise, mainly because director Robert
Zemeckis cuts out what stood to be the most thrilling part of the film
-- the first month that Hanks spends back in civilization.  I mean, if
you spent four years alone on an island, do you know how seriously
fucked up you'd be?  Hell, I start to itch if the TV is off for an hour.
     But in Cast Away Hanks is a longhaired near maniac one minute.  The
next he's shaved and fine, with a little insomnia and sun-bleached hair
his only apparent problems, mental or physical.  You could have made an
entire film about his reconditioning.  Or you could have just ended it
when he makes his escape.  Anything but this hour of padding that
leeches from what is otherwise an emotional tour de force.
     It is certain that Hanks's name will be up in lights again come
Oscar nomination time.  The same can't be said for Helen Hunt, an
unfortunate casting mistake whose innate, hard-assed unlovability makes
you wonder why Noland was interested in her to begin with.
     Ultimately, Cast Away rests wholly on the strength of its second
act and its leading man.  The supporting cast, the editing, the
camerawork -- everything else is completely swept aside to make way for
our survivor.  And that's funny, because if you'd told me yesterday that
Tom Hanks, a movie camera, and a whole lot of nothin' would be the
recipe for great cinema, I'd have told you to take a flying leap in the
ocean.
Director: Robert Zemeckis
Producer: Tom Hanks, Jack Rapke, Steve Starkey, Robert Zemeckis
Writer: William Broyles Jr.
Starring: Tom Hanks, Helen Hunt, Christopher Noth, Nick Searcy, Lari
White
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for How to Make an American Quilt (1995)
     I am dumbfounded about where to begin writing about this
experiment-in-filmmaking-gone-terribly-wrong, HOW TO MAKE AN AMERICAN
QUILT.  Some of the best actresses working in film (Anne Bancroft,
Ellen Burstyn, Winona Ryder, Jean Simmons, Lois Smith, Samantha Mathis,
and Claire Danes, to name a few) appear in this movie.  And I can't
begin to imagine how such a wide array of talents agreed to appear in
such a dreadful picture.
     Ryder plays the cheeky Finn, a precocious grad student pondering a
marriage proposal.  Having second thoughts, she decides to spend the
summer with a gaggle of quilting relatives and their friends, just to
sort things out.  Well, we see right off the bat that this probably
wasn't such a great idea, because each and every one of these people is
completely insane.
     For some bizarre, sadistic motive, each of the ladies begins to
tell Finn the warped story of her life, wherein we have the luxury of
viewing cutesy flashbacks which inevitably include adultery, self-pity,
insecurity, more adultery, pathetic whining, and/or a lot of just plain
bad advice.  And get this:  all this so-called "wisdom" is the "theme"
for the latest quilt they're working on--Finn's wedding quilt.
     After an O.D. of this idiocy, Finn is driven into the arms of Leon
(Johnathon Schaech), a muscle headed loser with no redeeming
qualities.  When she feels bad about it later, one of the quilters
(don't even bother trying to keep them straight, as some 8 zillion
characters are introduced in the first 5 minutes) advises her to
*never* tell her fiancee about the affair.  Well, how comforting.
     Maybe I didn't get it because I'm just a guy.  Maybe I just don't
understand "quilt humor."  But this film is simply awful.  The way I
see it, there's nothing wrong with the acting; it's the story and the
actresses' parts.  (I do give Bancroft and Smith a few kudos for making
me laugh ... twice.)  Director Jocelyn Moorhouse and especially
screenwriter Jane Anderson should both be blacklisted.
     Be warned, stay away from this one.  If this is really how to make
an American quilt, I'll just sleep on the floor covered with a burlap
sack.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-E-mail request to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
     Treading on the thinnest of plots, Road Trip fully earns its
obvious comparisons to American Pie, There's Something About Mary, and
even Animal House -- with one gross-out, slapstick scenario after
another, all wedged into a tight 90 minutes of running time.
     Witness our college-aged hero Josh (Go's Breckin Meyer), who
figures his long-distance girlfriend Tiffany (Rachel Blanchard) has
blown him off, leading him into a night of passion with local girl Beth
("Felicity"'s Amy Smart).  When the ensuing sex tape (why must there
always be evidence?) is mailed to Tiffany in error, the titular road
trip begins, as Josh must make the 1,800 mile trek from Ithaca, NY to
Austin, TX and be back in time for midterms.  And what's a road trip
without a bunch of guys along for the ride?  And no money!?  (If you've
seen Overnight Delivery -- same thing.)
     Highlights from the trip include an exploding car, a sperm bank, a
visit to an all-black frat house, a little Viagra (though not in
conjunction with the sperm bank), and a stolen bus for the blind -- all
narrated by Tom Green, who has stayed behind in order to feed a pet
snake.
     The acting, the line delivery, the music -- everything is as it
should be here.  Constantly we are reminded that we are not watching the
comedy of Woody Allen or Albert Brooks.  We are watching a "Beavis and
Butt-head" episode played by real-life actors.  Only funnier.  And
cruder.
     Thank god, each scene of Road Trip is played to its comedic
terminus.  Sometimes this is clever, often it's funny, and invariably
it's rude and disgusting.  If you aren't prepared for balls-out juvenile
humor -- and lots of it -- Road Trip is not going to entertain you.  If
you actually want a story, go read a book.  But if you want to see a bit
of nudity and a lot of potty humor, Road Trip ought to help you make it
through the summer.
Director: Todd Phillips
Producer: Daniel Goldberg, Joe Medjuck
Writer: Todd Phillips, Scot Armstrong
Starring: Seann William Scott, Breckin Meyer, DJ Qualls, Tom Green, Amy
Smart, Fred Ward, Andy Dick, Rachel Blanchard, Omar J. Dorsey
http://www.roadtrip-itsgood.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
     HAPPINESS has been mired in controversy for the entire year, and
not without good reason.  Put simply, HAPPINESS is one of the most
shocking films I've ever seen - this from a man who adores A CLOCKWORK
ORANGE.
     Not that it's particularly graphic or lewd.  Rather, HAPPINESS is
truly eye-opening for its theme: that everyone in this world is pretty
much a pig of some sort.  Those that aren't are doomed to be victims.
     Watching the film, you get the idea that director Solondz may not
be too far off the mark.  A disturbing investigation into the underbelly
of suburban New Jersey, the film tracks a few days in the life of one
highly dysfunctional family and the people with whom their lives
intersect.  Namely, an obscene phone caller, a murderous neighbor, a
pedophilic serial rapist/family dad, a suicidal loser... and that's not
even including the three sisters themselves.  There's *no one*
redeemable in this movie.
     And that fits it to a "T".  Unlike YOUR FRIENDS AND NEIGHBORS,
which showed a bunch of pitiful losers interacting with one another to
no ultimate end, HAPPINESS shows how a bunch of losers can watch their
lives get even more pitiful - and downright disturbing - when the seams
in society start to crack.
     HAPPINESS is not for everyone.  In fact, it may not be for many of
you, unless you have a strong stomach and a taste for the bizarre.  And
HAPPINESS may not be perfect, either.  It's too long, it rambles from
time to time, and there's probably one too many characters to follow. 
But the film's boundary pushing, gripping storytelling, and
truer-than-life moments make up for it all.
Director: Todd Solondz
Producer: Ted Hope, Christine Vachon
Writer: Todd Solondz
Starring: Jane Adams, Elizabeth Ashley, Dylan Baker, Lara Flynn Boyle,
Ben Gazzara, Jared Harris, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Louise Lasser, Camryn
Mannheim, Cynthia Stevenson
http://www.happinessthemovie.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Nightmare Before Christmas, The (1993)
Just in time for Halloween and Christmas, the reissue of The Nightmare
Before Christmas couldn't be more appropriate.  With all of the
attention thrown to "family films" in recent years, namely those
starring pocket monsters and Nickelodeon characters, it's high time we
raised the intellectual level of children's fare as well as the
animation achievements of the movie studios.  With that in mind, it was
refreshing to revisit an animation classic on the big screen that still
retains the originality and freshness it had seven years ago.
Nightmare is the story of one man's quest to discover his true purpose
in life -- to look beyond the accolades of his peers, the achievements
of his years, and the praise of his ego.  Jack Skellington, the pumpkin
king of Halloweentown, is the main dude behind the Halloween holiday for
kids everywhere.  But during his reign as pumpkin king, Jack has somehow
lost his understanding of his place in the world and the magic he
creates with his Halloween holiday.  After the completion of one
particular Halloween season, Jack walks with a heavy heart and ends up
discovering in the woods outside Halloweentown a grove of trees with
doors to all of the other holidays in the world.  Imagine his surprise
to discover Christmastown, a far more impressive and uplifting holiday
than Halloween, surrounded by happy elves making toys, and with good
cheer all around.
Upon his return to Halloweentown, Jack decides to combine Halloween and
Christmas together by kidnapping "Sandy Claws," employing all the
residents of Halloweentown to build toys for children.  He then aims to
take over the role as primary joy-provider and gift-bearer to the
children of the world, in the hopes of rediscovering the zest for life
he once had.  Alas, the co-mingling of Halloween and Christmas creates
disastrous results involving shrunken heads, psychotic wooden ducks, a
sleigh pulled by a phantom dog with a lighted nose, and a large,
sinister, singing bag named Oogie Boogie
Tim Burton -- the man behind such great films as Ed Wood, Beetlejuice,
Pee-Wee's Big Adventure, and Edward Scissorhands -- is the creative
force behind Nightmare.  Originally, Burton authored a poem that became
the basis of the storyline, and he was jointly involved in the
production design of the film (though many mistakenly assume he directed
the picture).  The stamp of Burton is clearly everywhere in the film --
with bold colors, imaginative character design, and it's simple yet
compelling story.  The direction of Harry Selick, who also directed
James and the Giant Peach, is strong, offering intimate views of the
strange collection of characters.  Also memorable are the songs in the
film, written by former Oingo Boingo lead singer Danny Elfman, the next
John Williams of film composing.
The Nightmare Before Christmas is intended for both the kid and adult in
everyone.  It's not just child's play for the holidays; it's a movie
about how to be truly happy in a tough world, saying that all you need
to do is just be exactly who you are, without compromise.  What better
message is there for Christmas?
Director: Harry Selick
Writers: Caroline Thompson
Starring: Chris Saradon, Danny Elfman, Catherine O'Hara, William Hickey,
Paul Ruebens
Producers: Tim Burton, Denise Di Novi
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Truth About Cats & Dogs, The (1996)
     What happens if you meet someone with whom you have almost everything
in common, you find yourself falling for them, but the sparks of romance
just don't seem to fly on a physical level?  Maybe you need an extra body,
and you can just play Cyrano in the background until that fateful moment
when everything is revealed with hilarious results.
     Such is the case in THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS, a pleasantly funny
romance that takes another twist on the Cyrano tale, by taking two very
different women (Janeane Garofalo and Uma Thurman) and pitching them at one
guy (English actor Ben Chaplin).
     In this version, Garofalo plays Abby Barnes, a veterinarian who hosts
the titular pet-oriented talk show.  When Brian (Chaplin) calls in about
his new dog's wacky antics, he is immediately smitten by Abby's voice.  And
when Abby describes herself, it isn't is a 5'1" brunette, but as Abby's
model neighbor Noelle (Thurman)--a 5'10" blonde.  A simple wig is out of
the question, so Abby opts to "use" Noelle's body as a surrogate, wooing
Brian on the phone while Noelle exhibits her physical charms.  Meanwhile,
Brian unwittingly falls for both of them.
     The sweetness factor of THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS is almost
unbearable--full of oohs and aahs, largely due to literal doses of humor
relating to the parade of animals that punctuates the film.  Audrey Wells'
debut script is also a mushy affair, but it works well enough, even though
it feels a lot longer than it really is (95 minutes).  In fact, everything
here would work a lot better if all the best jokes hadn't been beaten to
death in the rotten trailer for an otherwise pretty good movie.
     That aside, Michael Lehmann's direction (he also directed HEATHERS) is
fine for this story, but the real kudos go to Garofalo, who is one of the
funniest comedic actresses working today and proves it here, and,
surprisingly, to Chaplin, who bored me to tears in last year's period drama
FEAST OF JULY, but turns out to be great in the comic medium.
     I'm really pleased that the theme of romance transcending physical
beauty is being explored again, but the only problem is that Garofalo is
plenty cute in her own right, and in my opinion, can hold her own against
the supermodels any day.  But it's still great to see her get the guy.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)
     A cynic would say any filmmaker is looking for trouble by trying to
make a spoof out of another spoof.
     Scary Movie is just that spoof, a Wayans brothers special that's a
flat-out parody of Scream -- both of which ironically were produced by
Dimension Films.  Studio spoofs itself -- now that's comedy!
     Oddly, I have very little to say about this picture at all. 
There's not much point to discussing the plot of Scary Movie (mercifully
renamed from Scream If You Know What I Did Last Halloween).  If you've
seen Scream (and Scream 2), I Know What You Did Last Summer (and its
sequel), The Sixth Sense, The Blair Witch Project, and, delving into
more curious spoof choices like The Matrix, The Usual Suspects, and the
Budweiser "Whassup" commercials -- then you'll "get" Scary Movie.
     Not that there's much to it to "get."  As usual with this genre,
there's no story; the Wayanses simply pummel the audience with gag after
gag.  My humor-o-meter pegs the success rate of these jokes at about one
in three, including (at best count) three fart jokes, two penis jokes,
one testicle joke, and at least three jokes about Scary Movie not being
real, but, you know, actually being a movie instead.  And that's not to
mention countless gay jokes, sex jokes, and gay sex jokes.  Yeah, one in
three is about right.
     Ironically, Scary Movie spoofs the teen horror genre but is so
raunchy it's shocking it isn't rated NC-17.  I guess the old
phallus-through-the-head gag is a-ok these days.
     While this is the best film Keenan Ivory Wayans has been involved
with since his first film, 1987's Hollywood Shuffle, that isn't saying
much (did you see The Glimmer Man?).  Still, if you're looking for a
little gross-out raunchiness and you've already seen Me, Myself & Irene,
Scary Movie may be the perfect late-night fix.  Just consider yourself
warned.
Director: Keenan Ivory Wayans
Producer: Eric L. Gold, Lee R. Mayes
Writer: Phil Beauman, Jason Friedberg, Buddy Johnson, Aaron Seltzer,
Marlon Wayans, Shawn Wayans
Starring: Jon Abrahams, Carmen Electra, Shannon Elizabeth, Anna Faris,
Kurt Fuller, Regina Hall, Lochlyn Munro, Cheri Oteri, Marlon Wayans,
Shawn Wayans, Marissa Jaret Winokur, Mark Hoeppner
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Just One Time (1999)
     Just One Time has that Sex in the City feeling -- if only they
never left the East Village.
     A New York indie romantic comedy in the classic vein, Just One Time
is writer/producer/director/star Lane Janger's fifth time around as a
filmmaker but is his first major in front of the camera.  To my
surprise, he's not bad -- which probably means the source material is
ripped from his personal headlines (but who am I to say?).
     The story's got a sitcom feel: NYC firefighter Anthony (Janger) is
about to get married to fiancée Amy (Joelle Carter).  But Anthony's
life-long dream is to be in bed with two women getting it on.  He pushes
and pushes Amy and finally she gives in, on the condition that he do the
same for her with another guy.  He agrees; wacky relationship issues
ensue.
     Most memorable in the film are The Other Guy and The Other Girl,
Guillermo Díaz and Jennifer Esposito (Summer of Sam) respectively.  Both
are nutty and memorable supporting stars, not to mention better actors
altogether.  In fact, the only real dead fish in the cast is Carter, who
imbues Amy with, well, nothing much.  Emotionally dead, it is
inconceivable that feisty Anthony would really want anything to do with
her.  In fact, Just One Time would have been a much better film if
Anthony had ended up running off with Díaz's Victor instead.
     But alas, happy and expected endings are the rule of the day, and
sure enough, that's what we get.  The era of "straight man dabbles in
gay culture" is no longer taboo, and movies like Trick, Better than
Chocolate, and countless others that have taken us down this road in
recent months just don't cut it any more.  It's not a bad way to spend
90 minutes, but not fantastic cinema either.
Director: Lane Janger
Producer: Lane Janger, Jasmine Kosovic, Exile Ramirez
Writer: Lane Janger, Jennifer Vandever
Starring: Lane Janger, Joelle Carter, Guillermo Díaz, Jennifer Esposito,
Vincent Laresca, Domenick Lombardozzi, David Lee Russek
http://www.cowboybi.com/jot/home.htm
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Exorcist, The (1973)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Norm Schrager.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/15a92dead179a8878825695f00043152?OpenDocument
Green vomit.  Unnatural head twisting.  Unlikely use of a crucifix. 
These images from William Friedkin's The Exorcist have become so
memorable, so iconic, that they almost carry an air of humor (even
spoofed by Linda Blair herself in 1990's Repossessed).  They're no
longer just parts of the movie, they are the movie.  But now that Warner
Bros. has given the film a Friedkin-enhanced re-release, it's time to
see The Exorcist again as a complete film, beginning to end, with the
gory details intact and in context.  The result is that 27 years after
its controversial release, The Exorcist is nothing short of a taut,
American classic.
People may forget that The Exorcist, recently screened at the Boston
Film Festival and now hitting wide re-release, was a wildly independent
movie when that particular movement was really getting in gear. 
Shocking and blasphemous-beyond-words in 1973, the story of a sweet
little girl's demonic possession still has a renegade feel today -- the
introductory exposition takes nearly forty minutes, the use of profane
language is disgusting and thrilling, even by today's standards, and the
long battle at the film's end is relentless.
For the most part, Friedkin's eleven minutes worth of added sequences
work, and Exorcist fans (me included) are already familiar with most of
them via its laserdisc release.  First, there's more time spent with
young Regan in the medical offices, giving a broader evolution to her
"sickness," though this isn't really needed, especially when young Linda
Blair's acting is below par.  (Some of the doctor talk gets some healthy
chuckles when he discusses an unknown drug called Ritalin.)  There's
also a fresh ending that gives a little more credence to William Peter
Blatty's outstanding screenplay, a signature Friedkin once publicly
wished he had initially included.
Then, there's the infamous "crabwalk."  Known to most fans, and only
previously seen in a rough cut, it is a physical stunt that Friedkin and
Blatty originally planned to use to further illustrate Regan's
mind-jarring body sacrifice.  In short, Regan "crabwalks," speeding
backwards on just hands and feet, to the horror of a few witnesses.  In
the director's "new" version, it's used to punctuate an already gripping
scene with a huge, eye-popping exclamation point.  If you think you've
seen it, you haven't really until this.
One of the biggest factors that really sets this movie apart from what
we've come to know as "horror" is the acting.  Ellen Burstyn, who would
go on to win an Oscar a year later for Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore,
is nearly perfect, setting the stage as the doting, atheist mother,
having us shriek along with her at the terror that takes over her life. 
Lee J. Cobb is steady as the unknowing Detective Kinderman, and God only
knows what little Linda Blair had to endure.
But if you asked me in 1973 (though I was only 5), I would've guessed
that Jason Miller, in his film debut as the tortured Father Karras,
would come away with the most successful career.  With a movie star
countenance and a gruff voice, he plays Karras as intense, eternally
conflicted, and totally believable.  He is the true center and morality
of the movie.  I wonder why his other notable roles have been so few,
including those in two Friedkin movies, the cult classic The Ninth
Configuration and a reprisal of Father Karras in The Exorcist III.
The powerful acting stands up after all these years, and Friedkin has
even supervised a new surround sound mix (as if the sound effects aren't
scary enough).  I could do without some of the added music, and those
new scenes can be hit and miss, but you find me another director that
handles a movie with such gravity, suspense, and style, and I'll see his
pictures every time.
Director: William Friedkin
Producer: William Peter Blatty
Writer: William Peter Blatty
Starring: Ellen Burstyn, Max Von Sydow, Lee J. Cobb, Kitty Winn, Jack
McGowran, Jason Miller, Linda Blair, Reverend William O'Malley, Barton
Heyman
http://theexorcist.warnerbros.com/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Executive Decision (1996)
     For those action film fans who think that Steven Seagal is
indestructible, I highly recommend you see EXECUTIVE DECISION, a
cheese-o-rama of an action flick that gives Seagal *seventh* billing and a
quick ride to Action Hero Heaven.
     No, this is *not* a "Steven Seagal Movie."  It's a "Kurt Russell
Movie"--the New Kurt Russell, the tough-yet-vulnerable Kurt Russell, the
Kurt Russell a la Bruce Willis-type with whom we're about to be deluged,
like it or not (answer:  probably not).
     The story of EXECUTIVE DECISION is easy to boil down:  another
rehashing of DIE HARD, on an airplane for the first time since PASSENGER
57.  This outing, Seagal, Russell, John Leguizamo, and Oliver Platt head a
team of scrappy commandos and less-warlike people who board a 747 in
mid-flight to stop a nerve gas bomb from detonating over Washington and
wiping out the Eastern seaboard.  This, apparently, is what terrorists do
for kicks.
     It could've been fun.  It's been done, yes, but a fresh take on the
hostage story can be exciting, and at times, EXECUTIVE DECISION is
edge-of-your-seat material.  The problem, and it shouldn't exist, is that
for the entire first *hour* of this film, it is the most hideously boring,
lifeless, repetitive, derivative, and pointless bit of celluloid you can
imagine.  Clocking in at a whopping 2 hours, 20 minutes, this picture had
*plenty* which could have been cut out but wasn't, resulting in a whole
lot of catching up to do in the last hour.
     Thank God that the catch-up is pretty fun--but still, putting the
audience to sleep at the beginning of the movie is a violation of the
cardinal rule of action filmmaking.
     If you're wondering about the acting, dialogue, etc.--don't.  They're
all typically cheese-infested (Seagal's character is actually, and I am
not making this up, named "Austin Travis").  Instead, if you go to
EXECUTIVE DECISION, sit back and try to enjoy the explosions and high-tech
gadgetry.  But more importantly, try to get there late.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Jane Eyre (1996)
     One of these days, Hollywood is going to run out of old Bronte
sisters/Jane Austen books to make into films.  Then, and only then, will
the world be safe once again.
     Don't get me wrong, I loved SENSE AND SENSIBILITY (it even made my
1995 top ten list), but I gave PERSUASION one of the worst reviews of the
year.  Here comes JANE EYRE to follow in the latter's footsteps.
     JANE EYRE is based on one of those books you were supposed to read in
high school (entitled, oddly, "Jane Eyre"), but which was so damn boring
you couldn't even get through the Cliff's Notes.  The film is *almost* as
exciting as one would expect a film about, say, the book, "Jane Eyre," to
be.  It's full of longing glances, Jane (Charlotte Gainsbourg) staring
into the hills of England, Jane prancing through the meadow, Jane in a
carriage, and important lines like, "He is a proud man."  And, sadly, not
much else.
     The hopelessly archaic story is one of love and idiocy in the early
1800's, when men could keep their insane first wives locked up in the
spare room of the castle (those were the days!).  It was also a time when,
for no apparent reason, you could expect a young governess to fall in love
with her invalid boss.  There are some other plot points of note, but
really, who cares?  There's much better things to laugh about!  Such as:
     Gainsbourg, best described as a British girl with a really long neck
and really fat cheeks, was recently seen in the film KUNG FU MASTER!  Who
better to play Ms. Eyre, really?  Anna Paquin plays Young Jane but is
completely devoid of the charm that endeared her to me in THE PIANO (and
won her an Oscar).  Elle Macpherson is Rochester's girly friend
(inexplicably jilted in the second film within a month)!  Maria Schneider
pulls off a totally toys-in-the-attic portrayal of Blanche, the crazy
first wife.  Amanda Root, who sucked in PERSUASION, doesn't suck as badly
here, but still causes me to break out in hives when she's on screen
(fortunately briefly).  And...the kicker...*William Hurt* as Rochester!? 
Ho ho ho!
     As if the casting and acting weren't enough to make this a bomb,
we've got an interminable story that just won't end, a really dumb ending
when it finally does, half of the audience laughing at the "high drama,"
the other half asleep, and, worst of all, a film that is so archaic and
out-of-date that it's almost insulting to watch.  How helpful and/or truly
relevant is this story of Victorian obsession and self-destruction today? 
Who would act in a manner remotely similar to these people, except my
psychopathic ex who fancied herself to be Blanche (but that's another
story)?  Putting it all together, JANE EYRE manages to be not just a very
bad movie, but to be irresponsible as well.  Keep away.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter  /  Novelist  /  Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Basketball Diaries, The (1995)
     THE BASKETBALL DIARIES is a gritty new film chronicling the
adolescent years of poet/writer/musician Jim Carroll (played by Leonardo
DiCaprio).  Carroll was a star Catholic high school basketball player,
presumably headed for the NBA.  Unfortunately, his plans didn't quite work
out when young Jim fell into the cruel world of life on the street and
heavy drug abuse.  He kept a vivid journal of his life and times, hence
the title.
     This is not your typical coming-of-age story.  From the beginning,
the antics of Carroll and his exceptionally rude punk friends don't help
raise a lot of sympathy for their cause.  When the boys (including a
surprising performance by "Marky" Mark Wahlberg) get into trouble, mugging
elderly women and robbing New York shops, in order to raise money for
their drug habits, the temptation is to dismiss them as common hoodlums. 
But the powerfully realistic performance by DiCaprio, full of all the pain
and suffering that comes along with heroin addiction and withdrawal, makes
this film almost required viewing for any young person not exposed to the
drug culture.
     Carroll's early life reads like a textbook of what not to do.  The
film really gets under your skin and never pulls a punch, with Carroll
getting badly beaten, begging for drug money, haggling over the price of
dope, and violently shaking from D.T.'s.  The movie weaves between reality
and the drug-infused, nightmarish dreams of Carroll quite well, and
inevitably, pity for the boy win out over disgust for his habit.
     The filmmakers wants you to recognize that none of this is Carroll's
fault, and the vast majority of the movie is composed of various scenes of
the effects of the drugs:  over and over again.  The repetition, while
effective, gets a little tedious, having the impression more of a music
video rather than a movie.  Also, the preachiness of the film's theme
(Drugs are bad.) isn't exactly subtle, and the unavoidable happy ending
gives THE BASKETBALL DIARIES the flavor of a Public Service Announcement.
     Still, it's worthwhile.  This film won't encourage you to start that
heroin habit any time soon.

Title
Review for Kansas City (1996)
     Every time Robert Altman makes a movie, it becomes *the* thing to
do for the Hollywood acting community.  It happened with THE PLAYER.  It
happened with SHORT CUTS.  It happened with READY TO WEAR.  And it
happened with KANSAS CITY.
     The only problem is that THE PLAYER was the last of his films that
was really all that great.  While KANSAS CITY marks a slight improvement
over READY TO WEAR, that ain't saying much because, after all, so does
SHOWGIRLS.
     KANSAS CITY is Altman's homage to the 1930's in the titular city,
with a plot revolving around a brassy young girl named Blondie (Jennifer
Jason Leigh) who kidnaps the drugged-out wife (Miranda Richardson) of
one of President Roosevelt's advisors named Henry Stilton (Michael
Murphy).  Why?  Because Blondie's husband (Dermot Mulroney) is about to
be killed by local gangster Seldom Seen (Harry Belafonte), and Blondie
thinks Stilton can get him back before it's too late.
     That's basically it as near as I can tell, mainly because the plot
of the movie is given second billing to the scores of jazz musicians
Altman populates the film with.  The jazz is everywhere -- drowning out
dialogue and action and just about everything else.  Not that that's a
bad thing, because without the music the film would be even worse than
it already is.  I just hadn't realized that Altman was making music
videos now.
     What's so bad about KANSAS CITY?  The main problem is that Altman
tries to make this really dull, boring, and simple story into something
that is unique, exciting, and intricate -- all of which he fails at
miserably.  It starts with some horrible acting performances from
otherwise good actors, the worst of the lot being Mulroney, who just
*stands* there for 90 of the 120 minutes, looking like a sheepdog.  And
there's Leigh, who acts like she's reprising that wretched role from
GEORGIA, stumbling from scene to scene, and leading me to re-evaluate my
opinion of her acting ability altogether.
     KANSAS CITY does have a neat ending, but it's far too little, far
too late, and in retrospect, it doesn't even make a whole lot of sense. 
But at least it was something different.  Oh well.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Living in Oblivion (1995)
     Tom DiCillo wrote and directed this new low-budget story of making
a film-within-a-film, and it comes off superbly better than most of its
predecessor "movies about movies."  DiCillo has assembled the most
perfectly matched cast I've come across in ages, featuring Steve
Buscemi as Nick, a film director for whom nothing will work out,
Catherine Keener as a much too sensitive leading lady, Dermot Mulroney
as a leather-clad cinematographer, and James LeGros as an unbelievably
shallow leading man--possibly his best role ever.
     With the help of a misfit/wannabe crew, Nick leads us through one
"nightmare" after another, where the problems of shooting a few simple
scenes are never-ending but, fortunately for our benefit, are
hilarious.  While it may help to know something about the way a film is
made before you go in, LIVING IN OBLIVION will, at least, leave you
with a better understanding of the travails of film production, and, at
most, leave you in stitches.
     While LIVING IN OBLIVION is more of a "fun" picture than a "deep"
one, it's an awfully enjoyable way to spend 91 minutes.  The film's
problems are mostly cosmetic (a crummy soundtrack and a sometimes slow
third act), and the movie is a great success.  DiCillo's direction is
perfect, and needs to be seen on the big screen to be truly
appreciated.  The comic touches he adds to what would otherwise be some
ordinary scenes are also worthwhile.
     It ain't SCHINDLER'S LIST, and it's not supposed to be.  But
DiCillo gets done the job he set out to do: to send us home with a
smile and to hope for an equally good follow-up film.
-Christopher Null, Mike's FEEDBACK Magazine / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Won't Anybody Listen (2000)
     Dov Kelemer's look into an aspiring rock band in the L.A. music
scene is as stomach turning as a movie can get without showing any blood
and guts.
     Instead, the blood and guts can be found in the eyes of the six
members of the-band-you've-never-heard-of NC-17, a sort-of harmonized
post-grunge combo with a violinist and a gravelly-voiced lead singer. 
Having moved from rural Michigan to Los Angeles based on the promise of
a record deal, brothers Frank and Vince Rogala and Robin Canada (then
known as Exude) thought everything was going their way.  Said record
deal evaporated, though, and the band found itself more unknown than
ever.  Ten years later, they're still at it, now with five members
(including the violin), a new name, and nothing to show for a decade of
work.
     Documentary film doesn't get more desperate than this.  As Kelemer
put in an introductory note to me, "it is similar to Hoop Dreams... and
it is Leaving Las Vegas depressing....  Hopefully... you won't shoot
yourself after watching it."  I didn't, but I wanted to.  As a writer, I
know rejection, for sure.  But the career of musician is undoubtedly the
worst when it comes to an utter lack of recognition for your work,
ranking below independent filmmaker and aspiring actor.
     The members of NC-17 face everything from estranged wives and
uncaring A&R reps to greedy concert promoters and IRS audits.  And
Kelemer's got it all on film.  It's a truly unforgettable movie,
light-hearted at times, but devastating on the whole.  While the film
has its flaws (notably a filthy lens used in shooting the bulk of the
black and white video footage and some scenes that tend to repeat
material too much), Won't Anybody Listen is a picture that any fan of
documentary will adore.  And if you think you know what went into that
$16 compact disc, just you wait....
     Won't Anybody Listen premieres at the Independent Feature Film
Market in September 2000.
Director: Dov Kelemer
Producer: Dov Kelemer
Starring: Art Aviles, Robert Aviles, Roxanne Aviles, Lori
Graves-Bartolini, Mark Billes, Hugo Burnham, Robin Canada, C. Tucker
Cheadle, Kieth Dean, Bob Diamond, Bruce Duff, Len Fagen, Lonn Friend,
Danny Goodwin, Rich Heaton, Nina Heller, Chuck Hohn, Lance Hubp, Jeff
Jampol, Tom Kidd, Chris Martin, Lena Michaels, Ron Perron, Doug
Priestap, Frank Rogala, Rose Rogala, Vince Rogala, Billy Rose, Barry
Squire, Katherine Turman, Jim Washburn
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Josie and the Pussycats (2001)
Remember all those television-themed movies in the 90s, big-screen
versions of TV favorites that were devoid of any energy (The
Flintstones, The Beverly Hillbillies, The Little Rascals, Sgt. Bilko)? 
Well, forget that problem with Josie and the Pussycats.  This pop
culture comedy is just popping with giggles, laughs, rockin' tunes, a
smart script, and an infectious spirit.
If you're old enough to remember the Josie and the Pussycats cartoon
(from the Archie comics), but young enough to have actually watched it,
you'll dig this.  The plot is a kick -- a trio of peace-loving, friends
4-ever, rockin' chicks get hurled into the limelight as the next big
thing... only to realize they're just a corporate vessel carrying
subliminal messages that make teenagers part with their cash.
It's the same idea as last year's failed Adventures of Rocky and
Bullwinkle, but this is faster and sharper, with the sly flavor of an
Austin Powers or perhaps, a Wayne's World.  Director-writers Harry
Elfont and Deborah Kaplan create a pseudo-futuristic setting where
product placement is in every nook and cranny of life -- right down to
the McDonald's washcloth in the hotel that's shaped like an order of
fries.  Visual jokes like these come in piles, and if you blink, you
might miss some awfully good ones (quick magazine headline: Barrymore,
Diaz, & Liu to star as Pussycats!)
But let's not get carried away.  The story is often mighty thin, but in
a movie revolving around rock music, no problem: music video time! 
Sounds easy, and it probably is easy, but here it works.  The Pussycats
-- Rachael Leigh Cook, Tara Reid, and Rosario Dawson -- play around in
the montages with unparalleled adrenaline and happiness, and the songs
are flat-out great rock tunes (real lead vocals by Boston rock hottie
Kay Hanley).  The videos are edited with an MTV flair, but without
falling into parody.  Makes you wanna leap into the movie and jump
around.
A surprisingly plodding final act is saved by our two villains: music
moguls played by Alan Cumming and Parker Posey.  Both rip into their
roles, chewing up the dialogue and the scenery with an appropriate zest,
getting nearly all the laughs and looking like they're having a great
time, too.
Be aware, however, that some demographics are just not going to get
this.  If you know about today's boy bands, but are smart enough to
realize they're as processed as Hormel meats, this is for you.  If you
know the connection between Pussycat Tara Reid and MTV darling Carson
Daly, then this is really for you.
By the time the Pussycats save the day and reach rock stardom, it's
tough to wipe the grin off your face.  There's probably another show and
another adventure just around the corner.  Pussycats in Outer Space,
anyone?
Director: Harry Elfont, Deborah Kaplan
Producers: Tony DeRosa-Grund, Tracey E. Edmonds, Chuck Grimes, Marc E.
Platt
Writers: Harry Elfont, Deborah Kaplan
Starring: Rachael Leigh Cook, Tara Reid, Rosario Dawson, Parker Posey,
Alan Cumming, Gabriel Mann
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Playing Mona Lisa (2000)
     Playing Mona Lisa follows the life of Claire Goldstein (Alicia
Witt), who slowly unravels as various forces of nature turn against
her.  Claire's life is not unlike the movie as a whole, which starts off
strong but meanders to a non-ending that is unlikely to leave anyone
very satisfied.
     Claire is a "brilliant" 23-year old pianist, which is apt casting
for Witt, considering she is also a real-life piano prodigy.  On the eve
of her graduation from the San Francisco Academy of Music, Claire's life
starts to come undone.  First she doesn't make it into a big piano
competition.  Then she gets dumped, then evicted, then just plain whiny
as she realizes her family (with whom she is now forced to live) is full
of freaks.
     Subplots galore include messy wedding preparations for sister
Jenine (Molly Hagan) and a neurosis for dad (Elliott Gould), but Claire
is the centerpiece of the film -- and rightly so.  Witt is radiant as an
actress, and the few times she's been able to strut her stuff at the
movies (see Fun), she's stolen the show.  Unfortunately, Mona Lisa's
rambling storyline portrays Claire as so incapable of motivation that
she is literally paralyzed with inaction, so Witt doesn't have much
range to show off.
     The bulk of the film becomes a hand-wrenching "How will Claire get
by?" when she really just needs to get off her ass and stop bitching.
There's nothing overly compelling about her self-made tragedy --
everyone's been dumped once in life -- so it's hard to be overly
sympathetic.
     Fortunately, Witt is so dazzling she largely overcomes the
limitations of her character and makes Playing Mona Lisa (a reference to
some advice her friend gives her about creating a healthy state of mind)
mostly watchable.  It's not great cinema, but it's worth a chuckle or
two.
Director: Matthew Huffman
Producer: Sid Sheinberg, Bill Sheinberg, Jon Sheinberg
Writer: Marni Freedman, Carlos De Los Rios
Starring: Alicia Witt, Harvey Fierstein, Brooke Langton, Johnny Galecki,
Ivan Sergei, Molly Hagan, Elliott Gould, Marlo Thomas, Estelle Harris,
Joe Mazza, Tammy Townsend, Sandra Bernhard

Title
Review for Surveillance (2000)
     Digital filmmaking technology can be a dangerous thing.  On the one
hand, it opens up affordable avenues of production to virtually
everyone.  On the other hand, it leads to a flood of movies on the
market that have been made for less than the cost of printing your
Christmas cards.
     Which, in the case of Surveillance, is apparently the case.
     The film's conceit is this: Digital video was not simply used for
cost concerns, but because it is integral to the story.  In the picture,
a private eye named Trip Stevens (Stephen Triplett -- get it?) is hired
by a becoming redhead named Junis Rozma (Jacqueline Carroll) to locate
her missing brother "C. Fred."  Trip, with his team of Charlie's
Angels-lite helpers, quickly learns that Fred's dead, baby, and soon he
is wrapped up in a convoluted web of trickery that revolves around a
porky cop, his inexlicable "fake prostitution stings," a Russian limo
driver, and a video dating service.  Think of it as a backyard,
undergrad version of Chinatown.
     As Trip is a P.I., the entire film is told from the perspective of
alleged surveillance and hidden cameras.  (Interesting idea, but it
turns out that just about everyone carries a "hidden camera" or two with
them, all the time, thus ruining that angle.)
     Unfortunately, the lack of attention paid to Surveillance (its
really snazzy presskit aside) shows through at the seams.  A two-hour
running time is far too long to keep an audience seated without a score
or, at the very least, some better acting than we're treated to here. 
Triplett may be funny as a sketch-comedy player on Talk Soup, but his
mooning antics grow tiresome quickly in a feature film format (which, I
might point out, is not supposed to be a comedy).  A raft of other
semi-improvising and otherwise out-of-work actors (with the notable
exception of Carroll's femme fatale) doesn't help matters.
     While Surveillance makes good use of the photographic options of
DV, it ends up relying more on handheld bouncy-cam footage a la The
Blair Witch Project than anything else.  Rotten sound design leaves much
of the film hard to make out aurally -- a problem that would have been
largely avoided had an aggressive editor chopped about 80 minutes of fat
out of the film.
     Surveillance ultimately has a few charming moments but feels more
like a weekend film school project than the daringly experimental
feature it desperately wants to be.  Nice try.
Director: Brad Grossman, Debra Matlock
Producer: Brad Grossman, Debra Matlock
Writer: Brad Grossman, Debra Matlock
Starring: Stephen Triplett, Adam Tomei, Jacqueline Carroll, Paul Richard
Kessler, Tracy Talavera, Piper Henry, Caspar Poyck, Michael Mewborne,
Emily Limbaugh
http://www.surveillancemovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Bring It On (2000)
     There's a point about 35 minutes into Bring It On where you
suddenly realize you're sitting in a movie theater, watching Bring It
On, wondering exactly how the hell the events in your life conspired to
put your ass in an uncomfortable movie theater seat... to watch Bring It
On.  But soon you give up, knowing there is no answer to this dilemma,
and you resign yourself to watching the next hour of Bring It On,
knowing full well that since it's a PG-13 movie, nothing scandalous is
ever going to happen to make it interesting.
     Going in to this movie, I knew full well it was, well, a movie
about cheerleading, so I wasn't expecting another American Beauty
(which, now that I think of it, was partly about cheerleading, but
anyway...).  Suffice it to say that my expectations were low.  And sure
enough, Bring It On is an utterly vapid film with horrendous character
development, hackneyed dialogue, and a questionable theme.  No surprise
there.  Essentially it is Fame in short skirts.
     The story revolves around an affluent San Diego high school and its
crack cheerleading squad, the Toros, which are led by a girl named
Torrance (Kirsten Dunst).  Torrance is picked to lead the Toros to its
sixth consecutive national cheerleading championship, but tragedy
strikes when she learns their routines have all been stolen from an East
Compton high school troupe, the Clovers, which has moves to spare. 
Eventually, of course, it comes down to Toros vs. Clovers in the
championships.
     The bulk of the film revolves around the Toros trying to come up
with their own moves and hiring a choreographer, an outcast cheerleader
named Missy (Eliza Dushku) who shakes things up, and a mild romance
between Torrance and Missy's brother Cliff (Jesse Bradford).  While I'm
not sure if Bring It On's tepid, teen-friendly raunchiness is
titillating or disturbing, thank god for the pair of Dushku and
Bradford, who salvage this film with their anti-school-spirit tirades
and actual ability to act.  (On a side note: You will rack your brain to
figure out where you've seen these two actors before, so here are the
answers.  Dushku played Schwarzenegger's daughter in True Lies. 
Bradford played the geeky, youngest hacker Joey in Hackers.)
     But Kirsten Dunst?  Dunst is truly one of the best young actresses
working today and this is the material she has to work with?  Her
character comes off as an imitation of Alyson Hannigan's "Once, at band
camp..." character from American Pie.  Kirsten, you should not be in
movies like this.
     Nearing the finale of Bring It On, I began to fear that the message
of Bring It On was about how affluent white teenagers, if they have
enough determination, can stomp the crap out of underfunded, inner city
teenagers if they put their mind to it.  Fortunately, this is not the
case.  Bring It On is really about how a white teenage girl, if she has
enough determination, can forgo everything else in her life and just
focus on cheerleading, cheerleading, cheerleading.  Now there's a
message.
Director: Peyton Reed
Producer: Marc Abraham, Thomas A. Bliss
Writer: Jessica Bendinger
Starring: Kirsten Dunst, Jesse Bradford, Eliza Dushku, Gabrielle Union,
Clare Kramer, Melissa George, Tsianina Joelson
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Homeboy, The (1999)
Imagine what would happen if Vanilla Ice showed up to fix the sink at
Eminem's house, and you've pretty much got the gist of The Homeboy. 
Dave Gebroe's wacky comedy gives us fading rap star MC2 (Dave McCrea),
who slowly figures out that his British sink repairman is in actuality a
faded rapper named Hoolie Hooligan (David M. Wallace).  "Squared" finds
he's on a similar trajectory, so naturally he recruits the once-huge
Hoolie to help him mix it up.
But when Hoolie gets smashed on 40's and the other trappings of the
modern gangsta, things get a bit hot, and Squared sees his minor empire
crumble before his eyes.
It's all played for laughs, thank God, and this little indie film has
plenty of them (when you can hear the jokes, that is; bad sound is a
perennial problem for indies).  Wallace (who has no other screen credits
but looks just like Billy Connolly) is often hilarious -- my favorite
moment being when Hoolie puts a chopstick in a pencil sharpener to
invent the "sharpstick" -- both eating utensil and deadly weapon.
The same can't be said for McCrea, who is supposed to be a pitiable
semi-loser despite his triple platinum stature but is really just an
unlikeable cad who you want to see get his comeuppance.  Unfortunately,
Gebroe puts Squared in a hero's boots -- even taking us down one
ill-advised path that has the guy falling in love with the waitress at a
Chinese restaurant and then trashing her parents' bathroom.  Those
expecting a Wayne's World type kung fu showdown with dad will be let
down.
The lone "star" in the film is MTV's Julie Brown ("Downtown" Julie
Brown, not fat Julie Brown), who essentially plays herself with a
different name and working for a different music television channel. 
Her subplot, which involves her anger over Squared's use of the N-word,
goes on for a looooooong time ultimately to get paid off by a small gag
from Hoolie in the end.  But like the Chinese family arc, it doesn't
really make it.
Thanks to Wallace's scenes -- and I wish there were more of them -- the
film is watchable and often enjoyable.  It'll take some doing to get
this indie into a bunch of theaters, but should you stumble upon it on
cable one drunken night, give it a go.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Welcome to the Dollhouse (1995)
     Once again I have to agree with the mass of critics proclaiming a film
as spectacular.  First was FARGO, the best movie of the year.  Now there's
WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE, a close second.
     The winner of the Grand Jury Prize at the Sundance Film Festival this
year, WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE has earned every award it has and every
award it will get.  Writer/director/producer Todd Solondz's intensely
personal tragicomedy about an 11 year-old girl (Heather Matarazzo) facing
vicious ridicule in junior high is an often somber (and more often
hilarious) look at pre-teen "society."
     Her name is Dawn Wiener, a.k.a. "Wienerdog," and she has three strikes
against her from the start.  Not particularly attractive, not overly
bright, no personality to speak of -- the perfect tragic hero.  But as an
audience, we are instantly attracted to Dawn because she reminds us of all
the awkwardness that we had during that time in our lives (although mine
was more in 9th-10th grade).  If you were Homecoming Queen, you might as
well stop reading here.
     Dawn's life is like Solondz describes about himself, "just counting
off days and checking them off... interested in survival."  Her family
loves the darling youngest daughter Missy (Daria Kalinina).  She is bullied
by everyone at school, especially Brandon (Brendan Sexton, Jr.), with whom
she develops an intricate love-hate relationship.  She has in her backyard
a dingy clubhouse for the "Special People Club," which has two members, and
which her parents want to tear down in order to have a party.
     Basically, life sucks.  But things start to look up when brother Mark
(Matthew Faber) and his horrid band get the coolest guy in high school,
Steve (Eric Mabius), to join in return for tutoring.  Dawn finds herself
instantly falling for Steve, and he, surprisingly, doesn't push her away.
I could expound on the movie's rich plot like a "normal" film critic, but I
won't.  Instead, I'll let you savor the rich and juicy story that develops
over the course of the sparse 87-minute running time.  I will say that it
never lets up.
     Story is only one facet of what makes this film great.  The acting is
universally top-notch, especially considering these are all newcomers, and
Matarazzo deserves special recognition -- even the villains overcome
stereotyping.  Randy Drummand's photography is innovative and always
interesting.  The use of music, particularly Dawn's angry theme, is
excellent, and Solondz's little touches (like Dawn picking on Missy exactly
as the kids at school pick on her, continuing the cycle) make every scene
fresh and enthralling.
     Although there is a minor structural problem near the end, that really
doesn't detract from the overall success of the film.  And by the way,
cartoonist Lynda Barry should take a look at how her very similar (but not
*nearly* as good) comic strip would look as a movie.
     The social statement of WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE almost guarantees
that it will never be seen by the pretty boys and girls that really need
to.  That's too bad.  My highest recommendation.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
     Once upon a time there was a writer named Kevin, who wanted to make
a big splash in Hollywood.  He wrote a movie called KILLING MRS. TINGLE,
which didn't sell, so he tried again.  The next time he wrote a movie
called SCREAM, which single-handedly revived the horror genre, paving
the way for big horror flicks... and even small ones like THE BLAIR
WITCH PROJECT.
     And then he made a TV show called `Dawson's Creek,' which was also
a huge success.  And another horror flick.  And SCREAM 2.  And then this
writer was the hottest thing on Sunset Blvd., and even KILLING MRS.
TINGLE started to look good.  Miramax bought it.  They even let the guy
direct.
     Uh-oh.  Mr. Williamson may have a great gift for writing, but it's
not on display here.  There was, it turns out, a good reason MRS. TINGLE
didn't get sold: It's not that good of a story.
     That story involves a wicked schoolteacher (Mirren), who tortures
her pupils ruthlessly just for kicks.  When valedictorian-wannabe Holmes
is wrongly implicated for cheating, Tingle threatens expulsion.
Naturally, Holmes and friends decide to make the woman a hostage in her
own home and teach her a lesson.
     So much fun could have been had with this movie, but so little is
(see also: SUICIDE KINGS).  Though it's ostensibly a black comedy, the
jokes are deathly flat.  There's no `thrill' to speak of.  No scares.
Just some workmanlike acting that plods through about 90 minutes of
obvious tedium before the also-obvious ending arrives.  It's not a
hideously bad picture, it's just so unmemorable that I can hardly bring
myself to form an opinion about it.
     Changing the title to TEACHING MRS. TINGLE, big surprise, has not
made one bit of difference in the quality of the picture, either.
Director: Kevin Williamson
Producer: Richard N. Gladstein, Cathy Konrad
Writer: Kevin Williamson
Starring: Helen Mirren, Katie Holmes, Marisa Coughlan, Jeffrey Tambor,
Barry Watson, Michael McKean, Lesley Anne Warren, Molly Ringwald, Vivica
A. Fox
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Envy (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Norm Schrager.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/30e8cab26f86a51988256958007332f9?OpenDocument
The basic thriller usually stays in its tight little confines - it vies
with others in the genre for the most shocks and twists, leaving its
characters as cardboard playthings.  Sometimes though, as in the case of
Envy (screened at the 2000 Boston Film Festival), the thrills are really
a catalyst for something bigger.  Director Julie Money's Australian
feature veers slightly around the same old stuff and creates an
interesting and new mix of character study, role reversal, and sexual
politics.
The story is basic, but its presentation is tantalizingly off-kilter. 
Envy opens with a fragment from a scene that doesn't appear fully until
the film's climax, a device reminiscent of Steven Soderbergh's The
Limey.  It whets the appetite, draws a little confusion, and sets up the
possibility for unconventional storytelling.  It's simple: A girl sits
in a mall food court, looks at the camera, and then leaves.
The bulk of the setup is simple too - Kate (Linda Cropper), a married
professional with a young son, spies a gorgeous young girl at the local
pool, wearing what she believes is her stolen black dress.  When the
girl jumps in for a swim, Kate swipes it and bolts.  When the beautiful
Rachel (Anna Lise Phillips) and her two scuzzball friends come calling
for the dress back, the results are brutal.  The actions turn Kate's
family upside-down, and stir in her a passionate revenge, combining a
modern woman's power with a dangerous taste for retribution.
It's that change in Kate (or is it a change?) that gives Envy its step
above normalcy, its extra set of layers that make it worth watching. 
Cropper, who reminds me of Janet McTeer, plays Kate as tough and
calculated.  We can sympathize when she explains to her oaf of a husband
why rape doesn't have to include actual penetration, but we wonder how
long she'll foolishly stalk her enemies.  Cropper's got the load of
carrying Envy, and she performs well, save for some overly earnest
delivery here and there.
But is all this just about a missing dress?  It's obviously much bigger,
and in a framework that Kurosawa or Leigh would appreciate, it has to do
with class structure.  Kate's family lives in a broad, beautifully
appointed home, complete with a stylish fountain/pool; Rachel's "family"
lives in a shack in another part of town.  Kate owns, and wears, at
least two other black dresses, and even wears a negligee that looks
exactly like that little dress; Rachel and friends seem to wear the same
clothes each time we see them.  While some of the comparisons do come
across as simplistic (why is Rachel's group so inherently evil anyway?),
they make for an exciting use of set design and wardrobe, providing an
excellent set of rules to toy with.
Although Envy could easily have worked as a play, Money makes her study
solely cinematic.  She uses basic visual tricks of compressing time and
space to heighten scares, alter points-of-view, and just keep things
moving in general.  And while some of the thrills are of the cheap
Hollywood variety, Envy, as a whole, is not.
http://www.flp.com/New%20Films/index.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Mexican, The (2001)
Or not.  The Mexican has the distinction of being a romance that manages
to keep its lovey-dovey costars further apart than any film since
Sleepless in Seattle.  Not that there was any way around it.  Brad
Pitt's Jerry is a completely hapless bagman for a shifty mob boss (Bob
Balaban), sent from L.A. to Mexico to retrieve the titular objet d'art
-- an antique pistol.
This doesn't sit well with his difficult yet practically-a-wife
girlfriend Samantha (Julia Roberts), who swears she'll move to Las Vegas
if he goes on the job.  Bound by honor and/or the threat of death, he
goes.  And so does Julia.
In a convoluted tale of double-crosses, stolen identities, Mexican
curses, language barriers, and closeted homosexuality, The Mexican romps
through more genres (romance, comedy, adventure, drama, Western) than it
does miles of Mexican roadway.  Jerry finds the gun, and its deliverer
gets killed.  Sam heads off to Vegas and gets herself kidnapped. 
Twice.  People come back from the dead.  Characters get killed off
unexpectedly.  A dog barks.  Tequila is consumed.
Indeed, much of The Mexican plays out like highfalutin nonsense, with
Jerry the most ridiculously incapable courier ever put on this earth. 
He's endlessly losing the gun while inexplicably retrieving it again and
again.  He never learns a lesson about hiding valuables while managing
to figure out the complex plot against him.  Meanwhile, Sam is content
to simply nag nag nag.  If she can't bitch out Jerry on the phone, she's
happy to bend the ear of her kidnapper to wax on the topic of love in
the zeroes, thus screwing up his life, too.
Much to everyone's relief, a lot of this banter manages to come across
as the witty humor it's intended to be.  Even in one of her most grating
roles on film, it's hard not to like the overpowering Julia.  And Brad,
well, Brad's dunderhead comes across as the good-natured pendejo that he
really is.  Pitt amuses, and while Gore Verbinski hasn't come far as a
director since Mouse Hunt, the jokes pay off more often than not, and
the unexpected twists in J.H. Wyman's script liven up the picture
considerably.  That's good, because at two hours in running time, the
movie is much too long to support its ultimately frivolous guts as a
harmless road trip picture.
Altogether the film is likable enough and perfect for young, moviegoing
couples during an early spring.  But sadly, I'm already starting to
loathe The Mexican's influence.  Case in point: On the way home in the
car, my wife just wouldn't get off my back about the VCR.  Julia, what
hast thou wrought?
Director: Gore Verbinski
Producer: John Baldecchi, Lawrence Bender
Writer: J.H. Wyman
Starring: Brad Pitt, Julia Roberts, James Gandolfini, David Krumholtz,
Gene Hackman, Luis Felipe Tovar, Bob Balaban, J.K. Simmons, Michael
Cerveris
http://www.amazon.com/themexican
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
     Seeing ELIZABETH on the day of the impeachment of President Clinton
was a bit strange, but it did put things in perspective.
     450 years ago, no one would've thought a thing about a little
intern boinking. Today, that's obviously big news, and it should have
made the sexual, political, and religious escapades of ELIZABETH all the
more thrilling.
     Too bad it doesn't. The tumultuous tale of young Elizabeth I's
(Cate Blanchett) rise to power in the mid 1500's, we are treated to a
two hour trip through her battles with the French, a number of suitors,
the Pope, the Spanish, underhanded lords, and other nefarious types.
     The problem is this all comes off as too cliquish, with Britons the
obvious wink-wink insiders in all of this, as is typically the case with
movies about roylaty. Despite a rash of good performances, lush
camerawork, and great costumes, ELIZABETH is just too stand-offish to
really get into.
Director: Shekhar Kapur
Producer: Tim Bevan, Eric Fellner, Alison Owen
Writer: Michael Hirst
Starring: Cate Blanchett, Geoffrey Rush, Christopher Eccleston, Joseph
Fiennes, Richard Attenborough
http://www.elizabeth-themovie.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Mallrats (1995)
     Well, the long-awaited MALLRATS is here at last, and sadly, the
perfect twentysomething romantic comedy has still yet to be made. 
Writer/director Kevin Smith follows up his hilarious first film, CLERKS,
with this, the second in his so-called New Jersey Trilogy.  It's second
not only in sequence, but a distant also-ran in quality, too.
     MALLRATS tells the story of two mostly-losers, T.S. (Jeremy London)
and Brodie (Jason Lee), who manage to lose and regain their respective
girlfriends, Brandi (Claire Forlani) and Rene (Shannen Doherty), in one
long day at the mall.  Along the way, the pair has a series of big
adventures with cops and security guards, a game show organized by
Brandi's dad (Michael Rooker), comic book creator Stan Lee, and the
returning characters of Jay (Jason Mewes) and Silent Bob (Smith himself). 
Where all this was supposed to go, I'm not too sure.  But I *think* it was
supposed to be about relationships, and I think it was supposed to be
funny.
     For the most part, it's not.  Surprisingly, it's Jason Lee (who moves
into his first acting role from a career as a professional *skateboarder*)
who has all the good lines, and those are few and far between.  Gone is
Smith's witty and smartly lascivious dialogue from CLERKS.  Instead, the
MALLRATS script often sounds more like mindless smut with only a few
bright moments of real farcical entertainment.
     MALLRATS probably wouldn't be so painful if I didn't know what Smith
was capable of doing (and with a lot less funding, to boot).  This film
comes off as little more than random bits of plot and failed attempts at
humor:  Doherty parading about in her first appearance outside the 90210
ZIP code, Smith's strange homage to Stan Lee, Silent Bob's magic coat,
slapstick, sex jokes, and a completely inexplicable orangutan.
     I don't know what Smith was thinking when this project came together,
but let's just hope this is just the proverbial Sophomore slump.  Kev, I
know you can do better than this.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (archives)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
     A great score never hurt anybody, and with its hoppin' swing tunes,
BLAST FROM THE PAST gets quite a boost from a jumping swing soundtrack!
     Oh... wait a sec... the movie, right?  Well, what are you
expecting?  Maybe: "BLAST FROM THE PAST is a thoughtful analysis of Cold
War posturing and American paranoia in the 1960's?"  I don't think so. 
Let's try: "BLAST FROM THE PAST is a feel-good romp about a fish out of
water who tries to make sense out of a world gone wacky!"
     That'll do just fine.  Adam (Fraser) is the fish.  The world is
late 1990's Los Angeles.  The uber-hokey plot builds upon a jet
crash-landing in the unborn Adam's backyard on the eve of the Bay of
Pigs, sending the folks (Walken and Spacek) down into the enormous
fallout shelter below.  Convinced it's Armageddon, they hole up for 35
years, and Adam is born -- and raised -- with only his 1960's-mentality
folks to guide him.
     Then it's time to hit the surface.  Naturally, wacky hijinx ensue,
including a panicky bus ride, a gay baseball game, a hip dance number, a
cult formation, numerous car accidents, and many many many wry
observations likening modern life to a post-Apocalyptic wasteland.  But
not so Apocalyptic that a boy can't find himself a girl (Silverstone)!
     Okay, it's funny.  I even laughed out loud.  More than once.  Dave
Foley (of course) steals the show as Silverstone's hysterical
confidant.  Walken as the paranoid, anti-Commie father is also a treat
to watch.  Fraser isn't bad... very over the top, but not bad.  Of
course, Silverstone has the acting ability of a can of beets, but hey,
nothing's perfect.
Director: Hugh Wilson
Producer: Renny Harlin, Hugh Wilson
Writer: Bill Kelly, Hugh Wilson
Starring: Brendan Fraser, Christopher Walken, Sissy Spacek, Alicia
Silverstone, Dave Foley
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Johnny Mnemonic (1995)
     In 2021, when the world is basically ruled by corporate Japan,
humans with microchip brain implants are used to transport the most
important of data files.  Computer networks are unsafe, because people
can "jack in" and neo-physically enter the complex world of cyberspace,
where a computer virus won't just knock out your computer, it'll kill
you outright.
     This is the world of writer William Gibson, and it seems like a
pretty interesting place to visit.  It's unfortunate that JOHNNY
MNEMONIC does very little in this setting and comes off as little more
than a remake of TRON, without the lightcycle sequence.
     The plot (if you can't guess) is like this:  Keanu Reeves is one
of these cyber-couriers, his brain so packed with information he
doesn't even know his last name.  The information?  The cure for "NAS,"
the plague of the next century.  Out to get him?  Both the corporation
he's working for and their rivals, preacher/mercenary Dolph Lundgren
(yes, it's true), plus the LoTeks, a gang of antiestablishment types
led by Ice-T.  On his side is a doctor (Henry Rollins, rounding out the
pop culture cast) and newcomer Dina Meyer, as his bodyguard.
     Lots of characters here--almost all of them plastic and lifeless,
especially Reeves in what could have been a great role.  In fact, the
whole movie is a "could have been," but it mostly sells out to the
young video game crowd the film is destined to attract and never makes
a point except for one brief scene with Rollins jumping around and
howling about how technology is bad.  Whatever.
     On the redeeming side are the ultra-cool cyberspace sequences,
which are required viewing on the big screen.  Also good, but
overpowered by the animation, is Meyer as Johnny's bodyguard and
eventual love interest.  Together, these two aspects of the movie make
it largely watchable.
     The main problem with JOHNNY MNEMONIC (as if I hadn't listed
enough already) is the plot:  the bad guys are trying to get Johnny's
*head* in order to extract the information.  What's the point of a
human courier if you can get the info out just by chopping his head
off?  Maybe a portable hard drive would be cheaper next time.

Title
Review for Bless the Child (2000)
     Yes, August is upon us and with it comes the second appearance of
the twice-yearly dumping ground for Hollywood.  Like the February
doldrums, August brings us films filled with fading stars and awful
storylines that weren't deemed good enough to break even after a big
summer marketing campaign, nor will they be able to go toe to toe with
meatier fare during Oscar season.
     And to open August, enter Bless the Child, possibly the worst movie
I've seen this year.  Well, after Mission to Mars.
     Swallow hard before reading this ridiculous plot synopsis, which I
can already tell is going to be painful to type.  In a nutshell, Jesus
has returned to earth in the form of a little girl (Holliston Coleman),
who is abandoned by her druggie mother (Angela Bettis) as an infant, to
be raised by Aunt Maggie (Kim Basinger).  Six years later, Satan's
minions are out to kill the girl, of course.  And this year, Satan's
head minion is a New Agey creep named Eric Stark (Rufus Sewell),
determined to convert the Jesus girl to The Dark Side before Easter...
or else she must die!  (I guess they picked Easter because, you know,
they missed the whole millennial paranoia genre window by about a
year.)  Enter an occult-expert FBI agent (Jimmy Smits) and you've got a
kind of cop-thriller-paranormal Sixth Sense wannabe that makes
apocalyptic pap like End of Days look like The Seventh Seal.
     While young Coleman is a gifted actress, the movie has her doing
little more than beating her head against the wall, hugging people, or
spinning stuff with her magical powers (backed up by lousy digital
effects).  Basinger proves that, yes, L.A. Confidential was a total
fluke and that she can't act after all.  And Sewell appears to be
channeling Dr. Evil for his goofy bad guy role.  While Christina Ricci
is being used to sell this film to the unsuspecting masses, her part is
barely a cameo comprising three minutes of screen time.
     But bad acting doesn't kill Bless the Child, it's the bad plot that
aborts this production.  Driven by randomness, coincidence, and just
plain stupidity on the part of the characters, the movie wanders from
scene to scene with little more purpose than filling 100 minutes before
we get to the inevitable showdown at the end.  This has been a
successful M.O. for action films for a century -- but few have had the
gall to try to work in a God vs. Devil plot.
     The film is so over the top that Maggie's car, when falling off a
bridge, can't just splash into the water -- it has to explode into
flames on the way down.  The film is so derivative it actually steals
lines from other movies (notably a slight variation on "The greatest
trick the devil pulled was convincing the world he didn't exist" from
The Usual Suspects).  And the film is so amazingly obvious that you
expect Stark's limo to have "666" on the license plates.
     Altogether, Bless the Child is almost bad enough to become a cult
classic.
Director: Chuck Russell
Producer: Mace Neufeld
Writer: Thomas Rickman, Clifford Green, Ellen Green
Starring: Kim Basinger, Jimmy Smits, Rufus Sewell, Ian Holm, Angela
Bettis, Christina Ricci, Yan Birch, Lumi Cavazos, Holliston Coleman
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for 6th Day, The (2000)
     You've seen the ads.  You know the story.  So is The 6th Day the
same movie as Total Recall, just without the blonde?  Not really, but
don't feel bad if you have a little déjŕ vu along the way.
     Rest assured, you're watching an Arnold Schwarzenegger vehicle. 
This time he's not a spy or a commando, he's Adam Gibson, an extreme
snowboarding tour guide in the not-so-distant future, an era that
includes a company called RePet can clone your dog, cat, or snake.  Or
you can pick up a Sim-Pal, a child-size doll (with real hair that grows)
that makes for one of the creepiest props I've seen since that
miniature, squirting chicken in Eraserhead.
     One day in this utopia, our lovable hero returns home from work to
discover that, a la RePet, he's been cloned and a doppelganger has taken
over his life.  Say what!?  Everyone knows human cloning is illegal. 
Before you can say "I'll be back," Arnie finds himself on the run from
goons intent on killing him -- if only he could figure out who -- and
why -- they wanted him dead!
     Of course, that reason just might have a little something to do
with Tony Goldwyn's multi-billionaire bad guy Drucker, who turns out to
be building some kind of illicit clone empire that is near-unstoppable. 
Clone hitman gets killed?  Just re-clone him and send him back out into
the field to bust some heads!
     For the first time on film, it's Arnie vs. Arnie as the real Adam
comes to terms with his alter ego, only he understandably finds he has
trouble kicking his own ass.  Why?  Because this is the era of a kinder,
gentler Arnold.  A PG-13 Arnold.  A pacifist Arnold that only kills four
thugs instead of the usual two dozen during a shooting spree.
     Much of The 6th Day serves as little more than an excuse to show
off a bunch of gee-whiz effects, a lot of which is reminiscent of
Schwarzenegger's Eraser.  And while some of the FX really are gee-whiz,
some -- like the extremely annoying "high-tech" wipes that work as scene
transitions -- are tedious and look more like music video sequences.
     A lot of this unevenness can be chalked up to director Roger
Spottiswoode, the man probably best known for helming the limp James
Bond vehicle Tomorrow Never Dies but also responsible for movies like
Stop! Or My Mom Will Shoot and Turner & Hooch.  Then again, I suppose
Spottiswoode is no more out of his element that Arnold Schwarzenegger is
as producer.
     So is all this talk of cloning possible -- namely that you can copy
a person's personality and all their memories by flashing a light in
their eyes, or that you can clone a whole person in two short hours? 
Well... what The 6th Day lacks in scientific feasibility it makes up for
with some much-needed humor.  Now, a little phony science I can forgive,
but what's less forgivable is that The 6th Day is so damn boring!  Where
are the thrills?  Sure Arnie hangs out of a helicopter once, but much of
the film takes place behind corporate doors discussing the right and
wrongs of the clone debate.  Hardly a True Lies with, you know, a nuke
or two going off.
     Ultimately, The 6th Day turns out to be a curious modern morality
fable, one that comes out distinctly on the anti-cloning side.  But I'm
not sure if Spottiswoode isn't sending mixed messages here.  After all,
two Arnolds!?  What could be wrong with that?
Director: Roger Spottiswoode
Producer: Jon Davison, Mike Medavoy, Arnold Schwarzenegger
Writer: Cormac Wibberley, Marianne Wibberley
Starring: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Tony Goldwyn, Robert Duvall, Michael
Rapaport, Michael Rooker, Sarah Wynter, Wendy Crewdon
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Cirque du Soleil: Journey of Man (2000)
     The venerable performance troupe Cirque du Soleil (with two
concurrent Vegas shows to their credit) hits the big screen -- the big
big screen -- with a big-budget, dazzling, 3-D IMAX production called
Journey of Man.  While ostensibly there's a story to hold this thing
together (that being the life journey of a kid from infant to old man),
the film is really just a vehicle to show off the acrobatics of the
troupe to those unwilling to shell out the $80 or so for a glimpse of
the real thing.
     As it turns out, the movie really does feel a lot like the genuine
"journey of man" -- assuming your journey has a lot of bungee jumping,
synchronized swimming, and cube dancing in it.  If you've seen a Cirque
du Soleil show before, you'll know what I'm talking about, as the stunts
are the same as they are on stage.  Only here, the settings are
different.  Watch a fetusy-type person swim through the water to enjoy
some water dancing.  Watch a tyke in the jungle enjoy a little bungee
dancing.  Watch a grown man see some people painted to look like statues
do some balancing tricks on a big tadpole.  And watch the old guy look
on as some N*Sync lookalikes do some flips in his house.
     This is all well and good, but unfortunately a 100' screen and 3-D
effects add nothing to the visual display of the theatrics.  In fact,
I'd say Journey of Man would have been better if it was smaller and in
2-D.  As it stands, the movie is often out of focus and frequently
leaves you to hone in on little but the extreme strain on the
performers' faces -- something you aren't meant to be paying attention
to.
     The film is padded with long, helicopter shots of landscapes, the
gibberish prattling of typical otherworldly Cirque characters, and some
truly strange moralisms ("Each of you was born with three keys..."), as
narrated by Ian McKellen.  The end result at 38 minutes is not much
longer than a sitcom, and it's not much deeper, either.
     Ultimately, all of this, coupled with having to put up with an
audience full of idiots snickering at the scantily clad performers may
make you wonder why exactly you're shelling out 10 bucks.  I did, and I
wasn't even paying.
Director: Keith Melton
Producer: André Picard, Peter Wagg
Writer: Steve Roberts, Peter Wagg
Starring: Ian McKellen, Nicky Dewhurst, Brian Dewhurst, Anait
Karagyezyan, Chris Van Wagenen, Kenny Raskin, Cully Smoller, Mikhail
Matorin, Yves Decoste, Marie-Laure Mesnage
http://www.cirquedusoleiljourney.com/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Pallbearer, The (1996)
     If you haven't been beaten over the head enough with news of the grand
entrance of "Friend" David Schwimmer into the world of film, here's a
little more!
     Schwimmer's first outing, THE PALLBEARER, doesn't venture too far from
the "Friends" tree, as we are presented with a big romantic comedy that
borders on television kitschiness, full of screwball humor and plenty of
misunderstandings to fuel the plot.  In fact, the entire premise of THE
PALLBEARER is driven by one big misunderstanding itself:  Tom Thompson
(Schwimmer) is asked to give the eulogy at the funeral of Bill Abernathy, a
guy from high school who he doesn't even remember.  (While THE EULOGIST
might have been a more appropriate title, I figure a name like THE
PALLBEARER will confuse enough stupid American moviegoers anyway.)
     Tom reluctantly agrees to help out at the funeral thanks to the
sobbing and advances of Bill's seductress mother Ruth (a bleached-blonde
Barbara Hershey).  Of course, not remembering the deceased is good for at
least 40 minutes of laughs, the remainder of which are filled with Tom's
completely unrelated pursuit of high school crush Julie (Gwyneth Paltrow).
     Between Schwimmer's lost-puppy look and Paltrow's permanent pout, one
might think this is a serious movie about love and death, but of course
it's not.  In fact, with its large supporting cast of twentysomethings
variously afflicted with angst (including Michael Rapaport and Toni
Collette, Muriel from MURIEL'S WEDDING), it's a lot like a long "Friends"
episode ("The One With The Dead Guy").
     Now while I enjoy the show, I'm not too keen on a 94-minute version of
it, because as with many comedies, the jokes can get old, the story can get
silly, and the characters can get on your nerves.  While this isn't too bad
with THE PALLBEARER, it does happen on occasion, mainly because of director
Matt Reeves letting the film wallow in Tom's self-pity far too often.
Also, the progression of Tom's various romances here is a bit iffy, but at
least it gives schmucks like myself some hope for the future.
     Overall, THE PALLBEARER may not be as stylish or as funny as some of
the other comedies of 1996 like THE BIRDCAGE or FLIRTING WITH DISASTER, but
it's fairly good....  At least it's better than a funeral.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Moll Flanders (1996)
     Potential taglines for this movie...  MOLL FLANDERS:  *Less* than just
a bad title.  MOLL FLANDERS:  *Not* a shopping center in Belgium.  MOLL
FLANDERS:  Total waste of time.
     The last one is the most appropriate for this:  a picture which wastes
a lot of raw acting talent and pretty photography on a boring,
groaning-in-your-seat story which hinges on every clich in the book.
     MOLL FLANDERS is the most recent entry in the disturbing trend of
pictures made out of "classic" novels (in this case, Daniel Defoe's).
Regular readers pretty much know my opinion of how well this has been done
lately, but I'll say it again:  these movies haven't been too good.
     Robin Wright plays the titular character, a tempestuous woman born to
a death row-incarcerated mother in 18th century London.  She goes through
the ringer during the next two hours, going from nun to maid to whore to
respectable artist's wife to a voyage for the New World... none of which is
very interesting.  Along the way, she is befriended by Hibble (Morgan
Freeman, a character wholly invented for the film), a servant to the wicked
Lady Blystone (Stockard Channing), mistress of the bordello where Moll
plies her whoredom, and the two become friends.
     The story is told in flashback -- with Hibble finding Moll's long-lost
daughter, Flora (Aisling Corcoran), and telling her the story of her
mother.  As it turns out, Flora is a truly snotty little kid, and we
quickly find out that her mother is a snotty big kid.  Neither one carries
too much appeal as someone for us to look up to, and I was hoping against
hope that every time Flora would try to run away from Hibble, she'd escape.
She didn't.
     The big problem in MOLL FLANDERS, as mentioned earlier, is its very
poor and outdated story line.  Maybe the line "I'd had sex many times but
never made love" was new 150 years ago... but not any more.  Literally
*every* scene is predictable.  *Seriously.*  We've seen this all before in
a hundred movies -- mostly the kind that play on cable, late-nights.  Yawn.
     Even worse:  the humor in the film plays to the lowest common
denominator, alternating between sex jokes and genitalia jokes.  Not
exactly for the highbrow.  And there are lots of scenes with Moll acting
drunk, inexplicably insane, or both.  That's acting?  If I wanted to see
that, I could go back to college.
     The two saving graces:  very lovely cinematography and a clever
ending.  Enough?  Hardly.
     Hopefully I've made my point.  And judging from the audience's
reaction, I wasn't the only one with this opinion.  Best comment I heard
after the film:  "It was better than SPY HARD."  I couldn't agree more.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
     You heard it here first:  When big "Mission: Impossible" fans leave
the theater after seeing the film version of their favorite TV show, the
most common opinion will be, "I'm pissed off."
     Telling you why would spoil what little plot MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE
actually has, so I won't.  Instead, let me try to shed a little light on
what is a messy, uneven production that had so much promise but delivers so
little.
     Tom Cruise, surprisingly, is not to blame.  The only A-list name in
the production, Cruise stars as Ethan Hunt, the disguise expert in the IMF
gang.  Something of a rebel in the bunch, Hunt finds himself embroiled in a
mission-gone-wrong that should have been a cakewalk.  With the whereabouts
of his crew unknown (including Emmanuelle Beart, Kristin Scott-Thomas, an
uncredited Emilio Estevez, and Jon Voight as boss-man Jim Phelps), Hunt
finds himself the target of a "molehunt" from IMF bigwig Kittridge (Henry
Czerny).  Hunt then tries to play cat and mouse to expose the real mole and
the bad guys and save his skin in the process.
     And getting to the blowing up of stuff is director Brian De Palma's
primary goal here.  In the process, he lets the story fall into new realms
of ridiculousness and "What the hell is going on?" Syndrome.  Respected
writers David Koepp (JURASSIC PARK), Robert Towne (CHINATOWN), and Steven
Zaillian (SCHINDLER'S LIST) appear to be running on fumes.  After a dozen
silly and unlikely plot twists, you really stop caring about the whole
thing and just sit back in the hopes of an impromptu explosion.  (And there
are many fewer of these than the trailer would have you believe.)
     MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE's success (or lack thereof) hinges on two big
scenes:  the big break-in scene (in the trailer, where Cruise is hanging
from a wire in a computer room), and the big finish (in the trailer, where
Cruise is propelled from an exploding helicopter onto a train).  While both
scenes are good, there's nothing new in them.  In fact, the break-in is
virtually identical to a similar scene in SNEAKERS.  Yawn.
     The free and inaccurate use of high-technobabble makes the production
look worse than it is, and Danny Elfman's score is surprisingly flat.
While the acting is on-target, never getting too far over-the-top, the
movie simply starts with a whimper... and, you guessed it... self-destructs.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for If I Die Before I Wake (1998)
Pity poor Muse Watson.  Ever since those darn kids ran him over with
their car in I Know What You Did Last Summer, he just hasn't been right
in the head.
This time out, he and his ultra-redneck brothers are invading an Ohio
suburb -- God knows why -- hell bent on destroying everyone and
everything inside a lonely house at the end of the street.
For nearly 80 minutes Muse and his crew terrorize this poor suburban
family, but little do they know the teenage LoriBeth (Stephanie Jones)
is ready to take them on, and she'll turn anything into a weapon of mass
destruction -- chairs, knives, fireplace pokers, shards of glass, even
the gunpowder emptied from a shotgun shell.
Most of the film consists of LoriBeth running, hiding, climbing, and
fighting off the predators -- including two memorable trips up the
chimney.  While she manages to get on an Internet chat board to beg for
help, the phone never seems to be an option for her (note to LoriBeth: a
modem can dial 911, too).
While it's uninspired, If I Die Before I Wake is often genuinely
thrilling, and writer/director Brian Katkin surprises us by killing off
plenty of bad and good guys alike.  For her part, the nubile Jones seems
to be making a living off movies like this (and, for example,
Rumplestiltskin), and she's fun enough to watch whether she's shimmying
under the bed or across the roof.  Someone give this girl some
legitimate work, will ya?
Director: Brian Katkin
Producer: Willie Boudevin, P.J. Pettiette
Writer: Brian Katkin
Starring: Stephanie Jones, Muse Watson, Michael McCleery, Anthony
Nicosia, Mary Kathleen Gordon, John Gavagin, Kristian Hans Horn,
Coryanne Sennett
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
     So here I am, newly engaged, and the subject of honeymoons comes up.  I
hate the sun, and I don't like flying, so naturally, I say: Cruise!  How about
Alaska?  This is the best idea we've come up with so far... and then we go to
see TITANIC.
     Well, I can't think of anything that would change my mind faster than the
sight of 1500 ice-covered dead bodies, bobbing up and down in the ocean, after
the sinking of a luxury liner.  Let's jump right on the boat, huh?
     And maybe that speaks to the power of the film.  When the ship is
launched on its maiden voyage, you can feel the splendor in the theater.  When
it bangs against the iceberg and starts to sink, you can feel the death in the
air.  When all that's left is ocean and darkness, you shiver in your seat with
the dying.
     The point I'm getting at is that this is a movie about *atmosphere*.  The
Titanic itself is the star--the only star--and the only reason to leave your
house.  Leonardo DiCaprio as a third-class drifter?  Forget it.  Kate Winslet,
one of my favorite actresses around, as a first-class dreamer who falls for
the lug?  She's fine, but sounds like she belongs in the Valley.  Billy Zane
as her betrothed?  Puh-leeze.  These parts could have been played by anybody
and then forgotten.  The movie would remain the same.
     Don't even think about waiting for video or cable with this film.  You'll
hate it.  I also think it's safe to say you can arrive 90 minutes late and
still see the good stuff (the rest is Cameron's sappy love story that is both
exceedingly phony and wholly unoriginal, not to mention the scenes from "the
present.")  Then again, lots of sobs in the audience attest that the film is
both an effects extravaganza *and* a chick flick (and a dessert topping, I guess).
     Whatever it's pigeon-holed as, you're going to love the movie, even if it
is 3 1/2 hours long.  But I've rambled too much.  I've got a honeymoon to plan.
Director: James Cameron
Producer: James Cameron, Jon Landau
Writer: James Cameron
Starring: Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet, Billy Zane, Kathy Bates, Bill Paxton
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Mystery, Alaska (1999)
     Oh no.  Someone let David E. Kelley out of his cage for a second
time this year.  This time, the water in his LAKE PLACID is frozen over,
giving us the setting for MYSTERY, ALASKA.
     The title's surely a MYSTERY and gives you no clues about the film
 so what's it all about?  Those expecting a schlocky horror flick like
LAKE PLACID will be let down.  Is it a surreal and light dramedy like
`Ally McBeal'?  That's closer.  Reality:  MYSTERY, ALASKA is simply a
grown-up version of THE MIGHTY DUCKS.  Hey, this *is* a Disney film.
     And not a very good one.  The first sixty minutes, which set up the
unlikely premise of the New York Rangers flying to a nowhere
nothing-town in the middle of the Alaskan winter to play a game of pond
hockey, is one of the worst hours of film I've seen all year.
Stonkingly boring stretches broken up by potty humor do not a fun
viewing experience make.
     History would tell us that hockey movies are supposed to be funny.
Disney would seem to argue otherwise, claiming that this Cinderella
story can be played like an Arctic ROCKY.  And maybe it can.  For a
while, I thought MYSTERY was headed into brave new territory  maybe a
cautionary tale about the false pedestals we put our sports heroes on.
     But pretty soon the Disneyfication hits and hits hard, and we've
got the Against-all-odds-David-vs.-Goliath movie on our hands.  And in
its own bizarre way, that's when the movie becomes watchable.  At two
hours flat, MYSTERY, ALASKA is redeemed in its second half only by some
unexpected cameos (that I won't spoil here) and a surprisingly great
game of hockey.
     If you're a hockey fan, you'll enjoy the movie for the game alone.
If not, you're going to find yourself, ahem, out in the cold.
Director: M. Jay Roach
Producer: Howard Baldwin, Karen Elise Baldwin, David E. Kelley
Writer: David E. Kelley, Sean O'Byrne
Starring: Burt Reynolds, Hank Azaria, Russell Crowe, Mary McCormack,
Lolita Davidovich, Ron Eldard, Colm Meaney, Mary Chaykin
http://movies.go.com/mysteryalaska/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
     Another year-end flick with another four-star rating?  What, am I nuts,
or just some corporate tool shilling for would-be Oscar contenders?
     Never mind that I am saving up all my *real* praise for SPICEWORLD next
week... I'll try to lay it on again for WAG THE DOG.  It's a great little
premise: what would happen if you tried to produce a phony war as a diversion
away from a lecherous President's leisure time?  A lot of wacky hijinks, from
the looks of it!  With everything from a "We Are the World" parody to a
memorial for a P.O.W., WAG THE DOG is really just a send-up of America's
fascination with war from WWII through the Gulf War, where combat truly became
a ridiculous exercise in soundbites and TV footage.
     The story is good, the comedy is goofy but still solid, but it's Dustin
Hoffman that is the crown jewel of the film, hamming it up as a kind of C.C.
De Mille-meets-Liberace egomaniac/movie producer.  De Niro's understated
cover-up man is also good, and Anne Heche's Prince Valiant haircut is
interesting, at the very least.
     Finally, the commentary on our society is pretty rich, and I can't help
but think that a lot of people are going to be subtly offended by this movie. 
I think that pleases me most of all.  You see, as WAG THE DOG states, modern
war really is a "pageant."  It's more dangerous to drive to work than hit the
front lines... if there are any lines, that is.  Is it live, or is it Memorex?
 What's the difference?
Director: Barry Levinson
Producer: Robert De Niro, Barry Levinson, Jane Rosenthal
Writer: Hilary Henkin, David Mamet
Starring: Dustin Hoffman, Robert De Niro, Anne Heche, Denis Leary, Willie Nelson
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Fierce Creatures (1997)
     One of the moviegoing experiences I'll never forget is seeing A
FISH CALLED WANDA at Mann's Chinese Theater in Los Angeles in 1988.  It
instantly became one of my all-time favorites, and I greeted the arrival
of FIERCE CREATURES, a follow-up from the same four principals almost 10
years later, with heavy anticipation.
     While the experience of seeing FIERCE CREATURES at the Highland 10
in Austin, Texas will be a considerably less memorable experience, the
film is certainly full of entertainment and is worthy of an audience.
     The plot concerns London's Marwood Zoo, which is purchased by
cutthroat media mogul Rod McCain (an unidentifiable Kevin Kline).  In
Rod's employ is Willa (not Wanda; Jamie Lee Curtis), who is charged with
making the zoo a profitable chain of theme parks.  She turns to Rod's
unloved son Vince (also Kline) for help, and hires ex-cop Rollo Lee
(John Cleese) with making some big changes.  Rollo seizes upon the
public's love of violence for his direction, and enacts a plan to stock
the zoo with only "fierce creatures" -- no more boring sloths, lemurs,
or turtles.
     The story gets murkier from here, involving rebellious zookeepers
(including Michael Palin), a plan to sell the zoo, and lots of sex
jokes, but basically the movie floats, thanks to liberal doses of humor
from the principals.
     On the other hand, the film does get a bit heavy into the fart
jokes, making this whole experience seem more like "Benny Hill" than
"Monty Python," but hey, now that Benny's gone, what are we supposed to
do for crude British humor?  Cleese and Kline are the acting standouts
-- no big surprise.  Rather, it's Curtis who proves to be, well, boring,
wearing the same expression throughout the film as if she's constipated
(hence the potty humor, I suppose).
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Schlafes Bruder (1995)
     Occasionally a film is conceived more as a series of images than as
a story with a beginning, a middle, and an end.  BROTHER OF SLEEP may
not have been intended this way, but that's certainly how it came out.
     Gorgeous Cinemascope photography (which is done no justice
whatsoever on the videotape copy from which I reviewed this film) is
what makes BROTHER OF SLEEP a standout.  Shot in the
still-untouched-by-time Austrian Alps, this picture is difficult to
describe in two paragraphs.  But I'll try.
     Elias (Andre Eisermann) is born a mystery.  Mystically imbued with
a gift for music -- an innate talent capable of causing his listeners to
see and become one with heaven, however briefly -- Elias finds his
childhood a hard one.  Considered a devil by the inhabitants of his tiny
mountain village, he has only two friends -- similarly outcast Peter
(Ben Becker) and his Elias's sister Elsbeth (Dana Vavrova).
     As they grow to adulthood, the three find themselves in a bizarre
sort of love triangle, still outcasts from the rest of the village.  As
things go from bad to worse, culminating in a jealousy-fueled
catastrophe, the three are torn apart... and come back together one last
time.
     BROTHER OF SLEEP has "artsy" stamped all over it, and I realize it
sounds *really* corny, but there's a lot more to it than what I've
briefly described.  While it has, in my opinion, an overly pessimistic
view on life, the subtleties of theme about one's search for God away
from the walls of the church and a spiritual link with the natural world
make it all worthwhile.  (As I mentioned before, the cinematography (by
Joseph Vilsmaier [STALINGRAD], who also directed and produced) would
certainly be outstanding on the big screen.)  Also of note is the music,
mostly on pipe organ (scored by Norbert J. Schneider), which equals any
classical pieces I've ever heard.
     Certainly not for everyone and likely to be inaccessible to many,
thanks to its introspective and subtle style, BROTHER OF SLEEP is still
a fine film that deserves to be seen.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Glass Shield, The (1994)
     At least it *sounded* like a good idea.  Unfortunately, the
execution of the new Miramax film, THE GLASS SHIELD, a drama set in an
L.A. sheriff's station, leaves the viewer with little more than the
perception that he's just seen a movie that could have been something,
but didn't quite make it.
     THE GLASS SHIELD is the tragic tale of J. J. Johnson (Michael
Boatman), a bright-eyed and idealistic black deputy-in-training who is
"chosen" to join an all-white Los Angeles station for his first
assignment.  There, he encounters not-so-subtle racism and persecution
which begins to crack his romanticism of the cop's life.
     Soon after his arrival, J. J. is drawn into a plot to falsify
evidence against a supposed murderer.  Then, a much deeper conspiracy
is uncovered, and J. J. and his sole ally, Deborah (Lori Petty, as the
only female and only Jew in the department), become trapped between the
wheels of the conspirators and the legal system, both of which they are
sworn to serve.
     The trouble with THE GLASS SHIELD is that the storytelling is so
heavy-handed and convoluted that it never becomes the gripping thriller
that it wanted to be.  In fact, television shows like Law and Order and
NYPD Blue tell more enthralling stories in half the time.  Director and
screenwriter Charles Burnett introduces far too many pointless
characters and takes the movie down so many subplot paths that the
moviegoer has no choice but to give up trying to pin names to faces.
And although the lengthy narrative scenes are cut with some nice bits,
like renegade cop Baker (Michael Ironside) jamming a gun into J. J.'s
mouth and threatening to blow his head off in the station building
itself, they don't even look like they belong in a movie that feels
dedicated to droning on and on without really moving the story
forward.
     There are some parts to the film that shine:  Boatman is
absolutely riveting as J. J., and the bad guys couldn't be any badder.
The clever use of sedated color and lighting and some nice camerawork
help the film immensely, also.  But on the other hand, the casting of
Petty is a complete mystery--she's completely lifeless and out of place
here.  After all, I'm not the only one who hasn't forgotten TANK GIRL
(though I'd desperately like to).
     Burnett is a lucky alumnus of the MacArthur "genius" Grant clique
and obviously feels like he can't be second-guessed.  Hopefully his ego
won't be too bruised by the lukewarm reception his film is getting, but
he does need a wake-up call.  THE GLASS SHIELD may have a few bright
spots, but overall, it is definitely not the work of a genius.

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
     Twenty years before Marilyn Manson put on ladies' makeup and
frightened the crap out of mothers around the nation, a little band
called KISS pioneered the idea, and played some good music as a bonus.
     While KISS was a few years before my rock & roll prime, they were
still quite popular when I was in school, and tales/rumors of Gene
Simmons' cow tongue, blood splitting, backwards-masked lyrics, and the
infamous `Knights In Satan's Service' moniker were the stuff of legend.
     Director Adam Rifkin would love to rekindle the KISS flame that we
all remember so well, but the movie doesn't quite live up to the
standards set by coming of age/adventure flicks like THE BREAKFAST CLUB
and FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF.
     You gotta give them points for originality, though.  Following four
Cleveland kids and their desperate quest to reach Detroit in time for
the big KISS show, Rifkin (whose only recognizable credit is the Charlie
Sheen bomb THE CHASE) takes a few fun and unexpected turns in an
otherwise rote story that provide some great laughs.
     But really, this is an unabashed movie about KISS fans, for KISS
fans.  There's nothing wrong with that, but let me just say that
watching a film in a theater packed with aging hard rockers trying to
regain their youth through the cinema is one of the more trying
experiences a critic can go through.
     It's nice to see Furlong and HEAVENLY CREATURES' Melanie Lynskey
back on the big screen, but they've both done far better material
before.  Let's hope to see some more of that again soon.
Director: Adam Rifkin
Producer: Gene Simmons, Barry Levine, Kathleen Haase
Writer: Carl V. Dupré
Starring: Edward Furlong, Giuseppe Andrews, James DeBello, Sam
Huntington, Gene Simmons, Paul Stanley, Ace Frehley, Peter Criss,
Melanie Lynskey, Nick Scotti, Shannon Tweed, Miles Dougal, Natasha
Lyonne, Lin Shaye
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
     Besides having the hardest-to-type title of a movie since BEING
JOHN MALKOVICH, what will be the legacy of ERIN BROCKOVICH, an unabashed
Julia Roberts star vehicle that, coincidentally, also tells the story of
the largest direct-action legal settlement in American history?
     It won't be for its aura of jurisprudence.  As a primer on the U.S.
legal system, BROCKOVICH is not terribly compelling.  The legal
mumbo-jumbo is all there and feels accurate enough, but the heart of the
movie simply doesn't rest with the details of the case, which features
Pacific Gas & Electric poisoning 600 people in a small California town
with chromium (and then telling them it's good for them).
     While it's not a class-action lawsuit, the case has essentially the
same details as A CIVIL ACTION and any number of other VERDICT clones,
with nearly-bankrupt attorneys who risk it all on One Big Case.
     And while the mind wanders when the film turns toward the perils of
fighting The System, your eyes light up when Roberts takes the stage.
ERIN BROCKOVICH is her movie.  And while Albert Finney steals a bit of
thunder as her grumpy boss, it's Erin's brassy, white-trash, amateur
investigator that makes you want to watch this movie, all 2 1/2 hours of
it.
     That, and the fact that none of Roberts' outfits seem to be able to
cover her brassiere.  To say the least, Roberts is breaking new grounds
in cleavage with this film -- anticipate much to be made of her "new
look".  That said, it's fabulous to see her in an atypical role, far
away from the sap and formula of recent fare like RUNAWAY BRIDE.
     With the exception of Finney, the supporting cast is lackluster.
Aaron Eckhart tries awfully hard as Erin's Harley-lovin' yet
family-friendly boyfriend, but the role doesn't really suit him.  While
attempts are made to humanize them, the victims are all pretty much the
same character, each battling one tragic disease or another.
     It's obvious that indie breath-holder Stephen Soderbergh (OUT OF
SIGHT, THE LIMEY) is behind the camera.  Shots are regularly hand-held,
close-ups are regularly extreme.  The film looks different, but in the
end it's really just more of the same fist-waving we've seen before.  A
good film, not great, not terribly compelling, but featuring a slam-dunk
performance by Miss Roberts in a season of otherwise unwatchable films.
     All of which may leave you wondering, Is PG&E still this awful?
Last year somebody at the company flipped the wrong switch, and the
power went out in San Francisco for a full day.  I think a few lawsuits
are pending.
Director: Steven Soderbergh
Producer: Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey Sher
Writer: Susannah Grant
Starring: Julia Roberts, Aaron Eckhart, Albert Finney, Marg Helgenberger
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Virtuosity (1995)
     In the not so distant future (1999 A.D.), Virtual Reality has
progressed to the point where the Virtual part isn't so clear.  With
the help of nanotechnology (read: really small) machines, VR
simulations can take on a physical form composed of millions of these
teeny robots.  When a semi-crazed engineer decides to bring his
ultimate bad guy VR program to life, he sneaks the chip into some of
this robotic glop.  Thus, Sid 6.7 is born.
     Sid (Russell Crowe) is version number 6.7 of a compilation of 183
personalities: mass murderers, serial killers, and Hitler-types.  The
ultimate villain, Sid is imbued with the ability to regenerate damage
at the touch of glass (silicon), almost superhuman powers, and the
cunning and mental imbalance of history's worst killers.  And who would
have thought ... when you let Sid out of the lab, Sid wants to kill.
Preferably on national television.
     Enter Parker Barnes (Denzel Washington), ex-cop sent up the river
for the accidental slaying of two people.  Turns out that Barnes is the
only one who has a chance of stopping Sid (see also, DEMOLITION MAN),
so out of the lock-up he comes.  Partnered with him is criminologist
Madison Carter (Kelly Lynch), who holds her own as the first lead
female I've seen in ages who *doesn't* get romantically entangled with
the hero.
     Full of wicked, cutting-edge special effects, VIRTUOSITY makes a
strong entry into a summer of lifeless films.  It takes a while to get
rolling, and the early character development is weak, but pretty soon,
everyone's caught up in this innovative take on the cat and mouse
game.  I won't spoil the twists, but the dynamic between Sid and Barnes
is quite interesting to watch.  Crowe, as Sid, is the real star,
playing the megalomaniacal killer with perfect poise and egocentrism,
eerily reminiscent of Malcolm McDowell's Alex from A CLOCKWORK ORANGE.
The only complaint I have is that with 183 professional killers inside
him, you'd think he'd be a better shot with a pistol.
     VIRTUOSITY has its flaws, though.  The main problem is that the
premise of Reality vs. Fantasy isn't taken as far as it could have been
(TOTAL RECALL was the last good example of this).  The filmmakers have
made it very clear which world we're in at all times, mainly because
they're really, really busy showing off what their visual effects guys
can do (expect an Oscar nomination).  Supporting cast is also boring
(even Academy Award winner Louise Fletcher (ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S
NEST) is wasted).
     Director Brett Leonard, who just came off the dismal HIDEAWAY, has
thankfully redeemed himself here.  Maybe the best recommendation I can
give is that VIRTUOSITY is still on my mind as I replay the intriguing
parts, and that's all too rare in Hollywood these days.

Title
Review for Sex: The Annabel Chong Story (1999)
     The funny dilemma about SEX: THE ANNABEL CHONG STORY is this:
Annabel Chong (aka Grace Quek) has one of the more interesting porn star
bios around.  Born in Singapore, raised in London, and studying at USC,
she decided almost on a whim to go into adult movies, culminating in the
starring role of THE WORLD'S BIGGEST GANGBANG, wherein she had sex with
251 men in 10 hours.  Getting inside this head would be fascinating...
but documentarian Gough Lewis does such a bad job of it we leave the
theater more confused than anything else.
     Annabel's story is an atypical one as porn starlet studies go.
She's got a real head on her shoulders, she's a rabid spokesperson for
feminist rights, she seems really nice in person, spends time with her
family, and has some of the worst teeth in show biz.  But the strangest
part is that Annabel doesn't seem to be in it for the money.  In fact,
she still doesn't have the 10 grand for her "performance" in GANGBANG,
which she continually expresses nothing but nostalgia over, saying it
was a glorious "moment" she experienced between the men and herself.
     Annabel gets stranger from there.  One minute she's pounding her
chest about women's rights, the next she's a ball of gibberish.  The
more one listens to her, the less coherent she sounds... in fact, she
ends up being exactly what you'd expect a porn star to be like.
     Lewis doesn't play up much of this, instead preferring to dwell on
disease issues, an invented rivalry with Jasmin St. Clair (who broke
Annabel's record with 300 men a year later), the tired issue of "her
parents don't know!", and the minutiae of Annabel's twisted version of
feminism.  Little that she says makes sense, and most of the laughs in
the film are at her expense.  (Though wildly entertaining are her
detractors, who think her "experiment" has somehow cheapened the adult
industry.)
     While the stars of movies like THE GIRL NEXT DOOR are much
shallower, SEX blows every opportunity to get inside the twisted head of
its subject.  Then again, maybe there was nothing to see inside there in
the first place.  Oh well.
Director: Gough Lewis
Producer: Hugh F. Curry, David Whitten, Gough Lewis
Starring: Grace Quek / Annabel Chong, John Bowen, Ed Powers
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Judge Dredd (1995)
     You know from the first *second* what you're getting into with this
movie.  The opening to JUDGE DREDD, Sylvester Stallone's new sci-fi action
vehicle, is not a smash-bang action sequence, but rather a montage of
comic book covers from old the Judge Dredd series.  This comic book movie
intro is getting popular (the third time I've seen something like it this
year), and it's getting really, really old.
     After the comics are laid out, we have a screenfull of text,
explaining the mind-numbingly unoriginal premise of JUDGE DREDD, which is
this:  in the future, the world sucks.  At first I didn't know why there
was a voice-over attached to this text, but then I realized that most of
the audience of the film probably couldn't read.
     In this happy land, Sly is a genetically-enhanced "Judge," a
super-cop who dispenses judgments to criminals on the spot of their
crimes.  When his psychotic, also-enhanced brother (Rico, played by Armand
Assante) returns from prison to get his revenge on Dredd by framing him,
Sly finds himself on the run in an attempt to save himself and the world
from Rico.
     Yawn.  Full of crappy digital effects, JUDGE DREDD looks like a bad
B-movie from Roger Corman.  Armand Assante is pathetic as the giggling
villain who is supposed to be Sly's *brother*--I mean, Armand Assante, the
guy who danced in red heels in FATAL INSTINCT?  Yeah, right.  Basically,
Assante grimaces his way through 91 long minutes of this schlock so we can
get to the inevitable showdown.
     JUDGE DREDD does clear up one minor mystery for me.  It answers the
riddle, "How many times can one film use the plot device, 'Someone sneaks
up behind someone else.'"  The answer:  about 20.
     Everything about the movie is just ridiculous.  The ultra-high tech
cops don't seem to notice Rico and his 8-foot tall robot traipsing around
the city.  And of course, the only way to fix a flying motorcycle is to
beat it with one's fist.
     Dialogue saves DREDD from one-star hell.  Sly's got a few good
one-liners, and Rob Schneider is often funny as the comic relief
sidekick.  Fellow Judge Diane Lane also seems to be able to act.  But
that's about it.

Title
Review for Pitch Black (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Max Messier.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/e2e728050216b2b508256889000b77b2?OpenDocument
Mama, could you leave the hall light on tonight?
One thing I love to see in a film is definition of character without the
need for a windy, Oscar speech or the death of a loved one that prompts
an "emotional release."  The only genre that gives you that type of
character is the Western.  The Western is littered with good men with
bad hearts and bad men who struggle for a clean conscious.  The words of
these men carry a heavy emotional burden and clearly define and expose
the true nature of the person.  Pitch Black is one of the best films I
have seen in a very long time, and it carves its roots from the essence
of a Western, providing amazing clarity with a direct narrative prose.
>From the moment the lights dim, the audience is thrown into an emotional
situation where innocent people go to `meet their maker' and survival is
their first instinct.  In those first moments, Pitch Black wraps its
hands around your neck and never lets go.  To wit: A passenger spaceship
carrying 40 people hits some type of space debris and crash lands on a
barren, desert plant with only 7 people walking away.  The survivors
include a convicted murder with infrared lenses for eyes, a marshal with
a hidden agenda, a selfish pilot focused on saving her own ass, a
religious leader with three followers, and various odds and ends of
characters.  The three suns shine brightly on the planet's surface, and
the hodgepodge of survivors form a loose collation to survive.  The only
problem is that something is hiding in the shadows, waiting for them in
the dark.
This simple plot lets the script take shape and lets the characters
develop and define their own prerogatives.  With amazing cinematography
that resembles the work of the David O. Russell film Three Kings,
director David Twohy gives the planet a barren, washed-out look, and all
of the interiors of the wrecked ship a cool metallic tinge.  One of main
elements that gives the film such a film grip on the senses in the
presence of Vin Diesel, currently seen in the new film Boiler Room and
from last year's Saving Private Ryan.  His cool, somewhat haunting prose
littered with poignant words reminds you of the gunslinger who has
killed one too many people and has lost touch with the human race: A man
of honor who provides the main catalyst for defining his fellow
characters' personal attributes and motivations.
By underexposing the terror that lies in wait for the survivors, the
feelings of suspense and claustrophobia are astonishing.  What lies
beyond the circle of light?  What lies beyond the light bears a strong
resemblance to the aliens designed by Geiger and the movements of the
creatures mimic those of the raptors of Jurassic Park.  But Twohy lets
us also `see' through the eyes of the aliens and take part in the hunt
for food.  (The concept was first employed in the Schwartzenegger
vehicle from the eighties, Predator.)
The most attractive element of Pitch Black is how beautiful the
cinematography is, while developing a real sense of an alien world.  You
can almost feel the heat from the ground and the dizziness of the
humidity in the air.  The mish-mash of B-actors pull together some
terrific acting, and no loose ends of the storyline are left hanging in
the lurch.  It's pretty amazing when you realize this script came from
the guys that wrote the riveting drama, The Birds II: Land's End.
For the ride of your life (or at least just two hours of mayhem), Pitch
Black will leave you with the sudden urgency to leave the hall light on
when you climb into bed that night.  But it's a lot scarier to not know
what's in the dark, waiting for you to turn the corner.  Wes Craven and
John Carpenter taught us that a long time ago.
Director: David Twohy
Producer: Tom Engelman, Ted Field, Scott Kroopf
Writer: Jim and Ken Wheat, David Twohy
Starring: Vin Diesel, Radha Mitchell, Cole Hauser, Keith David
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for 'Til There Was You (1997)
     A cute idea with questionable delivery, 'TIL THERE WAS YOU is a
romantic comedy for the very patient among us.  Clocking in at almost
two hours, my biggest complaint is the desperate need for some
cut-cut-cutting -- editing which would have made the film a much more
enjoyable experience.  It's a cute idea:  Gwen (Jeanne Tripplehorn) and
Nick (Dylan McDermott) are meant for each other, but they never seem to
cross paths.  Also in the picture is Francesca (Sarah Jessica Parker), a
now-grown-up child actress who ends up being the catalyst that
inevitably brings the couple together.  Written by "My So-Called Life"
scribe Winnie Holzman, the story is absolutely dripping in the expected
melodramatics and sentimentality -- but that's not necessarily bad. 
It's just that when you combine the film's tedious length with
questionable casting decisions (Parker disappoints, & Jennifer Aniston
plays a surgeon(!?)) you get a fine mess that eventually redeems
itself... just not all the way.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Ground Control to Major Bob  The Bob Zmuda Interview
By Christopher Null
`Andy Kaufman asked me on his deathbed to do two things,' says Bob
Zmuda.  `One was to write a book about him, the other was to produce a
movie about him.  He was scared of being remembered as Latka on Taxi.
That scared him worse than death.'
So Zmuda wrote the book (Andy Kaufman Revealed! Best Friend Tells All).
Now prepare for Andy Kaufman: The Movie, also known as Man on the Moon,
which opens December 22.
So who is Bob Zmuda?  When you see the film, you'll understand.  He was
Andy Kaufman's best friend and writing partner (played expertly by Paul
Giamatti in the film).  He was Employee #2 in a quiet partnership that
got its jollies from playing tricks on an unsuspecting public.  He was
Tony Clifton (q.v.) from time to time.  And after Kaufman's death, he
was the creator of the Comic Relief specials, which have raised millions
of dollars for the homeless.
On a recent press tour in San Francisco, Zmuda talked about the film,
the book, and how Jim Carrey just about lost it trying to get inside the
head of the most eccentric comedian the world has ever known.
Zmuda says, `Jim said he would never again approach a role like this.
Jim Carrey is the biggest Andy Kaufman freak in the world.  If he wasn't
Jim Carrey, he could travel the country lecturing on Kaufmanism.  He
fought to get this role.  He was born to play this role.'
Zmuda continues, discussing Carrey's preparation to play Andy Kaufman.
`Jim said, How would Andy Kaufman approach this role?' Jim approached
the role just as Andy would have.  We shot for 85 days.  Jim was only
there for 2.  The rest of the time he was Andy or Tony.'
Who's Tony?  As the film explains, Tony Clifton was the anti-Andy.
Kaufman, a die-hard Transcendental Meditation guru, health food nut, and
all-around purist, had a dark side.  That dark side was Tony Clifton, a
rotten Vegas lounge singer that looked nothing like Kaufman and fooled
people for years.  Clifton would smoke, drink, and whore with the best
of them, and that was just the beginning of the ruse.  The only problem,
of course, is that the guy didn't really exist.  Says Zmuda, `Andy's
contract with Paramount said that Tony Clifton had to have a parking
space next to Kaufman's with his name on it, and he had to have his own
dressing room.'
As it turns out, Tony was quite the character, and the personality had a
serious affect on Carrey, too.  `One day we were shooting half Tony
Clifton, half Andy.  Next thing we knew, Andy showed up on the set with
a bloody nose, saying he had passed Tony Clifton and Tony punched him
out.  I don't know if it was real blood, but a real medic was brought
in.'
It's hard to imagine anyone but Carrey in this role, but there was a
time when Carrey didn't have it locked down.  `Everyone wanted to play
Kaufman.  I was not a believer in the beginning.  I thought Nicolas Cage
looked more like Andy Kaufman.  This was even before The Truman Show.
Carrey calls me one day and says, Bob, will you come over and see my
audition tape for Milos [Forman, the director]?  I said sure, thinking
this is gonna suck eggs.  The tape's not on a minute, and I'm crying
like a baby.  It was remarkable.  He had the role.  There was just
something about him.'
And what about the name of the film, Man on the Moon, which is taken
from the R.E.M. song of the same name?  I had heard rumors that one of
Kaufman's hoaxes was that he thought the moon landing had been faked,
but apparently that's not so.  Zmuda explains the name, `R.E.M. were
saddened when Andy died.  But that whole thing, Is there a man on the
moon?' means is there a card up my sleeve?'  Nothing more, apparently.
Still, Zmuda says, `The hoax and the practical joke are lost art
forms.'  But did Andy Kaufman pull one last stunt on his deathbed at age
35?  No, says Zmuda.  `Andy Kaufman is dead.  He's not in some truck
stop with Elvis.'  While Kaufman tinkered with the idea, tells Zmuda, he
never brought it up again.  `The only thing that is odd is page 112 of
The Tony Clifton Story, a screenplay that Andy and I wrote, that was
never made.  On page 112, Tony dies of lung cancer at Cedars-Sinai
Hospital.  Andy Kaufman would die of lung cancer at Cedars-Sinai eight
years later.  Pretty odd stuff.'
But Zmuda does admit, `Had Andy Kaufman lived, he would have faked his
death.'
And what of that grand last scene, which hints at Kaufman's return?
Zmuda describes an encounter with a woman who was begging to know.
`'What does it mean? What does it mean?' Look, it's the monolith in
2001.  It's just there.  We don't know.  And if you have to ask, you
really don't get it.'
We got it, Bob.
---
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Check out the G-Rex Personal Shopper at http://www.g-rex.com

Title
Review for Un air de famille (1996)
There are exactly three moments in this movie that are really worth
watching, and one of them comes when a fashionable woman's choker is
mistaken for a dog collar (an obvious joke I know, but always funny). 
The other two moments are the only two times that this relentless work
of realism even begins to approach optimism.  
UN AIR DE FAMILLE, or "Family Resemblances" by its English title, is
your typical under-drama from the French cinema.  It is a single setting
observation of the interactions of an estranged family at the weekly
family dinner, when tensions begin to run high.  I would mention the
performances here, but they all kind of run into one melancholy melange,
ultimately resulting in very striking resemblances between the
characters, at least insofar as my opinion of them.
Getting back to my opening point, the basic problem with this movie is
that it is quite simply depressing.  And isn't life too short to be
getting so depressed all the time.  Maybe some people can view this type
of film as an instructional feature helping us realize what not to do
with our lives.  Or maybe some get a kick out of realizing that their
lives aren't THAT bad.  Or maybe some really have lives as bad as these
and use the experience to feel like they're not alone.  In my opinion
though, the point of realist cinema is to display the apparently mundane
and find something magical in it, which UN AIR DE FAMILLE does only
twice.  Once, about two-thirds of the way through the film, when one of
the characters, Yoyo, celebrating her birthday is swept off her feet on
the dance floor.  And the second time, in the last scene of the movie
when it is revealed that not every event of the evening was a wash, and
something good may come.
But in the end, it is too little, too late.  You can talk about the
well-written script, the nuances, etc.  But if we want to analyze the
average family, we can go home for the holidays.  The real power of
realist drama comes out when it shows us how something extraordinary can
blossom from the ordinary.  UN AIR DE FAMILLE hints at this magic in its
last three minutes, but the first 100 were a pain to sit through for the
small payoff.
Director: Cedric Klapisch
Producer: Charles Gassot
Writer: Agnes Jaoui, Jean-Pierre Bacri, and Cedric Klapisch
Starring: Jean-Pierre Bacri, Agnes Jaoui, Jean-Pierre Darroussin,
Catherine Frot
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - Writer and Script Consultant
Check out The Movie Emporium's new design at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Bridget Jones's Diary (2001)
I'm used to the e-mail: You're not a cheerleader so you shouldn't review
Bring It On!  Or If you don't like boring movies about Iraqi Kurds you
shouldn't review A Time for Drunken Horses!  Or If you've never heard of
Reynaldo Arenas you shouldn't review a movie about his life (Before
Night Falls)!
Sorry, folks, I don't buy it.  Do I need to be shot into space to review
Apollo 13?  A movie should stand on its own whether you're familiar with
the subject, whether you're fond of the topic in question, or whether
you're a member of the demographic that the film is about or is targeted
at.  If it especially appeals to a certain group (and what film
doesn't?), well, good for you.  But I'm going to review whatever I want
-- and if you don't want to hear what a white guy in his late 20's has
to say about cinema, well, that's just to bad.
So with that lengthy disclaimer understand that this review of the
celebrated adaptation of the novel Bridget Jones's Diary is written by a
non-British man who's never read the book.  Deal with it.  You'll also
have to forgive me for not writing this review in the "v. Bridget's
diary" style that I guarantee every other one you read will be written
in....
The story of Bridget Jones's Diary tracks our title character during the
32nd year of her life, one dominated by menial work, too much
drinking/smoking/eating, and most notably, the lack of a meaningful
relationship.  Renée Zellweger has clearly and bravely gained the 20
requisite pounds to play the chubby-cheeked Bridget, who repeated
resolves to get her life in order -- and pretty much mucks it up
miserably every time.
Central to her woes are her rakish boss Daniel Cleaver (Hugh Grant) and
her childhood friend Mark Darcy (Colin Firth).  Oddly, while Bridget
professes romantic woes, she soon finds herself with the two men to
choose from.  Hence the dilemma, and hence the need for a diary.
Hugh Grant's role as her scoundrel of a boss is quite delicious, showing
us some of his inner rogue that was responsible for memorably getting he
and Divine Brown together a few years back.  The humorless Firth,
however, is another matter.  Meant to be a rather stiff antithesis to
Cleaver's carefree loony, he comes off as unlovable and never makes a
case for why Bridget would genuinely be interested in him.  Students of
Hollywood won't find much surprise in the resolution, though, no matter
how thick the accents used to mask the movie's origin.
Fortunately, Bridget Jones is elicits a frequent giggle as it sets up
jokes and invariably pays them off, relying on Zellweger to deliver a
bravely out-there comedic performance, the talent for which she must
have picked up during her time as Jim Carrey's squeeze.  She shows up as
the only one in a hooker costume at a "tarts and vicars" party.  She
runs through a snowstorm in leopard-print panties.  Nice.  Zellweger
isn't afraid to show us her (expanded) skin, and she deserves credit for
it.  So much so, that I'll go out on a limb here and predict she'll win
at least one People's Choice Award next year!
But Bridget Jones isn't Annie Hall.  She's an archetype for modern
singles, sure, but her predicament is somewhat inaccessible while it
strives to be universal.  Her goofy antics are hilarious slapstick, and
I figure that's all the producers ever intended.  And that's fine with
me.  Even though I didn't read the book, it just goes to show that even
a v. married Yank can enjoy a little something silly about a troubled,
single British gal.
Director: Sharon Maguire
Producer: Tim Bevan, Jonathan Cavendish, Eric Fellner
Writer: Richard Curtis, Andrew Davies, Helen Fielding
Starring: Renée Zellweger, Colin Firth, Hugh Grant
http://entertainment.msn.com/bridget/default.asp
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
At last, someone remembered how to make a good summer movie!
With a clever, funny script and dead-on acting by title characters Will
Smith and Tommy Lee Jones at the heart of this hot weather gem, MIB gets
it all just about right, succeeding at crossing the sci-fi and comedy
genres where recent experiments like MARS ATTACKS! crashed and burned. 
Linda Fiorentino, almost unbilled in a great supporting role, also lends
a fun sexiness to the film -- a picture in which the leads seem
perfectly crafted for its stars.
While the plotline about chasing an interstellar bug around New York is
a little spare (clocking in at around 90 minutes) and devoid of much
sub-plot, it's so damn funny that you'll practically forget about all of
that... another trick that recent offerings haven't pulled off.  Also,
make sure you stay to the end, wherein a surprisingly humble look at
life is revealed... especially when you consider that this came from
Hollywood.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
     What is THE NINTH GATE?  Judging from the cryptic marketing
campaign, you might be likely to dismiss it as another ridiculous action
movie, with big fireballs and car chase scenes.  Or worse, maybe you'll
shun it as a metaphysical adventure -- yet another END OF DAYS.
     Fortunately, THE NINTH GATE is neither of these.  In actuality,
it's a mystery with Johnny Depp as the unlikely hero, Frank Langella as
the perfectly-cast antagonist, and Lena Olin and Emmanuelle Seigner as
the femmes fatale.  Under the direction of Roman Polanski, you can rest
assured that these characters get mixed up quite a bit en route through
a serpentine plot that is far more interesting than its subject matter
would imply: The search for a couple of rare books.
     As Polanski's first movie since 1994's DEATH AND THE MAIDEN, the
auteur has a lot to make up for in lost time.  Apparently striking into
more commercial territory, THE NINTH GATE offers Depp as a
chain-smoking, rare-book-finding mercenary.  Employed by Langella's
publishing magnate, he is tasked with hunting down the two additional
copies of "The Nine Gates," a book also owned by Langella's character
and which he wishes to authenticate.
     Mystery ensues, largely owing to the subject matter of "The Nine
Gates," which is purported to be a manual for summoning the devil.  Now
if only a couple of these books weren't forgeries....
     An awful lot of THE NINTH GATE (based on the book "The club Dumas")
is better than you'd expect, but a lot of its potential is wasted on
repetitious scenes and a meandering storyline (the film runs about 2 1/4
hours).  The fistfight scenes are weak, the car chases dull.  The ending
is particularly annoying, essentially leaving the interpretation up to
the audience (and thus making it unable for loudmouth critics to spoil).
     However, Depp and Langella are fantastic, playing off one another
with demonic flair.  Imagine Depp's SLEEPY HOLLOW character with a
personality and you've got him spot-on.  Seigner (aka Mrs. Roman
Polanski), whom you might recognize from Polanski's BITTER MOON and
FRANTIC, is starting to lose her credibility as a sex goddess, I will
note.
     Still, despite a little snickering in the audience, Polanski still
pulls enough tricks out of his sleeve to recommend this film.  It
certainly isn't CHINATOWN, but it does carry a punch.
Director: Roman Polanski
Producer: Roman Polanski
Writer: John Brownjohn, Roman Polanski, Enrique Urbizu
Starring: Johnny Depp, Frank Langella, Lena Olin, Emmanuelle Seigner,
Barbara Jefford
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
I remember sitting in a movie theater at the tender age of 14, watching
a little film called D.A.R.Y.L., about a boy with a computer brain
trying to cope with modern society and questions of emotion and
identity.  D.A.R.Y.L. was not some overblown, 2 1/2-hour ordeal.  It was
99 breezy minutes of fun fun fun!
A.I. Artificial Intelligence is, too my deep dismay, neither breezy nor
particularly fun.  The level of anticipation of the film, of course,
would be impossible to effectively sate, but A.I. just doesn't cut it. 
It doesn't even come close.
The mystery-enshrouded story is told obliquely, in fleeting glances of
half-explained scenes.  Presumably we are meant to absorb the rich, rich
atmosphere of the film, and for a long while, this works.  But as a
result, much of A.I. is cryptic at best, so you'll have to forgive any
wandering plot descriptions.
In the future, the icecaps have melted, population controls are rampant,
and of course people turn to machines for love.  A.I. is the story of a
boy named David (Haley Joel Osment), not a real boy, of course, but an
artificially intelligent robot who has been programmed to love -- the
first of his kind.  "Mecha" robots coexist with "Orga" humans in a
crowded dystopia, so when Henry Swinton (Sam Robards) brings the first
David model home to his wife Monica (Frances O'Connor), who is grieving
over a mysteriously ill son, she freaks out but eventually develops a
guarded affection for David.  When the son in question returns to them
(equally unexplained), things come to a head, and the robot boy finds
himself a bit of an outcast, a machine that loves people but is not
loved in return.
Without giving away too many plot points, suffice it to say that David
ends up on an adventure throughout the greater New Jersey area,
encountering such characters as the megalomaniacal Gigolo Joe (Jude
Law), a "love robot" with all the attendant baggage, and Professor Hobby
(William Hurt), David's creator and a scientist with a bad God complex.
As David wanders from the safety of home to the wilds of the big city
and eventually, an underwater Manhattan, his journey is inspired by that
of the original robot boy, Pinocchio.  But Pinocchio is more than an
inspiration for the film, it quickly becomes the entire plot, as David
searches for the story's "blue fairy" to turn him into a real boy.  His
robotic teddy bear is a latter-day Jiminy Cricket.  He encounters
villains and even a theme park, much like our animated hero.
Sadly, this becomes an enormous crutch for Spielberg, as the search for
the blue fairy saves him from having to write a real movie.  Spielberg
earnestly apes Kubrick to a fault (he even credits the film to him in
part, a dubious honor I doubt the late genius would have appreciated). 
A Clockwork Orange and, of course, 2001 are strong influences,
particularly in set design.  Later in the picture, Blade Runner is an
obvious reference point.  By the end, Spielberg is ripping off his own
E.T. and Close Encounters, and the jumble of stolen plots, sets, and
characters becomes so daunting the film degenerates into utter nonsense.
The Kubrick connection is worth a little extra ink, because A.I., we
should all remember, is Spielberg's resurrection of a film that Kubrick
had essentially abandoned years ago.  Why he didn't make it we'll never
know, but if the scraps of story Spielberg has woven together in this
movie are any indication of where he was headed, Kubrick was wise to
drop the thing.  As for Spielberg, the sole writer credited for the
film, it is also worth noting that he hasn't even worked on a movie
screenplay since collaborating on The Goonies in 1985.
I don't want to knock A.I. down completely.  Law is a fantastic
supporting player, giving A.I. the levity it needs during Act 2.  The
effects are groundbreaking and phenomenal, and while the science of A.I.
is dubious, its dystopic future is believable and spooky.
But it's the three mini-movies within A.I. that make it so hard to sit
through.  The first (David at home) is excellent.  The second (David in
the big city) is fair.  The third (David's quest for infinity and
beyond) is unwatchable.  By the end, the audience is practically being
spat upon with nonsensical, 2001-wannabe metaphysics and general
weirdness that goes on and on without end.  For what it's worth, the
entire movie evoked laughter and snickering from the audience, but only
the last act brought out the real hecklers.
Mr. Spielberg, your love is real.  Your movie, sadly, is not.
Director: Steven Spielberg
Producer: Bonnie Curtis, Kathleen Kennedy, Steven Spielberg
Writer: Steven Spielberg
Starring: Haley Joel Osment, Jude Law, Frances O'Connor, Sam Robards,
Jake Thomas, Brendan Gleeson, Daveigh Chase, William Hurt, Jack Angel
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
     REINDEER GAMES is one of those movies that thinks so much of itself
it sports a special cover sheet over the press notes, reading, "REINDEER
GAMES is filled with twists and turns that we hope will keep the
audience guessing," followed by a plea that critics will not spoil the
fun by divulging these twists and turns to the gentle readers.
     Set on a cold Christmas Eve in Michigan, REINDEER GAMES borrows
heavily from its northern brethren FARGO and A SIMPLE PLAN, leaving the
best elements of both those films on the cutting room floor.  Writer
Ehren Kruger (ARLINGTON ROAD, SCREAM 3) has tried his darnedest to
create a formula heist movie that breaks from the formula.
Unfortunately he has given us something barely worthy of Arnold
Schwarzenegger.
     The plot starts off with promise: Rudy (Ben Affleck) and his
cellmate Nick (James Frain) are set to get out of prison in 3 days, but
the day before release, Nick gets killed (oh no!).  Rudy takes one look
at Nick's pen-pal Ashley (Charlize Theron) and decides, what the hell,
he'll impersonate his best jail-friend to get a little nookie.  But Rudy
quickly gets drawn into a casino-robbery scheme by Ashley's evil brother
Gabriel (Gary Sinise), and then the twists begin.
     Of course, by that time a long and lonely hour has passed.  The
first half of REINDEER GAMES just sits there, spiked with droll
voice-over setting up the notion that Ben Affleck just might be the next
big action hero.  (He's not.)  While Kruger and all-star director John
Frankenheimer try to imbue REINDEER GAMES with that FARGO mystique, they
mainly end up relying on Theron's bared breasts to captivate the
audience.  Mind you, movies have been carried on less before, but the
ho-hum thrills and coincidental mystery of these GAMES will likely leave
you shrugging with indifference on the way out the door.
     How could a two-inch shiv kill Nick?  Why would anyone believe Rudy
is Nick?  Why does Gary Sinise look like he did in FORREST GUMP?
Whether you bother to worry about the details is up to you.
Director: John Frankenheimer
Producer: Marty Katz, Bob Weinstein, Chris Moore
Writer: Ehren Kruger
Starring: Ben Affleck, Gary Sinise, Charlize Theron, Dennis Farina,
James Frain, Donal Logue, Clarence Williams III
http://www.reindeergames-themovie.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
     It truly is the oldest joke in the book: "A priest and a rabbi walk
into a bar..."  Okay, so you've heard this one.  Well now you can watch
the movie of the joke!
     Keeping the Faith may not be quite that bad, but it's nothing to,
ahem, preach about.  Setting the film up with all the trappings of your
classic, neurotic, New York relationship comedy, Faith wants to be a wry
When Harry Met Sally tale of opposites attracting and love conquering
all.  Oh, the opposites aren't the rabbi Jake (Ben Stiller) and the
priest Brian (Ed Norton) -- that might actually be a movie worth
watching.  The kink in this picture is Jenna Elfman's Anna, the old
childhood friend of Jake of Brian, who swishes into town and promptly
falls in love with our rabbi.
     While Keeping the Faith has some genuinely funny moments, you've
probably seen them all in the trailer.  The rest of the jokes often
involve someone falling down or otherwise injuring themselves.  The
exception to this rule is Ken Leung's bit part as a crooning karaoke
machine salesman (don't ask), who steals the show from the rest of the
players.
     Not that it's tough: what a dismal job these guys do with their
parts!  After proving herself to be genuinely dippy in bombs like
Krippendorf's Tribe and EdTV, Jenna "Dharma" Elfman as a high-test
corporate consultant stretches the boundaries of reality to the breaking
point.  Stiller is all right but uninspired, and Ed Norton seems like he
has cotton in his mouth for half the film, he mumbles his lines so
badly.
     Normally I'd blame the director for something like this, only... Ed
Norton is the director.  And judging by this, his debut performance
behind the camera, I think it's safe to say the phrase, "And the Oscar
for Best Director goes to Edward Norton!" is something we shall never,
ever hear.
     Thanks to a sappy script that runs more than two hours (and this is
a comedy!) and features a stroke, an ostracized son, and a
near-excommunication, Keeping the Faith is a clear example of a huge
collection of bad choices being paraded on the screen, one after
another.  But the worst sin of the film is its interminable blathering,
with characters droning on and on with no point, so much so that I just
stopped paying attention altogether.
Director: Edward Norton
Producer: Stuart Blumberg, Hawk Koch, Edward Norton
Writer: Stuart Blumberg
Starring: Ben Stiller, Edward Norton, Jenna Elfman, Anne Bancroft, Eli
Wallach, Ron Rifkin, Milos Forman
http://studio.go.com/movies/keepingthefaith/index.html
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
     Another week in '99, another horror film.  But will THE SIXTH SENSE
really scare you?  Despite the title that is more reminiscent of
LEPRECHAUN than THE EXORCIST, this is a genuinely creepy film with a
solid story, great acting, and a surprise ending that not even a jaded
critic like me saw coming.
     The concept is that young Cole Sear (Osment) sees ghosts, and they
torment him night and day, to the point of physical abuse.  Desperate
for help, he eventually hooks up with brilliant child psychologist
Malcolm Crowe (Willis), who tries to help him out.
     Meanwhile, Cole's mom (Collette) and Malcolm's wife Anna (Williams)
have problems of their own relating to the men in their lives.  While
these subplots are a bit sketchy at first, they do serve a purpose,
coming full circle by the end of the picture.
     Writer/director Shyamalan has a few credits under his belt (nothing
I've ever seen, though), but his skill at combining the supernatural
with the everyday here is pretty well-done, and is largely without
intense special effects.  As for acting, Willis actually does a credible
job with his part, for the first time since 12 MONKEYS (1995).
     Osment -- previously seen as Forrest Gump Jr. in FORREST GUMP, as
the kid in the underrated BOGUS, and as Murphy Brown's son -- is stellar
in his role.  Although he over-enunciates to an extreme, he's an
excellent actor, and I hope that will carry over to his adult roles
later in life.
     THE SIXTH SENSE is still a horror/thriller at its heart, so don't
expect it to win any great flood of awards.  But it's a solid film and
the work of a meticulous writer, which is a rare pleasure these days.
Director: M. Night Shyamalan
Producer: Frank Marshall, Kathleen Kennedy, Barry Mendel
Writer: M. Night Shyamalan
Starring: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia
Williams
http://movies.go.com/sixthsense/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Truth About Cats & Dogs, The (1996)
     What happens if you meet someone with whom you have almost everything
in common, you find yourself falling for them, but the sparks of romance
just don't seem to fly on a physical level?  Maybe you need an extra body,
and you can just play Cyrano in the background until that fateful moment
when everything is revealed with hilarious results.
     Such is the case in THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS, a pleasantly funny
romance that takes another twist on the Cyrano tale, by taking two very
different women (Janeane Garofalo and Uma Thurman) and pitching them at
one guy (English actor Ben Chaplin).
     In this version, Garofalo plays Abby Barnes, a veterinarian who hosts
the titular pet-oriented talk show.  When Brian (Chaplin) calls in about
his new dog's wacky antics, he is immediately smitten by Abby's voice. 
And when Abby describes herself, it isn't is a 5'1" brunette, but as
Abby's model neighbor Noelle (Thurman)--a 5'10" blonde.  A simple wig is
out of the question, so Abby opts to "use" Noelle's body as a surrogate,
wooing Brian on the phone while Noelle exhibits her physical charms. 
Meanwhile, Brian unwittingly falls for both of them.
     The sweetness factor of THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS is almost
unbearable--full of oohs and aahs, largely due to literal doses of humor
relating to the parade of animals that punctuates the film.  Audrey Wells'
debut script is also a mushy affair, but it works well enough, even though
it feels a lot longer than it really is (95 minutes).  In fact, everything
here would work a lot better if all the best jokes hadn't been beaten to
death in the rotten trailer for an otherwise pretty good movie.
     That aside, Michael Lehmann's direction (he also directed HEATHERS)
is fine for this story, but the real kudos go to Garofalo, who is one of
the funniest comedic actresses working today and proves it here, and,
surprisingly, to Chaplin, who bored me to tears in last year's period
drama FEAST OF JULY, but turns out to be great in the comic medium.
     I'm really pleased that the theme of romance transcending physical
beauty is being explored again, but the only problem is that Garofalo is
plenty cute in her own right, and in my opinion, can hold her own against
the supermodels any day.  But it's still great to see her get the guy.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Screenwriter-Producer  /  Novelist-Publisher
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and e-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
     Having seen young Anakin Skywalker in all those commercials, I was
curious to see how his pairing with Adam Sandler would pan out in this
revisionist STAR WARS called, strangely enough, BIG DADDY.
     We are first introduced to a young Obi-Wan Kenobi (Sandler), who
finds his life at a standstill, unable to progress to the next phase of
his Jedi training.  His wiser friend (and roommate) Qui-Gon Jinn (Jon
Stewart) leaves town for a land to the far east, stranding Obi-Wan with
nothing to do but live the life of a do-nothing.
     Obi-Wan is surprised by the arrival of young Anakin (twins Cole and
Dylan Sprouse), who gives the Jedi a real challenge, for which he finds
himself completely unprepared.  In this version, Skywalker is the lost
son of Qui-Gon, a turn which I don't think George Lucas will approve of.
     Obi-Wan undertakes the training of Anakin, teaching him the ways of
Jedi concentration (the ability to urinate in public), agility (pelting
him with baseballs), and etiquette (drooling to the ground and sucking
it back up).
     Only then is Anakin ready for the next step, helping Obi-Wan woo
Queen Amidala (Joey Lauren Adams), a wealthy and brilliant woman
seemingly out of Obi-Wan's reach.
     Also along for fun and comic relief is delivery guy Jar Jar Binks
(Rob Schneider), who, although completely created on a computer, looks
extremely realistic and lifelike (although you'll find his voice a bit
grating).  Two gay droids, R2-D2 (Peter Dante) and C-3PO (Jonathan
Loughran) also make for less serious moments.
     BIG DADDY takes a turn for the malevolent when social services
worker Darth Maul (Josh Mostel) threatens to take Anakin away from
Qui-Gon, and assumedly, place him in the hands of the dark side.  But a
dramatic confrontation in the Imperial Senate ensues, where the Jedis
successfully defend young Skywalker, and it's an appearance from elder
Jedi Master Yoda (Joe Bologna) who saves the day.
     Altogether, BIG DADDY is a fair entry into the Star Wars pantheon.
Although I was perplexed by some of the decisions of the filmmakers to
try to make this film into a comedy, I will be most intrigued to
discover how Anakin eventually turns into the malicious Darth Vader.
     Filmcritic.com has learned that this will be revealed in the film's
sequel: BIGGER DADDY.
Director: Dennis Dugan
Producer: Sid Ganis, Jack Giarraputo
Writer: Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy, Adam Sandler
Starring: Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart, Allen Covert,
Rob Schneider, Josh Mostel, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Leslie Mann
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Beyond Rangoon (1995)
     BEYOND RANGOON is absolutely typical of the way Hollywood can take a
compelling story, full of genuine characters and heartfelt emotion, then
hack it to tiny bits and put it back together, Frankenstein-like, into a
sappy, overwrought drama that is without a soul and without a point.
     The story is "based on actual events."  Patricia Arquette plays Laura,
an American doctor trying to find peace after the brutal murder of her
husband and son.  With her sister (Frances McDormand), they embark on a tour
of the exotic East, including a peaceful stopover in Burma, a war-torn
country ruled by military dictatorship (As they say, "In Burma, *everything*
is illegal.).  Laura's passport is lifted, and she finds herself trapped in
the capital city of Rangoon, while her sister and their tour group head off
to Bangkok.  The Burmese pick that time to revolt, and Laura finds herself
caught up in a civil war, which basically amounts to dodging bullets in the
jungle while covered in mud.
     Laura may have a medical degree, but she's also got the common sense of
a stick.  Any sensible person would have avoided this situation altogether.
When she can't sleep...she heads down to check out how the local
revolutionary rally is going, violating curfew.  When she loses her passport
and martial law is declared...she decides to leave Rangoon and sightsee in
the country--to hell with the law!  When her tour guide (U Aung Ko) doubts
they can get back to the city in time...she responds, "Let's risk it!"  In
the end, she gets what she deserves.  After all, she went to *Burma* didn't
she?
     It's hard to feel sorry for someone that acts so stupid, so often.  And
despite the constant threat of capture by the enemy, BEYOND RANGOON is
actually pretty boring.  Director John Boorman is much more concerned with
Laura's brooding over her dead son than with anything else.  Of course, this
is all part of the film's master plan: Toy with the viewers' emotions to the
point that they can't feel anything but horror when seeing the terrible
crimes of the Burmese.  If Laura wasn't such an idiot, that might have
worked.
     Another disappointment is the wholesale ripping off of THE KILLING
FIELDS, the Academy Award-winning film about a Cambodian refugee trying to
escape the Khmer Rouge during the Vietnam War.  THE KILLING FIELDS is one of
the best "on the run" pictures ever made, and BEYOND RANGOON borrows heavily
from it, even to the extent of casting Spalding Gray in a minor role.
Unfortunately, BEYOND RANGOON borrows bits and pieces, and can't replicate
the film's spirit.
     BEYOND RANGOON gets some points for at least having a noble premise,
which is a pleasant change from typical Hollywood fare.  U Aung Ko's tour
guide/revolutionary is very engaging, too, and almost makes the picture
worthwhile.  One thing still bugs me, though, and it's got nothing to do
with the sappy plot and hokey ending.  I keep wondering, just how much
numbingly repetitious, fluty woodwind music can one person stand, and where
was Zanfir hiding during the takes?
-Christopher Null / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
     Sooner or later, every director makes his SHORT CUTS.
     Paul Thomas Anderson (BOOGIE NIGHTS) only waiting until his third
film to make his, an over-three-hour epic with at least 10 major
characters in almost as many separate story lines.  And thanks to those
characters, every one a rich mystery burning with secrets, MAGNOLIA is a
smashing success.
     MAGNOLIA has one of the greatest openings I've ever seen in a
film.  Narrated by Ricky Jay, who also has a small role in the movie, we
are led through a few short examples of strange coincidence, allegedly
real events from the past.  Whether or not they are true (one involves
the old story of a boy who attempts suicide by jumping from his roof,
only to be shot in the stomach by accident on the way down, thus being
murdered), they set the tone for the far more bizarre events to come.
     And again, it's those characters that drive MAGNOLIA along.  There
are far too many players to list, but the highlights include Julianne
Moore as the unhinged and much-younger bride of a dying older man.
William H. Macy as a once-famous 1960's quiz show star, now an
unemployable loser.  Tom Cruise as Frank "T.J." Mackey, an over-the-top
guru of female seduction.  And my favorite, John C. Reilly as a bumbling
and lovelorn LAPD officer looking for a meaningful relationship -- on
the job.  How these characters all come together is what makes MAGNOLIA
so much fun.
     It's unfortunate that the sheer, ass-numbing length of MAGNOLIA
tends to drag it down at times.  Most annoying is the fact that Anderson
gives virtually every character a long, drawn-out soliloquy to speak.
Invariably these are lost on an audience more interested in keeping the
plot moving.  There's even an inexplicable moment toward the end of the
movie when all the characters sing along to a song on the radio
together, although none of them are in the same place.  As an old friend
of mine would say, "What's up with THAT!?"
     And of course, as with any three-hour movie, maintaining a solid
theme from beginning to end is tough.  MAGNOLIA rolls its opening
credits to the tune of "One Is the Loneliest Number" and begins as a
study of exactly that.  By the end, it's become a movie about redemption
and forgiveness, a trend that PULP FICTION launched and has since been
done to death in countless films.
     And that's too bad, because otherwise MAGNOLIA is a world-class
film that would have been a shoo-in for the best of the year.
Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
Producer: Joanne Sellar
Writer: Paul Thomas Anderson
Starring: William H. Macy, Julianne Moore, Jim Beaver, Jeremy Blackman,
Michael Bowen, Tom Cruise, Melinda Dillon, Philip Baker Hall, Philip
Seymour Hoffman, Felicity Huffman, Brad Hunt, Ricky Jay, Emmanuel
Johnson, John C. Reilly, Jason Robards, Melora Walters
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
     Nope, it's not SHORT CUTS.  It's not THE PLAYER.  It was THE
GINGERBREAD MAN.  Before that it was KANSAS CITY.  And before that,
READY TO WEAR.  It's been six years since Altman's last decent picture.
And he's got a lot to redeem himself for.
     COOKIE'S FORTUNE goes a long way toward reminding us why we ever
cared about Altman in the first place.  Wryly funny, COOKIE is a black
comedy about an ancient woman, nicknamed Cookie (Neal), who decides to
off herself.  When sister Camille (Close) discovers the body, she opts
to cover up the suicide, making it look like a robbery of Cookie's
precious necklace gone awry.  And a web of sometimes-funny and
always-silly deceit and duplicity ensues.
     As an "Altman picture," COOKIE is well outside the lines of his
classic oeuvre, sticking to a fairly traditional structure, albeit with
a few non-sequiturs (the staging of the play "Salome," namely) that
serve mainly to run the clock while the action is going on.
     Done wrong, COOKIE could have been as bad a film as something like
GREEDY (greedy heirs fight over will of dying man).  Done right, it
could have been a reinvention of PULP FICTION.  COOKIE'S FORTUNE is
neither, of course, but it's happily closer to the latter than the
former.
     Kudos to Charles Dutton, who takes his role as Cookie's closest
friend to excellent heights.  Julianne Moore is, of course, underused, but
even Liv Tyler failed to annoy me the way she normally does.
Director: Robert Altman
Producer: Robert Altman
Writer: Anne Rapp
Starring: Glenn Close, Julianne Moore, Liv Tyler, Chris O'Donnell,
Charles Dutton, Patricia Neal, Ned Beatty, Courtney B. Vance
http://www.octoberfilms.com/cookiesfortune/index.html
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Evening Star, The (1996)
     What could be more foul than having your ashes spread over the
beach of the horribly polluted Gulf of Mexico?  Well, maybe having to
sit through THE EVENING STAR, the long-awaited tearjerky sequel to TERMS
OF ENDEARMENT.
     THE EVENING STAR picks up in 1988, and follows 8 more years of the
further adventures of Aurora Greenwood's (Shirley MacLaine)
uber-dysfunctional extended family.  Now, Emma's (Debra Winger in TERMS)
kids have grown up under Aurora's eye, and the jury's still out on how
well she did.  Their Aunt Patsy (Miranda Richardson) is now a wealthy
divorcee who is constantly one-upping Aurora.  The caustic Aurora finds
brief happiness in the arms of a younger man (Bill Paxton).  Rosie
(Marion Ross) is still in Aurora's kitchen, and a whole horde of minor
players weave in and out of the action, mainly serving to dredge up the
past and to breathe some new life into the ENDEARMENT franchise.
     THE EVENING STAR is so chock full of mystery illnesses & deaths,
Oedipal complexes, prison terms, illegitimate children, and other
staples of daytime TV that you'd think it would make a much better movie
than it does.  Instead, the film comes off as a pointless rehashing of
old story lines, part soap opera (see above illnesses, etc.) and part
sitcom (sample wacky dialogue: "How are we gonna get Aurora Greenwood to
see a shrink!?").
     ...and *all* cheese.  By killing off the entire senior citizen
population of Houston (where the film is set and was shot in), the
filmmakers go straight for the tear ducts, in the hopes that you'll be
crying too much to notice that this movie has no plot whatsoever.  When
someone's not gasping last words, the film is just a series of movie
cliches, one after another.  Why bother?
     While there are a few bright sparks in the film, notably the
fantastically over-the-top Richardson and the curmudgeony Ross, plus
some decent jokes here and there, overall the movie is a meandering tale
that, in the end, just reminds me even more of why I hate Houston so
much.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
     A progressive nun living in the confines of rural Louisiana, and a
racist convicted murderer, waiting on death row.  The cast of next year's
hottest new sitcom?  No!  They're the leads of DEAD MAN WALKING, a somber
"inspired by true events" docudrama wherein the nun, Sister Helen Prejean
(Susan Sarandon), becomes the spiritual guide and confidant of the
criminal, Matthew Poncelet (Sean Penn).
     Poncelet (a hybridized, fictional character), along with a friend,
raped and murdered a teenage girl along with her boyfriend back in 1988. 
Poncelet was convicted and sentenced to death.  His execution rapidly
approaching, Poncelet struck out to find anyone who could help him file
his appeals and requests for pardon hearings.  Enter Helen Prejean and the
beginning of DEAD MAN WALKING.
     As Helen helps Poncelet through the legal circus, she tries to get
him to confess his sins and admit his guilt.  Poncelet forcefully refuses,
and Helen quickly finds herself as hated by the public as Poncelet is. 
Interacting with the slain teens' families takes her into their world,
filled with remorse and seething with anger.  And all the while,
Poncelet's execution looms closer and closer.
     Tim Robbins wrote and directed DEAD MAN WALKING, based on Helen's own
book of the same name.  While the film is flawed (it starts off slow, it's
talky and repetitive, and Robbins really isn't much of a director), it
really starts to grow on you as the relationship between Helen and
Poncelet becomes curiouser and curiouser.  At first, Poncelet appears to
be nothing more than a common hood, who isn't worth saving at all and who
evokes no sympathy.  But Helen takes this man and crafts him into
something that, while not quite "good," is genuinely remorseful and,
maybe, worthy of redemption .  By the end of the picture, the movie comes
together quite nicely.
     Sarandon and Penn are to be commended for their fine performances,
but the story itself is the real star, showing us the harrowing reality of
the execution process and the raw anger that it creates.  It probably
isn't for everyone, but DEAD MAN WALKING is a tale that needs to be heard
and that will likely provide material for hours of philosophical debate.
     And what's more fitting for the holidays than a good execution movie,
anyway?
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://www.notes.tpoint.net/emporium/
-Contributing Editor, FEEDBACK  /  http://www.eden.com/~feedback/
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Dog Park (1998)
     It is rare that a great actress (Garofalo) will make two *really*
bad movies, back to back.  It is even rarer that those two movies will
premiere on the same day.  And what are the odds that those two films
will star brothers (eg. Luke Wilson in this movie and Owen Wilson in THE
MINUS MAN)?
     According to my astrologer/numerologist, it's an 18 billion to one
shot.
     And yet it happened here, when two of the worst films to grace the
silver screen have been star-crossed in this conflagration of irony.
     There's very little worth writing about in DOG PARK.  Ex-Kid in the
Hall Bruce McCulloch wrote, directed, and starred in this paean to
canines, where a bunch of singles in what looks like Boston meet around
the local dog park and embark on a romantic affair here and there.
Central to this epic saga are Lorna (Henstridge, looking really bizarre
with a short hairdo) and Andy (Wilson, playing dumb, as he did in HOME
FRIES).  Garofalo and McCulloch make another couple, and various other
people intersect the four romantically, all with very little in the way
of a point or anything funny -- and with *zero* chemistry in the entire
lot.
     As a fan of `Kids in the Hall,' this is quite a disappointment.  Of
course, BRAIN CANDY, McCulloch's other writing credit, wasn't a whole
lot better.  And watch for SUPERSTAR, McCulloch's *next* directorial
outing, next week.
     A couple of one-liners here and there, and a notable supporting
role by McKinney as a dog trainer/psychologist earn DOG PARK its half a
star, but believe me, these 93 minutes feel like an eternity with nary a
laugh to be heard.
     Not convinced yet?  Here's the teaser copy from DOG PARK's Web
site:  `I think Andy starts to fall in love with Lorna when she pukes on
him.'
Director: Bruce McCulloch
Producer: Leonard Goldberg
Writer: Bruce McCulloch
Starring: Natasha Henstridge, Luke Wilson, Jeneane Garofalo, Bruce
McCulloch, Kathleen Robertson, Mark McKinney
http://www.lionsgate-ent.com/lionsgatefilms/dog_park.htm
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
LOCK, STOCK, AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS has been described as the British
PULP FICTION, and on the surface, that would seem like an accurate
depiction.  It's got the usual cross-section of characters with witty
tongues involved in varied illegal activities, that get themselves into
very peculiar situations in which no one really survives unscathed. 
Nonetheless, the film seems to be missing something that characterized
its predecessor.  And right now, you're getting the feeling that I'm
about to quickly file LOCK, STOCK as another Tarantino homage/copy-cat
crime, but that's not quite it either.
LOCK, STOCK is in fact, probably the best film since PULP FICTION in
which there are no really good guys.  Like PULP FICTION, LOCK, STOCK
begins with what would seem to be a simple story, that quickly careens
out of control.  In this case, four buddies; Tom, Eddie, Bacon, and
Soap, pool their money together to back can't lose Eddie at an
unbeknownst-to-them rigged game of cards.  Of course they get fleeced,
and end up in heavy debt to the local heavy.  What follows is a madcap
plan to recoup the money by intercepting a heist Eddie has fortuitously
discovered his neighbor is carrying out.  The interrelation of the
problems with the original heist, along with the interception of it by
Eddie's gang, and a couple of other local illegal activities result in a
frantic circle of destruction.
Though the web of illegal activity is obviously reminiscent of PULP
FICTION, where LOCK, STOCK most significantly strays from its de facto
blue print is in theme.  In Tarantino's masterpiece, the theme was
essentially that there was no theme, no morality.  In the gritty
underworld, outcome is random.  While Samuel L. Jackson is divinely
saved and given a second chance to "walk the earth like Kane in Kung
Fu," his partner in the guise of John Travolta is sentenced to death on
a toilet.  In this incarnation, the badder they are, the worse their
fate seems to be, which often is death.
The real question now, is why have I rambled on without making much
comment on the quality of the movie.  The answer of course, is that I
don't have much to say.  LOCK, STOCK is end the end one of those films
that pretty much leaves you when you leave it.  You can talk about the
witty plot, and the funny lines, but in the end, I guess a movie with o
one to really root for (I guess we do root for our four pals a little)
leaves you in the end without too much invested.  So we leave it like we
left PULP FICTION before it, by walking out of the theater and saying,
"Wow, that was pretty cool," and not thinking of it after that.  (Of
course, as with PULP FICTION, some could always take a deeper shine to
it.)
http://www.lockstock2barrels.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)
     Kathy Bates and Jennifer Jason Leigh have returned in a new Steven
King film, DOLORES CLAIBORNE.  Another departure from typical King
fare, this is a tense psychological drama and character study, akin to
last year's THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION (also based on his work).
     Set on a depressed and perpetually wet island off the coast of
Maine, Dolores Claiborne (Bates) is the focus of the film.  Looming in
her past is a secret:  she may or may not have killed her abusive
husband (played in flashbacks by David Strathairn).  In the present,
Dolores has apparently been driven to madness by her husband and her
employer Vera, the elderly woman for whom Dolores nursemaids.  At the
film's opening, we are presented with what appears to be Vera's death
by Dolores's weathered hands.
     This all sets the tone for the ensuing investigation, in which Max
Von Sydow plays the investigator "thwarted" by Dolores during his
investigation of her husband's death eighteen years earlier.  Selena
(Leigh), Dolores's similarly insane daughter shows up to help out in
the crisis.
     What follows is pretty much predictable.  After a promising start,
the film begins to rely on way-over-the-top acting, culminating in the
worst courtroom scene in years, to get its point across (basically:
abuse is bad).  Clocking in at well over two hours, DOLORES CLAIBORNE
is far too long for the audience to stare at the same dull grey sky and
dead landscapes, while its stars deadpan for the camera.
     Thematically simplistic, DOLORES CLAIBORNE is a mildly interesting
story with some memorable characters.  It's not what we've come to
expect from King, and it is a step in the right direction, away from
the author's customary schlock horror.  But with another King story
playing in theaters now as well (THE MANGLER), it doesn't look like
he's changed his evil ways.

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
     The time travel/time bending genre always seems worn out.  The very
topic lends itself to the production of hacky movies like Millennium,
and yet I am constantly surprised to see one film after another making
good on the hidden promise of the genre.  Witness the Back to the Future
series and the powerful 12 Monkeys.  As it turns out, mucking with time
actually pays off more often than not!
     Not only is Frequency a good flick, it's fully worthy of a place
among one of the best timetwisters ever made.
     Incorrectly being marketed as a sci-fi movie (not to mention
poorly-titled and bearing the dumb tagline "What if it changed
everything?"), Frequency is the story of a father and son, reunited
across time through a ham radio and the rare appearance of the aurora
borealis over Queens.
     In 1969, Dad Frank (Dennis Quaid) is a star firefighter with a
loving family.  30 years later, his son John (Jim Caviezel) is a NYC
cop.  When John, just about scraping the bottom of his life, finds his
long-dead dad's old radio set in a footlocker, he plugs it in and hears
a mysterious voice on the other end.  As you can imagine, beyond all
expectation, it's his father communicating from back in time... the day
before he is about to die.
     Frequency soon becomes infinitely more complex when John tells
Frank of his imminent demise.  "Go the other way" in that burning
warehouse, and he would have lived.  A skeptical Frank tests Jim's
prognostications (the "Amazin' Mets" World Series being the backdrop for
the 1969 action), and when the warehouse fire materializes as promised,
Frank decides to take the advice, surviving the blaze.
     All those geeky "what if" questions you may have had about mucking
with the past are addressed in Frequency, with much of the film taking
on the form of a whodunit, as father and son try to find a serial killer
that crops up when Frank's survival alters the course of history.  The
twists and turns are fascinating and unpredictable; in fact, Frequency
marks one of the extremely few times I've watched a movie where I
honestly had no idea what was going to happen next.
     Even more amazing is that Frequency marks writer Toby Emmerich's
first script: Emmerich is actually a music executive at New Line
Cinema!  Director Gregory Hoblit's best-known work is probably that dog
of a movie Primal Fear, and he's come up with genius here.  And the
acting is first-rate, especially Quaid, who I haven't seen shine in a
decade.  Altogether, if there is any justice in the world, Frequency
should become this year's Sixth Sense.
Director: Gregory Hoblit
Producer: Bill Carraro, Toby Emmerich, Gregory Hoblit, Howard W. Koch
Jr.
Writer: Toby Emmerich
Starring: Dennis Quaid, Jim Caviezel, Shawn Doyle, Elizabeth Mitchell,
André Braugher, Frank McAnulty, Noah Emmerich
http://www.frequencymovie.com/
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Kids (1995)
     So much hype has surrounded KIDS, the gritty, "not rated" feature about
New York teens, that it was almost impossible to go into the film
objectively.  I was expecting an ultra-graphic film about sex, drugs, and
life on the mean city streets.  That's about what I got.
     The film follows a few characters through one day in New York City.
Telly (Leo Fitzpatrick) and his buddy Casper (Justin Pierce) skateboard, do
a little petty thievery, drink malt liquor, hustle drugs, beat up a black
man, throw some dice, and if a virgin or two happen to cross their path,
Telly is only too happy to perform a little "virgin surgery."  On their
trail is Jennie (Chloe Sevigny), a prior virginal conquest of Telly's, who
discovers she is HIV-positive that morning and is on the verge of a nervous
breakdown.
     When the boys aren't wandering, they're talking.  And when they're
talking, it is *always* about sex.  Written by 19-year old Harmony Korine,
the dialogue is completely on the mark yet is totally disgusting.  Too bad
there's no one around to wash some mouths out with soap.
     The film is shocking, not because the subject matter is foreign to us,
but rather, because for all intents and purposes, these really are KIDS,
barely into puberty.  The movie is shot almost like a documentary, and the
sheer "realness" of the picture is what has parents, teens, Bob Dole, and
the MPAA staring with their mouths agape.
     Although watching these disgusting kids do disgusting things over and
over gets old after awhile, the movie is unforgettable.  The cast assembled
here is rough and unpolished--perfect for the subject matter.  Director
Larry Clark brings his skill at photography to brilliant use, showing the
underbelly of New York in all its seamy squalor.
     "There's nothing in the world to worry about."  This is one of the many
lines in Telly's arsenal when soothing his virgins during their initiation.
It's also the most frightening statement in the film, showing just how sad
the state of youth in America really is these days.  Deeply shocking and
disturbing, this film's hype exists for a reason.
-Christopher Null / null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Film Critic, Screenwriter, Novelist (Mailing list available)

Title
Review for White Squall (1996)
     You have to respect any movie with enough guts to use the word
"squall" in its title.  Brought to us by stellar director Ridley Scott
(BLADE RUNNER, THELMA & LOUISE), and pitched as "DEAD POETS SOCIETY on a
boat," WHITE SQUALL ends up as a passable film, but won't being going down
as one of the director's best productions, much less an equal to POETS.
     WHITE SQUALL is the true story of the Albatross, a ship carrying 13
boys as students of the Ocean Academy, a school-at-sea on which
Christopher Sheldon (Jeff Bridges) is the captain.  Setting sail in 1960
for a year-long voyage "half way around the world and back," the boys
learn about discipline, facing ones fears, the joys of Danish schoolgirls,
alcohol, venereal disease, and they occasionally even find some time to
study.
     In a completely unexpected turn of events (never mind the TV
commercials) near the end of the tour, the ship encounters a mythical
"white squall" (basically a mini-hurricane) and capsizes.  (I won't spoil
the ensuing aftermath like every other review you'll read.)
     WHITE SQUALL is really hard to get in to, and it's even harder to
like.  For a full hour, the ship is docked, and we explore the
coming-of-age of these kids who are just absolutely hideous:  there's the
fighting, taunting, vomiting, dolphin-killing, pants-wetting, and
toilet-exploding that makes the film seem like it should have starred
ex-"Saturday Night Live" cast members.  (As it is, the 13 boys are almost
exactly alike with the exception of 1 or 2 with actual personalities.) 
And it's not just gross, it's predictable and over-simplistic.
     This is all bad, yes, but believe me, you'll forget all about it when
The Big Storm hits and the film reaches its watery climax.  Scott really
jumps into the film here, regaining his old sense of suspense,
constructing an intricate and visually stunning sequence of events that
lead to the gripping climax:  the sinking of the Albatross.  These are
probably the best action scenes ever filmed on water, and they fully
redeem the film for its earlier failures.
     While the denouement is basically another bummer of a letdown, you'll
still be coming off that adrenaline rush from the "squall scenes."  Extra
points if you even remember the ending after you leave...or any of the
rest of the film, for that matter.
-Christopher Null  /  null@utxvms.cc.utexas.edu
-Movie Emporium (reviews)  /  http://cca2.carrington.com/emporium/
-Screenwriter / Novelist / Publisher
-E-mail requests to join the movie review mailing list

Title
Review for Touch of Evil (1958)
God, I love Charlton Heston movies.  He can always be relied on to give
an, er, square-jawed performance. He's appropriately square-jawed here,
with a pencil-thin moustache and a swaggering demeanor.  Yes, sir.  You
want to make a compulsively watchable movie, you throw old Chuck a bone
and cast him in the lead role.
On top of that, Touch of Evil makes him a Mexican!  I love it! Charlton
Heston plays a Mexican detective!
Now that I've got that out of my system, on with my review.
Everyone who has seen Touch of Evil justifiably remembers that one long
opening shot, the one that feels like it runs for twenty minutes.  It's
nothing short of exceptional.  Pure pulp.  A bomb is placed in the back
seat of a car, and we follow this car through the dilapidated city
streets of Los Robles, a rusty old town on the border of Mexico.
As the car cruises round, we see shifty locals in dirty t-shirts and
scarlet women lounging in doorways, second-rate clubs and seedy hotels.
E nter newlywed cop Mike Vargas (our man Heston) and his no-nonsense
wife, Susan (Janet Leigh), just in town on their honeymoon.  Why they've
chosen the armpit of the earth is anyone's guess.
We cut away to the car as it explodes.  The dramatic effect is
undeniable.  Moving from that hypnotic long take which went up and down
streets, allowing characters to move in and out of the camera's range,
to an abrupt cut to the explosion and flames is bold, exciting, and pure
Orson Welles.
Welles wound up directing this film when Heston made a big fuss over
it.  The studio originally intended him to only be involved as an actor,
playing the shady, overweight, degenerate junkie of a sheriff, Quinlan. 
He shows up on the scene shortly after the explosion, and he doesn't hit
it off with Vargas.  See, it's Quinlan's beat, and that's that.  He
gruffly considers it an open and shut case and when Vargas promises not
to cause any trouble, Quinlan chomps on his cigar and sneers, "You bet
your sweet life you won't."
It's mano a mano, shot in slightly canted close-ups that seem to bring
out their intense eyes and beads of sweat.  Immediately, we know where
this story is going.  Vargas, being a good man with an inherent sense of
decency, can't let it go (even though he's just married).  We know these
men will be involved in a battle, and that the local sheriff is clearly
in on the scheme.  The big question is, how far will they go?
Quinlan proceeds to work in cahoots with the local gangsters to frame
Vargas in a drug scandal and lure his wife to a remote hotel where she
will be drugged and held hostage.  Things move at a breakneck pace, with
Welles' trademark eye for strong visuals, unusual low-angle
cinematography, and impenetrable shadows.
Two versions of the film are available on video, but for the purposes
of this review let's discuss the director's cut, newly available on
video and DVD.  The studio had final cut of the project back in 1958,
and made changes based on what they felt was either too risqué or too
"intelligent" (to put it bluntly) for an audience to handle.  As always,
they assumed the worst from the masses.
The original cut is still a fine piece of work.  The opening shot
remains intact, you've got credible performances from the leads, and an
eclectic rogue's gallery in the supporting cast.  However, Welles felt
so passionate about some of the small (and cumulative) details within
the film that he wrote a 58-page memo to the studio heads begging for
crucial changes.
That famous opening shot no longer has the original music or credits
overlaid, instead using the sounds of the street and the distant club
music in the background.  During those scenes where poor Janet Leigh is
trapped in a hotel (she always seems to run into trouble in roadside
hotels) there are stronger implications that she was raped by those
blank-faced goons who terrorize her in the bedroom, merely by lingering
on each menacing shot a little longer.
There's also a moment between Quinlan and a gypsy woman who reads
fortunes (played in a cameo by Marlene Dietrich).  In the original cut,
lighthearted music treats her like a joke -- your standard comic relief
role.  In this new cut, that hokey music is removed and the lingering
close-ups show a quiet despair under the interactions over how Quinlan
is getting fat on her chili and "the pianola sure brings back memories."
It's subtle character shading which adds depth and meaning to Quinlan,
a small moment in his backstory which showed his aspiration for
something close to love.  In the studio cut, since the fortune teller is
treated like a fool to be laughed at, Quinlan remains a comic brute when
he's not an outright murderous villain.  In Welles' cut, he arouses some
small touch of pathos which pays off in the final confrontation with
Vargas.
Sadly, after the debacle over Touch of Evil, Orson Welles found his
directorial privileges revoked in Hollywood.  As a filmmaker, he never
worked in the town again.  (The fortune teller even says, in a prophetic
moment, "Your future is all used up.")
To his credit, Orson Welles made a class act potboiler which still
feels fresh and exciting over forty years later.  It's pure gritty
entertainment, like a fine Jim Thompson novel or a shot of tequila.  He
conjures up a vivid atmosphere and plants himself right in the center
opposite a formidable foe -- our favorite Mexican, Charlton Heston. 
What could be more exciting than that?
Director: Orson Welles
Producer: Albert Augsmith
Writer: Orson Welles
Starring: Orson Welles, Charlton Heston, Janet Leigh, Joseph Calleia,
Akim Tamiroff, Marlene Dietrich, Dennis Weaver
---
Jeremiah Kipp - kipp@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Multiplicity (1996)
     I hate it when a film *sounds* like it's going to be great, has a
hilarious teaser-trailer, stars some wonderful actors, features a small
role played by the daughter of one of my film review subscribers, and ends
up falling a bit flat on the screen.
     Such is the case with MULTIPLICITY, the new Harold Ramis-Michael
Keaton comedy about a guy who clones himself in order to get a little free
time.
     Doug (Keaton) is a construction contractor with way to much
responsibility at work and not enough time to do it.  His wife (Andie
MacDowell) never sees hubby, and neither do the kids.  Doug's stress is
getting so severe that he seems on the verge of a breakdown, and eventually
he does so -- a couple of times -- before being talked into having himself
cloned by a doctor in Malibu.
     Doug #2 (Keaton) is a gruff mensch who takes over Doug's job and never
looks back.  Deciding that still isn't enough, Doug opts for another in #3
(Keaton), who takes on the personality of a fey househusband obsessed with
souffl=E9s, Tupperware, and the non-crumpledness of aluminum foil.  And when
#2 and #3 decide they don't have enough time themselves, they get together
to clone #4 (Keaton), who doesn't turn out quite as sharp as expected,
shaving his tongue and keeping pizza in his wallet.
     Yes, it *does* sound funny, and Keaton does some of his best work
here, hamming it up to an extreme -- particularly with the fall-down funny
#3:  the Martha Stewart inside all of us.
     But what to do about that darned script?  Rewrite after rewrite has
taken its obvious toll, and the thing comes off as shredded as a bowl of
cole slaw, with very funny moments (watch for "Vista de Nada") interspersed
with lifeless exposition.  Keaton does his best, but it isn't enough to
maintain more than a mild chuckle-average during the course of the film.
     Also of note:  MULTIPLICITY has the dubious honor of being the second
movie in a row that Andie MacDowell stars in that she did not
single-handedly ruin (the first being UNSTRUNG HEROES).  Let's hear it for
Andie!
     But I found the most interesting part of the movie's premise painfully
avoided, and I'll ask it here for the reader to ponder:  Just how much
*does* it cost to get a clone?
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Title
Review for Paragraph 175 (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Robert Strohmeyer.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/61643a1b84f35f7c88256936001fa860?OpenDocument
There have been hundreds of Holocaust documentaries in our time, and
Paragraph 175 is certainly one of them. The new angle here is that, for
what may be the first time, homosexual survivors of the Holocaust
atrocities have come forward-some hesitantly-to tell their stories. The
problem, shameful as it is to admit, is that the flood of Holocaust
documentaries that came before have stripped this film of its potential
fire and intensity. From beginning to end, I caught myself thinking,
"Yes, these are horrible stories. Now tell me something new." And that
something never came.
The film gets its title from Paragraph 175 of the German Penal Code of
1871, which states, "An unnatural sex act committed between persons of
male sex or by humans with animals is punishable by imprisonment; the
loss of civil rights may also be imposed." According to the film, this
law was later modified by the Nazi party to include a broader definition
of homosexuality and, of course, the loss of civil rights was uniformly
imposed. It was finally abolished in 1969.
For obvious reasons, Paragraph 175 might be called a groundbreaking
documentary. It is, for example, a rare examination of Nazi-era
homosexuality (like Cabaret without the singing). The direct,
charismatic subjects of Dr. Klaus Müller's interviews (most of whom are
in their 90's) display a degree of comfort in their own sexuality that
is disarming and fresh. The film does great credit to the world's gay
communities in that it exposes a deep and joyous human spirit within the
men it introduces. And, within that spirit, there is sorrow and shame.
The shame of these victims lies not in their sexual preferences, but in
the horrible punishments they endured. One man reveals in a trembling
voice that his ass still bleeds from the tortures he endured.
It is important that the horrors of the Nazis be documented, but it is
also important that each subsequent film continues to delve to new
depths and challenge the revelations of those that came before, lest we
become desensitized to the information itself. Paragraph 175 does take
on relatively fresh subject matter, but it painfully short in the
revelation department. It only corroborates what we already know about
the horrors of that time-and vaguely, too. The narrative, ultimately, is
restrained and impotent.
The salvation of this picture is the humanity it contains. The men we
meet here are vital and smart, reminiscing fondly about their youth, and
morosely about the tragedies they've suffered. And, in the end, it is
their spirit that touches us.
http://www.tellingpictures.com/films/5.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Stealing Beauty (1996)
     STEALING BEAUTY is a *bad* movie.  Bernardo Bertolucci, the Academy
Award-winning director of 1987's THE LAST EMPEROR, is dead.  He has been
replaced with a hormonal and juvenile kid, masquerading as a filmmaker,
desperately trying to appeal to a cerebral audience yet maintaining enough
accessibility for the moviegoing public.
     STEALING BEAUTY fails miserably on both counts.
     The story is simple, after you put it together (Susan Minot's script
hides the real plot for a good hour).  Liv Tyler plays Lucy, a 19-year old
virginal American who travels to Italy to lounge around with old family
friends, talk about her dead poetess mother, and find her sexual awakening.
Or, HOW TO MAKE AN ITALIAN QUILT.  Lucy moves in with about a dozen bizarre
characters -- I have no idea who they are or why they are together except
that some of them new her mother -- some are English, some American, some
Italian -- they're just living in a big villa in Italy -- and Lucy
basically makes herself at home.  A lot of people have a lot of sex, and
Lucy watches or listens to a lot of this, when she isn't posing half-naked
for a statue being carved in her image.  As Jerry Seinfeld would say, "Who
*are* these people!?"
     On screen, this set of situations is as ridiculous as it looks on
paper.  The movie makes little or no sense, being at its heart a far-too
simplistic tale of a girl losing her virginity that is told in a far-too
roundabout way so as to make even this fact almost lost upon the viewer.
     The story is so simple, yet at the same time, Tyler's character is
wholly unbelievable as a real person.  Quite frankly, she is contradicted
in her actions with every progressive scene.  Whether this is Tyler's fault
or the script is anyone's guess.
     As for the titular BEAUTY, there ain't a whole lot of it around,
unless you consider scenes of Lucy drooling, Lucy looking at a bidet, Lucy
talking with her mouth full, Lucy singing off-key, and Lucy vomiting as
"beautiful."  *Stealing* beauty?  You can have it!  And you can keep Liv
Tyler as an actress altogether as far as I'm concerned.  (Am I the only one
who had the misfortune of seeing SILENT FALL?)
     In fact, the only real beauty in the film is Bertolucci's
ultra-stylish/ ultra-cutesy photography, which ultimately does little to
enhance the story.  (Note to the producers:  *please* cut out the
superimposition of Lucy's poetry on the screen while she looks wistfully
into the camera.)  And lest you think I'm too negative, the only decent
character in the film is the terminally ill Alex (Jeremy Irons).  I have no
idea *why* he was in the movie, but his scenes were the only watchable
ones, and he's the only likable character.
     Bertolucci tries to win us over by showing a lot of naked people, but
I certainly wasn't sucked in.  In fact, I was just shocked at the amount of
lechery and sluttiness that goes on that is essentially *endorsed* by the
film.
     My favorite line in the picture:  "What am I doing here with these
kids?"  I couldn't have said it better myself.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com/
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm
